(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“After fans pointed out it was the first time Underwood had been photographed since her accident, Gang reassured them that she looked “amazing” and added that she had “no clue” Underwood was injured.”
“...not quite looking the same However several weeks earlier on Dec 12 Below Deck alum Adrienne Gang posted a photo of herself posing with Underwood at the gym...”
“I ll spare you the gruesome details but when I came out of surgery the night of my fall the doctor told Underwood s husband Mike that he had put between 40 and 50 stitches in Seven weeks after the accident Underwood said that she s on the mend but...”
““It’s crazy how a freak random accident can change your life.”She continued: “In addition to breaking my wrist, I somehow managed to injure my face as well.”
““There is also another part of the story that I haven’t been ready to talk about since I have still been living it and there has been much uncertainty as to how things will end up,” she wrote in a note to her fan club members.”
“However, it wasn't until New Year's Eve that Underwood, 35, revealed the fall also caused severe cuts to her face.”
“The country star fell outside her Nashville home, resulting in a broken her wrist.”
“Carrie Underwood is on the road to recovery after suffering a scary accident in November that left her with more than 40 stitches in her face.”


"After fans pointed out that this was the first time Underwood had been photographed after the accident, they just assured them that Underwood looked" amazing "and added that she" didn't know "Underwood was injured."
“… It looks different, but a few weeks ago, on December 12, Adrian just released a photo of herself and Underwood in the gym... "
"I don't want to tell you the terrible details, but the night I came out of the operating room, the doctor told Underwood's husband, Mike, that he had 40 to 50 stitches in seven weeks after the accident. Underwood said she was recovering, but..."
"It's crazy that a strange random accident can change your life." "Besides breaking my wrist, I managed to hurt my face," she added
"There's still a part of the story I'm not ready to talk about because I'm still living in it and there's a lot of uncertainty about the outcome," she wrote in a letter to members of the fan club
"However, it was not until new year's Eve that Underwood, 35, revealed that the fall also caused severe cuts to his face."
The country star fell in front of his home in Nashville and broke his wrist
"Carrie Underwood, who suffered a terrible accident last November and had more than 40 stitches on her face, is on her way to recovery."



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Although her children are all growing up and have each entered their teenage years, Kate admitted in a recent Kate Plus 8 TLC promo that she still worries about their pasts, presents and futures.”
“I love you guys!” she continued.”
““I love you all and NO MATTER WHAT it requires of me, I will ALWAYS be there for you; I’ll always be your biggest cheerleader, your role model by example, your shoulder to cry on, the hug and laugh you need, and your mommy and friend!”
“At this moment (7:51-7:53 am) 13 years ago, my life and heart were completed with your births!” the Kate Plus 8 star began.”
““HAPPY 13th BIRTHDAY, my precious Alexis, Hannah, Aaden, Collin, Leah and Joel!”
“WATCH: Story Behind the Story: A Lesson Kate Gosselin Had to Learn the Hard WayThis past May, the former couple’s sextuplets turned 13, and Kate shared a heartfelt Instagram post to celebrate the milestone.”
“They finalized their divorce in 2009.”
“Collin Hannah Leah and Joel each 13”
“No one was arrested and the daughter did go home with the father after she expressed that was her desire to do The former Jon Kate Plus 8 stars welcomed eight children over the course of their 10 year marriage twins Mady and Cara both 16 and sextuplets Aaden Alexis...”
““The call came in at 1:10 this afternoon for a verbal domestic argument … over the custody of one of their 13-year-old daughters,” a Wyomissing Police Department spokesperson told Entertainment Tonight.”


"Although her children are growing up and everyone is entering puberty, Kate admitted in a recent Kate plus 8 TLC Promo that she is still worried about their past, gifts and future."
"I love you! "She continued
"I love all of you, no matter what you ask of me, I will always be by your side; I will always be your biggest cheerleader, your example, your crying shoulders, the hugs and laughter you need, as well as your mother and friends!"
"At this moment 13 years ago (7:51-7:53), my life and soul ended with your birth! "Kate eight starts."
"Happy 13th birthday, my dear Alexis, Hannah, Eden, Colin, Leah and Joel!"
"Observation: the story behind the story: a lesson Kate Gosselin had to learn in the past may. The former couple's sextuples are 13 years old, and Kate shared a heartfelt instagram post to celebrate this milestone."
"They finalized the divorce agreement in 2009."
"Colin Hannah Leah and Joel are 13 years old each"
"No one was arrested. The daughter did go home with her father because she expressed her wish. The former Jon katega eight stars had eight children in their 10-year marriage. The twins, Maddy and Kara, are both 16 years old and have sextuples, Eden Alexis..."
"This call was made at 1:10 this afternoon for a family verbal quarrel About custody of their 13-year-old daughter, "a Wyoming police spokesman told entertainment tonight



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“[h/t E!]”
“Let us all aspire to someday reach this level of extra.”
“OnlineWhile Karl Benz may be credited as the inventor of the first automobile, let the history books reflect that Khloe Kardashian single-handedly reinvented driver's license photos in the year 2017.”
“E!”
“Flawless.”
“And the end result?”
“Malika Haqq, meanwhile, was on-hand to give Khloe a few glam touchups before the photo session.”
“OnlineKUWTK lighting director Landon Hosto was there to direct the photo session and hold up a giant round lighting fixture around Khloe's face—which surely the folks at the DMV really enjoyed.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
“[h/t E！ ]”
"Let's all aspire to that extra level one day."
"While Karl Benz may be considered the inventor of the first car, let history books reflect that Khloe Kardashian reinvented the driver's license photo in 2017 on his own."
“E！”
"Perfect."
"What happened?"
"At the same time, Malika Huck made some beautiful decorations for heloy before taking the photo."
"Landon hosto, lighting director of onlinekuwtk, was on the scene to guide the photo taking session, and held a huge circular lighting device on Khloe's face. People in the vehicle management office must like it very much."



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They plan to honeymoon in Tahiti.”
“Dugal, who is a nurse at Duke University Hospital, wore a gown by Morilee.”
“I support her dreams and she supports mine.”His song, “This Is it,’ is about their relationship and his proposal which he pulled off in a secluded spot on Grandfather Mountain about 200 miles northwest of Garner, a Raleigh suburb.”
““That kind of story doesn’t happen too often nowadays.”
““We’ve been dating six years and have known each other our whole lives,” McCreery told People.”
“The pair first met in kindergarten in their hometown of Garner, North Carolina.”
“The Season 10 “American Idol” winner wed Gabi Dugal in the North Carolina mountains Saturday, People reported.”
“Story highlights The pair wed Saturday They first met in kindergarten(CNN) —Their love story inspired his song and this weekend Scotty McCreery married his longtime girlfriend.”
“Singer Scotty McCreery and Gabi Dugal attend the 53rd Academy of Country Music Awards on April 15, 2018, in Las Vegas.”


"They plan to honeymoon in Tahiti."
Dugar was a nurse at Duke University Hospital, wearing a molieri robe
"I support her dream, and she supports mine." His song "this is it" is about their relationship and his proposal. He proposed in a quiet place on grandfather hill, 200 miles northwest of Ghana, a suburb of Raleigh
"This kind of story doesn't happen very often now."
"We've been dating for six years, and we've known each other all our lives," mcleary told people
They first met at a kindergarten in their hometown of Ghana, North Carolina
The 10th season american idol champion married Gaby Dugar in the mountains of North Carolina on Saturday, according to people
"The story focuses on Saturday's wedding when they first met at the kindergarten (CNN) - their love story inspired him to sing, and this weekend Scotty mcleary married his girlfriend of many years."
"Singers Scotty mcleary and Gaby Dugar attended the 53rd Academy of country music awards in Las Vegas on April 15, 2018."



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Bloom is starring as Will Turner in Pirates of the Caribbean: Dead Men Tell No Tales which opened this weekend.”
“They have one son, Flynn.”
“Kerr and British actor Orlando Bloom were married for six years but split in 2013.”
“This will be Kerr's second marriage and Spiegel's first.”
“Kerr, 34, posted news of her engagement to the billionaire Spiegel, 26, in July on Instagram with a black-and-white photo of her engagement ring and the caption, "I said, 'Yes!!!'”
“The nuptials took place in Spiegel's backyard with around 40 guests, according to People.”
“News reported.”
“Bryan AlexanderUSA TODAYAustralian supermodel Miranda Kerr married Snapchat CEO and founder Evan Spiegel tied the knot Saturday in an intimate ceremony, People.com and E!”


"Bloom will play will Turner in Pirates of the Caribbean: the dead don't tell stories, which will be released this weekend."
"They have a son, Flynn."
"Kerr and British actor Orlando Bloom were married for six years, but broke up in 2013."
"This will be Kerr's second marriage and Mingjing's first."
Cole, 34, announced her engagement to 26 year old billionaire Der Spiegel on instagram in July, along with a black-and-white photo and caption of her engagement ring. "I said," yes!! "
"According to people familiar with the matter, the wedding was held in the backyard of Mingjing, with about 40 guests."
"News coverage."
Today, Australian supermodel Miranda Kerr married snapchat CEO and founder Evan Spiegel in an intimate ceremony. People.com and E! "



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— Continue the conversation with Matt Young on Facebook or Twitter.”
“Despite promising she’s not using, viewers on the hit reality show, on which Ms Evans has appeared since 2011, aren’t so sure.”
“We are writing down your information.’”She said that when Child Protective Services arrived for the wellness check, they closed the case soon after.”
“We are not here to judge.”
“I can’t eat.’ And they said, ‘OK, some mums do that.”
““I said, ‘I have really bad esophageal spasms and I throw up every five minutes.”
““I said, ‘I did within the past 30 days,’” she explained.”
“Ms Evans said the chemical compound was found shortly after she had given birth to her daughter just over one year ago after Child Protective Services asked her if she had smoked during her pregnancy.”
“Daughter Ensley did not test positive.”
“I tested positive for THC,” the reality star, 26, said.”


"- continue talking to Matt young on Facebook or twitter."
"Despite Evans's promise not to use it, the audience of the popular reality shows that started in 2011 is not sure."
"We're writing down your message." "She said that when the child protection service came for a health check, they closed the case quickly."
"We're not here to judge."
"I can't eat it." They said, "well, some moms do that."
"I said that my esophageal spasm was so severe that I vomited every five minutes."
"I said, 'I've done it in the last 30 days,'" she explained
"Ms. Evans said the compound was discovered shortly after she gave birth to her daughter more than a year ago, when child protection agencies asked her if she smoked during her pregnancy."
"My daughter, ensley, didn't test positive."
"I tested positive for THC," said the 26 year old reality TV star



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...lady, the Old Spice guy and our favorite actors like Dustin Hoffman, John Cleese and Ken Jeong hawking various wares.”
“A clip montage saluting broadcast advertising is a humorous look back at bite-sized pop culture ranging from the "Where's the beef?"”
“Jack Donaghy still rules.”
“It's OK, Alec.”
“He is met with silence.”
“Apparently, Fey had just said to him, "If you know Amy, she's doing Amy."”
“"She's doing Poehler," Baldwin says perplexingly of Best Supporting Actress winner Melissa Leo.”
“Worst Delivery: Alec Baldwin still loves boss and 30 Rock co-star Tina Fey, so much so that he includes one of her jokes in his acceptance speech.”
“Check out all the SAG Awards' fashion hits and misses8.”
“A spacey, dark-lipped Paz de la Huerta commandeers the mic after Steve Buscemi's speech for Boardwalk Empire's drama ensemble win, to thank the people on her own list.”


“… Ladies, spice girls and our favorite actors like Dustin Hoffman, John clise and Ken Cheng are selling all kinds of goods
A montage clip salutes a broadcast ad that is a humorous review from a bite size pop culture "where's the beef?"
"Jack Donaghy is still the rule."
"Never mind, Alec."
"He was silent."
"Obviously, Fei just said to him," if you know Amy, she's being Amy. "
"She's playing poller," Baldwin said bemusedly of best supporting actress winner Melissa Leo
"The worst speech: Alec Baldwin still loves Tina Fey, CO star of boss and rock 30, so much that he added one of her jokes to his acceptance speech."
"Look at all the fashion hits and missed 8 of sag awards."
After Steve Buscemi's winning speech for the theatrical ensemble of "boardwalk Empire," a stout, dark lipped Paz de la Huerta took over the microphone to thank the people on his list



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let's just hope Nick Cannon can keep up.”
“As for Pons, this won't be the last time she plays hostess.”
“Pons is currently in the webseries Amigos, a Latino parody of Friends, alongside fellow YouTubers Rudy Mancuso, Hannah Stocking, Anwar Jibawi, Ana Marte, and Juanpa Zurita.”
“The 22-year-old Venezuelan-American actress first cut her teeth on Vine, and now has a widely popular YouTube account, which boasts over 10,000,000 subscribers.”
“So how did she end up co-hosting the Teen Choice Awards?”
“"LATINA AND PROUD," her Twitter bio reads, in part.”
“According to an interview she did with The Cut last year, Pons was born in Venezuela and moved to Miami with her parents when she was 5.”
“The next season of the singing competition show airs Oct. 14, per Variety.”
“The content creator is set to be the next host of La Voz... México — the Mexican version of The Voice.”
“And, per another Entertainment Tonight report, Bebe Rexha will perform "I'm a Mess," her hit single.”


"I hope Nick Cannon can keep up."
"As for Pang, it won't be the last time she'll be a hostess."
"Pons now appears in Webseries Amigos, a Latin American imitation of friends, along with YouTube's peers Rudy Mancuso, Hannah stocking, Anwar jibawi, Ana Marte and juanpa Zurita."
The 22-year-old Venezuelan American actress cut her teeth for the first time on vine and now has a popular YouTube account with more than 10000000 subscribers
"So how did she co host the Teen Choice Awards in the end?"
"Latin and pride," she tweeted in her resume section
"According to an interview she gave last year, Ponce was born in Venezuela and moved to Miami with her parents when she was five years old."
"The next season's singing competition will be broadcast on October 14, each variety."
"Content creators will be la voz's next presenter... The voice of Mexico. "
And, according to another report in Entertainment Tonight, babe reisha will sing her hit single "I'm a mess."



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““There was a history of suicidal ideation [in Bennington].“”
““Autopsy findings are characteristic of suicidal hanging,” deputy medical examiner Dr. Christopher Rogers’ report reads.”
“The report coincides with June’s suicide report.”
“A prescription bottle of Zolpidem (the generic version of the sleep aid Ambien) and a small amount of beer was also found in Bennington’s bedroom.”
“An earlier version of this story reported MDMA (ecstasy) was also detected, though TMZ now asserts that after Bennington's blood tested "presumptive positive" for the drug, two subsequent tests disproved this.”
“The findings, published through TMZ, show "a trace amount" of alcohol in the singer's system at the time of death.”
“On Tuesday (Dec. 5), further details have emerged detailing the conditions of Bennington’s death, via autopsy and toxicology results.”
“The tragic, unexpected death of Linkin Park singer Chester Bennington was ruled a suicide by hanging on July 20, when his body was discovered in his Los Angeles home.”


"(in Bennington) had a history of suicidal ideation."
"The autopsy results are characteristic of suicidal hanging," Dr. Christopher Rogers, the associate medical examiner, wrote in his report
"This report coincides with the suicide report in June."
"A bottle of the prescription drug zolpidem and a small amount of beer were also found in Bennington's bedroom."
"The early version of this report also reported MDMA test results, although TMZ now claims that after Bennington's blood test was" presumed positive ", the results of the next two tests proved that."
The singer died with "traces" of alcohol in his body, according to research published by TMZ
"On Tuesday (December 5), the autopsy and toxicology results further detailed the cause of Bennington's death."
On July 20, Lincoln Park singer Chester Bennington was found at his home in Los Angeles and sentenced to hang himself



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Informed opinion: Kim wanted to have an informed opinion about Planned Parenthood'I want to have an opinion on this but I just don't know enough, there's nothing worse…I do like to speak up on social media, I want to be more informed,' she said.”
“In another storyline Kim, 37, wasn't sure which way to sway in the Planned Parenthood debate.”
“Moving in: Kourtney told her sisters how Scott said he wanted to move in with herTotally confused: The reality star admitted she was confused by Scott's behavior'Scott and I are not in a good place, he's been partying…is he serious?'”
“'He's like, ''we could raise the kids together and have an open relationship'',' she balked.”
“She earlier told her siblings how she was fielding requests from Scott to 'move in' with her and their three children.”
“Bad look: The Kardashians thought Scott went to Cannes just to annoy KourtneyParty guy: Scott showed up at the airport with Bella Thorne on his way to CannesKourtney, 38, meanwhile called her ex Scott a 'psychopath' after he threatened to have people attack Younes in Cannes.”
“It's just so ridiculous.'”
“She added: 'Kourtney's genuinely trying to go away and have a good time and he's trying to like freak her out and make Kourtney think there's going to be some crazy drama run-in.”
“'I think it's clear to everyone that Scott's doing this just to try to one-up Kourtney and that seems super malicious,' Kim said.”
“Kim later shared her frustration.”


"Informed opinion: Jin hopes to have an informed opinion on family planning." I want to have an opinion on this, but I just don't know enough. There's nothing worse than that I really like to express my opinions on social media, and I want to get more informed opinions, "she said
"In another story, Kim, 37, is not sure how to swing in the family planning debate."
"Move in: Courtney told her sisters that Scott said he wanted to move in with her and was completely confused: the reality TV star admitted that she was confused about Scott's behavior," Scott and I are not in a good place, he's been gathering Is he serious? '"
"He said," we can raise children together and build an open relationship, "she hesitated
"She told her brothers and sisters earlier how she handled Scott's request to stay with her and their three children."
"Bad appearance: the kardashians think Scott went to Cannes just to annoy the kurtanis: Scott showed up at the airport with Bella Thorne on the way to Cannes, 38 year old Courtney, and called her former Scott a" psychopath "because he threatened that someone would attack you in Cannes."
"That's ridiculous."
"She also said: 'Courtney really wants to leave and have a good time. He wants to frighten her and make Courtney think that there will be some crazy plots on."
"I think it's clear to everyone that Scott did it just to please Courtney, which seems very malicious," king said
"Kim felt the same way later."



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Later in the Woods' brief, it's argues that the word "Nazi" is "inherently imprecise and subject to myriad subjective interpretations" and that "several courts have consistently held that use of the term 'Nazi' is rhetorical hyperbole."”
“"Nor would a reasonable reader interpret Mr. Woods' question — seeking clarification — as inferring any factual content."”
“From attorney Kenneth White the letter states On behalf of my client the defendant referred to as Abe List in the lawsuit filed by James Woods and my client s surviving family I acknowledge that they are not aware of...”
“...any facts to suggest that Mr Woods has ever been a cocaine addict or used any other drugs...”
“To earn this, Woods filed a $10 million libel action in July 2015.”
“The target in the lawsuit was an anonymous Twitter user who responded to Woods' conservative politics by suggesting the actor was a "cocaine addict."”
“In filing the lawsuit, Woods wanted to send a message.”
“"AL, and anyone else using social media to propagate lies and do harm, should take note," stated the complaint handled by Michael Weinsten at Lavely & Singer.”
“"They are not impervious to the law."”
“Woods then beat back an anti SLAPP motion that attempted to make the argument that the cocaine addict tweet was a constitutionally protected political insult the type made routinely by Woods as a well known part of Twitter s culture...”


"At the back of woods' briefing, some people think that the word" Nazi "is" essentially imprecise and influenced by numerous subjective interpretations, "and" several courts have always considered the use of the word "Nazi" rhetorical exaggeration. "
"A reasonable reader will not interpret the question Mr. Woods seeks to clarify as inferring any factual content."
"Lawyer Kenneth white pointed out in the letter on behalf of my client that in the lawsuit filed by James Woods and my client's surviving family, the defendants were called Abe's list, and I admit that they did not know..."
“… Any fact that Mr. Woods was a cocaine addict or used any other drug
"To earn the money, woods filed a $10 million libel lawsuit in July 2015."
"The target of the lawsuit is an anonymous twitter user who responds to woods' conservative political views, suggesting that Woods is a" cocaine addict. "
"When he filed a lawsuit, woods wanted to send a message."
"Al, and anyone else who uses social media to spread lies and hurt others, should be aware," said Michael weinsten of Lavely & singer in a complaint
"They are not free from the law."
"Woods then hit back at an anti slapping bill that tried to prove that cocaine addicts' twitter was a constitutionally protected political insult, which woods, as a well-known part of the twitter culture, often did..."



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s so bizarre and wonderful at the same time.”
“Oh, and who could forget Gomez’s Marie Antionette costume in the middle?”
“This is all before she lounges in her tub and channels her inner pop diva.”
“She shows off her killer bod in her lingerie, dances in a Risky Business ensemble and rides a motorcycle with Christopher Mason, who is extremely good looking.”
““Hands to Myself” is saucy, sexy and full of spice from the singer.”
““Hands to Myself”If you thought Gomez couldn’t do sexy then you haven’t seen this music video.”
“Plus, Gomez plays all of the leads including a man, a cool girl—complete with Farrah Fawcett locks—and your average teen.”
“It takes you back to the ’70s with the style and as Gomez goes through her school day it’s totally relatable.”
““Bad Liar”The 2017 video for “Bad Liar” is one of the most movie-like videos Gomez has ever done.”
“Plus, it’s fun to go back through the “Bad Liar” singer’s videos because it’s like taking a trip back through your childhood AKA it’s a win-win!”


"It's so strange and wonderful at the same time."
"Oh, who can forget the dress of Mary antionet in the middle of Gomez?"
"It's all before she's lying in the bathtub, preparing for her inner pop queen."
"She shows off her killer in her underwear, dances in a risky business ensemble, and rides a motorcycle with the beautiful Christopher Mason."
"My hands" is both sexy and full of singer's interest
"My hand" if you think Gomez can't be sexy, then you didn't see this music video
"In addition, Gomez plays all the leading roles, including a man, a cool girl with Farrah Fawcett lock and your ordinary teenager."
"It takes you back to the style of the 70s and Gomez through her school day, which is totally relevant."
Bad swindler the 2017 bad swindler video is one of the most movie like videos Gomez has ever seen
In addition, it's also interesting to review the video of the "bad liar" singer, because it's like going back to childhood, which is a win-win situation



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Vanessa Hudgens Recalls ‘Kind of Crazy’ Meeting With Michael Jackson (Exclusive)Related Gallery...”
“(Exclusive)Vanessa Hudgens Gets the Royal Treatment in 'The Princess Switch' -- See the Pic!”
“The actress shows off her fit physique on the December cover of Women's Health, in which she discusses her upcoming milestone 30th birthday on Dec. 14.”
“Hudgens says she's in no rush to get married and have kids with Butler, whom she's been dating since 2011.”
““I want to get married, travel, then have kids -- probably in my late 30s,” she says.”
“As for the latest trend of quick celebrity engagements, she notes, "Everyone’s clock is different."”
“Hudgens says that the former Switched at Birth star inspires her more than anyone.”
““We both respect, trust, and admire each other," she shares about what makes their relationship work.”
“"It’s so solid now because I feel strong as an independent woman.”
“I am very self-reliant, but it’s nice to have a best friend you can share victories with as well as losses.”As for currently being in incredible shape, Hudgens credits it to intermittent fasting, following a pescatarian diet and working out at least six days a week.”


"Vanessa Higgins recalls a 'kind of crazy' meeting with Michael Jackson's (exclusive) gallery..."
(exclusive) Vanessa Huggins gets royal treatment in Princess switch - see photo
The actress showed off her healthy physique on the cover of December's women's health magazine, where she discussed the upcoming milestone of her 30th birthday on December 14
"Huggins said that she is not in a hurry to marry Butler and have children. She has been dating Butler since 2011."
"I want to get married, travel and have children - probably in my 30s," she said
As for the latest popular celebrity speed dating, she points out, "everyone's clock is different."
"Huggins said the star, who had been transformed since she was born, inspired her more than anyone else."
"We all respect, trust and admire each other," she said, sharing the reasons for the success of their relationship
"I'm so down-to-earth now because I feel strong as an independent woman."
"I'm very self reliant, but it's good to have a good friend with whom you can share success and failure." As for the current state, Huggins thinks it's due to intermittent fasting, following the pescataria diet and exercising at least six days a week



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— billy eichner (@billyeichner) August 8, 2018”
“— Paul Brittain (@PaulBrittain3) August 8, 2018Hearing from so many millenials today who cannot wait to watch the Oscars now.”
““The film business passed away today,” began Rob Lowe’s tweet (read below for the whole thing).”
“Lowe, of course, had his own Oscar low moment, during his musical number with Snow White in the critically lambasted Allan Carr produced telecast.”
“Finally wrote Andy Richter the Oscars will be giving a statue based on popularity so that those poor mountains of box office money won t be lonely anymore The new award category announced today will honor outstanding achievement in popular film with eligibility requirements and other key details yet to...”
“...be announced...”
“But Hollywood stars and pundits weren’t waiting.”
“Here’s a sampling (we’ll update periodically):Better than a sequel, now that the Academy has added the section for ‘Overlooked Nineties Cult Movies With Squirting Pustules and Rasta Eyeballs’ it’s Oscar gold, baby.”
“...https://t.co/ZLZzLduNCn — Alex Winter (@alxwinter) August 8, 2018The #Oscars are adding a category "Best Popular Film."”
“Good Luck Chuck is coming back in rerelease!”


"- Billy Eichner (@ billieichner) August 8, 2018"
"Paul Brittain (@ Paul brittain3) on August 8, 2018, I heard so many millennials today that they can't wait to see the Oscars."
Rob low's tweet began: "the film industry is dead today."
"Of course, Lowe also has his own Oscar trough, which is in his music duel with snow white, and it's Allen Carr's TV show that has been criticized."
"In the end, Andy Richter wrote, the Oscars will award a statue based on popularity, so that those mountain peaks with low box office revenue will not be lonely any more. The new category of awards announced today will recognize outstanding achievements in popular films, but the qualification requirements and other key details have yet to be determined... "
“… Announce... "
"But Hollywood stars and experts didn't wait."
"Here's a sample (which we'll update regularly): better than the sequel, now the academy has added a section on" the neglected 90's cult movie with pustules and Rasta's eyeballs. "This is the Academy Award, baby."
“... https://t.co/zlduncn- Alex winter (@ alxwinter) Oscar will add a category of "best popular movie" on August 8, 2018
"Good luck, Chuck's back!"



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“With Norman Reedus Teen Mom Best Structured Reality Series The Carbonaro Effect Fixer Upper The Profit Shark Tank Undercover Boss Who Do You Think You Are...”
“The Late Late Show With James Corden The Tonight Show Starring Jimmy Fallon Watch What Happens Live With Andy Cohen Best Animated Series Archer Bob s Burgers BoJack Horseman Danger Eggs Rick and Morty The Simpsons Best Unstructured Reality Series Born This Way Ice Road Truckers Intervention Live PD Ride...”
“Lady Bird Emma Stone Battle of the Sexes Best Sci Fi Horror Movie Blade Runner 2049 Get Out It The Shape of Water Best Foreign Language Film BPM Beats Per Minute A Fantastic Woman First They Killed My Father In the Fade The Square Thelma Best Original Screenplay Guillermo del...”
“...a Comedy Steve Carell Battle of the Sexes James Franco The Disaster Artist Chris Hemsworth Thor Ragnarok Kumail Nanjiani The Big Sick Adam Sandler The Meyerowitz Stories New and Selected Best Actress in a Comedy Tiffany Haddish Girls Trip Zoe Kazan The Big Sick Margot Robbie I Tonya Saoirse Ronan...”
“Post Best Animated Feature The Breadwinner Coco Despicable Me 3 The LEGO Batman Movie Loving Vincent Best Action Movie Baby Driver Logan Thor Ragnarok War for the Planet of the Apes Wonder Woman Best Comedy The Big Sick The Disaster Artist Girls Trip I Tonya Lady Bird Best Actor in...”
“Acting Ensemble Dunkirk Lady Bird Mudbound The Post Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Best Director Guillermo del Toro The Shape of Water Greta Gerwig Lady Bird Martin McDonagh Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Christopher Nolan Dunkirk Luca Guadagnino Call Me by Your Name Jordan Peele Get Out Steven Spielberg The...”
“Blige Mudbound Hong Chau Downsizing Tiffany Haddish Girls Trip Holly Hunter The Big Sick Allison Janney I Tonya Laurie Metcalf Lady Bird Octavia Spencer The Shape of Water Best Young Actor Actress Mckenna Grace Gifted Dafne Keen Logan Brooklynn Prince The Florida Project Millicent Simmonds Wonderstruck Jacob Tremblay Wonder Best...”
“Ronan Lady Bird Meryl Streep The Post Best Supporting Actor Willem Dafoe The Florida Project Armie Hammer Call Me By Your Name Richard Jenkins The Shape of Water Sam Rockwell Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Patrick Stewart Logan Michael Stuhlbarg Call Me by Your Name Best Supporting Actress Mary J”
“James Franco The Disaster Artist Jake Gyllenhaal Stronger Tom Hanks The Post Daniel Kaluuya Get Out Daniel Day Lewis Phantom Thread Gary Oldman Darkest Hour Best Actress Jessica Chastain Molly s Game Sally Hawkins The Shape of Water Frances McDormand Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Margot Robbie I Tonya Saoirse...”
“Here s a look at the full list of nominees Best Picture The Big Sick Call Me by Your Name Darkest Hour Dunkirk The Florida Project Get Out Lady Bird The Post The Shape of Water Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Best Actor Timothée Chalamet Call Me by Your Name...”


"Norman reed teen mom best structured reality series cabonarot effect reviser top profit shark tank undercover boss who do you think you are..."
"James Colden's evening show" Tonight Show "Andy Cohen, starring Jimmy Fallon, watched the best animated film" Archer Bob hamburger bojack hosman dangerous Rick and Morty Simpson's best unstructured reality series "born like this" ice truck driver intervened in the scene of PD riding... "
"Lady Bird Emma stone, the battle of the sexes, the best science fiction horror movie" cutting the mess 2049 "stands out, the best foreign language movie BPM beat every minute, a magical woman first of all, they killed my father Selma in the fading square, the best original screenplay Guillermo del..."
“… Comedy Steve Carrell battle of the sexes James Franco disaster artist Chris Hemsworth Torr Ragnarok Kumar nangarni the sick Adam Sandler meyerowitz comedy Tiffany hadish girl's journey Zoe karshan the sick Margot Robby I Tonia Sawyer Ronan
"Best cartoon" breadwinner coco mean me 3 "LEGO Batman movie" fall in love with Vincent "best action movie" baby driver Logan tol ragnaro battle of the ape planet "best comedy" seriously ill "best disaster artist" girl's journey I Tonya Lady Bird "best actor..."
"Performance ensemble Madame Dunkirk bird mud pillar three billboards out of the ebb Missouri best director Guillermo del Toro water shape gretagwig bird Martin MacDonald out of the ebb Missouri Christopher Noland Dunkirk Luca guadanino call me your name Jordan peel out of Stevens Spielberg's three billboards..."
"Blige mudbund Hong Chau downsizing Tiffany hardish girls trip Holly Hunter, Allison Janney I Tonya Laurie Metcalf, bird Octavia Spencer, water's best looking young hero and heroine McKenna grace, gifted Dafen gene Logan Brooklyn Prince Florida project, wonderful Simmons wonderbest Jacob Tremblay wonderbest..."
"The best supporting actor after Ronan Lady Bird Meryl Streep Willem Dafoe Florida project Armie hammer calls me your name Richard Jenkins the shape of water Sam Rockwell three billboards outside the ebb of Missouri Patrick Stewart Logan Michael stuhlbarg calls me your name best supporting actress Mary J"
"James Franco disaster artist Jack Gyllenhaal stronger Tom Hanks after Daniel caruya out Daniel Day Lewis phantom informer Gary Oldman darkest hour best actress Jessica chastan Molly's game Sally Hawkins water shape Francis mcdom and three billboards outside Missouri ebb "Tony Sawyer..."
"Here's a complete list of nominations for best picture big illness call me your name darkest moment Dunkirk Florida project got the shape of water behind the lady bird three billboards ebb Missouri best actor Timothy chalamit call me your name..."



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As for "Sex Tips For Straight Women From a Gay Man," the show is set to begin sometime early next year.”
“...miss new episodes of Vanderpump Rules Season 6 on Mondays on Bravo TV”
“To see more of Scheana Marie her ex boyfriend Robert Parks Valletta and their co stars including Jax Taylor Brittany Cartwright Kristen Doute Stassi Schroeder Tom Sandoval Lisa Vanderpump Katie Maloney Lala Kent James Kennedy and Tom Schwartz don t...”
“That said, the next several weeks will be quite busy for the reality star, who will be spending the majority of her time reading and memorizing lines.”
“Robert Parks Valletta on The Daily Pop...”
“Scheana is still spending time with her ex boyfriend We ve been friends and in each other s lives for almost 12 years now so that s not going to change anytime soon Scheana Marie explained of her relationship with...”
“As the outlet revealed, the "Vanderpump Rules" star recently appeared on "The Daily Pop," where she explained their relationship status and revealed she had every intention of getting back together with her former boyfriend.”
“Scheana Marie and Robert Parks-Valletta began dating about one year ago, but these days, they are only "friends with benefits."”
“"I'm hoping to make it to Christmas Eve with [Robert Parks-Valletta's] family but I have a big move ahead of me the next day."”
“The 'Pump Rules' star will be living in Las Vegas for several months"I'm moving to Vegas for four to six months," Scheana Marie explained, adding that she is set to begin rehearsals around Christmas.”


As for "gay men's sexual skills for heterosexual women," the show will be on air early next year
“… Missed the new episode of season 6 of van der Pol rules on Bravo on Monday
"In order to learn more about Shanna Marie, her ex boyfriend Robert parks Valletta and their partners, including Jakes Taylor Brittany Cartwright, Christine DUT stasy Schroeder, Tom Sandoval, Lisa vanderpe, Katie Maloney, Lala Kent, James Kennedy and Tom Schwartz, I don't want to ”
"In other words, the reality TV star will be quite busy in the next few weeks, and she will spend most of her time reading and reciting her lines."
"Robert parks Valletta in daily pop music..."
"Shanna is still with her ex now. We have been friends for nearly 12 years in each other's lives, so it won't change very soon. Shanna Mary explains that she and "It's a relationship."
"As revealed by the media, the star of" van der Pol rules "recently appeared on" daily popular ". In the program, she explained the relationship between the two and revealed that she had a complete plan to get back together with her ex boyfriend."
"Shana Marie and Robert parks Valletta started dating about a year ago, but now they're just" friends with benefits. "
"I'd like to go to Christmas Eve with my family, but the next day I have a big move to do."
"The pump rules star will be in Las Vegas for a few months." "I'm moving to Las Vegas for four to six months," explains scheana Marie, adding that she will start rehearsals around Christmas



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Academy did not respond to TheWrap’s question about whether a new envelope design would be in place this year, and show producers Michael De Luca and Jennifer Todd are unlikely to spill the beans about the final presenters ahead of time.”
“Also Read Academy Lets PwC Keep Its Job Despite Oscars Fiasco But With Big Changes For starters the team that ll replace Cullinan and Ruiz crucially includes PwC partner Rick Rosas who served as a balloting leader of the Oscar team for 14 years the last of those paired with...”
“That’s because the chance that a presenter will receive the wrong envelope and announce the wrong winner this year is about the same as the chance that “The Boss Baby” will beat “Coco” for Best Animated Feature.”
“Which is to say, it won’t happen.”
“PwC the Academy s accounting firm through about 80 years and a few name changes had a catastrophic failure last year but with new people in charge new procedures in place and everybody on high alert it s inconceivable that we ll see a repeat of last year unless it...”
“...s engineered by Kimmel and crew...”
“Also Read: Oscars Stage Manager Details PwC Accountants' Incompetence: 'They Froze' (Exclusive)And make no mistake — even if the Academy and PwC didn’t do anything, they could still be almost certain that it wouldn’t happen again.”
“It took a perfect storm of ineptitude to produce last year’s fiasco, starting with a money-saving envelope redesign that made the category name harder to read, particularly in the dark.”
“The mistakes went on to include a pair of presenters in their 70s one of them Warren Beatty known for fooling around and the other Faye Dunaway perpetually surrounded by a certain level of chaos a spot at the end of the show when the wings fill up with people...”
“...and things get more disorganized a distracted and star struck accountant Brian Cullinan who had been violating the rules by tweeting from backstage during the show and who was reluctant to acknowledge that he d given Beatty the wrong envelope and correct his error when it happened and a second...”


"The Academy didn't answer the wrap's question about whether a new envelope design will be introduced this year, and producers Michael deluka and Jennifer Todd are unlikely to reveal the final host ahead of time."
"Despite the Oscar fiasco, Reed College has kept PwC's job, but the first thing to do is to make a huge change, which will replace the team of kulinan and Ruiz. The key includes PwC's partner Rick Rosas, who has been the voting leader of the Oscar team for 14 years and is the last one to work with A partner. "
"That's because this year's hosts are almost as likely to receive the wrong envelope and announce the wrong winner as boss baby is to beat coco to get the best animation."
"That is to say, it won't happen."
"After more than 80 years of development and several renames, PricewaterhouseCoopers suffered a disastrous failure last year. However, with the implementation of the new person in charge, new procedures and everyone's high vigilance, it is difficult for us to imagine repeating the mistakes of last year, unless it..."
“… It was designed by Kimmel and the crew... "
"Also read: the Oscar stage manager details the incompetence of PwC's accountants: 'they freeze' (exclusive) and make no mistakes - even if Oscar and PwC do nothing, they can almost be sure it won't happen again."
"It was a perfect storm of incompetence that led to last year's fiasco. The first was the redesign of the envelope to save money, which made the classification names more difficult to read, especially in the dark."
"The mistakes also include a couple of hosts in their 70s, one of whom is Warren Beatty, known for his idleness, and the other is Faye Dunaway, who are always surrounded by a certain degree of chaos, with wings full of people at the end of the show..."
“…… Things get more chaotic. Brian Cullinan, a distraught star accountant, tweets backstage on the show, breaking the rules. He doesn't want to admit that he gave Betty the wrong envelope and corrected it when it happened... "



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Following the private ceremony, a public memorial service was opened to the fans that congregated outside the cemetery.”
“The program handed out to attendees featured a Cornell quote, “We are neighbors in a modern world where proximity is relative and the threshold to our hearts moves outside time and space.”Cornell’s ashes were reportedly placed next to his friend Johnny Ramone’s remains, TMZ reported.”
“The private ceremony began with the cemetery’s speakers playing Audioslave’s “Like a Stone” as well as Cornell’s recent solo song “The Promise.” At the conclusion of the funeral, Temple of the Dog’s “All Night Thing” accompanied mourners as they exited.”
“Linkin Park’s Chester Bennington performed Leonard Cohen’s “Hallelujah” at the memorial while actor James Brolin, Pearl Jam’s Jeff Ament and Cornell’s band mates Soundgarden’s Kim Thayil, Matt Cameron and Audioslave’s Tom Morello delivered eulogies, the Associated Press reports.”
“Bale and Brad Pitt also in attendance...”
“Metallica s James Hetfield and Lars Ulrich Foo Fighters Dave Grohl Pat Smear and Taylor Hawkins Pharrell Williams Krist Novoselic Nile Rodgers Courtney Love Jane s Addiction s Perry Farrell and Dave Navarro and Joe Walsh were among the rockers who attended the funeral with actors like James Franco Christian...”
“Chris Cornell was laid to rest Friday at a private ceremony at Los Angeles’ Hollywood Forever Cemetery, with Cornell’s band mates, celebrity friends, family and grunge peers among those who paid their respects to the Soundgarden singer.”


After the private ceremony, a public memorial service was opened to the fans gathered outside the cemetery
According to TMZ, in the program distributed to the participants, Cornell quoted a sentence: "we are neighbors of the modern world, in which distance is relative, and the threshold of our soul moves beyond time and space."
At the beginning of the private ceremony, speakers at the cemetery played Audioslave's "like a stone" and Cornell's recent solo "promise.". At the end of the funeral, the "all night objects" of the dog Temple accompany the mourners to leave
Chester Bennington of Lincoln Park performed Leonard Cohen's "Hallelujah" at the memorial hall, with actors James Brolin, Jeff ament of pearl jam, and Cornell University band partners Kim Sayer of Soundgarden, Matt Cameron and Tom Morello of Audioslave delivering tributes, AP reported
"Bell and Brad Pitt were also present..."
"Metallica's James Hetfield and Lars Ulrich foo fighters Dave Grohl pat smile and Taylor Hawkins Farrell Williams and Krist novoselic Nile Rodgers Courtney love Jane's rock singer Perry
"When Chris Cornell was buried Friday at a private ceremony at Hollywood permanent cemetery in Los Angeles, Cornell's band mates, celebrity friends, family and trash peers paid tribute to the Soundgarden singer."



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“October 26 DeJesus 23 denied them despite sharing photos on her social media accounts of Marroquin that were captioned Daddy Javi Although DeJesus insisted otherwise a source told Us Weekly at the time that the two were dating...”
“I have a 6 pack from laughing so hard these last couple of days IMY SCORPION BAE CHICKENFINGERS BBQ GAPING BOUJEE YOUCHANGEDINLA PLAYTHATCARDIIIIB A post shared by Javi Marroquin javim9 on Oct 23 2017 at 4 26pm PDT But when reports surfaced that the two were officially a couple on...”
“Marroquin fueled rumors when he posted a photo with DeJesus on October 23: “I have a 6 pack from laughing so hard these last couple of days,” he wrote with hashtags, “#IMY” and “BAE.” He also told Radar Online on October 25 that things were “amazing” between him and DeJesus.”
“Fans speculated for months that the two were dating after they were spotted out at dinner in New York City in September and at Walt Disney World in Florida with their kids.”
“Marroquin calling DeJesus his “girl” was not insignificant.”
“Linc loved them.”Marroquin shares 4-year-old Lincoln with ex-wife Kailyn Lowry, while Briana shares daughters Nova, 6, with Devoin Austin, and 5-month-old Stella with Luis Hernandez.”
“Huge thank you to my girl @_brianadejesus helping me put this together and thank you @miss_teenyfabsmama for these awesome shirts.”
“He captioned it, “Thank you friends and family that came and made Lincoln’s birthday extremely special.”
“The Air Force member, 24, posted a photo of the reality stars posing in front of a birthday cake with their children.”
“Teen Mom 2’s Javi Marroquin celebrated son Lincoln’s birthday on Saturday, November 18, and he did it with help from his costarBriana DeJesus.”


"On October 26, DeJesus 23 rejected them. Although she shared photos of Marroquin on social media with the title of daddy Javi, DeJesus insisted that, on the other hand, a source told us that they were dating..."
"I've been laughing a lot in recent days. I have a 6-Pack scorpion, BAE chickenfingers barbecue, boujee youchangedinla playhatchard IIIB. At 4:26 pm on October 23, 2017, Javi Marroquin javim9 shared a post, but when the report showed that they were officially a couple..."
"Marroquin released a group photo with DeJesus on October 23, which triggered rumors:" I've been laughing so much these days, I have six bags, "he wrote with a label," #imy "and" BAE ". On October 25, he also told radar online that what happened between him and DeJesus was "amazing."
"Fans have been speculating for months that the two were found dating Disneyland in Florida at dinner in New York with their children in September."
"It's not unimportant for Malcolm to call Jesus his" girl. "
"Lincoln loved them." Mallokun shares 4-year-old Lincoln with his ex-wife, Caroline lorry; Briana shares 6-year-old nova with Devon Austin; and Louis Hernandez shares 5-month-old Stella
"Thank you very much to my daughter, Jesus briannard, for helping me put these in order, and thank you, miss teenyfabsmama, for giving me these wonderful shirts."
He wrote in the title of the letter: "thank you for your friends and family. Their arrival makes Lincoln's birthday very special."
The 24-year-old air force member posted a photo of a reality TV star with children in front of a birthday cake
"On Saturday, November 18, Javier mariokin of teenage mother 2 celebrated his son Lincoln's birthday, and he completed the work with the help of his son costabriana DeJesus."



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Barr is an executive producer, along with Sara Gilbert, Tom Werner, Bruce Helford, Whitney Cummings and Tony Hernandez.”
“Conner, Emma Kenney as Harris Conner-Healy, Ames McNamara as Mark Conner-Healy and Jayden Rey as Mary Conner.”
“Sources say the order is for 13 episodes, up from 9 in the current first installment of the revival.”
“You can watch a video of the renewal announcement below the post.”
““We’re thrilled that America has welcomed the Conner family back into their homes,” said Channing Dungey, president of ABC Entertainment.”
““The show is as fresh and relevant today as it was when it left the air 21 years ago.”
“We can’t wait to see what the ‘Roseanne’ team has in store for next year.”I just got the call-thank u ABC!”
“Thank you, Roseanne Show family (including fans)B'aruch Hashem.”
“DAYENU Roseanne Barr therealroseanne March 30 2018 As Deadline previously reported ABC had been laying the groundwork for a second season of its Roseanne revival in the weeks leading to its March 27 debut and cast deals for a second season in the 10 13 episode range had been made...”
“...ahead of the premiere...”


Barr is executive producer, as are Sarah Gilbert, Tom Werner, Bruce Helford, Whitney Cummings and Tony Hernandez
"Connor, Emma Kenny as Harris Connor Healy, Ames McNamara as mark Connor Healy, and Jaden ray as Mary Connor."
According to sources, the play has 13 episodes, which is higher than the current 9 episodes in the first issue of Renaissance
"You can watch the video of the renewal announcement at the bottom of the post."
"We are very happy that the United States welcomes the Connors back to their home," said Channing dungee, President of ABC entertainment
"Today's show is as fresh and relevant as it was 21 years ago when it left the air."
"We can't wait to see what rosani will do next year." I just got a call, thank you
"Thank you, Rosanna show family (including fans) b'aruch HaShem."
"Before the deadline of March 30, 2018, dayenu Roseanne Barr thereal Roseanne reported that ABC had been laying the foundation for the second season of Roseanne Renaissance in the weeks before its premiere on March 27, and the actor deal for the second season of 10 episodes and 13 episodes had been concluded..."
“… Before the premiere... "



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We took the matter seriously and worked with her to find a resolution.”
“Over a year ago, Pauley came to us with a workplace concern.”
“I feel I have to protect my crew, jobs and so many people.”
““Telling the story, THE TRUTH.”
“...over the weekend, Perrette elaborated with a few more: “Maybe I’m wrong for not ‘spilling the beans,’” she wrote.”
“...bullied by a powerful man for way too long A day after her initial tweet regarding N C I S”
“Last fall after reports about Harvey Weinstein emerged she shared her own story writing that she was raped in high school by a football player My rape led me into a series of abusive relationships terrible self worth and self blame dismissing a few groping incidents allowing myself to be...”
“(Sorry guys, had to be said).”In the past, Perrette has identified herself on Twitter as a rape and domestic violence survivor.”
“You clearly don’t know me.”
“Please leave me alone.”


"We take it seriously and work with her to find a solution."
"More than a year ago, poly came to us with worries about his job."
"I feel like I have to protect my crew, my job and so many people."
"Tell a story, tell the truth."
“…… Over the weekend, Perrett elaborated a few more words: "maybe I was wrong not to 'leak'," she wrote
“… I was bullied by a powerful man for too long, one day after she first tweeted about NCIS
"Last fall, after the report about Harvey Weinstein came to light, she shared her story. She wrote that she was raped by a football player in high school. My rape led me into a series of abusive relationships. My terrible self-worth and self reproach rejected several touching incidents and allowed me to..."
"I'm sorry, guys, I have to say." In the past, Perrett tweeted as a survivor of rape and domestic violence
"You obviously don't know me."
"Please leave me alone."



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just last week Kevin was gushing over his wife on Instagram, writing, “Love every moment with you.””
“Danielle’s absence doesn’t seem to be cause for concern though.”
“...show, Married to Jonas.”
“They even briefly dabbled in reality television with their E!”
“The couple met while he was still in the Jonas Brothers back in 2007 while on vacation in the Bahamas.”
“As for Kevin, he’s been busy with his two kids and wife, former hair stylist Danielle Jonas, who he married in 2009.”
“Middle bro Joe has already taken the next step with Turner, proposing to the Game of Thrones actress last year.”
“Nick Jonas and Priyanka Chopra have been getting more serious about their relationship recently, even taking a trip to India together where he reportedly met some of her friends and family.”
“Older brother Kevin, despite being the only married one, was also there, solo as the fifth wheel.”
“Nick and Joe had a double date with their significant others, Priyanka Chopra and Sophie Turner, in London on Monday.”


Just last week, Kevin gushed to his wife on instagram: "I love you every moment."
"However, Danielle's absence does not seem to be a cause for concern."
“… Xiu, marry Jonas. "
"They even use their own e!"
"The couple met when he was on holiday in the Bahamas in 2007, when he was still with the Jonas Brothers."
"As for Kevin, he's been busy with his two children and his wife, former hairdresser Daniel Jonas, who got married in 2009."
"Middle brother Joe and Turner have taken the next step, proposing to the" game of Thrones "actress last year."
"Nick Jonas and Priyanka Chopra have recently taken their relationship more seriously and even went to India together, where they are said to have met some of her friends and family."
"Brother Kevin is the only one to get married, but he's also there, lone ranger."
"Nick and Joe had a double date in London on Monday with their partners, Priyanka Chopra and Sophie Turner."



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now that that's squared away, we can get back to discussing possible first names for Schmidt...”
“So, there you have it: The mischievous Stiles is actually named Mieczyslaw.”
“Both as a mischievous child and equally misbehaved adult."”
“It seemed like a perfect word to describe Stiles.”
“Mieczyslaw sounded like 'mischief.'”
“"I was looking for a Polish name that was incredibly difficult to both spell and pronounce.”
“"A few years ago, I knew I would have to actually reveal Stiles' name at some point," Davis told Entertainment Weekly .”
“Luckily, Teen Wolf's showrunner Jeff Davis has a pretty great explanation about the meaning behind Stiles' full name.”
“And when shows finally disclose long-withheld names, there needs to be a payoff, like when we found out that Cappie's real name is "Captain John Paul Jones" in Greek.”
“But sometimes, that's half the fun — who doesn't want to know what Schmidt's first name is on New Girl?”


"Now we can talk about Schmidt's name..."
"Well, you know: the naughty stiles is actually called Mitch slough."
"Not only a naughty child, but also an adult with the same misbehavior."
"It seems to be the perfect word for stiles."
"Mizlav sounds like a prank."
"I'm looking for a Polish name that's hard to spell and pronounce."
"I knew a few years ago that I had to reveal stiles' name at some point," Davis told Entertainment Weekly
"Fortunately, Jeff Davis, the host of" little wolf ", has a good explanation of the meaning behind stiles' full name
"When the program finally reveals the name that has been hidden for a long time, it needs to be rewarded. For example, we find that Kapi's real name is captain John Paul Jones in Greek."
"But sometimes, it's just half the fun - who doesn't want to know Schmidt's name in new girl?"



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Chris is the father so I think we’re all going to work together to make sure everything is taken care of and that that’s established.”For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
“And while Lowry and Marroquin have had an up-and-down relationship since their May 2016 breakup, the mom of three confirmed he did reach out to her after she gave birth.”
“The MTV personality revealed in a Wednesday, August 16, interview with Radar Online that she doesn’t want her ex-husband Javi Marroquin to have a relationship with her yet-to-be named newborn son whom she gave birth to on August 5.”
“(The child’s father is Chris Lopez.)”
“The 25 year old who is also mom to son Isaac 7 whom she shares with ex Jo Rivera and son Lincoln 3 whom she shares with Marroquin acknowledged that while Marroquin 24 has played a father figure role in Isaac s life she doesn t feel it s necessary...”
“...for him to form a similar bond with the child she shares with Lopez...”
““I don’t see a reason for him to be involved other than knowing and acknowledging that this is Lincoln’s half sibling.”
“That being said, on my end, there is no bad blood.”
“But I don’t think there is any reason for him to necessarily be involved,” the mom shared with Radar.”
““I didn’t ask how he was handling it,” she explained to the outlet.”


"Chris is the father, so I think we'll work together to make sure everything is taken care of, and that's set." For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to American Weekly's YouTube page
"Although the relationship between Lowry and Marroquin has been ups and downs since their breakup in May 2016, the mother of three confirmed that he did contact her after she gave birth."
"In an interview with radar online on Wednesday, August 16, the MTV celebrity revealed that she did not want her ex husband Javi Marroquin to have a relationship with her unnamed new son, who was born on August 5."
"(the child's father is Chris Lopez)"
"Isaac, 25, has seven sons with former Joe Rivera and three sons with mallokin. She is also Isaac's mother. She admits that although mallokin, 24, plays the role of father in Isaac's life, she doesn't think it's necessary..."
“… Let him form a similar bond with her and Lopez's children... "
"I don't see any reason for Lincoln to get involved except to know and admit that he is Lincoln's half brother."
"Anyway, on my side, there's no bad blood."
"But I don't think there's any need for him to be involved," the mother told radar
"I didn't ask him what he did with it," she explained to the store



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We will, Chris, as we dream of happier days.”
“...by Pratt himself...”
“In this week's issue of People, the actress, podcast host, and author opened up about Pratt.”
“"We'll always have each other and be incredible friends," she said.”
“"There is still so much laughter in our lives together, and he is so proud of me, still."”
“She continued, "We watched each other grow, and he still cracks me up all the time.”
“And I think I crack him up—unless he's a really good actor and great at faking laughter."”
“Faris added, "It's understandable that people seemed so invested in our happiness together.”
“All I can say about that is, it's all true, that we truly adore each other, and we love each other.”
“I think it still comes through."”


"We will, Chris, because we dream of happier days."
"Pratt himself..."
In this week's People magazine, the actress, podcast host and author unveiled Platt's story
"We will always have each other and become incredible friends," she said
"There's still so much laughter in our lives together, and he's still proud of me."
"She went on," we watched each other grow up, and he was still laughing at me. "
"I think unless he's really a good actor and can pretend to laugh, I'll give him a good beating."
"It's understandable that people seem so invested in our happiness together," Faris added
"All I can say is that it's true. We really adore each other and we love each other."
"I think I'll make it."



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She was later released, and completed her probation in August 2019.”
“In addition to her reality television career, de Lesseps has also dabbled in acting.”
“In season 6 of RHONY, de Lesseps was classified as a "Friend of the Housewives" because at the time of filming, she was not living in New York City.”
“She has been part of the main cast in every season since the show's premier on March 4, 2008, with the exception of season 6.”
“What de Lesseps is best known for, though, is her role as a main cast member on the Bravo reality series "The Real Housewives of New York City" (RHONY).”
“She was also formerly a Wilhelmina model.”
“In recent years, she has credited her time as a nurse for helping her develop people skills.”
“Career: Before her days as a professional model, de Lesseps was a licensed practical nurse in Connecticut who worked with the elderly in a nursing home.”
“On December 31, 2016, she married Tom D'Agostino Jr., before announcing their divorce less than a year later in August 2017.”
“Together, they have two children, Noel and Victoria.”


"She was later released and suspended in August 2019."
"In addition to the reality show business, dreiseps is also involved in acting."
In Ronnie's sixth season, dreisepps was listed as "a housewife's friend" because she didn't live in New York City at the time of filming
"She has been a leading actress in every season since the show premiered on March 4, 2008, except for Season 6."
"However, dreiseps is best known for her leading role in the Bravo reality TV series rhony."
"She used to be a model for Wilhelmina."
"In recent years, she owes her time as a nurse to helping her develop her interpersonal skills."
Career: before becoming a professional model, dreiseps was a practicing nurse in Connecticut, working for the elderly in a nursing home
"On December 31, 2016, she married little Tom dagostino and announced her divorce less than a year later in August 2017."
"They had two children together, Noel and Victoria."



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Mike Fleiss, Martin Hilton, Nicole Woods and Elan Gale are the executive producers.”
“Hosted by Chris Harrison, Bachelor in Paradise is a production of Next Entertainment in association with Warner Horizon Unscripted & Alternative Television.”
“Olympios did not return for the salvaged Season 4 but took part in the reunion episode.”
“...show resumed production about later that month after an internal network investigation found no misconduct...”
“ABC s Good Morning America reported on June 13 two days after filming was halted that contestant DeMario Jackson and a fellow contestant later revealed to be Corinne Olympios reportedly were engaging in a sex act while they were both intoxicated The pair lawyered up the next day but the...”
“ABCLast summer, Warner Bros. suspended production on Bachelor in Paradise in Mexico due to an allegation of sexual misconduct, and the show’s survival was in doubt.”
“Out to mend those broken hearts, they will travel to a romantic paradise in hope of turning a potential summer fling into the real thing.”
“Coming off a scandal-plagued fourth season, Bachelor in Paradise again returns unchosen contestants from The Bachelor or The Bachelorette for a second (or third) chance at finding love.”
“The reality-competition series will launch with a two-hour episode at 8 PM Tuesday, August 7.”
“ABC has set summer premiere dates for Season 5 of Bachelor in Paradise.”


"Mike fries, Martin Hilton, Nicole woods and elan Gail are executive producers."
"Hosted by Chris Harrison," Bachelor of heaven "is the next entertainment to work with Warner horizon screenless and alternative TV."
"Olympus didn't come back to participate in the fourth season, but in the reunion episode."
“… After the internal network investigation found no misconduct, the program resumed production later in the month... "
Good Morning America, ABC reported on June 13 that two days after the film was suspended, contestant demario Jackson and a companion who was later revealed to be Corinne Olympus were said to have had a sexual intercourse when they were drunk. Their lawyers were drunk the next day, but they were not happy
Last summer, Warner Bros. suspended the production of "Bachelor in heaven" in Mexico for alleged sexual misconduct, and the survival of the show was in doubt
"In order to repair those broken hearts, they will go to a romantic paradise, hoping to turn a potential summer Carnival into reality."
After a scandal ridden fourth season, "Bachelor in heaven" once again gives a second (or a third) chance to find love for singles or single women who have not been eliminated
"The reality TV series will be broadcast at 8 p.m. on Tuesday, August 7, with two hours in each episode."
"ABC has set a summer premiere date for the fifth season of singles in heaven."



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pitch Perfect 3 hits theaters December 22, 2017.advertisingSource: EWShare Share Tweet EmailWandaVision: Every MCU Easter Egg In Episode 5advertising...”
“According to EW, one of those challenges is a rival group called Dew, lead by a singer named Charity.”
“The second film she produced, Pitch Perfect (2012) made over 100 million dollars and was the second highest-grossing musical comedy of all time.”
“It no longer holds that honor however, because the 2015 sequel, Pitch Perfect 2, surpassed its predecessor in five days and ended up more than doubling the gross of the first film, becoming the highest grossing musical comedy.”
“Making Pitch Perfect 3 an inevitability.”
“Pitch Perfect tells the story of reluctant college student Beca, who found a place to belong when she joined an all-girls a capella group called The Bellas and helped lead them to victory in a national competition.”
“Along the way she makes friends with the other girls and even falls in love.”
“In Pitch Perfect 2, the Bellas are nationally disgraced and the only chance they have to salvage their reputation is to win a world championship.”
“They also bring in a new member, who perhaps will one day lead the Bellas once Beca is gone.”
“...advertisingAnd now, the Bellas have new challenges to face.”


"Pitch perfect 3" was released on December 22, 2017. Advertisement source: ewshare tweet email advertisement: every MCU Easter egg in Episode 5 Advertisement... "
"According to EW, one of the challenges is a rival group called dew, led by a singer named charity."
"Her second film, pitch perfect (2012), grossed more than $100 million, making it the second highest grossing musical comedy ever."
"However, this honor no longer exists, because the 2015 sequel" perfect pitch 2 "surpassed its predecessor in five days and eventually more than doubled the total box office of the first film to become the highest box office musical comedy."
"It's inevitable to make pitch perfect 3."
"Pitch perfect" tells the story of a reluctant college student, Becca, who joined an all girls a capella group called Bellas and helped them win a national competition and find their own place
"Along the way, she made friends with other girls and even fell in love."
"In perfect pitch 2, the Bellas are disgraced all over the country. Their only chance to recover their reputation is to win the world championship."
"They have also brought in a new member, who may one day lead the Bellas when Becca leaves."
“…… Now, the Bellas have to face new challenges. "



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“On his page Stamos shared his own adorable image of the pair as they smooched near the castle joking of their one-week anniversary, “and they said it wouldn’t last.””
“McHugh shared even more of their journey through the park, where they stopped in at shops to look at tiny baby trinkets since they are expecting their first child this spring.”
“While there they’ve even been spotted wearing matching mouse ears, though hers were a bit more spectacular as they came with a bridal veil.”
“As McHugh’s Instagram shows, the pair has been spending plenty of time at Walt Disney World Resort in Orlando, Florida.”
“Now, just a week into their marriage, they are celebrating again at the Happiest Place on Earth.”
“When the park closed, we ran around the park in our Disney onesies.”Since that day the two went on to get hitched in a gorgeous ceremony at the Little Brown Church in Studio City, California, then partied the night away at their home.”
“I don’t know how she did it, but she went to hug me and slipped her finger right in it.”
““I pulled the ring out.”
“...yes!”“She loves Disneyland and [at the park], I got on my knee and asked her,” Stamos told PEOPLE of their engagement.”
“.”


"On his website, Stamos shared a lovely image of himself, and the two were making out near the castle, joking about their week-long anniversary," they said. “
"McHugh shared more of their journey in the park, because they were going to have their first child this spring, so they stopped at the store to look at baby accessories."
"There, people even found that they were wearing matching mouse ears, but her ears were more eye-catching because they were wearing the bridal veil."
"As McHugh's instagram shows, they spent a lot of time at Walt Disney World Resort in Orlando, Florida."
"Now, just a week after their marriage, they are celebrating again in the happiest place on earth."
"When the park closed, we ran around in Disney pajamas." From that day on, they had a gorgeous wedding at little brown Church in Studio City, California, and then had a night at home
"I don't know how she did it, but she hugged me and put her finger in it."
"I pulled out the ring."
“… yes! "She loves Disneyland, and I knelt down and asked her," Stamos told people about their engagement
“.”



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Preview, below.”
“Stay tuned to find out what's next for these ladies every Tuesday at 9/9c.”
“We have a far better friendship than that.'"”
“"Of course, when it came out of her mouth I was like, ‘That's not very nice!”
“So, I completely understand," she said.”
“"I came into my friendship with her because of my husband.”
“She noted that "she's a very, very dear friend of mine" and did note that the connection to Lisa does come courtesy of PK.”
“So, they have a very different relationship and friendship."”
“And all of their friends have known each other for, like, 30 years.”
“News, sharing, "Lisa and I have a great friendship, but I've only known her a short amount of time compared to how long she's known my husband—and they go way back.”


Preview, as shown below
"Please pay attention to these women's next show at 9:9 every Tuesday."
"Our friendship is much better than that."
"Of course, when it came out of her mouth, I thought," that's not good! "
"So, I totally understand," she said
"I became friends with her because of my husband."
She noticed that "she's a very, very dear friend of mine" and that the connection with Lisa did come from PK
"So their relationship is very different from their friendship."
"All their friends have known each other for about 30 years."
"News, share," Lisa and I have a great friendship, but I only know her for a short time compared to the fact that she knows my husband and they go back a long time ago



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Busy woman: The Jungle Book actress has two characters she's been working on, Maz Kanata in Star Wars (pictured) and Nakia in the upcoming Marvel film Black Panther...”
“Star Wars: Episode VIII - The Last Jedi is coming out later this year on December 15.”
“And it seems Lupita Nyong'o wholeheartedly agrees, as the 12 Years a Slave actress took to Instagram on Friday to rave about the movie.”
“The 34-year-old couldn't say enough good things in her caption, which accompanied a promotional picture of Gal Gadot as the titular star.”
“Biggest fan!”
“It seems Lupita Nyong o absolutely loved Wonder Woman as the 12 Years a Slave actress took to Instagram on Friday to rave about the movie Ok people I just left the theater and KNOW for CERTAIN that the GODS have seen fit to BLESS us with WonderWoman began the...”
“Star Wars actress...”
“'W.O.W.”
“It is a superhero movie like none I have ever seen.”
“Epic.”


"Busy woman: the actress in the jungle book has two roles she has been working on, mazzin Tien in Star Wars (pictured) and Narcia in the upcoming surprise movie Panther..."
Star Wars: Episode 8 - the last Jedi will be released on December 15
"And Lupita Niono seems to agree wholeheartedly, because a slave actress reveled in the film for 12 years on instagram last Friday."
"The 34 year old gadote can't say enough good things in the title, which is accompanied by a promotional photo of gadote as a celebrity."
"The biggest fan!"
"It seems that Lupita nion o absolutely likes wonder woman, because a slave actress has been hyping the movie" the okman "on instagram for 12 years on Friday, and I just left the theater, convinced that the gods think it's appropriate to bless us with wonder woman..."
"Star Wars actress..."
“W.O.W.”
"It's a superhero movie I've never seen before."
"Epic."



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Stories:-Kate Middleton Just Debuted a Gorgeous New Bob-Kate Middleton's Two Favorite Fashion Brands Are Collaborating-Prince William and Kate Middleton Tried to Get 'Game of Thrones' Spoilers Out of One of the Show's Actors...”
“It is a cult classic, after all.”
“Her style is classic yet still very modern—hello, she loves the cold-shoulder look as much as we do.”
“The duchess also loves to mix up her beauty look—ICYMI, she apparently changes her hair for each pregnancy—but we dare you to name a time you've seen Kate wearing red nail polish or coral on her fingers.”
“Coming up blank?”
“It turns out there's a very specific reason.”
“*Marie Claire* U.K. reported recently that only natural-looking nails are permitted at official royal events, which tend to be where and when photos of her get taken.”
“That kind of explains why Queen Elizabeth II has been wearing the same shade of polish, Essie's Ballet Slippers, since 1989.”
“According to Essie, it's "the only color Her Majesty would wear."”
“And hey, if you know what you like…Kate wore a similar, sheer pink shade on her wedding day.”


"Related story: Kate Middleton has just launched a gorgeous new product. Two of Bob Kate Middleton's favorite fashion brands are cooperating. Prince William and Kate Middleton are trying to make a fool of an actor in the game of Thrones..."
"After all, it's a classic cult work."
"Her style is classic, but still modern. Hello, she likes cool looks as much as we do
"The Duchess also love to dress up her beauty, obviously she will change her hair every time she is pregnant, but we dare say you have seen Kate's finger painted with red nail polish or coral."
"A blank?"
"There was a very specific reason."
"Mary Claire UK recently reported that in official royal events, only natural nails are allowed, which is often the time and place where she takes photos."
"This explains why Queen Elizabeth II has been wearing the same color of Polish slippers since 1989, Essy's ballet slippers."
According to Essy, this is "the only color your majesty will wear."
"Hey, if you know what you like Kate wore a similar, pure pink dress on her wedding day



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Though David was allegedly unfaithful, the two spent time in therapy and even renewed their vows in August 2016.”
““I did have a conversation with him at the beginning of the summer that I just couldn’t keep living this way,” she said, adding that he lived in a separate wing of the house.”
“...a heartbroken Shannon revealed that her husband David Beador was the one to end their 17 year marriage in September...”
““It’s not what I wanted and it’s been really, really hard,” she admitted through tears.”
““We went on a trip to Hawaii, which I kind of hoped would bring everything together, but he left the trip early.”
“And when I came home, he said, ‘We’re done,’” Shannon told host Andy Cohen.”
““I said to David, when he told me it was over, ‘What happened?”
“We had a couple of amazing years,’” she recalled of the conversation.”
““And he goes, ‘We had a couple good months.’ It was just a knife in the heart.”Shannon wasn’t totally shocked by David’s gut-wrenching announcement.”
“There were warning signs that their relationship was circling the drain.”


"Despite David's alleged infidelity, they took the time to receive treatment and even took the oath again in August 2016."
"I did talk to him in the early summer, I just can't go on living like this," she said, adding that he lives in another wing of the house
“… A sad Shannon revealed that her husband, David BIDO, was the one who ended their 17 year marriage in September
"It's not what I want, it's really, really hard," she admitted tearfully
"We went on a trip to Hawaii, and I kind of hoped that everything would be arranged, but he left early."
Shannon told host Andy Cohen: "when I got home, he said, 'we're done.'"
"David told me it was over, and I said to him, 'what happened
She recalled the conversation: "we had amazing years."
"He said," we spent months. " It's just a knife in the heart. "Shannon was not completely shocked by David's heartbreaking statement."
"There are signs that their relationship is getting worse."



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...and NBC are both part of the NBC Universal family.)”
“Going Behind the Scenes of This Is Us With the Adorable Cast(E!”
“"This Is Us" will air Thursdays this fall on NBC.”
“The live show was hosted by Chris Hardwick and ended with Bryan Cranston getting dunked in a tank full of freezing water, after the three-part debut of "Red Nose Day Actually," the long-awaited sequel to the 2003 movie "Love Actually."”
“A few of the cast members reveal a fake spoiler from a long-lost brother to one of the characters dating Dennis Rodman in Season 2.”
“The video was part of NBC's Red Nose Day broadcast, which helped raise over $30 million to help end child poverty.”
“The "This Is Us" cast came together to spread fake spoilers for season two on fans while shedding light on Red Nose Day.”


“… And NBC are part of the NBC global family. "
"Behind the scenes is our lovely actor (E!"
This is us will air on NBC on Thursday
Hosted by Chris hadwick, Brian Cranston was immersed in a tank full of ice water after the premiere of three episodes of the 2003 sequel to true love, red nose day
"Some actors revealed a fake spoiler, from a long lost brother to one of the characters dating Dennis Rodman in season two."
"The video is part of NBC's" red nose day, "which helped raise more than $30 million to help eradicate child poverty
"This is us" actors get together to spread Season 2 fake spoiler to fans and shine on red nose day



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Linden Ashby (season 6; recurring seasons 1–5) as Sheriff Noah Stilinski: [2] Stiles' father is initially reluctant to help his son and Scott with their escapades but is later brought into their supernatural secret.”
“Liam's anger gives him an uncommon degree of strength for a young werewolf, and he comes to develop a real respect for his mentor, Scott.”
“Reed also portrays Allison's ancestor Marie-Jeanne Valet in the fifth season.”
“Her formidable prowess with a bow and arrow is an asset to the team in encounters with the shapeshifters and monsters that roam Beacon Hills.”
“Crystal Reed (seasons 1–3; guest season 5) as Allison Argent: Scott's love interest, Allison, descends from a long line of werewolf hunters.”
“Cast and characters [ edit ]Tyler Posey as Scott McCall: Scott is turned into a werewolf in the series premiere and, alongside his friend Stiles, begins to uncover the complicated supernatural world of Beacon Hills, California.”
“As new and familiar threats emerge, Scott is joined by werecoyote Malia Tate, kitsune Kira Yukimura, and Scott's first beta werewolf Liam Dunbar in keeping his family, friends, and the rest of the town safe.”
“The supernatural events surrounding Beacon Hills also end up affecting Lydia Martin, a popular and intelligent student who discovers that she is a banshee, and Jackson Whittemore, the captain of the school's lacrosse team who resents Scott's newfound attention.”
“Helping Scott manage his new life are his best friend Stiles Stilinski, the son of Beacon Hills Sheriff Stilinski, and the natural-born werewolf Derek Hale.”
“Further complicating matters, Scott develops romantic feelings for new classmate Allison Argent, who comes from a family of werewolf hunters that includes her father Chris Argent.”


"Linden Ashby (Season 6; seasons 1-5) plays Sheriff Noah stilinsky: [2] stiles' father was initially reluctant to help his son cheat with Scott, but was later brought into their supernatural secrets."
"Liam's anger has given him an unusual strength as a young werewolf to cultivate a true respect for his mentor, Scott."
"Reed also plays Alison's ancestor, Mary Jennie Valle, in season 5."
"Her formidable bow and arrow power is a valuable asset for the team in the battle with the shapers and monsters on Beacon Hill."
"Crystal reed (season 1-3; guest season 5) as Alison akin: Scott's fun Alison is a descendant of the werewolf hunter."
"Actor and character [editor] Tyler Posey plays Scott McColl: Scott turns into a werewolf at the premiere of the series and, together with his friend stiles, begins to uncover the complex supernatural world of Beacon Hill, California."
"As new and familiar threats emerge, Scott joins the werewolf mariante, kitsune Kira yukimura, and Scott's first test, Liam Dunbar, in keeping his family, friends and the rest of the town safe."
"The supernatural events surrounding Beacon Hill also ultimately influenced Lydia Martin, a popular and intelligent student who found herself a banshee, and Jackson Whittemore, a famous and intelligent student Whittemore, the head of the school principal's hockey team, is dissatisfied with Scott's new attention
"Scott's new life is managed by his best friend stiles stilinsky, the son of birkenhill sheriff stilinsky, and the natural werewolf Derek hale."
"What's more, Scott has a romantic relationship with her new classmate Alison argent, who comes from a family of werewolf hunters, including her father Chris argent."



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““You can’t be scared to try things, and you have to be confident.” Scroll down for five tips to follow if you’re looking to add a bit of Eleanor’s edge into your wardrobe.”
““It’s all about being experimental,” said Walsh.”
“It’s also one of the main reasons that we tune in each week, because you just never know what statement-making ensemble the royal badass (played by Alexandra Park) will step out wearing next.”
“Eleanor’s unpredictable fashion choices on the E!”
“...series never fail to catch our attention, and according to the show’s costume designer, Rachel Walsh, it’s easier to recreate the Princess’s look than you might think.”
““Eleanor’s look is actually quite achievable,” the British designer recently told InStyle.”
“She wears a ton of high street brands like Topshop and H M we re just clever in the way that we mix them in with designer pieces It s the combination of classic styles and current trends that create...”
“Eleanor s cool yet effortless vibe...”
““We use a lot of Maje and Sandro,” said Walsh.”
““But I think that if you went on the Topshop website, you could probably find at least one-third of the silhouettes that Eleanor wears.”


"You can't be afraid to try, you have to be confident." If you want to add a little bit of Eleanor to your wardrobe, scroll down five tips
"It's all experimental," Walsh said
"That's one of the main reasons we watch every week, because you never know what the Royal villain (Alexandra Parker) will wear next."
"Eleanor's unpredictable fashion choice!"
“…… The series has always attracted our attention, and according to the show's costume designer, Rachel Walsh, it's easier to recreate the princess than you think. "
"Eleanor's look is actually very fulfilling," the British designer recently told INSTEL
"She wears a lot of commercial street brands like Topshop and HM. we just skillfully combine them with the designer's works. This is a combination of classic style and current fashion trend, creating..."
"Eleanor is cool, but relaxed..."
"We used a lot of Maggie and Sandro," Walsh said
"But I think if you go to Topshop, you might find at least one-third of the silhouettes that Eleanor is wearing."



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“All The Way Up (2016) Feels So Good (2006) Conceited (There’s Something About Remy) (2006) My Lifestyle (2002)Read More: Mac Miller Net Worth...”
“After Big Pun s death Ma was signed by rapper Fat Joe to work as a member of Big Pun s rap group Terror Squad Ma is one of the four rappers to have ever reached the number one spot in the Billboard Hot 100 chart due to her outstanding...”
“$4 MillionHow did Remy Ma earn her money and wealth?”
“Remy Ma, real name Reminisce Mackie, was born on 30 May, 1980 in New York, United States.”
“She did not have a good childhood as she witnessed severe consequences due to her family’s drug abuse and was forced to look after her younger brothers and sister.”
“She is married to Shamele Mackie, better known by his professional rapper name Papoose.”
“Ma has a son Jayson, 18, from an earlier relationship and also has three step children with Papoose.”
“As of 2018, Remy Ma’s net worth is $4 million.”
“Remy Ma is not only an American rapper but is also a songwriter.”
“Her music talent was discovered by Big Pun initially and soon Pun became a mentor for her.”


"Along the way (2016) feel good (2006) pride (Remy has something) (2006) my way of life (2002) read more: macmillar net worth..."
"After the death of the big pun, Ma was signed by rapper Pang Qiao and became a member of the terror team of the big pun rap group. Because of her excellent performance, Ma is one of the four rappers who ranked first in the top 100 in history..."
"How did Ma Ying Jeou make money and wealth with $4 million?"
"Malemi, whose real name is nostalgic Maggie, was born in New York on May 30, 1980."
"She didn't have a good childhood because she was forced to take care of her younger brother and sister after witnessing the serious consequences of drug abuse at home."
"She married Shamir McKee, a professional rapper named PAPS."
"Ma has a son, Jason, who is 18 years old and has three stepsons with PAPS."
"As of 2018, Ma's net assets were $4 million."
"Malemi is not only an American rapper, but also a songwriter."
"Her musical talent was first discovered by Dapeng, and soon Dapeng became her tutor."



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After producer Alessandro Lo Monaco worked closely with the Vatican on Gianfranco Pannone’s documentary about the Vatican’s Swiss Guard, the Vatican approached him about co-producing a documentary about outspoken Pope Francis, who seeks to communicate directly with the people.”
“–EK“Pope Francis – A Man of His Word,” May 18Wim Wenders’ latest documentary, “Pope Francis – A Man of His Word,” will make its global debut at Cannes, but without the Pope.”
““Revenge” stars Matilda Anna Ingrid Lutz, who transforms from sex kitten to badass on a mission to seek revenge against the men who wronged her.”
“-KE“Revenge,” May 11If you love New French Extremity films like “High Tension” and “Martyrs,” and have been yearning for a grisly, blood-soaked heroine, have we got the film for you.”
“Yet it’s the insights into her personal life that feel the most vital, moving “RBG” beyond the kind of information you could read on a Wikipedia page (as ably and entertainingly rendered as they may be on the big screen).”
““RBG” serves as a compelling Ginsburg primer, and West and Cohen are understandably interested in driving home just how fully she fought back sexism at every stage of her professional life, from her experience at Harvard Law to her first steps into full-time work to her Supreme Court appointment.”
“It’s a fist-pumping, crowd-pleasing documentary that makes one heck of a play to remind people of Ginsburg’s vitality and importance, now more than ever.”
“In Betsy West and Julie Cohen’s wide-ranging “RBG,” Ginsburg’s life — and its many lessons, both learned and taught — come to entertaining and energetic life.”
“...personal and political...”
“DE RBG May 4 CNN When she was growing up Ruth Bader Ginsburg s beloved mother Celia gave her two lessons to guide her through life Be a lady and Be independent That two pronged approach appears to have influenced every aspect of the Supreme Court justice s life both...”


"After producer Alessandro Lo Monaco worked closely with the Vatican on Gianfranco pannone's documentary about the Vatican Swiss Guard, the Vatican found him and wanted to work with him on an outspoken Pope Francis Francis, who seeks direct communication with the public. "
"– EK" Pope Francis – the man of his word, "the latest Wenders documentary" Pope Francis – the man of his word "on May 18 will premiere in Cannes, but there is no Pope."
"Revenge" is starred by Matilda Anna Ingrid Lutz, who transforms from a sexy kitten into a villain, performing a task of revenge for the men who wronged her
"- Ke revenge, May 11 if you like new French films like high voltage line and martyr and have been longing for a horrible, bloody heroine, we have this film for you."
"However, insight into her personal life is the most important thing. Mobile 'RBG' goes beyond the kind of information you can see on Wikipedia pages (just as they can be presented on a big screen)
RBG is a fascinating primer for Ginsburg, and West and Cohen are understandably interested in how to adequately combat sexism at every stage of their careers, from her experience at Harvard Law School to her first step into a full-time job to her appointment as a Supreme Court judge
"It's a documentary that attracts audiences and reminds people of the vitality and importance of Ginsburg. It's a wonderful play, and now it's more wonderful than ever before."
In the extensive "RBG" of Betsy West and Julie Cohen, Ginsberg's life - and many of the lessons learned and learned from it - has become a life of entertainment and vitality
“… Personal and political... "
"De RBG, May 4, CNN reported on May 4 that Celia, Ruth Bede Ginsberg's beloved mother, gave her two lessons in her growing up process, instructing her how to be a lady and an independent person. The two-way approach seems to affect all aspects of the life of the Supreme Court justices. These two lessons are...."



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Kelly previously dated Leonardo DiCaprio in 2016.”
“...that the couple had been dating for 'four or five months', and that Steuart even gave Kelly 'flying lessons on his personal plane.'”
“And on Wednesday Kelly Rohrbach put on a loved-up display with her other half as they enjoyed some fun in the sun in Malibu.”
“The couple were wrapped up in each other's arms as they strolled down the parking lot after hitting the waves.”
“Beach babes!”
“Kelly Rohrbach hit the beach in Malibu on Wednesday with her boyfriend Steuart WaltonFirst the twosome got their heart rate up, jogging by the surf barefoot.”
“Kelly, 28, wore a white tank top, bikini bottoms, and a hat as she made her way down the coast alongside her other half, tuned into her earbuds.”
“The star looked incredible as she worked on her exquisitely toned physique with her blonde locks tucked away inside her cap.”
“Opting to go shirtless, Steuart, 37, put his chiseled torso on display as he jogged alongside his lady love.”
“Making a run for it!”


"Kelly dated Leonardo DiCaprio in 2016."
“…… The couple have been dating for "four or five months", and Stelter even gave Kelly a "private jet flight lesson."
"On Wednesday, Kylie robach and her partner put on a wonderful performance while enjoying the sunshine in Malibu."
"The couple were held in each other's arms as they strolled in the parking lot after the crash."
"Beach baby!"
Kelly robach and her boyfriend, Stelter Walton, take a walk on Malibu beach on Wednesday. They jogged barefoot by the surf, their hearts racing
Kelly, 28, wearing a white vest, bikini bottom and a hat, walked down the coast with her partner, putting headphones in her earplugs
"When she hides her golden hair in her hat and tries to build her beautiful physique, the star looks incredible."
Steuart, 37, chose to go shirtless as he jogged and displayed his well-defined torso
"Run



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I haven't felt that in a while, so it means a lot to me right now.'”
“That's all you have to do.'”
“The 34 year old wrestler struggled to know when was best to stop breastfeeding daughter Birdie 17 months and felt terrible when her milk supply began to dwindle and she had to introduce a bottle of formula to supplement the...”
“...tot s feeding schedule...”
“In a clip from an upcoming episode of Total Divas, Brie visited a breastfeeding support group and told the assembled women: 'My breast milk's taken a huge dip.”
“Mom guilt Brie Bella who shares 17 months old Birdie with husband and fellow wrestler Daniel Bryan 37 has admitted she felt awful when her milk supply began to dwindle and she had to feed her tot formula in a...”
“...clip from an upcoming episode of Total Divas I used to have enough where I donate...”
“And now I've realized in the last month, that I can't even keep up with her during the day so I've had to introduce one bottle of formula a day.”
“'I'm trying to pump and do all this stuff, but it's the stress.”
“I hate pumping.”


"I haven't felt that for a long time, so it means a lot to me now."
"That's what you're going to do."
"The 34 year old wrestler is trying to figure out when it's best to stop feeding her 17 month old daughter bird. When her milk supply starts to decrease, she has to introduce a bottle of formula milk to supplement..."
“… Baby feeding plan... "
"In the upcoming total queen, Bree interviewed a breastfeeding support group and said," my breast milk has dropped dramatically. "
"The mother felt guilty about bribella who shared the 17 month old bird with her husband and colleague wrestler Daniel Bryan on the 37th that she felt terrible when her milk supply began to decrease and she had to feed her baby formula in a..."
“… From the total day after the upcoming episode clip, I once had enough space for me to donate... "
"Now I realized last month that I couldn't even keep up with her during the day, so I had to introduce a bottle of formula every day."
"I'm trying to smoke and do these things, but it's pressure."
"I hate pumping."



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I have to go through the stages and prepare myself to give all my love to a child."”
“I want to be a young dad but not yet.”
“The model already has the best Christmas gift: her boyfriend Maluma.”
“On Thursday, December 20, the brunette beauty shared a loved-up photo of herself and her Colombian beau lounging by a Christmas tree.”
““All I want for Christmas..,” she captioned the post, adding a heart emoji.”
“Natalia sweetly rests her head on her boyfriend’s lap in the photo, while he places a tender kiss on her forehead.”
“Maluma and the DJ, who first met in 2017 while filming Maluma’s Felices los 4 music video, have heated up this past year, taking their romance around the world.”
“Last month, Natalia expressed her love for the 24-year-old singer in a heartfelt post writing, “This Thanksgiving, I am especially thankful and grateful for the love of my life.” She added, “Thank you for your love, kindness, understanding, patience, everything you do in our relationship & our beautiful home.”
“I love you forever my Juan Luis.”GALLERY: A LOOK AT MALUMA'S LAVISH LIFEMaluma previously admitted to HOLA!”
“Colombia that their relationship was “love at first night."”


"I'm going through these stages, ready to give all my love to a child."
"I want to be a young dad, but not yet."
"The model already has the best Christmas present: her boyfriend maruma."
On Thursday, December 20, the brunette shared a picture with her Colombian boyfriend at the Christmas tree
"Everything I want for Christmas..." She added a heart emoticon to the title of the post
In the photo, Natalia sweetly leans her head on her boyfriend's lap, while her boyfriend gently kisses her on the forehead
"Maluma and the DJ met for the first time when they filmed maluma's Felice 4 Music Video in 2017. In the past year, their relationship has been warming up and they have traveled around the world with their relationship."
Last month, in a heartfelt blog post, Natalia expressed her love for the 24-year-old singer, "this Thanksgiving, I am especially grateful for the love of my life." She added, "thank you for your love, kindness, understanding, patience and all you have done in our relationship and in our beautiful home."
"I love you forever, my Juan Lewis." Gallery: the luxury life of maluma. Maruma was accepted by Hora! "
Colombia says their relationship is "first night love"



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Offering some wisdom for his fans, it's unclear if the star is speaking from personal experience or not but, given the drama he has been involved in over the years, it is entirely possible.”
“While the statement reads as a very long-winded thought with little punctuation, Bieber was noticeably absent from the Gala, likely a choice given his post.”
“The pop star shared a note, saying, "HEY WORLD THAT GLAMOROUS LIFESTYLE YOU SEE PORTRAYED BY FAMOUS PEOPLE ON INSTAGRAM DON'T BE FOOLED THINKING THEIR LIFE IS BETTER THAN YOURS I CAN PROMISE YOU IT'S NOT!"”
“After the Met Gala, many social media users played judge on the outfits being presented and while some voiced their envy, the Biebs is ensuring that life as a famous person is not as positive as it is presented.”
“While he once enjoyed a wilder side of life, he seems to have toned things down and is advocating for people to make the most of their realities.”
“Justin Bieber appreciates the simpler things in life, spending time with his family and remaining relatively low-key in terms of public appearances these days.”
“While the glamours of celebrity life may seem enticing to some, especially after having seen the classy get-ups at the Met Gala this year, it may not be all that it appears to be.”
“Creative minds yearn for the opportunity to hear their songs played on the radio or see their art in a gallery as they celebrate each passing year as a child.”
“Growing up, many have dreams to become famous.”


"It provides some wisdom for his fans. It's not clear whether the star is based on personal experience, but considering the plot he has been involved in for many years, it's quite possible."
"Although the statement was lengthy and almost without punctuation, Bieber was obviously absent from the event, probably because of his position."
The pop star shared a note saying, "Hey, world, don't be fooled by the glamorous lifestyle depicted by those celebrities you see on instagram. They think their life is better than yours. I can assure you that's not the case!"
"After the met Party, many social media users judged the clothes they attended, and while some expressed their admiration, Biebs is making sure that celebrities' lives are not as positive as they are now."
"Although he used to enjoy the wilder side of life, he seems to have eased things down and advocated that people make full use of their reality."
"Justin Bieber appreciates the simple things in life, spending time with his family, and keeping a relatively low profile in public these days."
"Although the glamour of celebrity life seems tempting to some people, especially after watching the elegant costumes at this year's Metropolitan event, it may not be what it looks like."
"Creative people are eager to have a chance to listen to their songs on the radio or enjoy their art in the gallery because they celebrate every year when they were young."
"When you grow up, many people have dreams of becoming famous."



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“✕ Support free-thinking journalism and attend Independent events...”
“...to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here INDY LIFE Newsletter Be inspired with the latest lifestyle trends every week The Independent would like to keep you informed...”
“You can’t hide,’”, Williams said in a profile of the duchess that was published in Vanity Fair in 2017.”
““I told her, ‘You’ve got to be who you are, Meghan.”
“Meghan sought Williams’ advice at the time, asking her what she should do to deal with the unrelenting paparazzi.”
“Friendly adviceWhen the news broke that Meghan, formerly an actor on US drama Suits, had begun dating Prince Harry, the media went into a frenzy.”
“Beach Bowl playing on the same team alongside Hannah Jeter Nina Agdal and Shay Mitchell...”
“...about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here They crossed paths again at the Super Bowl in 2014 when they both took part in a flag football match at DirectTV s Celebrity...”
“INDY LIFE Newsletter Be inspired with the latest lifestyle trends every week Please enter your email address Please enter a valid email address Please enter a valid email address SIGN UP Thanks for signing up to the INDY LIFE newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like...”
““Little known fact: I often wear sneakers under my evening gown,” she wrote on Instagram.”


"✕ support free thinking journalism, participate in independent activities..."
“… In order to let you know about the offer and the latest news through email, please check the box. If you want to contact, please read our complete mailing list agreement terms. Here, Indy life news is inspired by the latest lifestyle trends. The weekly independent wants to let you know... "
"You can't hide it," Williams said in a profile of the Duchess published in Vanity Fair in 2017
"I told her, 'you have to be yourself, Megan.'"
"Megan asked Williams what she should do with the ruthless paparazzi."
"Good advice when it came out that Megan (who used to be an American actor) was dating Prince Harry, the media went into a frenzy."
"The beach bowl is on the same team as Hannah Jeter Nina Agdal and Shay Mitchell..."
“… Please check the box for activities and updates provided via email. If you would like to contact, please read our complete mailing list of agreed terms, where they met again at the 2014 super bowl, when they were all playing in directtv's flag of fame football match... "
"Inspired by the latest lifestyle trends every week, Indy life newsletters please enter your email address please enter a valid email address please enter a valid email address registration thank you for registering in Indy life newsletters verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors the independent hope..."
"Little known fact: I often wear sneakers under evening dresses," she wrote on instagram



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Carrie Underwood Tearfully Accepts ACM Award After Emotional First Performance Since Face InjuryGwen Stefani Sings Along to Blake Shelton's Performance During Sweet ACMs Date NightJason Aldean Opens ACM Awards With Star-Studded Tribute to Route 91 Mass Shooting VictimsRelated Gallery...”
“"It fit, really pleased," she added.”
“The 63-year-old country queen was not only the host of the 53rd Academy of Country Music Awards on Sunday night, but she also took the stage to sing her hit "Does He Love You" with daughter-in-law Kelly Clarkson.”
“What made the ACM flashback performance even better was that McEntire donned the exact same red velvet gown that she wore during a 1993 performance of the song with Linda Davis.”
“The stunning gown, designed by Sandi Spika, caused quite a stir when she first wore it because of its revealing sheer neckline.”
“"Sandi Spika made it in 1993.”
“I wore it to sing 'Does He Love You' with Linda Davis 25 years ago," McEntire told ET's Nancy O'Dell backstage.”
“"I didn’t tell Sandi I was going to bring it back and wear it tonight.”
“I saw her reaction, I saw her in the audience, she was crying."”
“Ethan Miller/Getty ImagesFollowing the awards ceremony, Clarkson, who is married to McEntire's former stepson, Brandon Blackstock, couldn’t help but gush about her mother-in-law.”


"Embedded code restart" content: after her first emotional performance after facial injury, Carrie Underwood tearfully accepted the ACM award. Winston van Nistelrooy sings with blacksheldon on a sweet ACM date night. Jason aldian unveils the ACM award with a star studded Gallery of highway 91 shooting victims
"It's fitting, it's really nice," she added
"The 63 year old country queen is not only the host of the 53rd annual Academy of country music awards ceremony on Sunday night, but also sang her hit song" does he love you "with her daughter-in-law Kelly Clarkson
"Let's ACM as like as two peas" and "McInteger", which is even more wonderful, McInteger wore the same red velvet robe worn when she sang this song with Linda Linda in 1993.
"This amazing robe, designed by sandy Spika, caused quite a stir when she first put it on because of its exposed transparent neckline."
"Sandy spica made it in 1993."
"25 years ago, I wore it to sing" does he love you "with Linda Davis," mcell told Nancy Odell backstage
"I didn't tell sandy I was going to bring it back tonight."
"I saw her reaction, I saw her in the audience, she was crying."
"Ethan Miller / Getty pictures after the awards ceremony, Clarkson married Brendan Blackstock, Machel's former stepson, and she couldn't help talking about her mother-in-law."



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In June, Swift’s back catalog of music returned to streaming platforms; she originally removed her music from music from such outlets in 2014.”
“Swift last released a new album, 1989, in 2014; the record became the best-selling album of 2014, and the fastest-selling record in more than 10 years.”
““Look What You Made Me Do” is the first single from Swift’s upcoming new album, Reputation; the record is due out on Nov. 10, and Swift will tour in support of the project.”
“The lyric video, meanwhile, according to Billboard, was watched more than 19 million times in its first 24 hours live on YouTube, making it the most-viewed lyric video within 24 hours of its debut.”
“On Spotify, the single was streamed just under 8 million times in its first 24 hours -- a new record for first-day listening, per Forbes.”
“Additionally, when Swift dropped "Look What You Made Me Do" and its lyric video late Thursday night (Aug. 24), it set another YouTube record and a record on Spotify.”
“The video was viewed 43.2 million times in its first 24 hours on the platform, averaging 30,000 views per minute and an average hourly audience of more than 3 million views during that time.”
“Business Insider reports that Swift's "Look What You Made Me Do" music video, which debuted Sunday (Aug. 27) during the 2017 MTV Video Music Awards, now holds the record for the biggest debut in YouTube's history.”
“The song itself, as well as its lyric video and music video, have broken Spotify streaming and YouTube watch records.”
“Taylor Swift's new single, "Look What You Made Me Do" is setting records left and right.”


"In June, Swift's backstage music catalog returned to the streaming platform; she initially removed her music from these media in 2014."
"Swift's last new album was released in 1989, in 2014; it became the best-selling album in 2014 and the best-selling album in more than 10 years."
"See what you ask me to do" is the first single of Swift's upcoming album reputation, which will be released on November 10 and will be supported by Swift's concert tour
"At the same time, according to billboard, the lyrics video was watched more than 19 million times in the first 24 hours of live broadcast on youtube, making it the most watched lyrics video in the 24 hours after its premiere."
"On spotify, the single played less than 8 million times in its first 24 hours, a new record for Forbes' first day of listening."
In addition, swift set another YouTube record and another spotify record when it released "look what you asked me to do" and lyrics videos on Thursday night
"The video was watched 43.2 million times in the first 24 hours on the platform, with an average of 30000 times per minute, and an average of more than 3 million viewers per hour during the period."
"Business insider reported that Swift's" look what you asked me to do "music video made its debut on Sunday (August 27) during the 2017 MTV Video Music Awards and currently holds the largest debut record in YouTube history."
"The song itself, along with lyrics videos and music videos, broke spotify streaming and Youtube viewing records."
Taylor Swift's new single "see what you make me do" has set two records



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Some fans speculated that she may be pregnant when it appeared that she was covering up her stomach while filming.”
““It’s super sweet!”The star is best known for playing Laurel Castillo on the hit ABC series.”
“I love you,'” she said at the time.”
“Or he’ll drop a little note in my bag saying, ‘I hope your day goes well!”
““He leaves me articles he wants me to read about something we were talking about, like Latino culture.”
“One year later, she told Us Weekly how her beau makes her feel special.”
““We welcomed our healthy baby girl Gianna and we couldn’t feel more blessed in this moment …The last nine months have been nothing short of a miracle.”Souza and her husband, banker Marshall Trenkmann, tied the knot in 2014.”
“Souza, 32, later took to Instagram Story to share more details.”
““God blessed us,” she wrote, showing her baby girl sleeping on her chest.”
“Moments later, she shared a second photo, revealing that her daughter was already here.”


"Some fans speculated that she might be pregnant. At that time, it seemed that she was covering her stomach when shooting."
"Super sweet! "The star is best known for playing laurel Castillo in the hit ABC Series."
"I love you," she said at the time
"Otherwise, he would put a note in my bag and say," I hope you have a good time! "
"He left me some articles and he wanted me to read something we talked about, like Latin American culture."
"A year later, she told us every week that her boyfriend made her feel special."
"We have a healthy baby girl, Gianna. At this moment, we feel very happy The past nine months have been a miracle. " Suza married her husband, banker Marshall trenkmann, in 2014
"Suza, 32, later shared more details through instagram story."
"God bless us," she wrote, showing the baby girl sleeping on her chest
"After a while, she shared a second photo, revealing that her daughter had come."



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Happy belated Valentine's Day, Mr. and Mrs. West!”
“The homage to love was nice while it lasted, though.”
“Kanye West Returned to Instagram and Posted 55 Photos of Old Celebrity Couples https://t.co/Wi6lkyNh4q — ELLE Magazine (US) (@ELLEmagazine) February 16, 2018Of course, all good things must come to an end, and West decided to delete his Instagram following his V-Day takeover.”
“Spoiler: based on his sequence of photos, he is pro-Mr. Big.”
“Aidan situation.”
“And then he decided to take a definitive stance on Sex and the City's whole Mr. Big v.s.”
“He chose iconic couples like JFK and Jackie O, Kurt Cobain and Courtney Love and the Obamas.”
“He started by posting a picture of a handwritten card that says, "Happy Valentine's Day Babe" and let loose from there.”
“Any images that might have been previously posted were deleted.”
“But this year, Yeezus switched it up for Valentine's Day and posted pictures of 52 iconic current and former celebrity couples before posting two shots of "Kimye" (as he captioned them) on Instagram.”


"Happy late Valentine's day, Mr. and Mrs. West!"
"But in the course of love, respect for love is beautiful."
Kanye West returned to instagram and released 55 photos of the old star couple https://t.co/Wi6lkyNh4q-ELLE  Magazine (US) (@ Elle magazine) February 16, 2018 of course, all the good things have to end, and West decided to delete his instagram after V-day's acquisition. "
"Spoiler: from the sequence of his photos, he's a pro Mr. big."
"The situation of Aidan."
"Then he decided to take a decisive position on sex and the big Mr. v.s. of the whole city."
"He chose iconic couples like Kennedy and Jackie o, Kurt Cobain and Courtney love and the Obamas."
He posted a photo of a handwritten card with the words "Happy Valentine's day baby" on it, and then released it
Any previously published images have been deleted
"But this year, yezus turned it up on Valentine's day, posting 52 iconic photos of current and former celebrity couples on instagram, followed by two photos of 'kimye' (as he describes it)," he said



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Well, it’s funny how you asked that because I never saw it as taking on the Catholic Church.”
“Were you scared of taking on the Catholic Church?”
“Jean is the reason I made “The Keepers” — I had a five-hour conversation with Jean and I left saying, “I need to do something with this woman’s story.” She, to me, was one of the most compelling people I’ve ever met.”
“She didn’t know Jean had gone through that abuse.”
“A few years ago my aunt connected me to Jean, her friend.”
“I never grew up knowing her teacher had been murdered.”
“White: My access point was personal connection: My aunt went to Archbishop Keough High School and was Sister Cathy’s student, so she always had a personal connection.”
“TheWrap: What was the process of getting this documentary together?”
“Find out what it is in TheWrap’s Q&A with White below.”
“But he’s only willing to share a slice of it.”


"Well, it's interesting that you ask, because I never saw it as a challenge to the Catholic Church."
"Are you afraid to compete with the Catholic Church?"
"Jane was the reason I did Guardian - I talked to Jane for five hours and then I left saying," I need to do something about this woman's story. " She, for me, is one of the most attractive people I've ever met
"She didn't know that Joan had been abused like that."
A few years ago, my aunt connected me with her friend Joan
"I didn't know her teacher had been murdered since I was a child."
White: my access point is personal: my aunt goes to Archbishop Keo high school and is a student of sister Casey, so she always has personal connections
"The wrap: what was the process of making this documentary?"
"Look at the white packaging below and ask what it is."
"But he's only willing to take a share."



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Staub’s past relationships were a huge subject of gossip among her fellow New Jersey Housewives on RHONJ — specifically her first marriage to former FBI informant Kevin Maher, who spoke openly about their past in his biography Cop Without a Badge.”
““The engagement was simply beautiful.”
““Oh my god,” Staub said upon seeing him.”
“Just then, Caffrey emerged from the crowd, taking Staub by surprise.”
“There, a violinist played Pachelbel’s “Canon in D” as a handful of couples danced around them.”
“Caffrey had arranged for Staub (with the help of Giudice and Josephs) to tour the grounds of a beautiful mansion, where they stumbled upon an outdoor fountain.”
“She wasn’t kidding.”
“He is such a gentleman,” Staub said.”
“And Margaret [Josephs], and Melissa [Gorga], and about 12 other people who are in my wedding party.”Image zoom Marty Caffrey and Danielle Staub | Credit: Jim Spellman/GettyCaffrey’s proposal was caught by RHONJ cameras, footage of which was shown on Wednesday’s episode.”
“As I got to know you, I fell in love with you.”


"Stab's past romance is a big topic for housewives in rhonj, New Jersey - especially her first marriage to former FBI informant Kevin Maher, who openly talks about their past in her biography police without a badge."
"The engagement is so beautiful."
"Oh, my God," said stubble as soon as he saw him
"Just then, Caffrey came out of the crowd and caught stab by surprise."
There, a violinist played Pachelbel's D major, and a couple danced around them
Caffrey arranged for stabu (with the help of Judith and Joseph) to visit a beautiful mansion where they came across an outdoor fountain
"She's not kidding."
"He's such a gentleman," Stubbs said
"And Marguerite (Josephus), Melissa (Gorga) and about 12 people who attended my wedding." Zoom in and out Marty Caffrey and Danielle Staub | photo source: Jim Spelman / Getty Caffrey's proposal was captured by rhonj's camera and shown on Wednesday's show
"When I met you, I fell in love with you."



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Find out what it was like for him to sit down with Kim Zolciak-Biermann earlier this season of Hollywood Medium, below.”
“Tyler has read lots of Bravolebs over the years, including Carole Radziwill, Lisa Vanderpump, and Stassi Schroeder.”
“But you could tell that there was still a lot of love between Brandi and her grandma, no matter what name she calls her.”
“"Yeah, you don't need to garden every day and live by yourself and be so, I call her 'gangster bitch grandma,'" Brandi told Tyler, to which her grandma replied, "Shut up, Brandi."”
“"It's not like grandma has to worry about her health, she just might have to pace herself.”That's a sentiment that Brandi shares about her grandma, too.”
““The way that this comes across is basically saying I’m not worried about health but if there are going to be any issues, she might kind of overdo it by her own doing,” Tyler explained.”
“The medium relays a message to Brandi from her late grandfather that's meant for her grandma, who is watching from another room, saying that he wants her to take it easy these days.”
“The Real Housewives of Beverly Hills alum revealed the eyebrow-raising moniker in a sneak peek of her session with Tyler Henry in the upcoming episode of Hollywood Medium, which you can view over at Us Weekly.”
“But they probably aren't using a nickname quite like the one Brandi Glanville calls her grandmother.”
“Tyler Henry Knows All...Lots of people opt for a unique term of endearment when referring to their grandmas or grandpas.”


"Take a look at how he and Kim zolciak Biermann felt in the Hollywood media earlier this season, as shown below."
"Tyler has read a lot of Bravo over the years, including Carol lazwell, Lisa vandepham and Stacy Schroeder."
"But you can see that there is still a lot of love between brandy and her grandmother, no matter what her name is."
"Yeah, you don't have to farm every day and live on your own. I call her" Granny gangster whore, "brandy told Tyler. Her granny replied," shut up, brandy. "
"Grandma doesn't have to worry about her health, she may just need to adjust her rhythm." Brandy thinks the same about grandma
"It basically means that I'm not worried about my health, but if there's any problem, she might overdo it," Taylor explained
"The media conveyed a message from her late grandfather to brandy, which was written to her grandmother. She looked at brandy in another room and said he hoped she would relax these days."
"In the upcoming Hollywood media, Beverly Hills Alumni's" the real housewoods of Beverly Hills alum "revealed an astonishing nickname in a peep with Tyler Henry, which you can see in US weekly."
"But they may not have used a nickname like Brandi Glanville called her grandmother."
"Tyler Henry knows everything Many people choose a unique title to express their love when they refer to their grandmothers or grandparents. "



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“News is a flirty business & it seems like current epidemic of #SexHarassmentAllegations may be criminalizing courtship & conflating it w predation."”
“In the tweet that caught Midler's attention, which he would later "humbly apologize" for, Rivera wrote, "Sad about @MLauer great guy, highly skilled & empathetic w guests & a real gentleman to my family & me.”
“ -- Geraldo Rivera has apologized to Bette Midler after the singer brought up again a previous accusation that the journalist groped her in the 1970s.”
“Although I recall the time BetteMidler has alluded to much differently than she that does not change the fact that she has a right to speak out demand an apology from me for in the very least publicly embarrassing her...”
“...all those years ago...”
“Bette, I apologize," He wrote Friday.”
“In his tweet, Rivera was responding to an old video Midler shared yesterday, where she called out Rivera for the alleged act, adding in her caption, "I feel like this video was a gift from the universe to me.”
“Geraldo may have apologized for his tweets supporting Matt Lauer, but he has yet to apologize for this."”
“Midler was referring to Rivera's other mea culpa, this time after defending Lauer, even calling him a "great guy" following his termination from NBC earlier this week for what his former network called "inappropriate sexual behavior."”
“Midler also added a #MeToo hashtag, a symbol of speaking out on social media against sexual harassment or assault.”


"News is a flirting industry, and it seems that the current popular sexual harassment charges may criminalize courtship and confuse it with predation."
"On twitter that caught Midler's attention, Rivera wrote, @ mlauer is a great guy, a skilled, compassionate guest, and a real gentleman to my family and me."
"Gerardo Rivera has apologized to Betty Midler after the singer made another charge that the reporter had touched her in the 1970s."
"Although I remember that the time mentioned by bette Midler is very different from her, it does not change the fact that she has the right to express her opinions in public. At least she embarrasses her in public and asks me to apologize..."
“… So many years ago... "
"Betty, I apologize," he wrote on Friday
"On his microblog, Rivera responded to an old video that middleman shared yesterday, in which she yelled about Rivera's suspected behavior and added in the caption," I think this video is a gift from the universe. "
"Gerardo may have apologized for supporting Matt Raul's Twitter, but he hasn't apologized for that."
Midler refers to Rivera's other sin, this time after defending Raul and even after being fired by NBC earlier this week for what his former network called "improper sexual behavior."
"Midler also added a # metoo tag, symbolizing public opposition to sexual harassment or assault on social media."



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— Ashley Iaconetti (@ashleyiaco) January 16, 2018— Jolie Lash...”
““The Bachelor” alum Ashley Iaconetti brought attention to the JoBros’ band Instagram account on Jan. 15, when she tweeted, “Interrupting this Bachelor episode to say…The Jonas Brothers have reactivated their Instagram.”Interrupting this Bachelor episode to say…The Jonas Brothers have reactivated their Instagram.”
“Rumors swelled of a reunion of the brothers’ band a little over a week ago.”
“Nick has teamed up with the brand for a Spring/Summer 2018 capsule campaign.”
“Nick, Joe and Kevin Jonas hung out together again on Friday night at the John Varvatos show in New York City.”
“You never know what’s going to happen,” he added.”
““But I can never say never.”
“PHOTOS: Grammy Awards 2018: The Red CarpetWhile nothing is currently in the works, Nick left the possibility open for the future.”
“But Ican tell you right now there’s no reunion planned,” Nick told RyanSeacrest on E’s Live from the Red Carpet on Sunday.”
““We hung out for a weekendall together and then, I guess our Instagram was restarted or reopened.”


"- Ashley iaconetti (@ ashleyiaco) January 16, 2018 - Jolie lash..."
"Interrupting this single life means The Jonas Brothers reactivated their instagram. " To interrupt this single life is to say The Jonas Brothers reactivated their instagram
"More than a week ago, there was a lot of talk about the reunion of the brothers."
"Nick works with the brand to launch the spring and summer 2018 capsule campaign."
"Nick, Joe and Kevin Jonas are back together on the John vawatos show in New York on Friday night."
"You never know what's going to happen," he added
"But I can't say never."
"Photo: the 2018 Grammy Awards: the red carpet has not made any progress yet, but Nick has left a possibility for the future."
"But I can tell you that there are no plans to reunite," Nick told Ryan Secrist on Sunday's red carpet
"We played together for a week, and then I guess our instagram rebooted or reopened."



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“My comment that seemingly 'racism didn’t exist 10 years ago' was made as part of a larger, emotional 45-minute conversation about how, sadly, social media has become a hub for hate.”
“"I was heartbroken when I watched the last few minutes of the episode and saw how my words were taken out of context.”
“"Wonder what you’d look like if you aged naturally without the surgeries," one person asked.”
“...someone else said.”
“She's paid to 'adjust' most of her body parts, so stop acting like it's all natural!"”
“That's the answer!”
“"Why are y'all acting like Kim didnt pay for that booty???!!!”
“...someone wrote.”
“"You run 5 days a week to your surgeon?"”
“Some wondered if instead she has had plastic surgery to thank for her curves.”


"My comment seems to be that 'racism didn't exist 10 years ago', part of a larger, emotional 45 minute conversation about how social media unfortunately became the center of hatred."
"When I watched the last few minutes of the episode and saw my words taken out of context, I was very sad."
"Want to know what it's like to age naturally if you don't have surgery," one asked
“…… Some people say
"She's paying to 'adjust' most of her body, so stop pretending that everything's OK!"
"That's the answer!"
"Why do you all act like king didn't pay for the booty?"??! "
“…… Someone wrote
"Do you run five days a week to see a surgeon?"
"Some people want to know if she has had plastic surgery to thank her."



**Something goes wrong**
“...her kids...”
“Etheridge first opened up about her weed use in the new Yahoo!”
“The 56-year-old singer was returning to the United States from Canada in North Dakota when her tour bus was reportedly stopped by Customs and Border Patrol.”
“After drug-sniffing dogs detected the substance, agents discovered marijuana oil, according to TMZ.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Etheridge told police that she uses the drug to manage pain from cancer.”
“Although the drug is legal in California, however, it’s not allowed in North Dakota, said TMZ.”
“The “Come to My Window” crooner was reportedly booked for possession of a controlled substance and smiled from ear-to-ear in her mugshot, which was obtained by TMZ.”
“According to the outlet, she pleaded not guilty.”
“PEOPLE’s requests for comment were not immediately returned by CBP or a rep for Etheridge.”


“… Her children
For the first time, terich has disclosed her use of marijuana on the new Yahoo
"It is reported that the 56 year old singer was stopped by customs and border patrol when she returned to the United States from North Dakota, Canada."
According to TMZ, after the sniffer dogs detected the substance, the agents found sesame oil
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Ethridge told the police that she used the drug to control cancer pain."
"Although the drug is legal in California, it is not allowed in North Dakota," TMZ said
According to reports, the "come to my window" singer was ordered for possession of a controlled substance and grinned in the photos obtained by TMZ
"According to the media, she did not plead guilty."
"Representatives from CBP or Etheridge did not immediately respond to requests for comment."



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"We outta here," he wrote.”
“In the caption, he put into words the joyous sentiments of new grads everywhere.”
“As for Lev, he reshared a photo of himself wearing a festive Hawaiian lei over his suit.”
“"ur a special one levie, happy grad luver," she wrote (in teen speak) to him.”
“Robertson, 16, also shared her own snap with her sweetie that showed off his snazzy wooden bow tie.”
“Lev's girlfriend, "Duck Dynasty" alum Bella Robertson, was also on hand to celebrate and can be seen in one pic beaming next to Cameron Bure and the actress' daughter.”
“...big day...”
“Click or swipe right to see the whole Bure family which also includes the actress hubby former pro hockey player Valeri Bure 43 and their two other kids Natasha 19 and Maksim 16 dressed to the nines for Lev s...”
“"Can’t wait to see what God has in store for the next chapter of your journey."'”
“...she added.”


"Let's get out of here," he wrote
"In the title, he used words to express the joy of fresh graduates from all over the world."
"As for LEV, he re shared a picture of himself wearing a holiday Hawaiian wreath outside his suit."
"You're a special levy, happy graduate rover," she wrote (speaking to teenagers) to him
"The 16-year-old also shared a snapshot of himself with her sweetheart, showing off his stylish wooden bow tie."
"Lev's girlfriend, Bella Robertson, an alumnus of duck Dynasty, was also present to celebrate. In one photo, she can be seen beaming beside Cameron Bray and the actress's daughter."
“… Big day... "
"Click or slide to the right to see the entire Bray family, including actress husband, former professional hockey player Valerie Bray, 43, and their other two children Natasha, 19, and maxim, 16, beautifully dressed Lev s..."
"I can't wait to see what God has prepared for your next journey."
“…… She added



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think she and Jesse have a lot of similarities.”Fuller House is now streaming on Netflix.”
“But if I had to pick one person that she’s gonna be like, it’ll probably be Uncle Jesse (John Stamos).”
“Stephanie Tanner (Jodie Sweetin) surprised fans – and her sister D.J.”
“Tanner (Candace Cameron Bure) – during the eighth episode of Fuller House season 4.”
“While attending an awards ceremony, Stephanie comments that the winner of Best Veterinarian’s Clinic “was only open for three weeks,” before adding, “I had a girlfriend longer than that.”Her sister is completely shocked.”
““Wait, what?” she says while Gia (Marla Sokoloff) cannot stop laughing.”
“Soon after, Sweetin, 36, also starts giggling.”
“The laughing was actually real, too – neither Sokoloff nor Bure were told about the line ahead of time.”
““Jodie switched up the line in that take and we weren’t expecting it, so it was everyone’s true reaction and we broke,” Bure, 42, wrote on Twitter on December 15.”
““So they kept it in.”The moment received a ton of attention on social media.”


"I think she has a lot in common with Jesse." Fuller house is now playing on Netflix
"But if I had to choose someone she would like, it might be uncle Jesse (John Stamos)."
"Stephanie Tanner (Judy swighting) surprised fans - and her sister D.J."
"Tanner (Candice Cameron Bray) - in Fuller's house, season 4, Episode 8."
Speaking at the ceremony, Stephanie said the winner of the best veterinary clinic "only opened for three weeks," then added, "my girlfriend is longer than that." Her sister was completely shocked
"Wait, what? "She said, and GIA (Marla Sokoloff) couldn't help laughing."
"Soon after, 36 year old swittin began to giggle."
"Laughter is also true - neither Sokolov nor Bray was told of the route in advance."
Brady, 42, tweeted on December 15: "we didn't expect Judy to turn up her lines in that shooting, so this is everyone's real reaction. We broke up."
"So they kept it." This moment has attracted a lot of attention on social media



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Story continuesMark Sagliocco/WireImage/Getty ImagesRead more about celebrities:Now, watch Lucy Hale try nine things she's never tried before:Don't forget to follow Allure on Instagram and Twitter.”
“See the full look, below.”
“Jones...”
“There are many reasons to love Leslie Jones: her love for tweeting about the Olympics and Game of Thrones, her acting in hilarious sketches on Saturday Night Live, and her unabashed support for women of all shapes and sizes.”
“The comedian showed off the latter, along with her flair for the dramatic, last night at the Time 100 Gala in an epic tribute to another Jones: Grace Jones, iconic supermodel known for envelope-pushing androgynous looks.”
“Wearing a show-stopping white double-breasted tuxedo dress with a high hemline and even higher shoulder pads, Jones completed the transformation with black cat-eye sunglasses, navy lipstick, and the supermodel's signature flattop haircut.”
“The dress was a custom look created by Christian Siriano, who was one of the event's honorees.”
“Siriano and Jones formed a close working relationship after the SNL cast member tweeted that no designers would dress her for the premiere of Ghostbusters.”
“Less than one day later, Siriano reached out and the duo began creating a custom, red, off-the-shoulder ballgown with major Vivian from Pretty Woman vibes.”
“"It takes a real designer to design for a real woman," Jones said at the time, adding, "I feel amazing.”


"The story goes on mark sagliocco / WireImage / Getty Images read more about Ce: now, before watching Lucy Hale try nine things she's never tried before: don" don't forget to follow temptation on instagram and twitter. "
"Look at the full look below."
"Jones..."
"There are a lot of reasons to love Leslie Jones: she likes to tweet about the Olympics and power games, her comic skits live on Saturday night, and her undisguised support for women of all sizes."
"The comedian paid homage to another Jones at last night's time 100 party, demonstrating the latter and her talent in Drama: Grace Jones, an iconic supermodel known for her androgyny."
Jones wore a white double breasted dress, wearing a high skirt, and even a higher shoulder pad. He completed the flat top hair with black cat sunglasses, Navy lipstick and super model signature.
"This dress was made to order by Christian Siriano, one of the winners of the event."
"Siliano and Jones formed a close working relationship after SNL crew members tweeted that no designer would dress her in the Guicai premiere
"Less than a day later, Siriano reached out to help, and the two began to work with major Vivian in vibes to customize a red off shoulder ball dress."
"Designing for a real woman requires a real designer," Jones said at the time. "I think it's amazing."



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“From Killing Eve to Krypton, here’s everything you didn’t know you’d been missing:Which of your favorites did we miss?”
“...worthy of your attention if not outright adoration...”
“We re keeping this list strictly to shows that have confirmed episodes ahead of them sorry Timeless but ScreenCrush editor E Oliver Whitney and writer Kevin Fitzpatrick have otherwise assembled 17 TV shows across network cable and streaming that are...”
“And now that the broadcast network shows have said goodbye for the season, what better time to stock up on some overlooked favorites airing new episodes?”
“Short of Thanos himself snapping away half the TV industry, you’ll never have time to catch up on every scripted show out there.”


"From killing Eve to krypton, there's everything missing you don't know: which one did we miss your favorite?"
“… It's worth noting that if it's not totally adored... "
"We strictly keep this list on those shows that have confirmed previous episodes. Sorry, it's eternal, but screenwriter Oliver Whitney and writer Kevin Fitzpatrick have collected 17 TV shows through cable TV and streaming media. They are..."
"Now that the radio network program has bid farewell to this season, what better time is there to reserve some neglected favorite new episodes?"
"You'll never have time to catch up with every script show there, except tanos who takes half of the television industry himself."



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““We already have four between us, so that’s a lot.””
“I remember saying No matter what I m not dating anyone for a year and don t let anyone near me Watch the full episode of People Cover Story Christina El Moussa I ve Never Been So Happy streaming now on peopletv com or download the PeopleTV app on your...”
“...last November and it may not be long before the couple makes their relationship official...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I can see myself getting married to him,” Christina says in this week’s issue of PEOPLE.”
““He’s so down-to-earth, and we have so much in common.”
“We basically do the same thing so he gets what my world is like and he s just rolled with the punches and handled everything so well Image zoom Credit Christina El Moussa Instagram Christina 34 first met Anstead who restores vintage classic cars on Discovery s Wheeler Dealers through...”
“...a mutual friend after she split from ex husband Tarek...”
““I was definitely not looking to meet anyone.”
“...favorite device...”


"There are already four between us, so that's a lot."
"I remember I said, no matter what, I don't date anyone for a year, and I don't want anyone around me to see the full episode of the cover story of people, Christina Musa. I've never been so happy on peopletv, or download peopletv app on your website..."
“…… Last November, perhaps soon, the couple will officially announce their relationship... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I can see myself marrying him," Christina said in this week's People magazine
"He's down-to-earth. We have a lot in common."
"We're basically doing the same thing, so he got my world what it was like, and he was just kicking with punches, dealing with everything so well image zooming credit Christina elmosa instagram Christina 34 first met Anstead who recovered the vintage classic car found by wheeler dealer through..."
“… Her mutual friend after breaking up with her ex husband Tariq... "
"I certainly don't want to see anyone."
“… Favorite devices... "



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The 47-year-old actress, sources told Page Six, is rumored to be dating Lucas after they were seen in the romantic embrace at Jimmy’s Corner, a bar in the city's Theater District near the Hudson Theatre they're performing at.”
“Sad He split from ex Jessica Ciencin Henriquez back in October of 2014 Rarely do both parents particularly if they re divorced get to have as much interaction with their children The Firm star said before adding we re really truly doing the split custody thing and have been so...”
“But Josh Lucas hasn't let that heartbreak get in the way of actively parenting his five-and-a-half year old son Noah.”
“The 46-year-old Poseidon actor told People on Friday that he and Jessica have agreed on a 'bird-nest' co-parenting situation.”
“Pushing forward Josh Lucas hasn t let the heartbreak of divorce from Jessica Ciencin Henriquez get in the way of actively parenting his five and a half year old son Noah exes pictured together in March 2017 The term comes from the parents rotating through a singular home meaning the...”
“...child gets to grow up in a far more stable environment...”
“Lucas was quite optimistic about the idea, telling the magazine 'it's a concept that's fairly new, particularly in the psychology of raising a child in divorce.'”
“He continued his analysis, proclaiming 'And the idea is, it's really not the child's fault that you got divorced, it's your fault and therefore it should not be the child's problem to go back and forth between two different homes.'”
“It seems the arrangement, though somewhat novel, is working for the family.”
“...lucky to soak up all that time with Noah...”


The 47 year old actress is said to be dating Lucas because they were seen in a romantic embrace at Cape Jimmy, a bar in the city theater district near their Hudson theater, the source told page 6
"Sadly, he separated from former Jessica ciencin Henriquez as early as October 2014. Parents rarely have the same chance to interact with their children, especially if they divorce. The star of the company is adding that we are really doing separation custody, and it has always been so..."
"But Josh Lucas didn't let this heartbreak stop him from actively raising his five-and-a-half-year-old son Noah."
"The 46 year old Poseidon actor told people last Friday that he and Jessica had reached an agreement on how to raise children together in the bird's nest."
"Josh Lucas's efforts did not break his heart from divorcing Jessica seanshin henriks and prevent him from actively raising his 5-and-a-half-year-old son Noah exes for a group photo in March 2017. The word comes from the rotation of parents in a single home, which means..."
“… Children grow up in a more stable environment... "
"Lucas is quite optimistic about this idea, he told the magazine," it's quite a new concept, especially in the psychology of raising children in divorce. "
"He went on with his analysis and declared," the idea is that it's really not your child's fault, it's your fault, so it shouldn't be the child's problem to go back and forth between two different families. "
"It seems that although this arrangement is a bit novel, it is good for the family."
"Lucky to be with Noah"



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Either way, if she ever ends up missing her good ol' days on reality TV, she can always queue up the DVDs or crank up "Unwritten."”
“Despite Bunney and Conrad's falling out, Bunney still keeps in touch with a few other Hills cast members: the notorious duo Heidi Montag and Spencer Pratt.”
“Most of those absences were to be expected, but one question remained: Where is Jen Bunney now?”
“The reality TV alum appeared on both MTV series, Laguna Beach and The Hills, but then she kind of disappeared from the public eye.”
“As it turns out, Bunney has been leading a totally normal life, and plays a super special part in the Montag-Pratt family.”
“Fans first got to know Bunney as Lauren "LC" Conrad's childhood best friend on Laguna Beach.”
“She gained more notoriety from her stint on The Hills, but not necessarily in the most positive way.”
“Bunney was more or less framed as a "villain" on the show — seemingly causing drama and generally stirring an already tumultuous pot.”
“Things got particularly rough during Bunney's 21st birthday party, though.”
“At the time, Conrad — who gifted Bunney diamonds that night, by the way — had been crushing on Brody Jenner post-Jason Wahler breakup.”


"In any case, if she missed out on a reality show, she could always line up for a DVD or" unwritten "
"Despite the fall out between Bonnie and Conrad, bonnie is still in touch with several other actors in Hills: the infamous combination Heidi Montague and Spencer Platt."
"Most absences are expected, but one question remains: where is Jen Bonnie now?"
"The reality TV star appeared in both the MTV series Laguna Beach and the mountains, but then she disappeared from the public eye."
"It turns out that Bonnie has been living a completely normal life, playing a super special role in the Montag Platt family."
"Fans first met Bonnie, Lauren Conrad's best friend at Laguna Beach as a child."
"Her experience in the mountains has made her famous, but not necessarily in the most positive way."
"Bonnie is more or less framed as a" villain "in the show - it seems to cause dramatic changes, and generally stirs up an already turbulent pot."
"But at Bonnie's 21st birthday party, things got really tough."
"At that time, Conrad - who, by the way, presented Bonnie diamonds that night - had been infatuated with Brody Jenner since Jason Waller broke up."



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“No, absolutely not.”
“Another person asked Dakota whether he ever feared he might hurt someone while having a PTSD episode, to which he said: 'That's such a great question.”
“Twitter can you imagine being a dad and not being allowed to be at your child s birth...”
“Opening up The former Marine took to Instagram Stories to share more thoughts about his divorce from Bristol and the circumstances of their split Dakota opened up about the circumstances of Sailor s birth adding I wasn t invited to the birth and found out my child was born on...”
“She told me to go through the courts to establish paternity.'”
“'I reached out to her before Sailor was born and asked what the plan was to co-parent.”
“'I spoke with her family every month and made it clear I would be the father of my child.”
“'We planned a wedding with our families and friends and Bristol decided to leave me a week prior,' he added.”
“Dakota began his post, which featured a photo of him holding Sailor in his arms, by saying Bristol 'got pregnant right after [their] engagement'.”
“While they have officially divorced, the show started filming while they were still together, and thus documents the dissolution of their marriage.”


"No, absolutely not."
"Another person asked Dako if he had ever worried that he would hurt others when PTSD broke out." that's a very good question, "he said
"Twitter, can you imagine when dad is not allowed to have a baby..."
"The opening of the former Marine Corps took the instagram story to share more ideas about his situation with Bristol and their separation in Dakota, the opening of the case of sailor born, adding that I was not invited to be born and found that my child was born in..."
"She asked me to go through the court to determine the parent-child relationship."
"I contacted the sailor before she was born and asked her if she had any plans to raise children together."
"I talk to her family every month and make it clear that I want to be the father of the child."
"We are planning a wedding with family and friends and Bristol decided to leave me a week ago," he added
"Dakota started his post, including a picture of him holding a sailor, saying Bristol was' engaged and pregnant. '
"When they officially divorced, the show started shooting while they were still together, thus recording the dissolution of their marriage."



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Deadline Hollywood first reported the news.”
“Yan is repped by CAA.”
“Gavin O’Connor is on board to write the sequel and is also in talks to direct the film that co-stars Will Smith and Jared Leto.”
“The sequel to the Harley Quinn-starring “Suicide Squad” is also expected to begin production in 2018.”
“Production is expected to start at the end of the year after Robbie finishes shooting Quentin Tarantino’s “Once Upon a Time in Hollywood,” for which she is currently in negotiations to play Sharon Tate.”
“The studio had been weighing several Quinn options, including a “Suicide Squad” sequel with Gavin O’Connor, before picking “Birds of Prey.” Sources add that script is still being worked on, but Yan is likely to take over directing reins once the script is done.”
“Christina Hodson, who was recently tapped to pen the “Batgirl” pic, wrote the script.”
“DC previously tapped Ava DuVernay to direct “New Gods,” which is still in development.”
“...universe...”
“Yan a former Wall St Journal reporter who made her feature debut with Sundance entry Dead Pigs will be the second female filmmaker to direct a DC film following Patty Jenkins with Wonder Woman She will also be the first Asian woman to helm a movie from the DC Comics...”


"Hollywood first reported the news."
"Yan is the representative of CAAC."
"Gavin O'Connor is writing a sequel and directing the film with Will Smith and Jared Leto."
"The sequel of" suicide team "starring Harley Quinn is also expected to start shooting in 2018."
"After completion of Quentin Tarantino's Hollywood past, Robby is expected to start filming at the end of this year and is currently negotiating to play Sharon Tate."
Before choosing Raptor, producers have been weighing several of Quinn's options, including the sequel to suicide squad with Gavin O'Connor. The script is still in production, but once the script is completed, Yan is likely to take over directing, the source added
Christina Hudson, who was recently sent to write a picture of Batman, wrote a script
"Washington D.C. previously hired EVA duvinai to direct new God, which is still under development."
“… The universe
"Yan, who used to be a reporter for the Wall Street Journal, will be the second female producer to direct DC films after Patty Jenkins and wonder woman, and she will be the first Asian woman to direct DC comic films..."



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In this Black Ink Crew clip, Dutchess tattoos a Jay-Z lyric down the spine of the girl’s back.”
“27 Calvin Harris and Rachel Platten Getty 28 Normani Kordei Getty 29 Camila Cabello and Clive Davis Getty Grammy nominee JAY Z has impact that reaches far and wide...”
“Sam Smith and Dua Lipa dualipa 19 Cardi B iamcardib 20 Lorde Vic O Connor and Sonja Yelich Getty 21 Young Paris and Eve 22 Jimmy Jam and Family Getty 23 Calvin Harris Diplo and Camilla Cabello Getty 24 Kesha Getty 25 Shaggy and Sting Getty 26 Rita Ora Getty...”
“Rodgers Getty 10 Bono and James Corden Getty 11 Rihanna Getty 12 Chrissy Teigen Getty 13 Sam Smith and boyfriend Brandon Flynn Splash News 14 Big Sean and Jhene Aiko IG 15 Dave Chappelle and Trevor Noah Getty 16 Erykah Badu Getty 17 Sarah Silverman and Dave Chappelle Getty 18”
“1 Kendrick Lamar and James Corden Getty 2 Bruno Mars Getty 3 Alessia Cara and Khalid Getty 4 Cardi B and Bruno Mars Getty 5 Rihanna Getty 6 Alicia Keys and Miley Cyrus Getty 7 Julia Michaels and Kesha 8 Katie Holmes Getty 9 Trevor Noah DJ Khaled and Nile...”
“Check out the pics below to see your favorite stars letting their hair down after music’s biggest night.”
“We don’t know about you, but we just love seeing celebs we didn’t even know were cool chatting it up between camera time.”
“In between the shows moments, celebrities mingled backstage and congratulated each other on a show well done.”
“Grammys sweeper Bruno Mars celebrated his night at NYC hot spot Jade Sixty while A-listers like Dave Chappelle, Lorde and Camilla Cabello cut a rug at Universal Music Group’s star-studded Grammy’s after party.”
“Win or lose, celebrities couldn’t wait to bounce around the big apple and party ’till the sun came up.”


"In this black ink crew clip, Dargis tattoos a Jay-Z lyric on the girl's back."
"27 Calvin Harris and Rachel pratengetti 28 Norman nicordi Getty 29 Camilla Cabello and Clive Davies Getty's Grammy nomination for jay z has a profound impact..."
"Sam Smith and duaripa duipa 19 caddy B imcaddy 20 Lord Vic O. Connor and Sonia yelic 21-year-old Paris and Eve 22-year-old Jimmy jam and his family 23-year-old Calvin Harris diplo and Camilla Cabello 24-year-old Kesha 25-year-old Shaji and sting 26-year-old Rita Ola Getty..."
"Rogers Getty 10 Bono and James scooter Getty 11 Rihanna Getty 12 Christie tigan Getty 13 Sam Smith and boyfriend Brandon Flynn splash news 14 Sean and Jean Aiko funny 15 Dave Chappelle and Trevor noagetty 16 Erica baduggetty 17 Sarah Silverman and Dave chappellgetty 18"
"1 Kendrick Lamar and James Colden Getty 2 Bruno Mars Getty 3 Alecia Carla and Khalid Getty 4 Cady B and Bruno Mars Getty 5 Rihanna Getty 6 Alicia case and Miley Cyrus Getty 7 Julia miles and Katha 8 Katy Helms Getty 9 Trevor Noah DJ Khalid and Nile..."
"Take a look at the pictures below to see how your favorite stars relax after the music feast."
"We don't know about you, but we just like to see celebrities who we don't even know chatting during photo time."
"During the interval of the performance, celebrities congratulated each other backstage on the success of the performance."
Bruno Mars, the Grammy sweeper, celebrates his night at jade sixty, a hot spot in New York, while stars like Dave Chappelle, Lord and Camilla Cabello are at Universal Music Cut the carpet at the starry Grammy Awards
"No matter win or lose, celebrities can't wait to revel around the big apple until the sun rises."



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Breaking up is not in the cards."”
“She and Hart also looked happy as they posed for a picture the day previous.”
“File Photo by Kevin Dietsch/UPI | License PhotoKevin Hart (R) with Eniko Parrish, son Hendrix and daughter Heaven at his Hollywood Walk of Fame ceremony on October 10, 2016.”
“File Photo by Christine Chew/UPI | License PhotoKevin Hart (L) and Eniko Parrish attend a New York screening of "Kevin Hart: What Now?"”
“...on October 12, 2016.”
“The couple shared photos this week from their trip to Mexico after Hart was spotted with an unknown woman.”
“File Photo by John Angelillo/UPI | License PhotoJuly 25 (UPI) -- Kevin Hart and Eniko Parrish put on a united front this week following cheating rumors.”
“The 38-year-old actor and comedian and Parrish shared photos from their trip to Mexico with friends after Hart was spotted with a mystery woman in Miami Beach.”
“Advertisement"Great times with great people .... #LiveLoveLaugh #Family #Blessed," Hart captioned a picture Tuesday with Parrish and their pals in front of a private jet.”
“Parrish, a model who is pregnant with the couple's first child, was all smiles Monday in a photo she shared of herself and Hart cooking s'mores.”


"It's impossible to break up."
"She and Hart looked happy when they posed for photos the day before."
"Information photo of Kevin dietsch / UPI | license photo Kevin Hart (right) with Eniko Parrish, son Hendrix and daughter haven at the Hollywood Walk of fame ceremony on October 10, 2016."
Kevin Hart (left) and iniko Parrish take part in Kevin Hart: what now? 》Screening in New York
“…… 12 October 2016. "
"After Hart was found with a strange woman, the couple shared photos of their trip to Mexico this week."
"On July 25, Kevin Hart and Eniko Parrish formed a united front this week after making false rumors."
"The 38 year old actor comedian and parish shared photos of their trip to Mexico with friends after they were found on Miami Beach with a mystery woman."
"Advertising" is a great era and a great person.... #On Tuesday, Hart took a photo of Parrish and their friends in front of a private plane with the title of "family happiness"
"Parish is a model who is pregnant with the couple's first child. On Monday, she was smiling in a group photo of herself and Hart doing s'mores



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jack Dylan Grazer plays a young Riley, Moynihan is the adult version and John Laroquette is the older incarnation of the character.”
““Hi @PattyJenks.”
“The 40-year-old confirmed the news to Entertainment Tonight at the Television Critics Association press tour in L.A. on Tuesday, August 1.”
“When asked how he’s coping with being a new dad, Moynihan replied, “It’s life, man.”
“It’s life.”
“Crazy.”PageSix reports that Broadway actress O’Malley, who wed Moynihan last year, was due on July 14.”
“The comedian, who left SNL in May after nine seasons on the NBC hit, announced that he and his wife were expecting in June.”
“He shared a picture of Gal Gadot as Wonder Woman on Instagram and posed a question to the film’s director, Patty Jenkins.”
“Big fan.”
“He costars with Family Matters alum Jaleel White in the show, which tells the story of a man named Alex Riley, who is portrayed by three actors.”


"Jack Dylan Glazer plays a young Riley, Moynihan is the adult version, and John laroquet is the old incarnation of the role."
"Hi, Patty Jenks."
The 40 year old confirmed the news to the entertainment industry on Tuesday, August 1, at a TV Review Association press conference in Los Angeles
Asked how he coped with becoming a new dad, Moynihan replied, "that's life, man."
"This is life."
"Crazy." Broadway actress O'Malley, who married Moynihan last year, was due to get married on July 14, according to the report on page 6
The comedian left SNL in May after nine seasons on NBC and announced that he and his wife would be pregnant in June
"He shared a picture of Gail gado playing wonder woman on instagram and asked Patty Jenkins a question."
"Big fans."
"He partners with alum JALEEL white, a family alum, and tells the story of a man named Alex Riley, who is played by three actors."



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...look from the 2018 Grammy Awards red carpet...”
“It took more than 100 hours to craft the lengthy black velvet gown from start to finish, and Jebran and his team focused on including elements that embodied strength.”
“The music legend shut down the Grammys tonight when she arrived midway, joining husband Jay-Z in the audience, and given her gown, it was easy to see why.”
“Dressed in all black by Nicolas Jebran and accented by a single white rose, the star smartly capped off a week filled with great looks chosen with her stylist, Marni Senofonte.”
“Though the visual appeal of her latest look is instantly clear, the story behind it may come as a surprise.”
“According to Jebran, the inspiration for the dress was rooted in the traditions of social justice.”
““The idea was to create a moment, a memorable design with meaning because it’s more than just a gown,” shared the designer via email from Paris.”
“After he was contacted by Senofonte to create a custom piece for the event, Jebran sought to innovate.”
“Though he’s worked with Beyoncé and her team in the past, creating one of a kind looks for appearances at the Video Music Awards and other events, the 2018 Grammys required something special.”
“1 / 4 Chevron Chevron Photo: Getty ImagesCiting the 1960s Black Panther movement as a reference point—one that Beyoncé has revisited multiple times, from her Super Bowl 50 performance to Lemonade—Jebran aimed to capture the spirit of vitality with his creation.”


“…… From the red carpet of the 2018 Grammy Awards ceremony... "
"This black velvet robe took more than 100 hours to craft from beginning to end, and jebran and his team focused on the elements of strength."
"This music legend came to the Grammy Awards ceremony in the middle of the night, appeared in the audience with her husband Jay-Z and gave her a dress. It's easy to see why."
Wearing an all black dress designed by Nicolas jebran and a white rose, the star skillfully ended a beautiful week selected by stylist Marni senofonte
"Although the visual appeal of her latest look is instantly visible, the story behind it can be a surprise."
"According to jebran, the inspiration for this dress comes from the tradition of social justice."
"The idea is to create a moment, a meaningful and memorable design, because it's more than just a dress," the designer shared via email from Paris
"After senofonte contacted him to customize a piece for the event, jebran sought innovation."
"Although he has worked with Beyonce and her team in the past to create a unique look for the music video awards and other events, the 2018 Grammy awards need something special."
"1 / 4 chevron chevron photos: Getty Images takes the Black Panther movement in the 1960s as a reference point. Beyonce has visited many times, from the performance of the Super Bowl top 50 to lemonade. Jebran aims to capture the spirit of vitality with creation."



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So, make sure to save that day and stay tuned for more upcoming info.”
“You’ll get more juicy details when E1’s series WAGS LA will return for season three which is scheduled on Thursday, August 24 at 9 p.m. ET/PT only on E!”
“They told E!”
“News that they are full of love right now and that it was an incredible journey getting here as that they couldn’t be happier.”
“They are both very overjoyed and excited abut the future, and we also wish them all the best.”
“The couple got engaged in the season two finale of the hit E!”
“...series this past September.”
“William was on a trip together with her friends when English surprised her proposing with the most beautiful Ritani ring.”
“Williams was on a trip together with her friends when English surprised her proposing with the most beautiful Ritani ring.”
“Before he got down on one knee, English told his love one who has been his girlfriend for four years the following lovely words:“I really felt like I had to come over here because you didn’t have nothing to wear on your left hand.”


"Therefore, please be sure to save the information of the day and continue to pay attention to more upcoming information."
"When the E1 series wags La returns in the third season, you'll get more interesting details. The third season is scheduled for August 24, Thursday, 9pm EST / Pacific time only at e!"
"They told me!"
"The news is that they are full of love now and it's an incredible journey to come here because they can't be happier."
"They are very happy and excited about the future and we wish them all the best."
"The couple got engaged at the second season finale of the hit show e!"
“… This September's series. "
"When William was traveling with her friends, the Englanders surprised her by proposing to her with the prettiest ritani ring."
"When Williams was traveling with her friends, the Englishmen surprised her by proposing to her with the prettiest ritani ring."
Before he got down on one knee, ingrish said such a lovely sentence to his girlfriend's wife, who has been his girlfriend for four years: "I really feel that I have to come here because there is nothing to wear on your left hand."



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Fingers crossed!”
“Once Sofia starts dancing on him, he recalls their hotel hook up and we’re not gonna lie, it’s super hot.”
“The singer gets frisky with a stripper in his new video for ‘Entertainer!’ Watch here!”
“Zayn Mailk and model Sofia Jamora are at it again in his latest music video for Entertainer In it Sofia is seen rocking a blonde wig which gives her more Kylie Jenner vibes than Gigi Hadid but she s in the dressing room of a strip club while Zayn walks...”
“...the streets smoking a cig...”
“The vid is a continuation of his last hit, “Let Me,” in which Zayn is essentially in Scarface and he and Sofia escape the bad guys on a boat.”
“This time, Zayn enters the club and sees his love interest, while singing, “Guess you didn’t know that you were my favorite entertainer, I watch you, laugh with and f–k with you.”
“Don’t you take me for a fool.”
“In this game, I own the rules.” Damn.”
“As a bleach blonde Zayn spots Sofia, he has flashbacks to their “Let Me” rendezvous.”


"Pray
"Once Sofia starts dancing on him, he'll recall their hooking up in the hotel. We won't lie. It's too hot there."
The singer has a great time with strippers in his new video for the artist! "Look here!"
"Zayn mail and model Sofia jamora appear again in his latest artist music video, where Sofia is wearing a golden wig, which makes her feel more Kylie Jenner than Gigi Hadid, but she is in the dressing room of the strip club while zayn walks..."
“… Smoking in the street... "
"This video is a continuation of his last" let me do it. "In this film, Zane is basically on the scar. He and Sophia escape from the bad guys by boat."
This time, zayn walked into the club, saw his taste, sang and said, "I guess you don't know you're my favorite artist. I look at you, laugh with you, f – K with you."
"Don't think I'm a fool."
"In this game, I have the rules." damn
When a blonde Zahn found Sophia, he thought of their "let me" date



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““If we do our job right, you’re going to go along for the ride.””
“Laroquette being much taller than Moynihan, “in the future scenes we tried to surround [Laroquette] with taller people so he is not towering over them.” But Moynihan and Larroquette are never seen together on screen, Kopelman reminded.”
““I’m an unabashed fan of SNL and would have stayed there forever and ever,” Moynihan acknowledged.”
““The day you get SNL you start worrying about your exit from SNL; it was always on my mind.”
“It was 13 years of getting it and then one day you get it and then you start thinking This is my life s dream what am I going to do after this It s always in the back of...”
“...your mind Moynihan said...”
““I knew my contract was ending.”
“I went to LA and went to a meeting,” Moynihan said of jumping to CBS.”
“He remembered thinking I ve got to make a decision soon whether to hang out at the place I love most or try and become an adult and move on Asked why he left SNL when the show is on...”
“...fire thanks to Donald Trump Moynihan said I felt like I was on one show for eight years and another for one year...”


"If we do a good job, you go for a ride."
"La roquet is much higher than Moynihan," we try to make (LA roquet) surrounded by higher people in future scenes, so that he won't be higher. "But Copperman cautioned that Moynihan and La roquet had never been together on screen."
"I'm a big fan of SNL and I'll stay there forever," Moynihan admitted
"From the day you got SNL, you began to worry about leaving SNL, which has always been on my mind."
"It's 13 years to get it, and then one day you get it, and then you start to think it's my lifelong dream, after what I'm going to do, it's always behind..."
“… Your heart Moynihan said
"I know my contract is about to expire."
"I went to Los Angeles and attended a conference," Moynihan said of moving to CBS
"He remembers that I thought I had to make a quick decision whether to go to my favorite place or try to be an adult and then move on and ask him why he left SNL at the beginning of the show..."
“…… Thank Donald Trump Moynihan for saying, "I feel like I've been on one show for eight years and another for a year..."



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple, who met and got engaged on season 2 of the ABC reality TV series in 2015, announced in March that they were expecting their first child.”
““For all the things my hands have held… the best by far is you…” he captioned the photo.”
“Tolbert, 30, shared a sweet photo on Friday that showed him kissing his little girl.”
“#bestdayever #ilovemyfamily.”The Bachelorette alum also tagged the baby’s Instagram account.”
“We love you so much.”
“Precious little girl, there are no words to describe the feeling of holding you in our arms for this first time and looking into your beautiful eyes.”
“She arrived on her own terms, quickly and 4 weeks early, but she is perfect in every way, healthy and doing well.”
““Our little sweetheart is here!”
““We did it!” Roper wrote in an emotional post on Friday, August 18.”
“She is such an angel and we can’t get enough of her!”As Us Weekly previously reported, the reality TV couple welcomed their first child on Thursday, August 17.”


"The couple met and got engaged in the second season of the 2015 ABC reality TV series and announced in March that they were pregnant with their first child."
"Everything I hold in my hand So far the best is you... " He wrote under the title of the photo
"The 30-year-old shared a sweet picture on Friday of him kissing his little daughter."
"The best day ever, I love my family." The single woman's alumni also tagged her child's instagram account
"We love you so much."
"Dear little girl, this is the first time I hold you in my arms and look into your beautiful eyes. The feeling is indescribable."
"She came according to her own conditions. She came very quickly, four weeks ahead of schedule, but she was perfect in all aspects, healthy and well done."
"Here comes our sweetheart!"
"We did it! On Friday, August 18, Roper wrote in a moving article
"She's such an angel. We've had enough of her! "As US Weekly reported earlier, the new reality show couple had their first child on August 17 (Thursday)," he said



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He was known for his smile, his fearlessness, his adventurous spirit, his mischievous sense of humor, and giving big hugs.”The Associated Press contributed to this reporting.”
““Nick also treasured the environment and he took seriously his responsibility to protect it,” the young star’s obituary says.”
““Duffy” reportedly got his start in fishing as a child with his father and grandfather.”
“He also appeared on the spinoff series "Wicked Tuna: Outer Banks."”
“Fudge appeared on “Wicked Tuna,” which follows several fishing boats in Gloucester, Mass., in search of the elusive Atlantic Bluefin tuna.”
“We join his family and friends in mourning his untimely loss,” the statement read.”
““Duffy was the first mate on Captain Tyler McLaughlin’s fishing vessel, Pinwheel.”
“The network also confirmed the fisherman’s passing in a statement released on Twitter.”
“Fudge died “unexpectedly” on Thursday, according to an obituary published on the funeral home’s website.”
“A cause of death has not been released.”


"He's known for his smile, fearlessness, adventure, mischievous humor and hugs." The associated press contributed to the report
"Nick also values the environment. He takes the responsibility of protecting the environment seriously," the young star's obituary said
It is reported that Duffy started fishing with his father and grandfather when he was a child
He also appeared in the derivative series "evil tuna: the Bund."
Fudge appeared in "the evil tuna," which tells the story of several fishing boats searching for the elusive Atlantic bluefin tuna in Gloucester, Massachusetts
"We join his family and friends in mourning his untimely death," the statement said
"Duffy is the first mate on captain Taylor McLaughlin's windmill."
"The network also confirmed the fisherman's death in a statement on twitter."
Fudge died "accidentally" on Thursday, according to an obituary on the funeral home's website
"The cause of death has not been announced."



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“The A Wrinkle In Time star also let slip about how smitten the bride and groom looked during the celebration.”
“And what it would take to be prepared for such a moment,' she added.”
“'And I thought immediately of the history, the legacy, the astounding moment Meghan Markle was stepping into.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“This right here is a whole 'nother level!"'”
“I exclaimed out loud to no one in particular: "Whoa!”
“'It literally took my breath away.”
“'I was unprepared for the depth of emotion I felt stepping onto the grounds of Windsor Castle,' Oprah wrote in the upcoming issue.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
The time star also revealed the expression of the bride and groom at the wedding
"And what it takes to prepare for such a moment," she added
"I immediately thought of history, of the legacy, of Megan markel's shocking moment."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from instagram."
"It's just another level!"
I yelled, "Wow!"
"I can't breathe."
"I was unprepared for the emotional depth I felt when I set foot on Windsor Castle," Oprah wrote in an upcoming issue of the magazine



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Cute kids + sweets + puppies + Styles = a winning recipe if ever we’ve seen one.”
“Styles ends it all with a sly smirk and wins over our hearts as he’s done so many times before.”
“A hilarious class photo closes the video, in which Styles and all of the students are covered in frosting.”
“...leftovers...”
“Related article Cate Blanchett is cool with the claim that Harry Styles is copying her outfits He then lets out a huge scream and a flood of puppies run through the doors to eat all of the food fight s...”
“But when he arrives, he comes with a puppy in hand, clad in the same chic floral suit as Gadsdon.”
“Related article: Harry Styles can’t stop leaving clues about his “Kiwi” music videoStyles himself doesn’t make an appearance until over two minutes into the fun-filled madness.”
“Once she joins the other students—who have their own slew of yummy baked goods at their disposal—Gadsdon slams down her sweets and the most epic food fight we’ve ever seen begins.”
“To set the scene, young actress Beau Gadsdon of Rogue One: A Star Wars Story is seen walking through the school halls with cupcakes in tow.”
“The three minute-long visual stars all of the impeccably dressed children he introduced on Instagram over the past few days, as well as a whole host of others.”


"Lovely kids + candy + dog + style = if we've seen it, it's a successful recipe."
"Stiles ended it with a sly smirk and won our hearts, just as he did many times before."
"A funny class photo ends the video, in which all the students are covered with frost."
“… Leftovers... "
"Kate Blanchett was cool about Harry styles' imitation of her clothes, and then he let out a huge scream, and a lot of dogs ran into the door to eat all the food..."
"But when he arrived, he had a little dog in his hand and was dressed in a flowery dress as chic as garzton."
"Related article: Harry stiles can't stop leaving clues about his Kiwi music video. He didn't show up in the fun filled madness until two minutes later."
"When she and the other students enjoyed delicious baked goods, gatzton drank all the sweets, and the most epic food war we've ever seen began."
Beau gadsdon, a young actress from "thief one: Star Wars," walks down the school hall with cupcakes
"The three minute video stars are all the impeccably dressed kids he's introduced on instagram in the past few days, as well as a bunch of other kids."



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“All rights reserved.”
“Copyright © 2018, ABC Radio.”
“All three were later spotted singing along to Taylor’s song “Dress,” with Gigi even dropping to her knees at one point.”
“Blake and Ryan were joined at the show by Taylor’s other bestie, Gigi Hadid.”
“Taylor previously confirmed it was James’ voice on the track in the liner notes for Reputation.”
“The couple was spotted in the audience genuinely freaking out when Taylor played the clip of their three-year-old daughter James’ voice, which kicks off her song “Gorgeous.” Blake was seen recording the moment on her phone and the two cheered when they heard their toddler over the speakers.”
“Michael Loccisano/Getty ImagesBlake Lively and Ryan Reynolds were proud parents Saturday night at Taylor Swift’s concert at Gillette Stadium in Massachusetts.”


"All rights reserved."
"Copyright? 2018, ABC Radio."
"It turned out that all three of them were singing along with Taylor's song skirt, and Gigi even knelt down for a while."
"Black and Ryan were on the show with another friend of Taylor's, Gigi Hadid."
"Taylor previously confirmed that this is James' voice on the track in" Liner reputation notes. "
"When Taylor played the sound clip of their three-year-old daughter James, the audience found that the couple were really scared. This is the opening line of her song gorgeous. Black was seen recording the moment on his cell phone, and they cheered when they heard a toddler coming from the loudspeaker
"Michael losisano and lake lively are proud parents at the Taylor Swift concert at Gillette stadium in Massachusetts on Saturday night."



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““[She’s] not in show business.””
“Yeah, I just wouldn’t want to be with someone who was disrespectful to me,” he said at the time.”
““I think I’m a pretty good person and a good boyfriend.”
“During a 2013 conversation with Howard Stern, the Snowden star opened up about his budding romance without revealing who he was dating.”
“The duo quietly tied the knot at their home in December 2014, and in the beginning stages of their relationship, Gordon-Levitt wouldn’t publicly name his then-girlfriend.”
““And so, for now, I’m just a protective dad, and I want to protect his privacy.”The actor and businesswoman have kept most aspects of their relationship out of the public eye.”
“...and make that decision for himself Gordon Levitt 36 said during an appearance on Live With Kelly and Michael in September 2015 one month after his son s birth...”
“He hasn t made the choice to be in the public eye and that s a choice that I would like him to be able to make when he s older when he can think about these kinds of things...”
““My son, he’s just a baby, you know?”
“The couple are also parents of a 23-month-old son, whose name they have chosen to keep under wraps to protect his privacy.”


"(she) is not in show business."
"Yes, I just don't want to be with someone who doesn't respect me," he said at the time
"I think I'm a very good person, a very good boyfriend."
"In a conversation with Howard Stern in 2013, the Snowden star revealed his budding romance without revealing who he was dating."
"The two married quietly at home in December 2014. At the beginning of their relationship, Gordon Levitt didn't want to publicly name his girlfriend at that time."
"So for now, I'm just a protective father, and I want to protect his privacy." The actor and businesswoman kept most aspects of their relationship out of the public eye
“…… Make your own decisions, Gordon Levitt, 36, said on "living with Kelly and Michael" one month after his son was born in September 2015
"He hasn't made the choice to appear in public yet, which I hope he can make when he grows up, when he can think about such things..."
"My son, he's just a baby, you know?"
"The couple, who are also the parents of a 23 month old son, chose to keep his name secret in order to protect his privacy."



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Like AllAboutTRH On Facebook.”
“Follow AllAboutTRH On Twitter.”
“Eden Sassoon may have gotten her walking papers, but the former Real Housewives of Beverly Hills star says she’s at peace with it.”
““I get a call…Great conversation.”
“And at the end of it, I was like, ‘Oh my God, I’m alive,'” she told E!.”
““I’m alive again.”
“I feel free and this end to that chapter, just a moment of time in my life, but a pretty big one because a lot of emotional stuff I worked through, is going to open the most beautiful things to come.”
“And I wanted to tell people before people found out from different sources.”
“And that was my way of sharing you know really truly an end is a new beginning and anything s possible now While it s only been a short time since her departure was announced Eden says she s talked to a few of her RHOBH co stars since the...”
“...news broke...”


"It's like allaboutthh on Facebook."
"Follow allaboutthh on twitter."
"Eden Sassoon may have got the running script, but the former Beverly Hills star housewife said she was calm about it."
"I got a call Good conversation. "
"Finally, I said, 'oh my God, I'm still alive,'" she told e. "
"I'm alive again."
"I feel free. The end of this chapter is just a moment in my life, but it's quite a big moment, because I've experienced a lot of emotional things, which will open up the best things in the future."
"I want to tell people before they find out from different sources."
"That's my way of sharing. You know, the real end is a new beginning. Now everything is possible. Although the news of her departure has just been announced, Eden said that she has talked with several of her RHOBH co stars, because..."
“… Message out... "



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"We have a lot of songs but in those times we just tried to get them to the outside world, and we didn't have enough money to do it weself," he explained to Reshma B.”
“Even a legend like Scratch has suffered from bad business deals.”
“Scratch, who will turn 85 next month, describes reggae music as "a spiritual organization that I put together," which isn't much of an exaggeration.”
“But for people like Scratch and Reshma B—whom VIBE readers know as the Boomshots correspondent who does IG Live interviews with all the top dancehall stars—every month of the year is reggae month.”
“Brown s birthday and runs through Bob Marley s birthday on February 6 all the way until the end of the month...”
“Plans to hit the film festival circuit in 2020 were put on pause by the pandemic but the film is finally streaming worldwide just in time for Reggae Month the international celebration of Jamaican music that kicks off today Dennis...”
“...where it was viewed by over 1 million people...”
“Hailed as one of the finest reggae documentaries ever made by acclaimed author John Masouri and a magical piece of work by veteran UK reggae radio DJ David Rodigan the Studio 17 doc premiered in late 2019 on BBC television...”
“Moments like these make the Studio 17 film a rare treat for music lovers seeking to understand the creative alchemy that makes reggae the most mystical and misunderstood music in the world.”
“"But Randy's wasn't humming or Randy's wasn't [shhhh-ing]."”


"We had a lot of songs, but at those times we just tried to get them out into the world and we didn't have enough money to be ourselves," he explained, reshma B
"Even legends like scock have had bad business deals."
Scotch, who turns 85 next month, is not exaggerating to describe reggae music as "a spiritual organization I organized."
"But for people like scratch and reshma, it's Reggae month that Ig interviews all the top ballroom stars every month of the year."
"Brown's birthday lasts until February 6, Bob Marley's birthday, until the end of the month..."
"The 2020 Film Festival plan has been suspended due to the influenza pandemic, but the film has finally been released around the world, just in time for the opening of the Reggae crescent Mecca music international celebration Dennis...."
“… There are more than one million people watching... "
"Known as one of the best Reggae documentaries in history, it was produced by the famous writer John masouri, and is also a magical work of David rodigan, a senior DJ of British Reggae radio station. Studio 17 premiered on BBC TV at the end of 2019..."
"Moments like this make studio 17's movies a rare enjoyment for music lovers, who want to know that reggae music is the most mysterious and misunderstood creative alchemy of music in the world."
"But Randy didn't hum or Randy didn't (Shhh)



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Buffy the Vampire Slayer star posted another Instagram of the performer with her 8-year-old daughter Charlotte Grace and her friend citing the lyrics of another P!nk pop classic: “Oh...we got the party started @pink.””
“She not only called Blair “the best date ever,” but described P!nk as “F**kin Perfect,” to quote her 2010 hit single.”
“Gellar posted the picture, gushing with her co-star from the 1999 film Cruel Intentions, in which the two actresses were anything but on good terms (although their characters did share an infamous onscreen kiss).”
“Sarah Michelle Gellar and Selma Blair reunited for a sweet selfie at P!nk's LA concert this weekend at The Forum.”


"The star of Buffy the Vampire Slayer posted another picture of the actor on instagram, in which her 8-year-old daughter Charlotte grace and her friends quoted another P! NK pop classic: "Oh Our party starts @ pink. "
She not only called Blair "the best date ever," but also described P! Citing her 2010 hit single "the perfect f * * kin"
"Galea posted this picture, and she talks to her partner in the 1999 film" cruel intent, "in which the two actresses have a bad relationship (though their character does have a notorious kiss on screen)
Sarah Michelle gella and Selma Blair in P! NK's Los Angeles concert will be held at the forum this weekend



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In the interview, Paris brushed off Trump's lewd comments as typical guy talk.”
“Zervos' attorney Gloria Allred stated that after Trump was accused by several other women of sexual misconduct, he 'knowingly, intentionally, and maliciously threw each of these women under the bus', and repeatedly called them 'liars'.”
“So I don't believe any of that.'”
“'They want to get money or get paid to not say anything or get a settlement when nothing really happened.”
“Advertisement'I feel like, a lot of people, when something happens, all these opportunists will come out.”
“'Moving forward I will continue to do what I can to be an advocate for girls and women with the hopes of providing a louder voice for those who may desperately need it.”
“'I am deeply hurt by how this has played out and also deeply sorry.”
“'I always believe in helping women have their voices heard and helping create an environment where women feel empowered and believe in themselves.”
“'I was speaking about my own experiences in life and the role of media and fame in our society and it was never my intention for my comments to be misapplied almost a year later.”
“'They were part of a much larger story and I am regretful that they were not delivered in the way I had intended.”


"In the interview, Paris saw Trump's obscene remarks as a typical man's conversation."
"Gloria Allred, a lawyer for zevos, said that after trump was accused of sexual misconduct by several other women, he" knowingly, deliberately and maliciously threw these women under the bus "and repeatedly called them" liars. "
"So I don't believe it at all."
"They want to get money or pay, don't say anything, and don't want to be reconciled when nothing happens."
"I think a lot of people, when things go wrong, these opportunists will come out."
"Moving forward, I will continue to do my best to be an advocate for girls and women, hoping to provide a louder voice to those who may need it urgently."
"I am deeply hurt by the result of all this, and I am deeply sorry."
"I've always believed in helping women listen to themselves and create an environment in which women feel empowered and confident."
"I'm talking about my own life experience and the role of the media and fame in our society, and I never intend to let my comments be misused nearly a year later."
"They're part of a bigger story, and I'm sorry they didn't deliver as I planned."



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Online Editors...”
“By dinnertime, her nutritionist Dr Philip Goglia recommends an eight-ounce piece of fish with four ounces of sweet potatoes.”
“(Photo by Jerritt Clark/Getty Images for Klutch Sports Group)Khloe Kardashian has opened up about the diet she's relying on to fuel her life as a new mother, just weeks after she hit back at critics who took aim at her for exercising too much.”
“The 33-year-old welcomed her first child, a daughter True, in April, with boyfriend Tristan Thompson and she has been keeping followers up to to date with her dedicated fitness regime.”
“It's believed she has lost 30 pounds in the weeks since giving birth and is in the midst of returning to an tweaked version of her normal exercise routine to be more gentle on her body.”
“In 2014, Khloe famously began her physical transformation and dropped a whopping 40 pounds and four dress sizes.”
“These days, she's inching her way back into healthy eating, writing on her website that she's one a low carb diet which includes "one tablespoon of jam and one tablespoon of almond butter" in the morning.”
“"It has lots of protein, so I'm able to go all out at the gym, but the best part is that I'm never hungry because I'm always eating," she wrote.”
“After her morning workout, she eats two eggs, one cup of oatmeal and one cup of berries.”
“Expand Close Tristan Thompson and Khloe Kardashian attend the Klutch Sports Group "More Than A Game" Dinner Presented by Remy Martin at Beauty & Essex on February 17, 2018 in Los Angeles, California.”


Online editor
At dinner time, her nutritionist Dr. Philip goglia recommends an 8-ounce piece of fish and a 4-ounce piece of sweet potato
(Photo by jerritt Clark / Getty Images, klutch Sports Group) Khloe Kardashian revealed her diet as a new mother, and just a few weeks ago, she hit back at critics who accused her of excessive exercise
In April, 33 year old Tristan Thompson and her boyfriend ushered in their first child, a daughter true, who has been keeping fans up-to-date with her focused fitness program
"She is believed to have lost 30 pounds in the weeks after delivery and is now returning to an adjusted version of her normal exercise program to be more gentle with her body."
"In 2014, Khloe began its famous body transformation, losing 40 pounds and four sizes of clothes."
"These days, she's slowly returning to a healthy diet, writing on her website that she's on a low carbohydrate diet that includes" a spoonful of jam and a spoonful of almond butter "in the morning
"It's high in protein, so I can do my best in the gym, but the best thing is I'm never hungry because I always eat," she wrote
After morning exercise, she had two eggs, a cup of oatmeal and a cup of berries
"On February 17, 2018, Tristan Thompson and Khloe Kardashian attended the klutch Sports Group's" more than a game "dinner hosted by Remy Martin in Beauty & Essex in Los Angeles, California."



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“...m doing now...”
“Eleven years after the death of Steve Irwin, his legacy lives on through his children, Bindi, 19, and Robert, 14.”
“During Sunday’s Super Bowl, a moving clip aired for the Irwin family’s new Animal Planet series, which featured Steve reflecting on his passion for wildlife conservation and his family’s involvement.”
“His daughter Bindi shared the truly moving video of her late father to Twitter.”
““My first time watching this footage was only a few days ago,” she wrote.”
““I don’t think I’ll ever be able to describe the amount of emotion in my heart once the video ended.”
“My dad.”
“My superhero.”
“I promise to do my best to make you proud and ensure your legacy lives on forever.”My first time watching this footage was only a few days ago.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
“… I'm doing it now... "
"Eleven years after Steve Owen's death, his legacy continues through his two children, 19-year-old bingdy and 14-year-old Robert."
"In Sunday's super bowl, the Owen family's New Animal Planet Series aired a touching clip in which Steve reviewed his passion for wildlife conservation and his family's involvement."
"His daughter, Bingdi, tweeted a truly moving video of her late father."
"The first time I saw this video was a few days ago," she wrote
"I think once the video is over, I can never describe the emotion in my heart."
"My father."
"My superhero."
"I promise to do my best to make you proud and make sure your legacy lasts forever." The first time I saw this video was a few days ago



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Despite not attending the wedding, George Clooney knows Princess Eugenie's husband well.”
“But why didn't the Hollywood couple make it Princess Eugenie and Jack Brooksbank's nuptials?”
“When Harry and Meghan tied the knot, George and Amal had one of the best views of the couple in St. George's Chapel.”
“Sitting in the left choir with Meghan's friends and family, the Clooneys made a big impact at the wedding, and it was thought that they'd also be putting in an appearance at Eugenie and Jack's big day.”
“However, George and Amal were noticeably absent from the second royal wedding of 2018, which was attended by celebs including Demi Moore, Liv Tyler, Kate Moss and Naomi Campbell.”
“WPA Pool Getty ImagesThis content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Brooksbank became the UK's brand ambassador for Casamigos in 2016, which is a tequila company Clooney co-founded with Cindy Crawford's husband, Rande Gerber.”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Although he didn't attend the wedding, George Clooney knew Princess Eugenie's husband well."
"But why didn't the Hollywood couple get married to Princess Eugenie and Jack Brooksbank?"
When Harry and Megan got married, George and Amar saw one of the best views of the couple at St. George's church
"The Clooney family and Megan's family and friends are sitting in the choir on the left, which has a great influence on the wedding. People think they will show up in Eugene and Jack's big day."
"However, George and Amar were apparently absent from the second royal wedding in 2018, attended by celebrities including Demi Moore, Liv Taylor, Kate Moss and Naomi Campbell."
"WPA pool Getty Images this content is imported from {embedded name}."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Brooksbank became the UK Brand Ambassador of casamigos, a tequila company co founded by Clooney and Cindy Crawford's husband, Rand Gerber, in 2016."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It should be noted Manjimutt is already dead and is not even an actual artist.”
“Manjimutt from Yo-Kai Watch uses this as an excuse for why he has no friends.”
“(2016 was a good year-long example.)”
“Technology has also amplified this trope's effects, with streams of a freshly-deceased artist's songs skyrocketing and social media making people's opinions more apparent.”
“The modern-day sentiment is probably "Dead Musicians Are Better", music being arguably the second-most personal media form.”
“For some reason, fraud accusations are seldom made.”
“Of course, something inevitably goes wrong, the artist is found to be alive, and the status quo is restored.”
“...years...”
“In 99 of the cases where this trope is mentioned one character either the artist or an associate will come up with the brilliant idea of spreading rumors of the artist s death which immediately causes said artist s work to magically get the recognition that eluded it all these...”
“...or more of the same...”


"It should be noted that manjimut is dead, not even a real artist."
"Manjimutt of Yo Kai watch uses this as an excuse to explain why he has no friends."
"(2016 is a good example of the whole year.)
"Technology has also magnified the metaphor, with a new dead artist's song stream surging, and social media making people's opinions more visible."
The mood of modern people may be that "the dead musician is better", and music can be said to be the second largest form of personal media
"For some reason, there are very few allegations of fraud."
"Of course, there will inevitably be problems, finding the artist alive and restoring the status quo."
“… Year... "
"In 99 cases where this metaphor is mentioned, a character, whether an artist or his colleagues, will come up with a brilliant idea and spread rumors about the death of the artist, which will immediately make the artist's works miraculously recognized by people, and all this is impossible..."
“… Or more of the same... "



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“POPULAR ON VARIETY:”
““And so thrilled to be working once again with Peter Morgan.”
“As Variety reported back in January, Bonham Carter will play Princess Margaret, taking over the role played for the first two seasons by Vanessa Kirby.”
““I’m not sure which I’m more terrified about — doing justice to the real Princess Margaret or following in the shoes of Vanessa Kirby’s Princess Margaret,” the actress said.”
““The only thing I can guarantee is that I’ll be shorter [than Vanessa].”She will next be seen in the film “Ocean’s 8.” Bonham Carter is known for her role as Bellatrix Lestrange in the “Harry Potter” franchise, as well as several collaborations with Tim Burton.”
“She is repped by WME and Conway van Gelder Grant.”
“Watkins, meanwhile, will play Harold Wilson.”
“Wilson was the Prime Minister of the United Kingdom from 1964 to 1970 and again from 1974 to 1976.”
““I am delighted to become part of this exceptional show,” Watkins said.”
“Harold Wilson is a significant and fascinating character in our history.”


Popular variety shows:
"I'm very excited to work with Peter Morgan again."
Bonham Carter will play Princess Margaret, taking over Vanessa Kirby's role in the first two seasons, according to variety in January
"I'm not sure which one I'm more afraid of - being fair to the real Princess Margaret or wearing Vanessa Kirby's Princess Margaret shoes," the actress said
"The only thing I can guarantee is that I'll be shorter." Next, she will appear in the movie ocean 8. Bonham Carter is famous for playing Bellatrix Lestrange in the Harry Potter series and several collaborations with Tim Burton
"WME and Conway van Gelder grant represent her."
"In the meantime, Watkins will play Harold Wilson."
"Wilson served as British Prime Minister from 1964 to 1970 and again from 1974 to 1976."
"I'm happy to be part of this special show," Watkins said
"Harold Wilson is an important and fascinating figure in our history."



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’m a champ and I’m back.””
“But you know what?”
“I’m overheated in my costume and I did pass out.”
“After a brief commercial break, she returned and said it “was not a stunt.”
“In October 2017, she suddenly collapsed on live TV.”
“No, never.”An outpouring of support flooded in the comments of Williams’ video, while some fans were concerned for her health.”
“What?”
““I took the proper vacation time, but take off sick?”
““I feel awful, I had to be talked out of going into work today, and taking off a few days to get myself together,” said Williams, calling herself a “thoroughbred” and referring to her days on the radio when she refused to take a sick day.”
“Reruns are airing in place of live shows.”


"I'm the champion. I'm back."
"But you know what?"
"My clothes are too hot. I really passed out."
After a short advertising break, she came back and said, "it's not a gimmick."
"In October 2017, she suddenly fainted on live TV."
"No, never." Williams's video comments have poured out a lot of support, while some fans are worried about her health
"What?"
"I'm on a proper leave, but I'm on sick leave?"
"I feel terrible," Williams said. "I had to be pushed out to work today and take a few days off to refresh myself." She called herself "purebred" and mentioned on the radio the day when she refused to take sick leave
"Replay replaced live."



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“More information about PETA’s work to help animals is available at PETA.org.”
“PETA is currently investigating whether the law was broken in this instance.”
“...being are often ignored...”
“Robert Pattinson is our kind of guy and everyone s who has a heart for refusing to masturbate a dog which is like child molestation and for talking about it so that the public can see that once again animal trainers top priority is money and animals interests and well...”
“Time PETA depends on actors and crew members to come forward when they see mistreatment whether it involves a dog who is being forced into churning water on the set of A Dog s Purpose or an A list actor who is being asked to molest his canine co star...”
“For Immediate Release August 4 2017 Contact Moira Colley 202 483 7382 Los Angeles Below please find a statement from PETA Senior Vice President Lisa Lange in response to Robert Pattinson s announcement that he had refused to perform a sex act on a dog on the set of Good...”


"For more information about PETA helping animals, visit PETA."
"PETA is currently investigating whether the case is illegal."
“… Ignored... "
"Robert Pattinson is a person like us. Everyone has a heart that refuses to masturbate a dog. It's like molesting a child and talking about it. Let the public see again that the first task of animal trainers is money and the interests of animals, as well as..."
"Time for PETA depends on actors and staff, whether it involves a dog being forced to stir water at the dog's destination, or a list of actors being asked to molest his dog's co stars when they see abuse..."
"For immediate release on August 4, 2017, please contact Moira Colley 202 483 7382 Los Angeles (Los Angeles) and check the statement of Lisa Lange, senior vice president of PETA, on Robert Pattinson's refusal to have sex with dogs on the set of good..."



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'” SiSi’s dad, Wilson, told Entertainment Tonight in July of his girl’s dancing skills, which seem to be inherited from mom.”
““She’s got so much personality… She was dancing to ‘Level Up’ today, and she’s grooving, and I’m like, ‘Man, she’s got better rhythm than me and she’s 1!”
“So cute!❤️”“daddy’s replica.. its like copy pasting..so identical.. much love and respect ciara.”Since Ciara welcomed Sienna last year, the baby has been a celebrated addition to the family, which already includes her 4-year-old son Future Zahir Wilson, whom Ciara shares with rapper Future.”
“ gorgeous baby girl‼️”“Wow her daddy spit her right out lol.”“She is his twin so cute….. ”“Dear lord that’s daddy’s baby girl!”
““She’s a mini Russell!”“Omg lookn like her dad”“@ciara she looks just like her daddy!”
“As Sienna and Ciara were cheering on Wilson, fans eagerly remarked about how much the couple’s only daughter looks like her dad.”
“The mommy and daughter duo watched the Seahawks take on the Los Angeles Rams in a 36-31 game that went to the Rams.”
“#3 #GoHawks ,” the “Dose” singer captioned the Sunday, Nov. 11 photo of her and 1-year-old Princess Sienna Wilson.”
“Let’s go!!”
““#GameDay!”


"Ceci's father, Wilson, talked about his daughter's dancing skills on entertainment tonight in July, which seems to be inherited from her mother."
"She has a lot of personality She danced "upgraded version" today. She had a great style. I said, "man, she has a better rhythm than me. She's only one year old!"
"How lovely! ❤️ "A copy of dad.. It's like copy and paste. It's exactly the same.. I love and respect Sheila very much. "The child has been part of the family since Sheila welcomed Siena last year. The family includes her 4-year-old son, future Zahir Wilson, and Sheila shares the child with rapper future."
"Beautiful baby girl ‼️ "Wow, her father threw her up, ha ha." "She's his twin, so cute...".. "Dear God, it's dad's baby girl!"
"She's Mini Russell! "God, she looks like her father" @ Sheila, she looks like her father! "
"When Sienna and Sheila cheer for Wilson, fans are keen to talk about how much the couple's only daughter looks like her father."
"The mother and daughter watched the Seahawks beat the Los Angeles Rams 36-31, which was eliminated by the rams."
"Three gohawks," the "dose" singer photographed her with 1-year-old Princess Sienna Wilson on Sunday, November 11
"Let's go!"
"Game day!"



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’ve known him for so long, and it’s so incredible having someone like that supporting you and knowing without a doubt that they are going to be there no matter what happens.””
“Their stunning wedding photos were captured by Elizabeth Messina.”
“On Sunday, the Pretty Little Liars alum married fiancé Hudson Sheaffer in a romantic ceremony at the Leslie Estate, a castle in Glaslough, Ireland, PEOPLE confirms.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We had the most magical day in Ireland.”
“Our wedding was beyond our wildest dreams,” the happy couple tells PEOPLE exclusively.”
“For her fairytale nuptials, the bride donned a custom Christian Siriano gown, a XIV Karats necklace and Zadig & Voltaire bracelets.”
“Her hair and makeup was done by Ryan Richman and Kirin Bhatty, respectively.”
“Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
““He’s incredible,” she told PEOPLE while competing on Dancing with the Stars in October 2017.”


"I've known him for a long time, and it's amazing to have people like that to support you, and no doubt that no matter what happens, they will be there."
"Their amazing wedding photos were taken by Elizabeth Messina."
"People" confirmed that on Sunday, the beautiful young liar alumni held a romantic wedding at Leslie manor, Glasgow castle, Ireland
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"We had the most amazing day in Ireland."
"Our wedding went beyond our wildest dreams," the happy couple told people exclusive
At the fairy tale wedding, the bride wore a custom Christian Siriano dress, a 14 carat necklace and a Zadig & Voltaire bracelet
"Her hair and makeup were done by Ryan Richman and Kirin Barty, respectively."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
"He's incredible," she told people in a dance competition with the stars in October 2017



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““To think that she was wearing sheer dresses in the ‘70s and just what people must have thought back then.””
“!”“She’s always had the sickest style, I’m obsessed with her,” Kardashian told the magazine.”
“Kim Kardashian kicked off Halloween by dressing up as Cher, alongside her best friend Jonathan Cheban as Sonny Bono.”
“The social media mogul and her pal attended the Casamigo Annual Halloween Party on Friday, October 27, and their costumes were spot-on!”
“The duo arrived hand in hand at the star-studded 1970s bash held at the Gibson Showroom in West Hollywood.”
“Although a source tells Us Weekly that they didn’t stay long, they posed for photos wearing their costumes inspired by what the iconic singing duo wore to the Academy Awards in 1973.”
“Before heading to the event Kardashian 37 showed off her costume and toned abs in a video on Snapchat wearing a long black wig and two piece yellow ensemble created by Brazilian couture designer Alexandrine that was almost identical to Cher s original Bob Mackie outfit while the Oscar winner...”
“...s hit song Believe played in the background...”
“Cheban, 43, danced with her, wearing a burgundy suit by Stello with a wig and mustache similar to the late singer, who died in 1998.”
“The Keep Up With the Kardashians star began teasing her look early on Friday, tweeting to fans: “Getting ready for tonight!”


"When you think about the transparent dress she wore in the 1970s, people must have thought so."
"!" she always has the most morbid style and I'm crazy about her, "Kardashian told the magazine
"Kim Kardashian and her best friend Jonathon Cheban, together as Sonny Bono, started Halloween."
The social media mogul and her friends went to casamigo's annual Halloween party on Friday, October 27, and their costumes were eye-catching
"In the 1970s, the two came here hand in hand at a star studded Carnival at the Gibson hall in West Hollywood."
"Although a source told us weekly that they didn't stay long, they still wore the clothes of the iconic singers at the 1973 Oscars."
"Before going as like as two peas, Kardashian and her 37 show a costume and body hair on the Snapchat video. She wears a black long wig and two piece yellow ensemble, created by Brazil fashion designer Alexander (Alexandrine), which is almost identical to Oscar's original Bob (Bob Mackie) costume."
“… I believe the popular songs will be played in the background... "
Cheban, 43, dances with her, wearing a Burgundy suit from stro, a wig and a beard similar to the late singer who died in 1998
"Get ready for tonight!" the "keep up with Kardashian" star began joking about her looks early last Friday and told fans on his microblog



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s the Good, the Bad, and the Ugly”,”reading_time”:11}]};”
“Vox dug deep into this phenomenon, and Card Advice Is Going Viral on TikTok.”
“But while many of the tips you might find are pretty useful \u2014 hello, tortilla trend \u2014 there\u2019s plenty of bad advice floating around, especially on a topic near and dear to our hearts at NextAdvisor: personal finance.”
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First is known for viral videos and life hacks galore.”
“...const FP = tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who\u2019ve Done it learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”


"Here are the good, the bad, the ugly", "reading time: 11}]}
"Vox delves into this phenomenon, and the card proposal spreads on tiktok."
"However, although you may find many tips very useful, tortilla trend has a lot of bad suggestions, especially a topic we are very concerned about: Personal Finance on next advisor."
"Here's what I'd like to know. What I'd like to know before I buy my first book is that it's famous for virus videos and a lot of life hackers."
“… Const FP = tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Experts who have learned a lot from the whole process of purchasing my first house have acquired the skill of starting a side push. "



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And even though we won’t be with them every week, in a show about magic and hope, we fervently believe it won’t be the last we see of them.“”
“As Once continues, this group will always be the beating heart of the show.”
“Without them there would be no Once Upon a Time.”
“We can’t thank them enough for the hard work, dedication, and passion they delivered day in and day out.”
“...has the heart of the truest believer...”
“And Jared literally grew up before the eyes of millions from a child actor with enormous innate talent to a young man whose abilities continue to astound as he created a character who truly as we say on the show...”
“She made the character soar to incredible heights while always keeping her grounded and relatable.”
“Rebecca took us on a broomstick roller coaster ride as she re-invented the Wicked Witch of the West by finding the pain beneath the green.”
“...encountered...”
“Emilie took the character of Belle to a deep and soulful place bringing great intelligence and warmth to the character making her fiercely independent strong willed but also an eternal optimist who saw only the best in all those she...”


"Although we will not be with them every week, we firmly believe that this will not be the last time we see them."
"As always, these people will always be the heart of the show."
"Without them, there would be no past."
"We are very grateful to them for their hard work, dedication and enthusiasm day after day."
“… Have the heart of the most sincere believer... "
"Jared grew up in the eyes of millions of people, from a child actor with great talent to a young man with amazing ability. He created a character, as we said in the program..."
"She made the character fly to incredible heights, while always being down-to-earth and approachable."
"Rebecca took us on a broomstick roller coaster. She discovered the pain under the green and reinvented the evil witch of the West."
“… Meet... "
"Emily takes the role of bell to a deep and affectionate place, brings great wisdom and warmth to the role, makes her have strong independence and strong will, but at the same time, she is also an eternal optimist. She only sees everything she thinks is the best..."



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The image of Jenner approaching police appeared to reference the widely shared photograph of Ieshia Evans, a black woman who stood up to riot police during a Black Lives Matter protest following the fatal shooting of Alton Sterling by police in 2016.”
“The soft drink multinational’s video featured the reality TV star and model Jenner joining a protest but then defusing a standoff with police by handing an officer a can of Pepsi.”
“The advert, first screened last week, shows a boy asking his mother about his dead father.”
“As she tells him what his dad was like, the boy looks sad as they do not seem to have much in common.”
“His face lights up once they arrive at a McDonald s and as he eats a Filet O Fish his mother says That was your dad s favourite too Shelley Gilbert a psychotherapist who founded the children s bereavement charity Grief Encounter said it had received a lot of phone...”
“...calls from concerned parents...”
“She said: “What [McDonald’s] have done is exploited childhood bereavement as a way to connect with young people and surviving parents alike – unsuccessfully.”
““One in 29 children are bereaved of a parent or sibling by the time they are 16 years of age, so this storyline will resonate with a huge number of children and surviving parents.”
“We have already received countless phone calls this morning with parents telling us their bereaved children have been upset by the advert and alienated by McDonald s as a brand that wants to emotionally manipulate its customers The Advertising Standards Authority said it had received about 100 complaints by Monday...”
“...with more coming in...”


"Jenner's picture of approaching the police seems to refer to the widely circulated picture of ieshia Evans, a black woman who stood up with riot police during the black life protest after police shot and killed Alton sterling in 2016."
"In the video of the soft drink multinational, Jenna, a reality TV star and model, joined the protest, but then handed a police officer a can of Pepsi to defuse the confrontation with the police."
The ad, first aired last week, shows a boy asking his mother about his dead father
"When she told him what his father was like, the boy looked sad because they didn't seem to have much in common."
"As soon as they arrived at McDonald's, his face lit up. When he was eating fish fillets, his mother said that it was also your father's favorite. A psychotherapist from Shelley Gilbert children's bereavement charity said that he received a lot of calls..."
“… A call from parents who care about it... "
"What [McDonald's] did was use the pain of childhood bereavement to connect with young people and surviving parents, but it didn't succeed," she said
"One in 29 children loses their parents or siblings at the age of 16, so the story will resonate with a large number of children and surviving parents."
"This morning, we have received numerous phone calls from parents telling us that their bereaved children feel uneasy about advertising and alienated by McDonald's because McDonald's is a brand that wants to manipulate customers emotionally. The agency said it had received about 100 complaints as of Monday. "
“… More people are coming in... "



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“How does Canto Bight have that body of water surrounding it and that huge waterfall?”
“Yes, it’s a desert planet!”
“It’s a continuation of the Coruscant Nights trilogy, which stars a Jedi Knight named Jax Pavan in the days after Order 66.”
“Planets, Other Cameos, & Miscellaneous– This isn’t the first Star Wars story to bear the name “The Last Jedi.” In the Legends timeline, there’s a novel called The Last Jedi by Michael Reaves and Maya Kaathryn.”
“He can be seen next to the Resistance fighter who tastes the salt on the ground.”
“– In one of the more overt cameos in the movie, Rogue One director Gareth Edwards appears during the Battle of Crait.”
“He also appeared in The Force Awakens.”
“– Nien Nunb, the Sullustan who piloted the Millennium Falcon with Lando Calrissian during the Battle of Endor, makes a brief appearance as part of Poe Dameron’s X-wing squadron.”
“She gets a bit more to do this time around, such as help Poe Dameron commit mutiny and take over the Raddus.”
“– Billie Lourd, Carrie Fisher’s daughter, returns once again as Lieutenant Kaydel Ko Connix.”


"How did the waters around Cantor Bay and the huge waterfalls form?"
"Yes, it's a desert planet!"
"It's a continuation of the" Coruscant night "trilogy, starring a Jedi named Ajax pavan in the days after Order 66."
"Planets, other guest stars and miscellaneous - this is not the first Star Wars story in the name of" the last Jedi. ". On the legendary timeline, there is a novel by Michael Reeves and Maya kasserin called the last Jedi. "
"You can see him next to the resistance soldier who has tasted the salt on the ground."
——In a more public Cameo scene in the film, the director of rogue one, Gareth Edwards, appears in the battle of Crete
"He also appears in the awakening of the force."
"In the battle of Endor, nean nurbu, a sallustan who drove the Millennium Falcon with Lando Calrissian, appeared briefly as a member of Poe Dameron's X-Wing squadron."
"This time she has more work to do, such as helping Poe Dameron to mutiny and take over ladus."
——Kelly Fisher's daughter, Billie Lloyd, is back as Lieutenant Cadel COE connix



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scroll through to see the photos!”
“...series and a makeup line.”
“The mom of three — who shares North, 4, Saint, 2, and 3-month-old Chicago with husband Kanye West — is now known as an icon worldwide with an empire that includes her family’s hit E!”
“A lot has happened to the former Catholic schoolgirl since she graduated in ’98.”
“...reality star reminisced while showing off shots of the private high school saying We are walking down the same halls that we walked 20 years ago this is crazy She also shared several selfies with friends...”
“So my friends are worried that we re gonna run into people that they were mean to and I feel so good about my conscience that I was so nice to everyone Kardashian quipped as a friend says in the background So nice Back at her old stomping grounds the...”
“The KKW founder, 37, shared a series of clips on Snapchat documenting her appearance at her alma mater, Marymount High School, which she graduated from in 1998.”
“Kim Kardashian got nostalgic on Friday, April 13, when she attended her 20-year high school reunion with pals she hadn’t seen in two decades.”
“Reunited and it feels so good!”


"Scroll through photos!"
“… Series and a supply line. "
"The mother of three lives with her husband Kanye West in Chicago, north, four, saint, two, three months old, and is now famous for an empire that includes her family's hit song" E! "
"A lot has happened to this former Catholic schoolgirl since she graduated in 1998."
“…… The reality TV star recalled when showing pictures of a private high school that we walked in the same hall 20 years ago. It was crazy. She also shared some self portraits with her friends. "
"So my friends are worried that we will meet their mean people. I feel good about my conscience and I feel good about everyone. Kardashian said backstage, "I'm back in her former stampede field very well..."
The 37 year old kkw founder shared a series of videos on snapchat about her graduation from her alma mater, Marymount high school, in 1998
"On Friday, April 13, Kim Kardashian was nostalgic when she was at a 20-year high school reunion with friends she hadn't seen in 20 years."
"It's nice to be reunited!"



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““[Christine] and Ben respect each other and will do anything to make sure their kids are happy.”The couple has two children together — Ella and Quinlin, 12.”
““They are a very loving family,” added the source, who didn’t expect a messy uncoupling from the pair.”
““It gets hard — he has a very busy Hollywood career, and she’s been very focused on being a mom,” a source told PEOPLE at the time.”
“Image zoom Credit: Bruce Glikas/FilmMagicA source told PEOPLE that Stiller’s hectic work schedule helped contribute to the split.”
“We kindly ask that the media respect our privacy at this time,” they wrote in a joint statement.”
“Our priority will continue to be raising our children as devoted parents and the closest of friends.”
““With tremendous love and respect for each other, and the 18 years we spent together as a couple, we have made the decision to separate.”
“Image zoom Credit: Paul Zimmerman/WireImageRELATED VIDEO: Ben Stiller and Christine Taylor Split After 17 Years of MarriageIn May, Stiller and Christine Taylor, 46, announced they were separating after 17 years of marriage.”
“Stiller wore a black suit with a striped black-and-grey tie while his teenage daughter wore a bright green dress with a gold clutch.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"(Christina) and Ben respect each other and will make every effort to ensure that their children are happy." The couple have two children together - Ella and Quinlin, 12
"They are a loving family," the source added, adding that the relationship would be a mess
"It's hard - he has a very busy career in Hollywood, and she's been very focused on being a mom," one source told people
"Image scaling credit: Bruce glikas / filmmagica sources told people that Stiller's busy schedule contributed to the split."
"We urge the media to respect our privacy at this time," they wrote in a joint statement
"Our top priority will continue to be to develop our children into loyal parents and closest friends."
"With great love and respect for each other and the 18 years we spent together as a couple, we decided to separate."
Photo source: Paul Zimmerman / wireimagereleased VIDEO:Ben Stiller Stiller and Christine Taylor, 46, announced their separation in May after 17 years of marriage
"Stiller was wearing a black suit and a black gray striped tie, while his teenage daughter was wearing a bright green skirt with a gold clutch on it."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So it’s kind of a new life.””
“But she’s tired and she’s ready to go.”He and Chavez have certainly had their ups and downs over Flipping Out‘s 10 seasons.”
“Out...”
“But after nearly two decades as Lewis’ housekeeper, the 68-year-old reality star has finally retired.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It’s been kind of rough,” Lewis told PEOPLE in a phone interview on Thursday.”
““I’m happy for her new life, but of course we were sad over here and we miss her.”Image zoom Credit: Kelsey McNeal/Bravo/GettyIf Chavez’s absence is felt even more right now, it’s because there’s a lot going on in the Lewis household.”
“Not only are the reality star’s house-flipping and design businesses thriving, but he and his partner of eight years Gage Edward are also busy raising their 9-month old daughter, Monroe Christine.”
“Lewis explains: “Zoila retired about three months ago.”
“She stayed the first six months we had the baby, which is amazing.”


"So it's a new life."
"But she's tired. She's ready to go." He and Chavez must have had ups and downs in the 10 seasons of the TV series
"Get out..."
"But after nearly 20 years as Lewis' housekeeper, the 68 year old reality star finally retired."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's a bit tough," Lewis told people in a telephone interview on Thursday
"I'm happy for her new life, but of course we're sad here. We miss her." Image zooming credit: Kelsey McNeill / Bravo / Getty if Chavez's absence feels stronger now, it's because of a lot of things that have happened to the Lewis family
"Not only is the reality TV star's house renovation and design business booming, he and his partner of eight years, gage Edwards, are also busy raising his 9-month-old daughter, Monroe Christina."
"Zoira retired about three months ago," Lewis explained
"It's amazing that she stayed in the first six months of our birth."



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"His brilliant, fearless spirit touched and inspired so many, and his generosity knew no bounds."”
“The 42-year-old actress and filmmaker took to social media to share her grief, two weeks since the popular chef’s death.”
““Two weeks without you,” Argento wrote alongside a photo of the pair soaking up the sun at sea.”
“The food critic died by suicide earlier this month.”
“He was 61.”
“He was found dead in his hotel room in France by close pal, Eric Ripert, while in town filming his CNN series, Parts Unknown.”
“Following his death, Argento released a statement on Twitter.”
“"Anthony gave all of himself in everything that he did," she wrote.”
“Anthony Bourdain's Ex-Wife Shares Photo of 'Brave' Daughter This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"His brilliant and fearless spirit has touched and inspired so many people. His generosity is endless."
The 42 year old actress and filmmaker shared their grief on social media after the famous chef died two weeks ago
"Two weeks without you," Argento wrote next to a photo of the two basking in the sea
"The food critic died of suicide earlier this month."
"He's 61."
"While filming the CNN series the unknown in France, Eric riper, a close friend, found him dead in his hotel room."
"After Argento's death, he made a statement on twitter."
"Antony went all out in everything he did," she wrote
"Anthony Bourdain's ex-wife shared a photo of his' brave 'daughter. This video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's message."



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s really fun!”Alba and Warren, who met on set of 2005’s Fantastic Four, dated for three years before tying the knot in 2008.”
““We’ll get to have a sleepover, we’ll get to order room service, we’ll get to rent a movie.”
“Jessica Alba and her husband, Cash Warren, have welcomed their third child together, Us Weekly can confirm.”
“Alba posted a pic of her newborn on Instagram on Monday, January 1, writing, “Hayes Alba Warren 12/31/17 Best gift to ring in the New Year!!”
“Cash and I feel so blessed.”
“Haven and Honor are already obsessed with their new baby bro.”Proud papa Warren also shared a pic that showed him cradling his son.”
““Hayes Alba Warren: You sure know how to ring in the new year!” he captioned the photo.”
““You showed up a few days early but we couldn’t be any happier.”
“Your Mamma is the strongest woman I know … you’re so lucky to have her by your side.”
“You have two amazing sisters who already adore you and I know you’ll be thankful to have them guide the way.”


"It's really fun! Alba and Warren met in 2005's magic four and married in 2008 after dating for three years
"We can stay overnight, book room service, rent movies."
"American weekly" confirmed that Jessica Alba and her husband KASH Warren have jointly ushered in their third child
On Monday, January 1, Alba posted a picture of her newborn on instagram. She wrote, "Hayes Alba Warren's best New Year gift ring for 12 / 31 / 17!"
"Cash and I feel lucky."
"Harvey and horn have become obsessed with their new brother." The proud father Warren shared a picture of him holding his son
"Hayes Alba Warren: you can call in the New Year!"! "He added a title to the photo."
"You came a few days earlier, but we couldn't be happier."
"Your mother is the strongest woman I know You're lucky to have her by your side. "
"You have two amazing sisters who have already admired you, and I know you will appreciate their guidance."



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s moving to Phoenix.”The Virigina Beach native and the former bearer of red roses found their happy ending, and Kufin, 27, is preparing to start an exciting new chapter as the season 14 star of The Bachelorette.”
““Lauren had trouble opening up on the show a little bit and our relationship developed late and I was always sort of vying for her affection,” the real estate agent told Ripa and Seacrest, 43.”
“The new couple appeared on Ripa, 47, and Ryan Seacrest’s morning show Live With Kelly and Ryan on Wednesday, March 7, but Ripa shaded their romance on Instagram only moments after the interview.”
““I give them 100 days.”
“Yikes,” a fan commented on a photo the Live With Kelly and Ryan account posted promoting the episode.”
“Ripa quipped back, “You’re being generous.”The Emmy winner didn’t hold back from calling Luyendyk out for his controversial actions during his visit to the show.”
““I want to understand everything,” she told the race car driver, who broke up with his season 22 Bachelor winner, Becca Kufrin, and proposed to his runner-up, 26-year-old Burnham, on After the Final Rose on Tuesday, March 6.”
““What are you thinking?”
“How did this happen?”
“Were you as shady as I think you are now?”Luyendyk kept his cool as he explained that he “of course” felt pressure to propose to Kufrin on the finale, which aired on Monday, March 5.”


"She's moving to Phoenix." The native from Virgina beach, a former Red Rose holder, has found their happy ending, and the 27 year old is preparing to start an exciting new chapter as the star of Season 14 of bachelor
"Lauren is a bit hard to talk about on the show, our relationship is developing very late and I'm always fighting for her feelings," the real estate agent told Ripa and Seacrest, 43
"The couple appeared on the 47 year old Ripa and the Ryan Seacrest morning show live with Kelly and Ryan on Wednesday, March 7, but Ripa only covered up their relationship on instagram shortly after the interview ended."
"I give them 100 days."
"Yikes," a fan commented on a photo posted by Kelly and Ryan's accounts to promote the episode
"You are so generous," Ripa joked The Emmy winner did not hesitate to call luyandick because his behavior on the show was controversial
"I want to know everything," she told the racer, who broke his season 22 bachelor champion, Becca Coughlin, and presented his runner up, 26 year old Burnham, on Tuesday, March 6, after the final rose
"What are you thinking?"
"How did this happen?"
"Are you as dark as I think you are? Luyandick remained calm, explaining that in the final episode broadcast on Monday, March 5, he "certainly" felt the pressure to propose to kuflynn



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“The Duchess of Cambridge stepped out today for a holiday party, which she's hosting for military families with Prince William at Kensington Palace, wearing the perfect plaid skirt for the occasion.”
“The pleated midi piece is by Emilia Wickstead, and boasts a bright red, green, and white tartan.”
“For her top, Kate opted for a cardigan by Brora, but cleverly buttoned it up and wore it like a blouse.”
“(The cardigan-as-a-shirt look is a BAZAAR-approved trend for the winter.)”
“Samir Hussein Getty ImagesStuart C. Wilson Getty ImagesThis content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge's Christmas party involved families of Royal Air Force (RAF) personnel from the RAF Coningsby and RAF Marham stations currently serving in Cyprus.”
“Prince William was seen making truffles with some of the young attendees, while Kate was seen chatting with some of the children and moms.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
The Duchess of Cambridge went out to a holiday party today. She and Prince William held the party for military families at Kensington Palace. She was wearing a perfect plaid skirt
"This pleated MIDI is the work of Emilia wickstede and is famous for its bright red, green and white plaid patterns."
"Kate chose Broca's cardigan for her top, but it was cleverly buttoned up and looked like a shirt."
"Cardigans, or shirt styles, are a winter trend recognized by the market."
"Samir Hussein Getty Images Stuart C. Wilson Getty Images this content is imported from {embed name}."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge Christmas party involved the families of RAF personnel from RAF corningsby station and RAF malum station currently serving in Cyprus."
Prince William was seen making truffles with some young participants, while Kate was chatting with some children and mothers



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...of YouTube s policy against spam deceptive practices and misleading content or other Terms of Service violations...”
“I go on record saying I am not a f***ing pedophile.”
“On Wednesday, the YouTube channel “Pop Blast” posted an edited clip of Dawson from an old podcast with the title “I think Shane Dawson is a pedophile.”
“Here’s my proof.”RELATED: Celebs Slam Logan Paul Over Another Insensitive And Disrespectful Video From Japan TripIn the accusation video, Dawson, who has 11 million subscribers, jokes about babies being “sexy.”Dawson posted his response later that day, apologizing for the nature of his humour back.”
“He played the full podcast clip in context, making clear his remarks were simply tasteless jokes.”
““I went to Google and I didn’t want to see child porn.”
“I just wanted to see, let me pretend I’m a pedophile for a second,” Dawson said in the clip.”
““So I typed in ‘naked baby’.”
“First of all, I don’t understand why anybody would be turned on by that.”
“But, they were sexy.”


“… YouTube's policy against spam, deception and misleading content or other violations of the terms of service... "
"I made it public that I was not a paedophile."
On Wednesday, YouTube channel pop blast released a clip of Dawson from an old podcast titled "I think Shane Dawson is a paedophile."
"This is my proof." Related story: celebrities attacked Logan Paul because Dawson, who has 11 million subscribers, joked about the baby's "sexuality" in the video. Dawson later in the day issued his own response, apologizing for the nature of his humor
"He played a complete podcast clip in the context, making it clear that his remarks were just tasteless jokes."
"I went to Google and didn't want to watch child pornography."
"I just want to see it and let me pretend to be a paedophile," Dawson said in the clip
"So I typed" naked baby. "
"First of all, I don't understand why people are irritated by this."
"But they're sexy."



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...family of four...”
“Sending love everyone Although a source close to Portwood previously told PEOPLE that the reality star spent almost her whole pregnancy feeling sick she couldn t be happier about her new life with Glennon whom she met on the set of Marriage Boot Camp Family Edition last year as a...”
“More big sis and bubby pics to come.”
““And yes I still look at booboo as my my little baby.”
““I’ve just been thinking today how lucky I am to have these 2 beautiful and loving babies in my life,” she captioned the post.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Amber Portwood’s Ex-Fiance Matt Baier Says He Wants Her ‘to Be Happy and Safe’ as She Is Seen Kissing a New ManLast month, Portwood shared a photo of her daughter cradling the new addition to their family.”
“The MTV personality also shares 9-year-old daughter Leah with ex Gary Shirley.”
“Portwood, 28, welcomed James with her boyfriend Andrew Glennon on May 8.”
““Beautiful baby James,” she captioned the photo.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


“… A family of four
"Send love to everyone. Although a source close to porterwood told people before that the reality TV star felt uncomfortable almost all her pregnancy, she was very happy about her new life with Glennon. Glennon met last year on the set of the family edition of marriage boot camp. She is a..."
"More big sister and bubble pictures are coming."
"Yes, I still think of Bobo as my baby."
"I've been thinking about how lucky I am to have these two beautiful babies," she wrote in the title of the post
"Related video: Amber porterwood's former fiance, Matt Baier, said he wanted her to be" happy and safe "because she was seen kissing a new man. Last month, porterwood shared a picture of her daughter holding her new husband."
"The MTV celebrity also shared his 9-year-old daughter, Leah, with former Gary Shirley."
"On May 8, Portwood, 28, and her boyfriend Andrew Glennon welcomed James."
"Beautiful little James," she wrote under the title of the photo
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Step 3: Apply foundation.”
“Really, you can customize this guide to fit your needs.”
“Does foundation go before or after concealer?”
“Should you put your eyeshadow on first or last?”
“The truth: It’s pretty much all up to personal preference.”
“But after years of being a beauty editor and talking to makeup pros, I’ve found a layering technique that works perfectly for me.”
“For example, I fill in my brows before putting on foundation, since it’s one of the most important steps in my full routine.”
“(So if I’m rushing at the end of my makeup routine, at least my brows will be done.)”
“I also put on setting spray before mascara because I’ve ruined one too many makeup looks with runny black streaks doing it the other way around.”
“I recommend this same application sequence to my girlfriends when I’m giving impromptu lessons in the bathroom before we go out, but don't worry—you can remove and add steps as you see fit.”


"Step 3: Application Basics."
"Indeed, you can customize this guide to suit your needs."
"Before or after the foundation of Concealer?"
"Should you put your eye shadow first or last?"
"The fact is: it's almost entirely up to personal preference."
"But after years of working as a beauty editor and talking to professional makeup artists, I found a layering technique that suits me very well."
"For example, I fill in my eyebrows first and then lay the foundation, because it's one of the most important steps in my daily life."
(so if I rush through my makeup program, at least my eyebrows will dry out.)
"I painted the mascara before the spray, because I destroyed a lot of makeup, the black streaks streak in reverse."
"I suggest that my girlfriends use the same app when they're in the bathroom for impromptu classes before going out, but don't worry, you can delete and add steps according to your own needs."



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““This is far beyond just having an opinion.”NeNe’s response to receiving the cease and desist?”
“It’s one thing like I said to kind of banter back and forth and have an opinion,” Kim told E!’s Daily Pop in October.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Bitch, the joke is on you.”Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
““Hehe, haha.”
““Well I decided to be an exterminator because I just want Kim and her little silly ass dumb f—— family to know that we are laughing at your ass, bitch,” NeNe said.”
“Black people do not receive that very well.”Image zoom NeNe Leakes and Gregg Leakes | Credit: Tibrina Hobson/GettyThough NeNe was angry about the roach comments then, she made sure Kim knew she was having the last laugh.”
“Because people feel like you associated that with the ghetto or trash.”
““It sounds very racial when you are speaking to an African-American person and talk about roaches.”
““That word ‘roach’ just ain’t the word I needed to hear her saying,” NeNe said.”


"It's much more than an opinion." What's Nei's response to the armistice order? "
"It's one thing, as I said, to tease back and forth and have an opinion," Kim told e! Daily pop music in October
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"You're kidding, bitch." Want to keep up with the latest news from people? "
"Ha ha, ha ha."
"Well, I decided to become an exterminator, because I just want Kim and her little fool f-family to know that we're laughing at your ass, bitch," said Nene
"Black people don't quite accept that." Zoom Nene leaves and Gregg leaves photo source: tibrina Hobson / gettythough Nene was very angry about the comments on coach at that time, and she made sure that Kim knew she had the last laugh
"Because people think you associate it with slums or garbage."
"When you talk to an African American about cockroaches, it sounds racist."
"I don't want to hear her say the word 'cockroach'," Nei said



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: Selena Gomez Opens Up About Justin Bieber With a Very Zen Answer...”
“Of course, neither Bieber or Gomez themselves have commented on the matter.”
“Teefey admits she is "not happy" about the latest reunion between the pair, but also says "Selena can live her life however she wants as long as she is happy, safe and healthy."”
“Later, Teefey spoke to Gossip Cop about her relationship with her daughter and was very forthcoming with her opinions.”
“Recently Mandy Teefey, Gomez's mother, was reportedly hospitalized after a particularly stressful talk with her daughter about her beloved Biebs.”
“I love you to the moon and back."”
“And your heart is gold.”
“You are so funny that I find myself laughing out loud when I’m alone, remembering of something you said or did.”
“You are maturing beautifully and wise beyond your years.”
“She said, "I admire your character and integrity.”


"Related report: Selena Gomez opens up the topic of Justin Bieber with a very Zen answer..."
"Of course, neither Bieber nor Gomez himself commented on this."
Tiffany admitted that she was "not happy" about their recent reunion, but she also said that "as long as she is happy, safe and healthy, Serena can live as she likes."
"Later, Tiffany talked to the gossip police about her relationship with her daughter, and she was happy to comment."
"Recently, it was reported that Gomez's mother, Mandy teefey, was particularly stressed when talking to her daughter about her beloved Bibbs, so she was hospitalized."
"I love you to come back to the moon."
"Your heart is gold."
"You're so funny. When I'm alone, I laugh when I think of what you said or did."
"You are growing up beautifully and wisely, beyond your age."
"I admire your character and integrity," she said



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Michael Buble's Wife Luisana Shares Devastating Moment She Learned of Son's Cancer Diagnosis This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Check out the video below to hear more from the proud mom about her young son's courageous battle.”
“Thank God."”
“There are nights that I still don't sleep and I pray to God because it's still a long process and the worst is over.”
“"The most important thing is to have faith and to be strong.”
“"There are things that happen in life that make you realize that the most important things that you think are important, really aren't," the actress shared.”
“PHOTOS: Celebs and Their Cute KidsIn June, Lopilato sat down with Argentinian TV host Susana Giménez, where she opened up about Noah's cancer battle, and how he's managing to overcome his condition.”
“For his third birthday, the little boy and his 1-year-old brother, Elias, celebrated with another red-and-blue web-slinger party, where the whole family got their faces painted to fit the theme.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Michael Buble's wife, Louisiana, shared the moment she learned about her son's cancer diagnosis. This video can't be played because we can't load the sponsor's information."
"Take a look at the video below to hear more about the proud mother's view of her young son's brave fighting."
"Thank God."
"Some nights I still can't sleep, and I pray to God, because it's still a long process, and the worst is over."
"The most important thing is to have faith and be strong."
"Some of the things that happen in your life make you realize that what you think is most important is not," the actress said
"Photo: celebrities and their lovely children. In June, lopirato sat down with Argentine TV host Susana GIM é Nez, where she talked about Noah's fight against cancer and how Noah overcame the pain."
"The little boy and his 1-year-old brother Elias held another red and blue net throwing party on their third birthday, and the whole family painted their faces in a color suitable for the theme."



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Us crazy ones love you.””
“And to his family, I thank them for letting us know him and seeing the joy they brought him.”
“I will miss him everyday, but I know the memory of him will live on.”
“There are not enough adjectives to describe the light he was, to anyone that ever had the pleasure to meet him.”
“...having...”
“To my children he was Uncle Robin to everyone he worked with he was the best boss anyone had ever known and to me he was not just an inspiration but he was the Father I had always dreamed of...”
““My life is a better place because I knew Robin Williams,” Gellar said.”


"We lunatics love you."
"To his family, I thank them for letting us know him and see the joy they bring him."
"I miss him every day, but I know that his memory will last forever."
"For anyone lucky enough to see him, there are not enough adjectives to describe his light."
“… Yes... "
"For my children, he's uncle Robin. For all the people who work with him, he's the best boss ever. For me, he's not only a source of inspiration, but also the father I've always dreamed of..."
"My life is a better place because I know Robin Williams," gaila said



**Something goes wrong**
“Murrel and her husband tied the knot in October 2014 and welcomed their son in July 2016.”
“Kristin Cavallari liked Murrel's picture and Jessica Smith commented, 'Eeeek so excited for you!'”
“Former Laguna Beach stars were quick to celebrate the news.”
“Dieter Schmitz also revealed that he and his wife Isabell are expecting their first bundle of joy.”
“Murrel's 1-year-old son Levi will soon have a little brotherFamily of four: Murrel cradles her growing baby bump as she watches her son playAnd baby Johnson isn't the only upcoming addition to the Laguna Beach family.”
“Oh brother!”
“In the comments, she revealed that her due date is July 27th.”
“The soon-to-be big brother wore a navy blue sweater, jeans, and sneakers for the special announcement.”
“In the family shots, the brunette cradled her baby bump and posed alongside her son.”
“The two were best friends when they appeared on the show.”


"Morrel and her husband married in October 2014 and had a son in July 2016."
"Christine Cavallari liked Morrel's pictures, and Jessica Smith commented," eeek is so excited for you! "
"The former Laguna Beach star soon celebrated the news."
"Dieter Schmitz also revealed that he and his wife Isabel are looking forward to their first happiness."
"Morrel's 1-year-old son levy will soon have a little brother of four: Morrel is holding her growing lump and watching her son play, and little Johnson is not the only member of the Laguna Beach family to join."
"Oh, brother!"
In the comments, she revealed that her due date was July 27
The soon to be "big brother" appeared at the special event in a navy sweater, jeans and sneakers
In the family photo, the brunette holds her little lump and takes a photo with her son
"They're best friends when they're on the show."



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to Cosmopolitan, a source claimed, “Initially, they leaned on each other for emotional support after going through messy breakups.”
“Theroux is reportedly seeing Selena GomezRumors have begun circulating that Theroux has moved on from Aniston with Selena Gomez — who is 21 years his junior.”
“News reported that Theroux prefered keeping a low profile, which just wasn’t possible when married to a Hollywood A-lister like Aniston.”
“E!”
“Their lifestyles were completely differentAniston and Theroux seemed perfect for each other, but their lifestyles just weren’t compatible.”
“3.”
“A source revealed that by the time of their split, they’d actually “been separated for two months.”However, they “were having intense issues for about eight months.”Next: They may not have ever been meant to be.”
“News, Aniston and Theroux had been unhappy for quite some time.”
“They went through ‘intense issues’ for almost a yearAccording to E!”
“2.”


According to cosmopolitan, a source said, "initially, after a messy breakup, they relied on each other for emotional support."
"It's reported that serrux has seen Selena Gomez. It's rumored that serrux has transferred from Aniston to Selena Gomez, 21 years younger than him."
"The news reports say that Cyrus prefers to keep a low profile, which is impossible when he marries a Hollywood star like Aniston."
“E！”
"Their lifestyles are totally different, and Cyrus seems to fit each other, but their lifestyles are just incompatible."
“3.”
At the time of their breakup, they had actually been "separated for two months," a source said. However, they "had been having a heated argument for about eight months." The next news: they may never have been meant to be
"Good news, Aniston and seru have been unhappy for a long time."
"They've gone through nearly a year of 'hot issues' according to e!"
“2.”



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““My heart goes out to all the families who are grieving the loss of a loved one, and for all the survivors who have to live with the trauma.”See her tweets below.”
“It’s devastating that such a violent tragedy happened in a place that I’ve always considered safe, a place that I associate with such innocent, childhood memories,” she wrote on Twitter.”
““#Parkland used to be my home, my sister attended Marjory Stoneman Douglas when I was in elementary school there.”
“The 23-year-old Riverdale actress also grew up in that same town.”
“Camila Mendes is mourning the victims of the horrific high school shooting that happened on Valentine’s Day (February 14) in Parkland, Florida.”


"My heart goes out to all families grieving for the loss of their loved ones and to all survivors who have to endure the trauma." See her microblog below
"It's devastating to have such a violent tragedy in a place that I always thought was safe, a place that reminds me of such naive childhood memories," she wrote on twitter
"Parkland used to be my home. When I was in primary school there, my sister went to school in Marjorie Stoneman Douglas."
"The 23-year-old Riverdale actress grew up in the same town."
Camilla Mendes is mourning the victims of the terrorist high school shooting in parkland, Florida, on Valentine's day



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Additional reporting by Rebecca Keegan.”
“Says a source familiar with both Cavill and Gadot s contract negotiations If you do an apples to apples comparison she was paid at least as much as he was WATCH A Brief History of Wonder Woman Hollywood contracts are notoriously complicated things salaries are often sweetened by box office...”
“Meanwhile, Henry’s Cavill had been paid $14 million—46 times as much!—for his own first outing as Superman in Man of Steel.”
“It would be perfectly indicative of the gender pay gap that lingers in Hollywood .”
“.”
“...if it were at all true.”
“As the Elle article that sent the stat viral said itself, Cavill’s $14 million earnings include bonuses for box-office performance, while Gadot’s $300,000, per a 2014 Variety report, is just the base salary for each movie she’s made thus far in the DC Universe.”
“Though the details of Cavill’s reported $14 million could not be verified, a source with knowledge of studio negotiations on franchise films told Vanity Fair, “It certainly isn’t for one picture.”
“That’s insane.”The same source said of Gadot’s salary, “Entry-level actors in franchise films are paid an initial rate.”


"Rebecca Keegan's supplementary report."
"A source familiar with the contract negotiation between Carville and gadote said that if you make an apple to Apple comparison, she will get at least as much compensation as when he watched a brief history of wonder woman. Hollywood contracts are notoriously complicated, and the box office will often increase wages..."
Meanwhile, Henry's Carville got $14 million, 46 times the original! -He played Superman in iron man for the first time
"It would be a perfect illustration of the long-standing pay gap between men and women in Hollywood."
“.”
"If it's true"
"As Elle's article says, Carville's $14 million revenue includes box office bonuses, while according to the 2014 variety show report, gadote's $300000 is just her base salary for every film she has made in Washington so far."
"Although the details of Carville's $14 million report could not be verified, a source familiar with the studio's negotiations on the franchise told Vanity Fair:" this is definitely not a movie. "
"This is crazy." The same source said of gadote's salary, "entry-level actors who join the film are paid initially."



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“InstagramHowever, the star has kept her 20.4 million followers.”
“During our daily morning commute to work, we were aghast (yes, that's right, aghast) at the news that fashion icon du jour Blake Lively has deleted all of her Instagram posts and purged her following list.”
“We know right, it’s a travesty.”
“But, of course, there’s reason behind the madness.”
“Getty ImagesFollowing in the footsteps of Taylor Swift - who last year deleted her entire Instagram history in the lead to the release of her album Reputation - Blake Lively erased all signs of Instagram identity to celebrate the upcoming release of her film A Simple Favour.”
“Blake Lively InstagramThe reason?”
“Well, the actress’ new film project is a mystery/thriller which follows Stephanie, a mommy vlogger (played by Anna Kendrick), who sets out to find out why her best friend Emily Nelson (Lively), has suddenly disappeared from their small town.”
“This might explain then why the Age Of Adeline has traded in her regular following list (including the likes of Michael Kors, Lorraine Schwartz and Louboutin) for several real-life women who all go by the name of her on-screen character, Emily Nelson.”
“I mean, this is Blake Lively we’re talking about - she’s not stupid!”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Instagram hover, the star has 20.4 million fans."
"On our way to work every morning, we were stunned by the news that fashion icon du jour Blake Lively deleted all her posts on instagram and cleared her list below (yes, yes, stunned)."
"We know right, it's a kind of irony."
"But, of course, there's a reason behind the madness."
"Getty Images follows in Taylor Swift's footsteps - she deleted the entire history of instagram last year, making the album famous - and Blake Lively wiped out all the signs of instagram's identity to celebrate her upcoming film a simple favor
"Black, why?"
"Well, the actress's new film project is a mystery / thriller about Stephanie, a mother and a man named flog (played by Anna Kendrick), who starts to find out why her best friend Emily Nelson (lively) suddenly disappeared from their town."
"This may explain why Adeline's age replaces the following women (including Michael Coles, Lorraine Schwartz and lubtin) she often appears with several women in real life, all of whom are named after her on-screen role Emily Nelson."
"I mean, we're talking about Blake Lively - she's not stupid!"



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Here’s an abbreviated version of the videos posted:And here’s one of the full posts:”
“Surprise, surprise.” Others noted that Paul is an “embarrassment” to his own culture by having so little regard for the culture of others.”
“As one of the video’s commenters, Sam M. wrote, “Instead of being respectful and taking the time to learn something, Logan Paul squandered the opportunity.”
“Paul’s behavior was both juvenile and offensive, and showcases an unapologetic display of white privilege and ignorance.”
“He does all of this while sarcastically saying that he must be “respectful” while in another culture.”
“At other times he tosses eels and fish at moving cars, throws stuffed animals at store owners and local police as if he’s “playing Pokémon,” and mocks an elderly woman who does not speak English.”
“At one point Paul dons a traditional kimono while making stereotypical “Asian” hand and facial gestures.”
“Before the controversial forest video was posted, Paul shared several other videos of his time abroad, which largely serve as a compilation of his disrespectful and racist antics throughout the trip.”
“...and apologized for the video but it now appears as though Logan Paul s trip to Japan was even more offensive than many of us realized and we re not sure any amount of apologizing can undo the damage or treacherous behavior...”
“Logan Paul s trip to Japan was far more offensive than we realized and there s video to prove it This week YouTuber Logan Paul received national attention for posting a wildly insensitive video of a victim of suicide in Japan s Suicide Forest The internet celebrity has since removed...”


"This is a short version of the video post:" here is a complete post:
"Surprise, surprise." Others point out that Paul is "embarrassed" about his own culture because he is indifferent to other people's culture
"As one of the commentators on the video, Sam M. wrote," Logan Paul didn't show respect and take the time to learn, but wasted the opportunity. "
Paul's behavior is childish and rude, showing the white privilege and ignorance beyond reproach
In doing so, he ironically said that in another culture, he had to "respect others."
"Other times, he threw eels and fish at the moving car, stuffed toys at the shop owners and local police, as if playing with wonder baby, and laughed at an old lady who didn't speak English."
Once, Paul wore a traditional kimono with typical "Asian" gestures and facial expressions
"Before the controversial forest video was released, Paul shared several other videos of his time abroad, which were basically a compilation of disrespect and racial discrimination during his whole journey."
“…… And apologized for the video, but now it seems that Logan Paul's trip to Japan is more aggressive than many of us realize. We are not sure that any degree of apology can save the loss or betrayal... "
"Paul Logan's trip to Japan is far more aggressive than we realize. A video this week proves this. Paul Logan has received national attention for publishing an extremely insensitive video of suicide victims in Japan's suicide forest, which was later deleted by Internet Celebrities..."



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just three years later she won an Oscar for her supporting role in “Dreamgirls.” Her recent TV credits include NBC’s “Smash,” Fox’s “Empire” and HBO’s “Confirmation.””
“She got her start as a contender on “American Idol” in 2004.”
“She’s also just coming off a stint on Broadway in the musical “The Color Purple.” And she just released a new single, “Remember Me.”Hudson is no stranger to TV talent competition series.”
““Her exceptional skills as a singer and actress have extended to film, television and Broadway, which makes her an incredible addition and a natural fit for our show.”Hudson made a splash on NBC in December with her show-stopping performance in the “Hairspray Live” musical.”
“She embodies the experience, expertise, positivity and sheer talent that “The Voice” stands for,” said Paul Telegdy, NBC’s president of NBC’s alternative and reality group.”
“Hudson earlier this year served as a winning coach on the U.K. edition of “The Voice.”“Jennifer is an extraordinary vocal talent and one of the premier voices of our time.”
“She’ll be joining Miley Cyrus and regulars Adam Levine and Blake Shelton.”
“The Oscar-winner is on board to join Season 13 of “The Voice” as a coach.”
“Jennifer Hudson has a new gig on NBC.”


Just three years later, she won an Oscar for her supporting role in the girl of dreams. Her recent TV works include NBC's smash, fox's Empire and HBO's confirm
"In 2004, she started competing for American Idol."
She just ended up in the Broadway musical purple. She just released a new single, remember me. Hudson is no stranger to TV talent shows
"As a singer and actress, her outstanding acting skills have extended to film, TV and Broadway, which makes her an incredible new member and naturally suitable for our program." Hudson made a big splash last December in NBC's hairspray live musical
"She embodies experience, expertise, enthusiasm and pure talent, which is what" voice "stands for," said Paul trogdy, President of NBC's alternative and reality group
Hudson was a successful coach in the British version of the voice earlier this year. "Jennifer is an extraordinary vocal talent and one of the most outstanding voices of our time."
"She's going to join Miley Cyrus and frequent guests Adam Levin and black Sheldon."
"The Oscar winner joined the voice season 13 as a coach
"Jennifer Hudson has a new concert at NBC."



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That, to me, is the biggest heartbreak.”The same day Amazon parted ways with Tambor, Soloway spoke of her “respect and admiration” for Tambor’s accusers.”
“I also deeply regret that this ground-breaking show, which changed so many lives, is now in jeopardy.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Amber Tamblyn Defends Husband David Cross Amid Allegation of Racism: ‘He Said He Was Sorry’He continued, “As I have consistently stated, I deeply regret if any action of mine was ever misinterpreted by anyone and I will continue to vehemently defend myself.”
“Therefore, I can only surmise that the investigation against me was deeply flawed and biased toward the toxic politicized atmosphere that afflicted our set,” he added.”
“In our four-year history of working together on this incredible show, these accusations have NEVER been revealed or discussed directly with me or anyone at Amazon.”
““I am even more disappointed in Jill Soloway’s unfair characterization of me as someone who would ever cause harm to any of my fellow cast mates.”
““I am profoundly disappointed in Amazon’s handling of these false accusations against me,” Tambor said in a statement provided to Entertainment Weekly at the time.”
“Image zoom Credit: Phillip Faraone/Getty; David Crotty/Patrick McMullan/GettyTambor has said he was “profoundly disappointed” over the way both Amazon and Transparent creator Jill Soloway handled the situation.”
““I can’t speak for everybody, but I know there are a number of us who stand behind him — from the limited amount we know, we stand behind Jeffrey — and I am one of them,” Cross, 53, told amNewYork in an interview published Monday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"For me, it's the biggest heartbreak." On the same day that Amazon broke up with Tambor, soloway talked about her "respect and admiration" for Tambor's accuser
"I also deeply regret that this groundbreaking program, which has changed so many people's lives, is now in danger."
"Related video: Amber TAMBLYN defends her husband David cross in racist charges:" he said he's sorry, "he continued," as I've always said, if any of my actions are misinterpreted by anyone, I'm deeply sorry, and I'll continue to defend myself strongly. "
"So I can only guess that my investigation is seriously flawed, biased towards a toxic political atmosphere that plagues our setup," he added
"In the four years we've worked together to make this incredible show, these accusations have never been exposed or discussed directly with me or anyone on Amazon."
"I'm even more disappointed that Jill soloway unfairly described me as a fellow actor who would hurt me."
"I am deeply disappointed that Amazon has dealt with these false accusations against me," Tambor said in a statement provided to entertainment weekly at the time
"The credit for image zooming: Philip Faraoni / Getty; David crotti / Patrick McMullen / Getty Tambo once said he was" extremely disappointed "with the way Amazon and transparency creator Jill soloway handled the situation
"I can't speak for everyone, but I know there are a lot of people who support him - we support Jeffrey in the limited number we know - and I'm one of them," cross, 53, said in an interview with the New York Times, published on Monday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Chopra Getty Images Sarah Rafferty Getty Images Tom Hardy Getty Images Patrick J Adams and his wife Troian Bellisario This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses...”
“Getty Images Joss Stone Getty Images James Corden and his wife Julia Carey Getty Images Serena Williams and Alexis Ohanian Getty Images Gina Torres Getty Images James Haskell and Chloe Madeley Getty Images Sarah Duchess of York Getty Images Gabriel Macht and Jacinda Barrett Getty Images Abigail Spencer and Priyanka...”
“Getty Images Idris Elba and his fiancée Sabrina Dhowre Getty Images Oprah Winfrey Getty Images James Blunt and Sofia Wellesley Getty Images Pippa Middleton and her husband James Matthews Getty Images George Clooney and Amal Clooney Getty Images David Beckham and Victoria Beckham Getty Images Carey Mulligan and Marcus Mumford...”
“Here's a look at all of the stars who attended the ceremony this morning.”
“More importantly, we'll finally see which celebrities from both sides of the Atlantic got the special invitation.”
“Today, 600 lucky folks will get to see Harry and Meghan wed in Windsor.”
“In a perfect union of two nations, Meghan Markle of Los Angeles and Prince Harry of Wales (one a noted television star, the other a noted grandchild) are getting married on May 19.”
“Here in the colonies, we like to turn our reality stars into political figures, but back in the Old Blighty, they do things a little bit backwards: Their royalty simply become reality stars at the time of birth or marriage into the family.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Chopra Getty Images Sarah Rafferty Getty Images Tom hardy Getty Images Patrick J Adams and his wife troian Bellisario this content is created and maintained by a third party and imported into this page to help users provide their email address..."
"Getty pictures Jos stone Getty pictures James Colden and his wife Julia Kelly Getty pictures Serena Williams and Alexis Ohanian Getty pictures Gina Torres Getty pictures James Haskell and Chloe Madeley Getty pictures Sarah York Duchess Gabriel Macht and Jacinda Barrett Getty pictures Biguel Spencer and Priyanka... "
"Idris Elba and his fiancee Sabrina Dowell Getty picture Oprah Winfrey Getty picture james blunt and Sophia Wellesley Getty picture Pippa Middleton and her husband James Matthews Getty picture George Clooney and Amar Clooney Getty picture David and Victoria beckhamgetty Picture Kelly Mulligan and Marcus Mumford... "
"Let's take a look at all the stars who attended the awards ceremony this morning."
"More importantly, we will finally see which celebrities on both sides of the Atlantic have been specially invited."
"Today, 600 lucky people will see Harry and Megan married in Windsor."
Megan markel of Los Angeles and Prince Harry of Wales (one is a famous TV star and the other is a famous granddaughter) will marry on May 19, which is a perfect combination of the two countries
"In the colonies, we like to turn our reality TV stars into political figures, but back in the old days, they did things a little bit backwards: their royal family only became reality TV stars when they were born or married."



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Evans later told PEOPLE that she couldn’t stop crying after watching it and felt as though she is “always portrayed as ‘the bad one’ to them no matter how much I change.””
“We are sorry for the comments that were made.”Evans’ relationship with Eason was a point of contention on the most recent season of Teen Mom 2: Evans, 26, threatened to quit the show after an episode exposing the couple’s marital tensions aired.”
“The MTV star — who shares a 1-year-old daughter, Ensley, with Evans, and has two kids from previous relationships — allegedly referred to gay and transgender people as “abominations.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Eason’s Twitter account has since been taken down, but screenshots of the alleged tweets continue to circulate.”
“MTV did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“After sharing a news story about the possibility of allowing those with concealed carry permits to bring guns onto school property Eason allegedly tweeted It only makes sense to protect our kids the proper way the only way we know how One Twitter user then suggested that instead of protecting...”
“...kids with guns we arm them with education and intentional parenting No you are wrong Eason allegedly replied...”
““Please tell me sir, how do you propose we make all the people in America start being better parents?”
“Or are you a monkeys uncle Image zoom Jenelle Evans and David Eason Credit Bruce Glikas FilmMagic The same Twitter user then called on Eason to stop glorifying assault rifles and teach his children how to solve problems without calling people names or using force And just what makes you...”
“...think you have the right to tell me how to be a parent...”


"Evans later told people that she couldn't help crying after watching it, feeling that" no matter how I change, they always portray her as the 'bad one.' "
"We are sorry for the comments." The relationship between Evans and Ethan is a point of contention in the latest season of teen Mom 2: Evans, 26, threatened to quit the show after an episode that exposed the tension in their marriage
The MTV star, who shares a 1-year-old daughter, ensley, and two children from a previous relationship with Evans, is said to refer to homosexuality and transsexuality as "annoying people.". Get news, feature, etc
"Eason's Twitter account was later removed, but the suspected twitter screenshots continue to circulate."
"MTV did not immediately respond to requests for comment."
"After sharing a news report about allowing people with hidden carrying permits to bring guns into school, Eason tweeted," it makes sense to protect our children in the right way. We know what a twitter user suggested at the time, not to protect... "
"Kids with guns, we arm them with education and conscious education, no, you're wrong, Ethan replied..."
"Please tell me, sir, how do you suggest we start to make all Americans better parents?"
"Or are you a monkey uncle image zooming in and out of Janel Evans and David Ethan credit Bruce gricas movie magic with the same twitter user and then calling on Ethan to stop glorifying assault rifles and teach his kids how to solve problems without naming people or using force, it's exactly what makes you..."
"You think you have the right to tell me how to be a parent..."



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[4]MTV Generation Award [ edit ]MTV Trailblazer Award [ edit ]Multiple nominations [ edit ]Film [ edit ]The following movies received multiple nominations:Television [ edit ]The following television series received multiple nominations:”
“[3] Winners are listed first, in bold.”
“[2]Winners and nominees [ edit ]The full list of nominees was announced on May 3, 2018.”
“[2]Presenters [ edit ]The first few presenters were revealed on May 23, 2018 with the performers.”
“[1]Performers [ edit ]MTV announced the first few performers on May 23, 2018.”
“The ceremony was hosted by Tiffany Haddish.”
“It was the 27th edition of the awards and the second to jointly honor movies and television.”
“Similar to the 2016 MTV Movie Awards, the event was not aired live and was pre-recorded on June 16 prior to its June 18 broadcast date.”
“The 2018 MTV Movie & TV Awards was held on June 16, 2018, from the Barker Hangar in Santa Monica, California, U.S. and was broadcast on June 18, 2018.”


"[4] MTV generation Award [editor] MTV Pioneer Award [editor] multiple nominations [editor] film [editor] the following films won multiple non award threats: TV series [editor] the following TV series won multiple nominations:
[3] The winners are shown first in bold
"[2] the full list of winners and nominators [editors] nominators was announced on May 3, 2018."
"[2] host [editor] the first batch of hosts were announced with the performers on May 23, 2018."
"[1] performer [Edit] MTV announced the first batch of performers on May 23, 2018."
"The ceremony was presided over by Tiffany hadish."
"This is the 27th golden statue award and the second time that film and television works have been jointly commended."
"Similar to the 2016 MTV Film Awards, the event was not broadcast live, and was prerecorded on June 16 before the broadcast date of June 18."
"The 2018 MTV film and Television Awards will be held on June 16, 2018 in the Barker hangar in Santa Monica, California, and broadcast on June 18, 2018."



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If she ever came to me and said, ‘I don’t feel comfortable in my body, ‘I don’t know what I would do,” the model admitted to SI.”
“...an amazing powerful addition to the project...”
“We all want to live according to our own truths,” Porzikova told SI.”
“We all have our own truths.”
““I wanted to say that I’m not ashamed of my body and you shouldn’t be ashamed of your body, no matter what age you are.”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more.”
“Looking for more style content?”
“Porzikova, who has been very open about sexual harassment in the modeling industry, landed her first SI Swimsuit cover at the age of 18 in 1984 and covered the issue again the year after, and the model isn’t letting age hold her back from loving her body.”
“The results are inspiring.”Image zoomPaulina Porzikova poses nude for Sports Illustrated Swimsuit’s new “In Her Own Words” project.”
“We want to give this control directly to the women to own their story and image throughout the whole creative process.”


"If she came to me and said, 'I don't feel well,' I don't know what I would do," the model admitted to Si
“… An amazing and powerful project supplement... "
"We all want to live according to our own truth," bozikova told Si
"We all have our own truth."
"What I want to say is that I am not ashamed of my body, and you should not be ashamed of your body, no matter how old you are."
"Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle newsletters for amazing discounts, beauty products and more."
"Looking for more style content?"
"Bozikova has always been very open to the problem of sexual harassment in the modeling industry. She appeared on the cover of her first Si swimsuit when she was 18 in 1984, and reported the problem again a year later. The model did not let age hinder her from loving her body."
Picture zoom Paulina porzikova taking nude photos for the new "in her own words" item of Sports Illustrated Swimsuit
"We want to give this control directly to women and let them have their own stories and images in the whole process of creation."



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“The Brooklyn Museum is a strong and iconic backdrop to one of fashion’s biggest nights.”The 2018 CFDA Awards nominees and honorees will be unveiled on the @cfda Instagram page on Thursday, March 15, at 7:30 p.m.”
““We are also excited to take the awards to Brooklyn this year.”
““Issa Rae is leading a new generation of performers who use their voice and humor to discuss social topics in a way that is relatable and poignant,” said CFDA president and CEO Steven Kolb.”
“(There was no host in 2010.)”
“Meyers (who also hosted the awards show in 2012) was preceded by Joel McHale, James Corden, John Waters, Andy Cohen and Anderson Cooper.”
“...led the ceremony in 2009”
“Taking the reins from last year s host Seth Meyers the 33 year old Insecure actress director producer web series creator and also a fashion force known for her bedazzling looks on the red carpet will be the first female host in years we count nine since comedian Tracey Ullman...”
“For the first time in its 37-year history, the fashion industry’s big night will take place at the Brooklyn Museum — where the David Bowie Is exhibition, featuring many of the iconic performer’s costumes, opened last Friday.”
“Issa Rae on Monday was named as host of the upcoming CFDA Awards (organized by the Council of Fashion Designers of America in partnership with Swarovski) on June 4.”


"Wait a minute."
"The Brooklyn Museum is the iconic setting for one of the biggest nights in fashion." The nominees and winners of the 2018 CFDA awards will be announced on the @ CFDA instagram website at 7:30 pm on Thursday, March 15
"We are also happy to bring the awards to Brooklyn this year."
"Issa Rae is leading a new generation of performers who use their voice and humor to discuss social issues in a way that is both relevant and poignant," says Steven Kolb, President and CEO of CFDA
(no sponsor in 2010)
"Mayes (who also hosted the awards ceremony in 2012) was preceded by Joel McHale, James Colden, John waters, Andy Cohen and Anderson Cooper."
“… Led the ceremony in 2009
"Taking over the command of Seth Meyers, the 33 year old insecure actress, director, producer, and creator of Internet series, as well as a fashion force famous for its stunning red carpet looks, will be the first female host in nine years since the comedian Tracey Ullman ”
"The night of fashion will be held at the Brooklyn Museum for the first time in its 37 year history - the David Bowie exhibition, which opened on Friday, shows many iconic performers' costumes."
"On Monday, Issa ray was named the host of the CFDA awards ceremony, which will be held on June 4 in collaboration with Swarovski by the American Fashion Designers Association."



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“Photo by Andrew Milligan PA Images via Getty Images Andrew Milligan PA Images PA Images via Getty Images Carey Mulligan and Marcus Mumford British musician Marcus Mumford and British actor Carey Mulligan arrive for the wedding ceremony of Britain s Prince Harry Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St...”
“Gareth Fuller—PA WireOprah WinfreyOprah Winfrey arrives at Windsor Castle ahead of the wedding of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle.”
“Chris Jackson—PA WireGeorge Clooney and Amal ClooneyAmal Clooney and George Clooney arrive at St George's Chapel at Windsor Castle for the wedding of Meghan Markle and Prince Harry, May 19, 2018.”
“Chris Jackson—AFP/Getty ImagesElton JohnSir Elton John leaves St George's Chapel in Windsor Castle following the wedding of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle, May 19, 2018.”
“Chris Jackson—AFP/Getty ImagesCharlotte Riley and Tom HardyTom Hardy and Charlotte Riley arrive for the wedding ceremony of Britain's Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle, in Windsor, on May 19, 2018.”
“Alastair Grant—AFP/Getty ImagesAbigail SpencerAbigail Spencer (left) and Priyanka Chopra arrive for the wedding ceremony of Britain's Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and US actress Meghan Markle at St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle, in Windsor, on May 19, 2018.”
“Ian West—AFP/Getty ImagesSarah RaffertySarah Rafferty and Santtu Seppala arrive for the wedding of Britain's Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle, in Windsor, on May 19, 2018.”
“Ian West—AFP/Getty ImagesGina TorresGina Torres arrives for the wedding ceremony of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle, in Windsor, on May 19, 2018.”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Marcus Mumford, a British musician, and Kerry Mulligan, a British actor, have arrived in St. Louis for the wedding of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Megan markel."
"Gareth fuller and Winfrey Oprah Winfrey arrive at windsor castle before the wedding of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle."
"On May 19, 2018, Chris Jackson and George Clooney arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle for the wedding of Megan Marcel and Prince Harry."
"On May 19, 2018, after Prince Harry married Megan markel, Chris Jackson left St. George's Church in Windsor Castle."
"On May 19, 2018, Chris Jackson / Getty Images Charlotte Riley, Tom Hardy, Tom hardy and Charlotte Riley arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle, Windsor, for the wedding of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Megan Markle."
"On May 19, 2018, Alastair grant AFP / Getty imagesabigail Spencer (left) and Priyanka Chopra arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle to attend the wedding of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and American actress Meghan Markle."
"Ian West AFP / Getty Images Sarah Rafferty, Sarah Rafferty and santtu seppala arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle on May 19, 2018 to attend the wedding ceremony of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Megan Marcel."
"On May 19, 2018, Ian West AFP / Getty Images Gina Torres Gina Torres arrived in Windsor to attend the wedding of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle."



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Lawrence is repped by LBI Entertainment and Hansen Jacobson.”
“Lawrence next reprises her Mystique character in Dark Phoenix, the Simon Kinberg-directed X-Men: First Class sequel that Fox releases June 7, 2019.”
“Washington is starring in and executive producing and Snapchat s first original scripted series Class of Lies...”
“Makeready bowed the Sam Taylor Johnson directed A Million Little Pieces at Toronto and among its many upcoming projects is Queen Slim written by Emmy winner Lena Waithe for Get Out s Daniel Kaluuya to star and Melina Matsoukas to direct the Hulu drama series Old City Blues which Kerry...”
“We are thrilled to be partnering with Makeready and look forward to this exciting collaboration.”Weston launched Makeready in 2017 as an independent film, TV and digital branded entertainment content studio.”
“...incredible taste and a history of supporting diverse and compelling storytelling...”
“Her versatility and commitment to working with the greatest filmmakers in the industry highlights our shared ambition to create thoughtful fearless films and we are extremely excited to partner with Jennifer and Justine as they start this new chapter Said Lawrence and Polsky Brad and Pam are visionary producers with...”
““In a relatively short amount of time, Jennifer has already proven herself to be a one-of-a-kind actress and businesswoman,” says Makeready founder and CEO Brad Weston.”
“She is attached to play socialite Zelda Fitzgerald in the Ron Howard-directed Zelda, producing with Polsky and others, and is developing to direct Project Delirium, about how the government tested the effects of chemical weapons on thousands of soldiers in the ’60s.”
“She and Polsky have been doing that piecemeal, developing as producer-star dramas that include Burial Rites with director Luca Guadagnino at TriStar and Bad Blood with Adam McKay at Universal, the latter of which has her attached to star as disgraced Theranos blood-testing founder Elizabeth Holmes.”


"Lawrence's spokesperson is LBI entertainment and Hansen Jacobson."
Lawrence then reinterprets her mysterious role in "the Dark Phoenix," a sequel to "X-Men: first class," directed by Simon kimberg, which will be released on June 7, 2019
"Washington is starring in and executing the first original screenplay series of snapchat and class lies..."
"Makeready bows Sam Taylor Johnson has directed a million small works in Toronto, many of which are coming to the project of Queen slim, directed by Emmy winner Lena Weiser for going out Daniel Kaluuya star and Melina songkas gourd drama series old town blues, Kerry..."
"We are very happy to work with makeready and look forward to this exciting collaboration." Weston launched makeready in 2017 as an independent entertainment content studio for film, TV and digital brands
“… Incredible taste and support for diversity and fascinating story telling history... "
"Her versatility and commitment to working with the greatest filmmakers in the industry highlights our shared ambition to create thoughtful and fearless films, and we are very happy to work with Jennifer and Justin to create this new chapter." Lawrence, Polski Brad and PAM said they were all visionary producers with a strong sense of responsibility
Brad Weston, founder and chief executive of makeready, said: "in a relatively short period of time, Jennifer has proved to be a unique actress and businesswoman."
"She plays the socialite Zelda Fitzgerald in Zelda directed by Ron Howard, CO produced with Polski and others, and is now developing into the director of delirium project, telling how the government tested the impact of chemical weapons on thousands of soldiers in the 1960s."
"She and Polski have been doing these piecemeal jobs, developing into star dramas as producers, including the funeral of Samsung and director Luca guadanino, and the evil blood of universal and Adam Mackay, which makes her dependent on the star and the disgraced founder of Serranos blood test Elizabeth Holmes."



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“How can I make that happen?”
“I now want to kick back with both Jennifer Lawrence and Gail at the same time.”
“Ever since her Hunger Games days she's been known to deliver an A-plus soundbite (or seven) during them.”
“And her recent chat with Ellen DeGeneres was no exception.”
“The Red Sparrow actress stopped by The Ellen Show on Friday (March 2) and wound up telling everyone about her drunk alter-ego named Gail.”
“"I can't go on a vacation right now, because I just can't deal with 'Gail' at the moment," she said.”
“"I need to rest before 'Gail.'"”
“So who is "Gail," exactly?”
“Well, according to Lawrence, she comes out only during "a very specific drunk" period.”
“"It's not just every time I'm drunk, I turn into this 'Gail,'" she said.”


"How can I do that?"
"I want to go back now with Jennifer Lawrence and Gail."
"Since her days in the hunger game, everyone knows that she plays an a + (or seven) soundtrack during the game."
"Her recent chat with Ellen DeGeneres was no exception."
"The red sparrow actress stopped on the Ellen show on Friday (March 2) and finally told you about her drunken self, Gail."
"I can't go on holiday now because I can't deal with Gail right now," she said
"I need to rest before Gail."
So who is Gail? "
"Well, according to Lawrence, she only appeared during" a very special period of drunkenness. "
"I don't become this Gayle every time I get drunk," she said



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Swift also played bridesmaid and gave a risqué speech at her best friend Abigail Anderson’s wedding in September 2017.”
“She famously crashed a fan’s big day in New Jersey in June 2016 to perform “Blank Space” as the newly-married couple danced.”
“The “Delicate” singer has a history of making weddings memorable for the bride and groom.”
“...their first dance to Love Story A source says the pop star would have tried to make it to the wedding but she was in L A”
“To get a bottle of Dom is a very nice gift and then to see it s from Taylor Swift is an even better gift Swift must have found out that they were using her music in their ceremony the duo walked in to Welcome to New York and shared...”
“With all the moving parts, this was a great surprise!”
“It was such a great day.”
““It was awesome.”
““When we got to the wedding venue, they told us, ‘There [is] a special gift upstairs for you from a very special person,’” the New York-based newlyweds tell Us Weekly.”
“Love, Taylor,” the songstress wrote.”


"Swift also served as a bridesmaid and delivered a risque speech at her best friend Abigail Anderson's wedding in September 2017."
"In June 2016, on a fan's day in New Jersey, she smashed the newlyweds' performance of" blank space "while dancing."
"This" exquisite "singer has a history of unforgettable weddings for bridegroom and bride."
“… In the first dance of their love story, it was said that the pop star wanted to attend the wedding, but she was in Los Angeles
"Getting a bottle of DOM is a very good gift, and then seeing it from Taylor Swift is a better gift. Swift must find that they use her music in their ceremony, and the two of them come in and welcome to New York and share..."
"All the moving parts, it's a big surprise!"
"What a beautiful day it was."
"Great."
"When we got to the wedding site, they told us, 'there's a very special person upstairs giving you a special gift,'" the New York couple told us every week
"Love you, Tyler," the singer wrote



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Though the couple has had to adjust to full-time parenting pretty quickly, they’re relishing in their new roles.”
““Seeing her there felt like a dream,” Lauren recalled of her first glimpse of Willa when her parents drove up to the private hangar where they met.”
“...until one young fan stole the spotlight...”
“The Grammy nominee, 27, was upstaged by his 18-month-old daughter Willa Gray, who smiled for the cameras moments before her dad’s performance.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Thomas Rhett s wife Lauren who is expecting a baby this August was also in the crowd cheering her husband on as he made his way through his hits like Die a Happy Man and Star of the Show Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements plus celebrity mom...”
“...blogs...”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Image zoomRELATED VIDEO: Thomas Rhett and Wife Lauren on Their Adoption JourneyThe couple adopted Willa from Uganda, welcoming her to their family on May 11.”
““It’s crazy.”


"Although the couple had to adapt quickly to full-time parenting, they were interested in the new role."
"It's like a dream to see her there," Lauren recalls the first time she caught a glimpse of Vera when her parents drove to the private hangar where they met
“… Until a young fan took the spotlight... "
The 27 year old Grammy nominees, who won the limelight with his 18-month-old daughter Willa gray, smiles at the camera before her father's performance
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Thomas Rhett's wife Lauren, who was pregnant in August, also cheered her husband in the crowd because he passed his hit songs" happy boy "and" stars want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements "and" celebrity Mom "
“… Blog... "
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Video related to image zooming: Thomas reed and his wife Lauren are on their adoption trip. The couple adopted Willa from Uganda and welcomed her to their home on May 11."
"It's crazy."



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here is the opening sequence of the first new episode of Unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt, featuring Kimmy (Kemper) as she makes her way to her first day as HR manager at Giztoob:”
“The streaming service swooped in and picked up the single-camera comedy, originally piloted and given a 13-episode series order by NBC, with a two-season pickup ahead of its debut on the broadcast network.”
“I hear that the Internet network and Unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt producer Universal Television are in talks for a movie that would bring the praised series to an end.”
“Primetime-Panic Your Complete Guide to Pilots and Straight-to-Series orders See AllThe movie would be written by series co-creators Tina Fey and Robert Carlock after they wrap work on Unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt‘s upcoming fourth season, which is currently in production.”
“Netflix and Uni TV declined comment.”
“As recently announced, Season 4 of Unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt will launch in two parts.”
“The first, consisting of six episodes, will be available May 30, with the remaining seven episodes premiering at a later date.”
“Netflix earlier today released first-look images from the new season, which are featured in this story, along with a Mary Tyler Moore-flavored promo (you can watch it below).”
“NetflixUnbreakable Kimmy Schmidt, starring Ellie Kemper, Tituss Burgess, Jane Krakowski and Carol Kane, has been an important series for Netflix.”
“The move gave Netflix instant credibility in the half-hour space by bringing into the fold one of the most celebrated comedy creators of this decade, Tina Fey.”


Here's the prologue to the first episode of the indestructible Jimmy Schmidt. Jimmy (Kemper) started her work on her first day as a human resources manager at giztob:
"The streaming service has flocked to take on the one shot comedy, which was initially trial broadcast by NBC and won orders for 13 episodes of the series, with two more seasons ahead of its premiere on the broadcast network."
"I've heard that the Internet and the impregnable Kimmie Schmidt producer, universal TV, are negotiating a movie, and this award-winning TV series is coming to an end."
"Prime time panic your pilot and direct to the complete guide to series orders to see all the films will be made by series co creators Tina fee and Robert Crocker after they have completed the impenetrable work of Jimmy Schmidt's upcoming fourth season and are currently in production."
"Netflix and uni TV declined to comment."
"As recently announced, the unbreakable Kimmie Schmidt's fourth season will be launched in two parts."
"The first episode consists of six episodes, which will be released on May 30, and the remaining seven episodes will premiere later."
"Netflix released the first pictures of the new season earlier today, all of which are included in this issue's report, as well as a Mary Tyler Moore style Promo (you can watch it below)
The legend of Netflix, starring Ellie Kemper, Titus Burgess, Jane Krakowski and Carol Kane, is an important play of Netflix
"This move gave Netflix instant credibility in half an hour, bringing in Tina Fey, one of the most famous comedy creators of the decade."



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“While he acknowledged that Sweetin has enjoyed periods of extended sobriety, he claims that she’s also had “many private relapses.” Still, she actress maintains that Coyle’s accusations are as untrue as the walls of her sitcom are soundstage façades.”
“Court documents indicate that red flags went up for Coyle when he spoke to her on the phone, becoming concerned that she sounded addled.”
“A rep for Jodie Sweetin, who plays Stephanie Tanner on the Netflix sitcom Fuller House, has slammed “completely baseless” claims that she’s no longer sober and unfit to parent.”
“According to E!”
“News, her ex-husband claims that the actress is also refusing his demands to take a drug test though Sweetin's rep says that her client "will comply with all of the courts' requests."”
“Morty Coyle, Sweetin’s ex, has charged in court documents that she has turned to drugs to deal with a recent split from her fiancé, putting their 7-year-old daughter Beatrix at risk.”
““This is not the first time Mr. Coyle has made ridiculous accusations about Jodie which were utterly untrue,” Sweetin’s rep told E!”
“News.”
“However, The Blast is reporting that as part of their custody agreement, the actress must submit to a hair follicle test within 12 hours of Coyle’s request.”
“Coyle noted that Sweetin has had “well-documented” struggles with drug addiction, including alcohol, crystal meth, ecstasy, cocaine and various prescription medications.”


Although he acknowledged that she had been sober for a long time, he claimed that she had also experienced "a lot of relapses of personal diseases". Nevertheless, the actress insists that Coyle's accusations are untrue, just as the wall of her sitcom is the facade of the sound stage
Court documents show that when Coyle spoke to her on the phone, he was worried about her because she sounded abnormal
A spokesperson for Jodie sweetIn, who plays Stephanie Tanner in the Netflix sitcom fuller house, attacked her as "totally groundless," claiming she was no longer awake and unfit to be a parent
"According to e!"
According to reports, her ex husband claimed that the actress also rejected his drug test request, although sweetIn's representative said her client "will comply with all the requirements of the court."
Swift's ex girlfriend Morty Coyle accused her of turning to drugs in response to her recent breakup with her fiance, putting their 7-year-old daughter Beatrix at risk, in court documents
"This is not the first time that Mr. Coyle has made absurd accusations against Judy. These accusations are totally untrue," a representative of swighting told e! "
"News."
However, it was reported that as part of the custody agreement, the actress had to undergo a hair follicle test within 12 hours of Coyle's request
Coyle pointed out that sweetIn has "well documented" efforts to combat drug addiction, including alcohol, methamphetamine, ecstasy, cocaine and various prescription drugs



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A week later, the cute couple was spotted grabbing a bite to eat at Sugarfish Sushi in Beverly Hills, and they were dressed in nearly identical outfits, according to The Daily Mail.”
“...boots...”
“She has been in L.A. a lot lately, and is having fun.”“Work will soon take over her life again, so who knows what will happen will Blake then,” added the source.”
““It’s nothing serious.”
““She’s seeing Blake romantically,” says the source.”
“After stepping out with Griffin three nights in a row, a source told PEOPLE at the time that the two were having fun together, but it was still very casual.”
“The following evening, they were spotted at Nobu with a group of friends, and the next night the two reunited again at Soho House in Malibu.”
“After the meal, Jenner and Griffin and Parsons all hopped into the same car and left together.”
“The foursome enjoyed dinner at Craig’s in Los Angeles.”
“Summer 2017Weeks later, Jenner was spotted on a double date with Griffin, Baldwin and Parsons.”


A week later, as like as two peas, the lovely couple were found eating in almost Sugarfish identical sushi restaurants in Beverly Hills, the Daily Mail reported.
“… Boots... "
"She's been in Los Angeles a lot lately and she's had a good time." "Work will soon take over her life, so who knows what will happen?" The source added
"It's no big deal."
"She's on a romantic date with black," the source said
"After going out with Griffin for three nights in a row, a source told people at that time that they were very happy together, but they were still very casual."
"The next night, they were found in Nobu with a group of friends, and the next night they were reunited at SOHO house in Malibu."
After dinner, Jenna, Griffin and Parsons all jumped into the same car and left together
"Dinner for four at Craig's restaurant in Los Angeles."
"A few weeks later in the summer of 2017, Jenna was found double dating Griffin, Baldwin and Parsons."



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“The Met Gala may have peaked too early this year.”
“See the way he's carrying it like a purse or maybe a mascot?”
“The hair travels with Jaden.”
“But as it turns out, the hair lives.”
“It was an iconic moment.”
“His dad, Will Smith, did the honors.”
“Getty ImagesIf you'll recall, Jaden chopped off his blond dreadlocks early in April, in preparation for his role opposite Cara Delevingne in the teen drama Life in a Year.”
“That is what's happening right at this moment.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"This year's Metropolitan party may have peaked too soon."
"See him holding it like a purse or a mascot?"
"Hair travels with Jaden."
"But it turns out that the hair is still alive."
"It was a landmark moment."
"His father will smith was honored."
If you remember, Jaden cut off his long blonde hair in early April to play opposite Carla delaviny in a year's teenage drama
"That's what's happening right now."



**Something goes wrong**
“Where the show could do better, at least as of this first episode, is with racial minorities.”
“Of the five lead characters, three are women!”
“Whereas the flashback device worked well on Lost to illuminate character, here it only serves to let the air out of any suspense that could be generated.”
“While both the premise of the show and the story of this episode are enjoyable, the execution of Adam Horowitz and Edward Kitsis’ script could’ve been better.”
“Script (1): This is what gave me the most trouble.”
“Skeptical at first, Emma agrees to stay in Storybrooke for a week when she notices certain things that lead her to believe that what the boy told her might not be just the product of an overactive imagination.”
“), holds the key to breaking the spell, but she doesn’t know it until Henry, the son she gave up for adoption years ago (Jared Gilmore), comes back into her life with a book of fairy tales and insists she come with him to Storybrooke.”
“Emma Swan, a bail bonds agent (person?”
“They’re banished to the modern-day town of Storybrooke, Maine; a place where time never passes, and none of its fairy tale inhabitants remember who they are.”
“Once Upon a Time, Ep 1: “Pilot”Snow White’s (Ginnifer Goodwin) wicked stepmother (Lana Parrilla) can’t bear Snow’s happily ever after, so she puts a curse not only on Snow White and Prince Charming (Josh Dallas), but on all of the fairy tale characters as punishment.”


"At least from the first episode, the place where the play can do better is the ethnic minorities."
"Three of the five protagonists are women!"
"Although the flashback device works well on the lost character, it only releases the suspense here."
"While the premise of the play and the story of this episode are pleasant, Adam Horowitz and Edward kisses could have performed better."
"Script one: it's the biggest problem for me."
"At first, Emma was suspicious that when she noticed something that convinced her that the boy told her it might not be just the product of an overactive imagination, she agreed to stay in stockbrook for a week."
”）, holds the key to lifting the curse, but she doesn't know this until her adopted son Henry (Jared Gilmore) returns to her life with a fairy tale book and insists on going to storibrook with him a few years ago
"Emma swan, bail agent?"
"They were banished to the modern town of stolybrook, Maine; a place where time never passes, where the fairy tale residents don't remember who they are."
Once upon a time, ep 1: "pilot" Snow White (Jennifer Goodwin) and her evil stepmother (Lana parrilla) could no longer endure Snow White's happiness, so she not only cursed snow white and prince charming (Josh Dallas), but also cursed all fairy tale characters as punishment



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...of the Year edit Single of the Year edit Best New Hip Hop Artist edit Hustler of the Year edit Made You Look Award Best Hip Hop Style edit Best Mixtape edit Sweet 16 Best Featured Verse edit Impact Track edit I Am Hip Hop Icon edit...”
“Mix 3 by Erykah Badu Nominations and Winners edit Winners highlighted in Bold Best Hip Hop Video edit Best Collabo Duo or Group edit Hot Ticket Performer edit Lyricist of the Year edit Video Director of the Year edit DJ of the Year edit Producer of the Year edit MVP”
“Cyphers [ edit ]Beat and mix by DJ Mustard.”
“[3] XXXTentacion's mother accepted his award on his behalf since he had been murdered months beforehand.”
“XXXTentacion was the winner of Best Hip Hop New Artist.”
“Jay-Z and Beyoncé followed with three awards, including Album of the Year and Song of the Year.”
“[2]Cardi B was the biggest winner with four awards, including MVP of the Years and Hustler of the Year.”
“Under them Childish Gambino received six nomination, Travis Scott and Kendrick Lamar tied for five nominations, and Jay-Z (credited also as "The Carters" with Beyoncé in Album of the Year, Best Collabo, Duo or Group and Song of the Year categories) with four nominations.”
“[1]Drake led the BET Hip-Hop Awards 2018 with eleven nominations, followed by Cardi B with ten.”
“The nominations were announced on September 9, 2018.”


“… Best editor of the year best single editor of the year best new hip hop singer editor of the year best liar editor makes you look like the best hip hop style editor of the year best mix editor Sweet 16 best feature verse editor impact track editor I'm hip hop idol editor... "
"Mix 3 nominated by Erykah Badu and edited by winners best hip hop video editor best co OP duet or group editor hot ticket performance editor lyrics editor video director editor DJ editor MVP of the year"
"Cyphers [editor] stirred by DJ mustard."
"[3] xxxentacion's mother accepted the prize on his behalf because he was murdered a few months ago."
"Xxxentacion is the winner of the best hip hop Rookie Award."
"Jay-Z and Beyonce then won three awards, including album of the year and song of the year."
"Katie B is the biggest winner, winning four awards, including MVP of the year and swindler of the year."
"Under their leadership, the boyish Gambino won six nominations, Travis Scott and Kendrick Lamar tied for five, and Jay-Z (also known as" cartel "in album of the year, best collaborator, duet or group and song of the year categories with Beyonce) won four."
"[1] Drake led the 2018 best hip hop awards with 11 nominations, followed by caddy B with 10 nominations."
"The nomination was announced on 9 September 2018."



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Everything I’m doing is for her.””
““I know I’m indecisive.”
“Later in the episode she took Kourtney to a fire station to take part in some rigorous drills.”
“I’m getting a headache.”But this wasn’t the only thing Khloé had planned for her older sister.”
““None of this is helpful.”
““This is such a joke,” Kourtney, 38, told the cameras.”
“So, Khloé, 32, decided to play a game to try and get Kourtney to make decisions on a whim.”
“It’s debilitating,” Kourtney told Khloé when the pair sat down for lunch.”
“But at the last minute — literally, Kim was sitting on the plane waiting — Kourtney called and backed out, infuriating her sister.”
““I hate that our relationship is a bit uncomfortable, but I’m very committed to building that friendship between Chyna and I, because the type of relationship I had with my dad, I want to have that with my daughter,” he told the cameras.”


"Everything I do is for her."
"I know I'm indecisive."
"Then she took kurtney to the fire station for some rigorous exercises."
"I have a headache." But it was not the only thing that Heroe had planned for her sister
"It doesn't work."
"It's a joke," Courtney, 38, told the camera
"So khlo é, 32, decided to play a game and let Kourtney make the decision on a whim."
As the two sat down for lunch, kurtney told khlo é, "it's debilitating."
"But at the last minute - in fact, Kim was on the plane waiting - kurtney called back and angered her sister."
"I hate that our relationship is a bit uncomfortable, but I'm very committed to building this friendship between me and Zina because of the kind of relationship I have with my father, and I want to have that relationship with my daughter," he told the camera



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Our thoughts are with the Harrison family during this difficult time.””
“Stars fans the world over this morning...”
“Richard Harrison, the co-owner and founder of Rick Harrison’s Gold & Silver Pawn Shop, died on Monday, June 25, at 77, the Harrison family confirmed to Us Weekly.”
““Richard Benjamin ‘The Old Man’ Harrison passed away this morning surrounded by those he loved.”
“He will be tremendously missed by our family, the team at Gold & Silver Pawn and his many fans the world over.”
“He was my hero and I was fortunate to get a very cool ‘Old Man’ as my dad,” Rick Harrison, 53, said in a statement to Us.”
““That I got to share him with so many others and they got to see what a great family man he was is something I am grateful to have experienced with him.”
“He lived a very full life and through the History television show Pawn Stars touched the lives of people all over teaching them the value of loving your family, hard work and humor.”
“We appreciate everyone s thoughts and prayers and ask that we are provided some privacy at this time The pawn shop also shared a statement on Facebook on Monday It is with heavy hearts that we acknowledge the passing of Richard Benjamin Harrison known as The Old Man to Pawn...”
“He was surrounded by loving family this past weekend and went peacefully.”


"In this difficult time, our idea is to be with the Harrisons."
"Star fans all over the world this morning..."
The Harrison family confirmed to us weekly that Richard Harrison, CO owner and founder of Rick Harrison's gold and silver pawnshop, died on Monday, June 25, at the age of 77
"Richard Benjamin, Harrison, the old man, died this morning surrounded by his loved ones."
"Our family, the gold and silver pawnshop team and many of his fans around the world will miss him very much."
"He's my hero, and I'm lucky to have a very cool old man as my father," Rick Harrison, 53, said in a statement to us
"I can share him with so many people, and they can see what a great family member he is, and that's something I appreciate going through with him."
"He lived a very full life. Through the history TV program" the popular star ", he touched the lives of people all over the world and taught them the value of loving family, hard work and humor."
"We thank you for your thoughts and prayers, and ask us to provide some privacy at this time. The pawnbroker also shared a statement on Facebook on Monday that it was with a heavy heart that we recognized Richard Benjamin Harrison as an old man's dead pawn..."
"Last weekend, he was surrounded by his beloved family and left quietly."



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m not afraid to date these guys and find the one who is the best fit for me — I welcome that with open arms.””
“But I have so much love to give and I want just a partner in life.”
““How did this breakup end up on camera?”
“Even former stars of the show spoke out.”
“There’s a happy ending to this story.”He may be okay with the cameras capturing Kufrin’s tear-filled heartbreak, but viewers certainly weren’t.”
““Becca is going to be the new Bachelorette and I’m very happy for her in that.”
“I know it’s difficult for a lot of people to swallow,” he told Strahan.”
““I’m happy that she’s going to be able to find her true love through the show.”“This ending obviously wasn’t perfect.”
““I’m very happy for her,” Luyendyk Jr., who is now engaged to Burnham, said of the decision on Wednesday.”
“… I hope I gave her a little bit of closure.”Image zoom Arie Luyendyk Jr. and Becca Kufrin | Credit: ABCKufrin will, in fact, be the next Bachelorette — a decision that was announced on Tuesday during the live After the Final Rose conclusion to Arie Luyendyk Jr.‘s season.”


"I'm not afraid to date these guys and find the right person for me - I welcome them with open arms."
"But I have so much love to give, I just want a life partner."
"How could this breakup be photographed?"
"Even the stars of previous programs have said it."
"The story has a happy ending." He may be able to accept the camera's capture of kuflynn's tearful heartbreak, but surely the audience won't
"Becca is going to be the new bachelor, and I'm happy for her."
"I know a lot of people are hard to accept," he told Strahan
"I'm glad she found true love through this show." "The ending is obviously not perfect."
"I'm happy for her," young luyandick, now engaged to Burnham, said of the decision on Wednesday
"I hope I gave her a little bit of an end." Photo zooming Ali luyandick Jr. and Becca kuflin | credit: Abu kuflin will, in fact, be the next bachelor - the decision was announced on Tuesday after the live final rose conclusion of Ali luyandick Jr. season



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Be sure to join our Teen Mom Facebook group to chat about all the latest updates and juicy gossip!”
“Love Teen Mom?”
“They even posed together for the first-ever family photo while Lux enjoyed his first slice of birthday cake.”
“But despite the fact that Kail has said that Chris is not really there as a parent, they still decided to have a joint birthday party for Lux for his first birthday and Chris and Kail seemed to get along at the party for the sake of their son.”
“...of the story so the only way fans learn anything about Chris and his involvement with his son Lux is through Kail...”
“She trashed you to look like she s the ultimate single mother one fan wrote while another commented You can kindly thank Kail for that we view you like she has portrayed you Since Chris does not film with MTV he doesn t get a chance to show his side...”
““You can thank your BM for that one.”
“I could tweet in peace.”Teen Mom 2 fans flooded Chris’ mentions, and they all seem to think that it’s his baby mama’s fault for portraying him as a deadbeat “Instagram dad” on the show, because that’s how fans see him now.”
““I really enjoyed when y’all didn’t know who I was.”
““The way people view me is terrible,” he wrote on Twitter.”


"Be sure to join our teen mom Facebook group and share all the latest updates and interesting gossip!"
"Do you love mom?"
"They even took pictures together. This is the first time lux has enjoyed a birthday cake."
"But even though Kyle said Chris wasn't really a parent, they decided to hold a joint birthday party for Lux's first birthday. Chris and Kyle seemed to get along well at the party for their son."
“… So the only way fans can get to know Chris and his son Lex is through Kail... "
"She slandered you and made you look like the ultimate single mother written by a fan, while another fan commented that you can thank Kail kindly, because we think you are just like she shaped you, because Chris didn't cooperate with MTV, and he didn't have a chance to show his own side..."
"You can thank your BM for that."
"I can tweet quietly." Fans of teen Mom 2 are flocking to mention Chris. They seem to think it's his mother's fault to portray him as a dead "instagram dad" on the show, because that's how fans see him now
"I'm really happy when you don't know who I am."
"People think badly of me," he wrote on twitter



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Chris Pratt and Anna Faris Split Shocked Friends, Source Says: 'It's Just Insane' This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“EXCLUSIVE: Patti Stanger Says Chris Pratt and Anna Faris Are Still Living Together After Split AnnouncementFor more on the couple's shocking split, watch the video below.”
“The actor's last appearance at the Teen Choice Awards was 13 years ago, when he and Everwood co-star Gregory Smith were nominated.”
“You guys have a great night and get home safe, I love you all," Pratt concluded the speech.”
“"Thank you again, thank you Teen Choice.”
“And that was the first of many lies that I told to get to where I am today."”
“...actor and he said Wow bro you must surf and I said Uh yeah...”
“I love you too thank you the 37 year old actor said during his acceptance speech joking Many years ago when I came to Los Angeles I came from Hawaii and I had this blonde hair and tan and I met an agent because I really wanted to be an...”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Chris Platt and Anna Faris broke up and shocked friends. The source said," it's crazy. "This video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's information."
"Exclusive: Patty stanger says Chris Platt and Anna Faris still live together after they split up. Please see the video below about the couple's shocking breakup
"The actor's last appearance at the Teen Choice Awards was 13 years ago, when he was nominated to co star with Everwood, Gregory Smith."
"You've had a great evening. Go home safely. I love you," Pratt concluded
"Thank you again for your choice."
"This is the first lie I told to get to where I am today."
“… The actor said to him, "Wow, brother, you have to surf. I said," well, yes... "
"I love you, too. Thank you, the 37 year old actor, for saying in his acceptance speech that when I came to Los Angeles many years ago, he joked that I came from Hawaii, I had blonde hair and tan skin, and I met an agent because I really wanted to be a..."



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Their goal was to make marginally more correct decisions than their competitors in the long haul and to do so they implemented an analytically rigorous system that not only processed all of the bleeding edge metrics they could find or create but also heavily incorporated data from old fashioned sources...”
“They always expected to make many of them.”
“What it wasn’t was empty clickbait, or a hot take.”
“Vegas usually assigns a given season’s spring favorite less than a 20% chance of winning that fall’s World Series.”
“Even the club’s own hometown paper, the Houston Chronicle, called it “more of an attention-grabbing, perhaps even tongue-in-cheek projection than a prediction.”It was certainly a long shot, but so is everything in baseball.”
“Enemy Lines: A Rival Scout Breaks Down the Astros Ahead of the World SeriesBut many people, including some within our own office, hated the cover, too.”
“...blink of an eye...”
“We settled on 2017 because the Astros young nucleus would by then be reaching its prime because it seemed to more or less hew to the front office s own timeline which they promised would eventually include a payroll hike and because three years in baseball is actually not the...”
“SI’s editor Chris Stone and I, along with baseball editor Emma Span, had consulted on the proper year to choose.”
“Still, a few days later I flew back to New York with the makings of a 5,000-word story that would appear in the June 24 issue Sports Illustrated, with a bold cover line: YOUR 2017 WORLD SERIES CHAMPS featuring the sorry Astros.”


"Their goal is to make slightly more correct decisions than their competitors in the long run. To this end, they have implemented a rigorous analysis system, which not only deals with all the frontier indicators they can find or create, but also integrates a large number of data from old-fashioned sources..."
"They always want to make a lot of these products."
"It's not an empty click bait, and it's not a hit."
"Vegas usually allocates less than 20% of the most popular opportunities to win the autumn World Series in the spring of a particular season."
Even the Houston Chronicle, the club's home newspaper, calls it "a more eye-catching, even exaggerated prediction, rather than a prediction." It's a long-term prediction, of course, but it's the same with baseball
"Enemy line of Defense: an enemy scout beat the Astronomy Series first, but many people, including some in our office, also hate the cover."
“… Blink... "
"We set it for 2017, because at that time, Astros young nucleus will reach its peak, because it seems to comply with the front desk's own schedule more or less, and they promise to eventually include a pay rise, and because three years of baseball career is not..."
"Si editor Chris stone and I, as well as baseball editor Emma span, consulted on which year to choose."
"Nevertheless, a few days later, I flew back to New York and prepared a 5000 word story to be published in sports illustrated on June 24, with a bold sentence on the cover:" poor astro boy is the protagonist of your 2017 World Series champion. "



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So, let's answer the question on everyone's mind: what's the real reason Jolie hasn't been on the big screen recently?”
“From health scares and a busy family life to humanitarian work and taking on roles behind the scenes, there's actually a lot about Jolie's life and career that even her most devoted fans may have missed since she last appeared on film.”
“While the movie star has continued to keep busy, we have to admit she's been pretty quiet lately.”
“Over the span of her impressive career, this multi-hyphenate has become one of Hollywood's highest-paid actresses and has boasted a number of accolades, including an Academy Award, two Screen Actors Guild Awards, and three Golden Globes.”
“From Girl, Interrupted to Mr. & Mrs. Smith, from Lara Croft: Tomb Raider to Wanted, and from Changeling to Maleficent, she's established herself as an icon within pop culture history through a wide range of roles.”
“The Real Reason Angelina Jolie Hasn't Been On The Big Screen RecentlyAngelina Jolie has been gracing the big screen for over two decades.”


"Well, let's answer the question in your mind: what's the real reason that Julie hasn't been on the big screen recently?"
"From health scare and busy family life to humanitarian work, to acting behind the scenes, in fact, there are many things in Julie's life and career, even her most loyal fans may have missed after her last movie."
"Although the film star has been very busy, we have to admit that she has been quite quiet recently."
"In her impressive career, the multi hyphenated actress has become one of the highest paid actresses in Hollywood and has won many honors, including an Oscar, two Screen Actors Guild Awards and three Golden Globes."
From girl to Mr. and Mrs. Smith, from tomb raider to wanted man, from changeling to villain, she has established herself as an idol in the history of pop culture through various roles
"The real reason Angelina Jolie hasn't been on the big screen lately is that Angelina Jolie has been adding luster to the big screen for more than 20 years."



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...says Michael Boychuck, celebrity colorist whose clients include Jennifer Lopez, Gwen Stefani, Lady Gaga, Kendra Wilkinson, Paris and Nicky Hilton and Debbie Gibson.”
“The cucumber and green tea shampoo will give you a fresh, multilayer scent and a more free-flowing feeling to get through every day and every night."”
“I especially love this product because it's a cure all when it comes to extensions — just a quick shampoo followed by the Frizz Ease Conditioning treatment and hair is vibrant again!” says salon owner Toni Neal, whose clients include Nene Leakes, Sheree Whitfield, Cynthia Bailey and Porsha Williams.”
“John Frieda Frizz Ease Miraculous Repairing Shampoo, $11, Amazon“This has an amino repair complex that can fix everything!”
“Best shampoo for damaged hair3.”
“Plus, it’s packed with protein—definitely goes a long way,” says Major.”
“Excellent product “that’s great for conditioning dry and coarse hair types.”
“Mane ‘N Tail Shampoo, $18 (for shampoo and conditioner), AmazonAlso available for $6 at Target, and for $7 at Walgreens.”
“2.”
““[This shampoo] has a good balance of protein and moisture, plus it also smells wonderful,” says Anh Co Tran, whose clients include Anne Hathaway, Uma Thurman, Chloe Grace Moretz, Riley Keough, Jessica Alba, Vera Wang, Ginnifer Goodwin, Emily Ratajkowski, Coco Rocha and Sophia Bush.”


"Michael boychuck is a famous colorist whose clients include Jennifer Lopez, Gwen Stephanie, Lady Gaga, Kendra Wilkinson, Paris, Nicky Hilton and Debbie Gibson."
"Cucumber and green tea shampoo will give you a fresh, multi-layered fragrance and a more free flowing feel through every night."
"I particularly like this product because it's a panacea when it comes to expansion - just a quick shampoo, then curl soothing conditioning treatment and hair is vibrant! Salon owner Tony Neal said his clients include Nini Rix, Shirley Whitfield, Cynthia Bailey and Bertha Williams
"John Frida curly hair relief miracle Repair Shampoo, 11 dollars, Amazon." here's an amino repair complex that can repair everything! "
"The best shampoo for damaged hair 3."
"Plus, it's rich in protein, and it must have a long way to go," major said
"Excellent product", which is great for conditioning dry and rough hair types
Mane'n tail shampoo costs $18 (shampoo and conditioner), Amazon also costs $6 at target and $7 at Walgreens
“2.”
"It's a good balance of protein and water, and it smells good," Anh co tran said His clients include Anne Hathaway, UMA Thurman, Chloe grace Moretz, Riley KIO, Jessica Alba, Vera Wang, Jennifer Goodwin, Emily ratajekovsky, coco Rosa and Sophia bush



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Swift recently extended her upcoming tour, which launches May 8th in Glendale, Arizona and concludes November 9th in Auckland, New Zealand.”
“Swift released the song in November as the album’s third single, following “Look What You Made Me Do” and “…Ready For It?” Later that month, she issued “New Year’s Day.”Rolling Stone ranked Reputation as 2017’s third-best pop album and the seventh-best overall LP.”
““End Game” highlights the singer’s chart-topping 2017 LP, Reputation.”
“She toasts to having a “big reputation,” dances and struts around town with confidence while professing her want to be the only one, the “end game,” for her love interest.”
“The song and video feature Future and Sheeran, who both join her in fun and flirty situations, from extravagant parties to karaoke bars.”
“Directed by Joseph Kahn, the video finds the singer and her entourage in Tokyo, Miami and London.”
“Ed Sheeran...”
“Taylor Swift has released the new video for Reputation song End Game The clip follows Swift hopping around the globe in international locales where she hits the beach takes in fireworks cruises around in a bus car and motorcycle dances with Future on a yacht and continues the party with...”


Swift recently extended her upcoming tour to Glendale, Arizona, on May 8 and Auckland, New Zealand, on November 9
Swift released the song in November as the album's third single, following "look what you made me do" and " are you ready? "Later that month, she released new year's day. The rolling stones named the album the third best pop album and the seventh best record of 2017. "
Finale highlights the singer's reputation on the 2017 record charts
She drank to her "fame", danced confidently in the town, swaggered around, and said she wanted to be the only "end game" of her love interest
"The main characters of this song and video are future and Sheeran, and both of them join her in all kinds of fun and flirting occasions, from luxurious parties to karaoke bars."
Directed by Joseph Kahn, the video found the singer and her entourage in Tokyo, Miami and London
"Ed Sheeran..."
"Taylor Swift has released the latest video" the song of fame ends the game ". This video tells of swift dancing on the international stage all over the world. On the beach, she dances with the future on buses, cars, motorcycles, yachts, and with Keep the party going. "



Number  142
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Moretz at Soccer Game in Ireland This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors...”
“RELATED CONTENT Brooklyn Beckham Visits Girlfriend Chloe Grace Moretz on Set Chloe Grace Moretz Brooklyn Beckham Wear Matching Denim Looks in First Joint Appearance Since Reconciliation Brooklyn Beckham Says He s Missing My Girl Chloe Grace Moretz in Sweet Instagram Post Brooklyn Beckham Plants an Adorable Kiss on Chloe Grace...”
“See more of their time together in the video below.”
“The on-again off-again couple rekindled their romance in late August and has since been inseparable.”
“Earlier this month, Beckham visited the actress on the set of her new movie in New York City.”
“Meanwhile, David and Victoria's eldest son shared pics from their lunch date, which included iced tea, a sandwich and curly fries.”
“InstagramThe If I Stay star also posted images of her campsite, Beckham playing Cornhole, her s'mores and a view from her bed.”
“Moretz, 20, shared a handful of videos and pictures of their day together on her Instagram Stories, including one of Beckham, 18, with the caption, "little camper boy."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"This video is not available for Moretz's football match in Ireland because we can't load the sponsor's message..."
"Related content: Brooklyn Beckhams visits his girlfriend Chloe grace morets on set Chloe grace morets Brooklyn Beckhams makes his debut together in self reconciliation. Brooklyn Beckhams says that he misses my daughter Chloe grace morets on sweet instagram. Brooklyn Beckhams planted a lovely kiss on Chloe grace ……”
"You can see more of their time together in the video below."
"In late August, the intermittent couple rekindled a new love affair, and they have been inseparable ever since."
Earlier this month, he visited the actress on the set of a New York film
Meanwhile, David and Victoria's eldest son shared photos of their lunch date, including iced tea, sandwiches and curly fries
"Instagram the if I stay star also released her camping site, photos of David's corn hole, her s'mores and the scenery on the bed."
"The 20-year-old shared several videos and photos of their day on instagram. One of them is 18-year-old David, with the title" little camping boy. "



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The three were later dubbed Ezra, Gus and Phineas by fans.””
““The three hitchhikers were designed as a traveler with a top hat and carpetbag, a tall skeletal figure and a fuzzy bearded fellow carrying a ball and chain,” the blog post continued.”
“Image zoom Neil Patrick Harris, David Burtka and their children | Credit: Monica Schipper/Getty“The Hitchhiking Ghosts were actually some of the final ghoulish ‘residents’ that were added into the plans for The Haunted Mansion,” the Disney Parks Blog explained.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Parents newsletter.”
“Halloween Pants.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“In the clip he dubbed Burtka, “Mr.”
“I’m excited by it,” Harris shared in an Instagram live video before the reveal.”
“We have taken our Halloween family photo this year.”
““We hope your Halloween is happily haunted, but heed this warning: beware of Hitchhiking Ghosts!”“We’re very excited.”
“Image zoom Credit: David Burtka/Instagram“Welcome, foolish mortals,” Burtka captioned the picture.”


"These three people were later nicknamed Ezra, Gus and Phineas by fans."
"The three hitchhikers were designed as a traveler in a top hat and a carpet bag, a tall skeleton, a guy with a fuzzy beard and a ball and chain," the blog continued
"Image zooming Neil Patrick Harris, David burtka and their children | credit: Monica shipper / Getty" the hitchhiker ghosts are actually some of the last ghouls' residents' to be added to the haunted mansion program, "Disney Park blog explained
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's parents newsletter."
"Halloween pants" want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, and celebrity mom blogs? "
In the clip, he voiced bertka
"I'm excited," Harris said in an instagram live video before the announcement
"We took a family photo for Halloween this year."
"We hope your Halloween is happily haunted, but pay attention to this warning: beware of hitchhikers! "We're very excited."
Image scaling credit: David bertka / instagram "welcome, stupid mortal," bertka wrote in the title of the image



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the past few days I have done the homework I should have done before absentmindedly posting that…To be clear on my values and where I stand…I am an immigrant and now an American citizen,” said the actor, who was born in Romania.”
“...for the firing of basketball and football stars like Colin Kaepernick who have chosen to protest the national anthem by taking a knee...”
“The actor shared a since deleted meme on his Instagram last week of Harding and Kerrigan sitting next to each other that said Back when taking a knee meant taking a knee The meme referenced the 1994 events that inspired his upcoming film I Tonya costarringMargo Robbie as the disgraced...”
“...athlete...”
“It recently world premiered at the Toronto International Film Festival, where Stan and Robbie were both in attendance.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Exactly… Can’t wait to share #itonya with you… Dec 8th – NY & LA Jan 19th – everywhere else #90slife #90shair #90shorror,” Stan wrote underneath the picture.”
“While the meme referenced the events in 1994 that led to Harding s ex husband hiring a hit man to take Kerrigan s knee out before the Winter Olympics many fans felt it was insensitive due to the prevalence of the TakeAKnee movement in wake of President Donald Trump calling...”
“Amid backlash, Stan has deleted the Instagram meme.”
““When I put up the post, I had not carefully researched the kneeling reference.”


The Romanian born actor said: "in the past few days, I've finished what I should have done and then published this article absently To clarify my values and position I am an immigrant and am now an American citizen. "
“…… Because basketball and football stars like Colin capenick were fired, they chose to protest the national anthem with their knees... "
"The actor shared a deleted meme on his instagram last week: Harding and Kerrigan sat together and said" when kneeling means kneeling. "Meme quoted events in 1994 that inspired the disgrace of Margo Robbie, the co-author of his upcoming movie my Tonya..."
“… Athletes... "
It recently premiered worldwide at the Toronto International Film Festival, attended by Stan and Robbie
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It is I can't wait to share itonia with you December 8 - New York and January 19 - it's itonia everywhere else, "Stan wrote at the bottom of the photo
"Although meme cites events in 1994 that led Harding's ex husband to hire a killer to remove Kerrigan's knee before the Winter Olympics, many fans think it's insensitive, because in President Donald Trump's appeal..." After that, the wukeni movement prevailed
"In strong opposition, Stan removed instagram's meme."
"When I posted the post, I didn't study the reference of kneeling carefully."



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Their littlest brother Louis, who was born April 23, stayed back from all the festivities, but we have a feeling when he gets bigger, he’ll be right there alongside them having a grand old time!”
“Mark Cuthbert / UK Press via Getty ImagesGeorge, looking casual yet preppy with his dark blue polo shirt and khaki shorts, ran around with his little sister who sported a pale pink dress and no shoes most of the time.”
“A game of chase, anyone?”
“Samir Hussein / WireImageThe Duke of Cambridge’s son, Prince George, 4, and daughter Princess Charlotte, 3, seemed to be having a ball as they cheered on their dad with their mom, the Duchess of Cambridge.”
“The Duchess of Cambridge was there to oversee all the fun.”
“Mark Cuthbert / UK Press via Getty ImagesBoth Prince William and Prince Harry have been scheduled to play in a series of polo matches this summer to raise funds and awareness for a variety of causes they support.”
“This particular game was the Maserati Royal Charity Polo Trophy at Beaufort Park in Gloucester, England, which raised money for the Royal Marsden cancer hospital and Centrepoint, a homeless youth charity — both charities William supports.”
“And while Prince William was busy on the field, his kids really stole the show from the sidelines.”
“Princess Charlotte had her mini sunglasses in tow.”
“The two looked carefree and happy as they smiled and laughed together.”


"Their youngest brother, Louis, was born on April 23. He didn't attend all the celebrations, but we have a feeling that when he grows up, he will have a good time with them!"
"Mark Cuthbert / via Getty Images George, the British press, looks casual but academic in his dark blue polo shirt and khaki shorts. He runs around with his sister, who wears a light pink dress most of the time without shoes."
"Chase the game, anyone?"
"Samir Hussein and the Duke of Cambridge's son, 4-year-old Prince George and 3-year-old daughter, Princess Charlotte, seem to be having a ball. They join their mother, the Duchess of Cambridge, in cheering for their father."
"The Duchess of Cambridge is there to supervise all the entertainment."
"Mark Cuthbert / British media reported through Getty pictures that Prince William and Prince Harry are scheduled to take part in a series of polo competitions this summer to raise funds and raise awareness of the various undertakings they support."
"This special event is the Maserati Royal charity Polo trophy at Beaufort Park in Gloucester, England, which raises money for the Royal Marsden cancer hospital and the homeless youth charity centrepoint - both of which William supports."
"When Prince William was busy on the court, his children really stole the limelight from the sidelines."
"Princess Charlotte is wearing her mini sunglasses."
"They were laughing together, looking carefree and happy."



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Cheryl Burke Was 'In Shock' While Meeting Her Long-Lost Sister (Exclusive)Cheryl Burke Reveals She Recently Met Her Sister Whom She 'Had Never Known' After Their Father's DeathCheryl Burke Talks Rekindling Romance With Matthew Lawrence: 'We Feel So Lucky' (Exclusive)Related Gallery...”
“"It's official!”
“Savage, 37, who starred as Cory on the beloved '90s show, shared a picture on Saturday on his Instagram account of himself with Lawrence, who played Jack, with a sweet message of encouragement to his former co-star.”
“Lawrence, 38, became engaged to the Dancing With the Stars pro dancer on May 3 -- her 34th birthday.”
“She said yes, obviously, and the two have been over the moon about it ever since.”
“"Congratulations on your engagement @matthewlawrence," Savage wrote on his Instagram account.”
“"So happy for you and @cherylburke."”
“Lawrence and Burke appear to be enjoying their engagement.”
“Lawrence moved in with Burke in June, requiring a little... adjustment... of closet space.”
“My fiancé @cherylburke and I moved in together," Lawrence wrote on Instagram at the time.”


"Embedded code restart" content: Cheryl Burke was "shocked" when she met her long lost sister (exclusive). Cheryl Burke revealed that she recently met her sister "never known" after her father's death. Cheryl Burke talked with Matthew Lawrence about rekindling the romantic story: "we feel very lucky (exclusive) related Gallery..."
"It's official!"
Savage, 37, who plays Corey on beloved's 90s, shared a picture of himself with Lawrence, who plays jack, on instagram on Saturday and sent a sweet message of encouragement to his former partner
Lawrence, 38, is engaged to a professional dancer of dance with the stars on May 3, her 34th birthday
"It's obvious that she agreed, and they've been very upset about it ever since."
"Congratulations on your engagement to Matthew Lawrence," savage wrote on his instagram account
"I'm so happy for you and @ cherylburke."
"Lawrence and Burke seem to enjoy their engagement."
"Lawrence moved to the Burkes in June and needed a little... Adjust... "Wardrobe space."
"My fiance @ cherylburke and I moved together," Lawrence wrote on instagram at the time



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Niña V. Guno/JBADVERTISEMENTRELATED STORIES:Fergie shuts down rumors of her Black Eyed Peas exitLISTEN: Black Eyed Peas’ new single ‘Street Livin”Read Next...”
“However, Pussycat Dolls lead singer Nicole Sherzinger is in it.”
“Following criticism of her national anthem performance on the NBA All-Star Game, now the singer, real name Stacy Ann Ferguson, is said to be out of hip-hop group Black Eyed Peas (BEP).”
“ADVERTISEMENTBlack Eyed Peas founding member will.i.am (William James Adams) told the Daily Star that Fergie is not on the group’s seventh studio album.”
““We are now a trio.”
“I don’t know why Fergie isn’t on the project.”
“You will have to ask Fergie that,” he said.”
“The other members of the group which formed in 1995 are apl.de.ap (Allan Pineda) and Taboo (Jaime Luis Gomez).”
“Fergie joined them in 2002.”
“Adams revealed that the group has a WhatsApp group chat called “Black Eyed Peas family” which Fergie isn’t a part of.”


"Nina and Cournot / JB story: Fergie shut up, rumors about her black eyed peas quitting: Black Eyed Peas' new single 'street life' read
"But Nicole shesingh, the lead singer of the cat and baby band, is also among them."
"Following criticism of her national anthem performance at the NBA all star game, the current singer, whose real name is Stacy Ann Ferguson, is said to have dropped out of hip-hop group Black Eyed Peas (BEP)"
"Will.i.am (William James Adams), the founder of advertising Black Eyed Peas, told the daily star that Fergie didn't appear on the band's seventh studio album."
"We're a trio now."
"I don't know why Ferguson is not in this project
"You have to ask Ferguson," he said
"The other members of the group set up in 1995 are apl.de.ap The company (Alan Pineda) and the taboo (James Lewis Gomez)
"Fergie joined them in 2002."
"Adams revealed that the organization has a WhatsApp group chat called" Black Eyed Pea family ", and Ferguson is not one of them



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The 38th Annual Razzie Awards will take place on Saturday, March 3, the night before the 90th Academy Awards.”
“This year's nominees were announced the day before the Academy announces its Oscar nominations via a video on the Razzie Awards YouTube channel.”
“...and Emma Watson in The Circle.”
“Acting nominees include Cruise, Johnny Depp in Pirates of the Caribbean: Dead Men Tell No Tales, Jennifer Lawrence in mother!”
“Topping this year's list of nominees are Transformers: The Last Knight, the Tom Cruise-starrer The Mummy and the Fifty Shades Darker.”
“PhotofestThe nominations for the 38th annual Razzie Awards have been announced to "honor" the worst films of the year.”


"The 38th annual Lazi awards will be held on Saturday, March 3, the night before the 90th Academy Awards ceremony."
"This year's nominations were announced the day before the Academy Awards ceremony announced their nominations via YouTube video."
“… And Emma Watson is in the circle
"Nominated actors include cruise, Johnny Depp in Pirates of the Caribbean: the dead can't speak, and Jennifer Lawrence in mother!"
Top of this year's list are Transformers: The Last Knight, mummy starring Tom Cruise and fifty shadows of darkness
Nominations for the 38th annual Lazi awards were announced a few days ago to "honor" the worst film of the year



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Happy viewing.”
“So yes, the idea that 2018 is only going to bring more shows and new seasons of old favorites does fill us with a tiny tinge of dread.”
“We re now way past Peak TV and deep into the age of Anxiety TV when you simply can t keep up with every must see show binge worthy new hit streaming service event series and whatever else is being...”
“...recapped and breathlessly chattered about on TV Twitter...”
“Scripted shows were at an all-time record high last year in terms of sheer numbers.”
“DVRs are no sooner partially emptied before they fill to the brim again.”
“Netflix releases roughly six gajillion new specials, docs and episodic spectacles every week.”
“(We need to check the stats on that.)”
“There’s never been a better time to be a TV fanatic, or a worse time to be a completist.”
“But it also makes us incredibly excited to dip into new soon to be classics and dip back into familiar worlds with characters we ve grown to love and loathe we re getting more Westworld and Legion and Handmaid s...”


"Enjoy watching."
"So yes, the idea that 2018 will only bring more shows and a new season of old favorites really fills us with a little bit of fear."
"We have now passed the peak of TV and entered the era of anxious TV. At that time, you can't keep up with every must see program, revelry, new popular streaming media service event series and anything else that is happening..."
“… Retelling and talking about Twitter on TV out of breath... "
"In terms of number, last year's plays set a record high."
"The VCR will not be partially emptied soon before it is refilled."
"Netflix releases about six new gajillion features, documents and spectacles a week."
"We need to check the data."
"There's never a better time to be a TV fan, and there's never a worse time to be a perfectionist."
"But it also makes us very excited to immerse ourselves in the new world that is about to become a classic, in the familiar world. We have fallen in love with and disliked the western world, legions and maids that we like more and more..."



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Jamie McCarthy/GettyIn addition, the singer accented her all-black look with a white rose to show solidarity in the movement against sexual harassment and assault.”
“When he was hurt, I hurt,” she continued.”
“Sitting at a white grand piano covered in feathers made to look like angel wings, the star played while singing the powerful lyrics of her album’s title track while Mark Ronson strummed a guitar.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““This is for my father’s late sister, Joanne,” she said, before beginning.”
““This is for love and compassion even when you can’t understand.”After a brief pause — and a call out to “Time’s up” — Gaga segued into her hit single “Million Reasons,” eventually leaving the piano seat to belt out the high notes.”
“She concluded the performance by lying backward onto the fluffy instrument.”
“Be sure to check out PEOPLE’s full Grammys coverage to get the latest news on music’s big night.”
“Just hours before the show, Gaga shared a touching message on social media about how she was hoping to transform the “deep grief” that inspired Joanne into “hope and healing.”Image zoom“The loss of Joanne affected my father so deeply that it affected me.”
“When he cried, I cried.”


"Image zooming credit: Jamie McCarthy / gettin in addition, the singer highlighted her all black appearance with a white rose to show her solidarity in the campaign against sexual harassment and abuse."
"When he got hurt, I got hurt too," she continued
The star sits in front of a white grand piano covered with angel wings. She plays the piano while singing the powerful lyrics of the album's main song. Mark Ronson plays the guitar
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's for my father's late sister Joanne," she said before starting
"It's for love and compassion, even if you don't understand." After a short pause, Gaga sang her hit single "a million reasons" and finally left the piano seat to bring out the high notes
"She finished the show by lying back on a fluffy instrument."
"Be sure to check out people's full coverage of Grammy and get the latest news on music night."
"Just a few hours before the show, Gaga shared a touching message on social media, hoping to turn the" deep sadness "that inspired Joanne into" hope and cure. ". Image zoom "the loss of Joanne affected my father so much that it affected me."
"When he cried, I cried too."



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Gallery...”
“...proud and they re gonna be proud of me that s a great feeling to have deep down inside he shared...”
“According to multiple reports, the Jersey Shore star welcomed a daughter on Tuesday, the couple's first child together.”
“Harley -- who said that she was in labor in her Instagram Stories on Monday -- is also a mom to an 11-year-old son from a previous relationship.”
“E!”
“News was the first to report the news.”
“In January, Harley Instagrammed a sweet photo of Ortiz-Magro kissing her baby bump at their gender reveal party.”
“ET spoke to Ortiz-Magro last Thursday at a party to promote Jersey Shore: Family Vacation, where he talked about welcoming his baby girl.”
“"I think she's crowning right now, actually," he joked.”
“"I actually have the Star Wars theme on my phone, so when she goes into labor ..."Clearly, the 32-year-old reality star has been looking forward to becoming a father.”


Related libraries
“… They will be proud of me. He has a good feeling in his heart
"According to a number of reports, the Jersey coast star had a daughter on Tuesday, their first child together."
"Harley - she reported on instagram Monday that she was giving birth - is also the mother of an 11 year old son, who had a previous relationship."
“E！”
"The news was the first to report it."
In January, Harley posted a sweet picture of Ortiz Magro kissing her little lump at their gender disclosure party
"Et spoke to Ortiz Magro last Thursday at a party promoting" Jersey coast: family vacation, "where he talked about welcoming his baby girl
"Actually, I think she's coronating now," he joked
"In fact, I have the theme of Star Wars on my mobile phone, so when she was in labor..." Obviously, the 32 year old reality star has been looking forward to becoming a father. "



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Ahead, learn about how he and Taraji got so close, the products he swears by, and all the wigs he carries in his 70-pound kit.”
“Wallace happily obliged, and they've been a match made in hair heaven ever since.”
“Three years ago, he blew her away while doing her hair on the set of Acrimony , and Henson solidified the relationship with four words: "You belong to me."”
“On any given week, you'll see her in glam Hollywood waves, a long wrapped ponytail, or a sharp angled bob... and it's all thanks to her mane man, Tym Wallace .”
“But Taraji P. Henson can't be pinned down to one aesthetic.”
“There are some celebrities who have a "signature look" — like J.Lo's glow , Kim Kardashian's contour, or Gwen Stefani's red lip .”


"Next, you need to understand how he and taraji got so close, the products he promised, and all the wigs he had in his 70 pound toolbox."
"Wallace happily agreed, and since then they have been a perfect match."
"Three years ago, he blew her away while the crew was doing her hair. Hansen consolidated the relationship with four words:" you belong to me. "
"In any week, you'll see her shimmering in Hollywood, a long ponytail, or a sharp Bob... Thanks to her man, Tam Wallace
"But taraji P. Henson can't be limited to one aesthetic."
Some celebrities have "signature looks" - like J.Lo's radiant face, Kim Kardashian's silhouette, or Gwen Stefani's red lips



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Dogs often don't know where their feet are when they touch the ground, leading to what is called a proprioceptive deficit," Alleyne says.”
“Signs include a slowly progressive unsteady gait, initially in the hind limbs, but also affecting the front limbs.”
““Often imaging the area will be a next step, and that includes radiographs or more advanced diagnostics, like MRI or CT scan.”What are some common neurological disorders in dogs?”
““Often, tests to evaluate systemic health, like blood work or urinalysis to look at blood cells and organ function, will be recommended,” Galban says.”
“You can expect your dog to receive a physical examination and a more specific neurologic examination, testing nerve function and reflexes.”
“Did they eat something they should not have, or are they receiving any medications?”
“Has there been travel or injuries?”
“Is the patient in pain?”
“Evelyn Galban, DVM, MS, DACVIM, associate professor of Clinical Neurology at the University of Pennsylvania School of Veterinary Medicine, says that when a dog has a suspected neurologic problem, a veterinarian will begin their assessment with a thorough history, including questions like:When did signs begin?”
“Inability to blink Loss of tongue function How are neurological disorders typically diagnosed...”


"When dogs touch the ground, they usually don't know where their feet are, which leads to so-called proprioceptive deficits," Alleyne said
Symptoms include a slow, unstable gait that initially appears in the hind limbs but also affects the forelimbs
The next step is usually to image the area, including radiography or more advanced diagnosis, such as MRI or CT scan
"In general, tests that assess the health of the system, such as blood tests or urinalysis, to see blood cell and organ function, will be recommended," galban said
"You can expect your dog to undergo physical examination and more specific neurological tests to test neurological function and reflexes."
"Have they taken something they shouldn't have, or are they taking medicine?"
"Did you travel or get hurt?"
"Does the patient hurt?"
Evelyn galban, DVM, MS, dacvim, associate professor of clinical neuroscience at the University of Pennsylvania School of veterinary medicine, said that when a dog has a suspicious neurological problem, veterinarians will start their assessment from a complete medical history, including questions such as: when did the mark start? "
"Can't blink, lose tongue function, how is nervous system disease usually diagnosed..."



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He wouldn’t tell her what the visit was about.”
“Raisman says she received a call from USA Gymnastics president Steve Penny, who asked her to speak to an investigator who would be coming to Raisman’s home.”
“He rarely used gloves when working with the girls, and would touch them with his bare hands, including penetrating their vagina with his fingers.”
“Gymnasts were sent to Nassar for any pain — whether it was in the back, hip, or muscle — and he often suggested massage as the treatment, according to interviews with gymnasts.”
“According to Raisman and other gymnasts who have described the procedures, Nassar’s so-called therapy seemed to consist primarily of invasive massage, touching the girls around their pelvic areas and vagina.”
“Those treatments, it turns out, weren’t necessarily treatments at all.”
“So when Nassar appeared at her door again, Raisman opened it and let him and let him “work” on her, the term that USA Gymnastics and the gymnasts used for Nassar’s treatments.”
“He was a great doctor, Raisman says the official told her, and she should consider herself lucky that he would work with her.”
“At that meet, an official with USA Gymnastics, the sport’s governing body, saw Raisman wincing through practice with sore heels and an aching back and suggested that she see Nassar.”
“It first happened several months earlier, when she was competing in Melbourne, Australia.”


"He would not tell her the purpose of this visit."
Reisman said she received a call from Steve penny, President of the American Gymnastics Association, who asked her to speak to an investigator who was coming to Reisman's house
"He rarely wears gloves when working with girls and touches them with his bare hands, including inserting his fingers into their vaginas."
According to interviews with gymnasts, gymnasts are sent to Nassar because of back, hip or muscle pain, and he often recommends massage as a treatment
"According to Reisman and other gymnasts, Nassar's so-called therapy seems to mainly include invasive massage, touching the girl's pelvis and around her vagina."
"It turns out that these treatments are not necessarily treatments at all."
"So when Nasar appeared at her door again, lesman opened the door and let him, let him" work "on her. The American Gymnastics Association and gymnasts used this word to describe Nasar's treatment."
"He's a great doctor," Reisman said. The official told her that she should think she's lucky that he can work with her
At that meeting, an official of the American Gymnastics Association, the sports governing body, saw that Reisman was cowering during practice, with sore heels and back, and suggested that she go to see Nasar
"It first happened a few months ago when she was competing in Melbourne, Australia."



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Safe (May 10)Netflix is releasing so many movies and new TV shows this year, so it’s hard to sort out what is worth prioritizing in your queue.”
“The ambitious show featuring an entirely Latinx cast tackles issues of identity, culture and sexuality.”
“Michael B. Jordan, fresh off Black Panther, stars as Montag, a young “fireman” employed by the government to burn books.”
“Fahrenheit 451 (HBO, May 19)As if royal wedding day weren’t exciting enough, HBO’s hotly anticipated adaptation of Ray Bradbury’s dystopia Fahrenheit 451 premieres that same day.”
“In preparation for the nuptials, you can tune in to both the Fox documentary Meghan Markle: An American Princess (May 11) and a Lifetime movie about Meghan Markle and Prince Harry (May 13).”
“The royal wedding begins at 12 p.m. BST on May 19 in London, so Americans will have to set their alarms for the wee hours of the morning.”
“Max Mumby - Indigo/Getty ImagesThis will be the biggest television event of the summer.”
“Prince Harry and Meghan Markle have been a couple officially since November 2016 and are due to marry in Spring 2018.”
“The top picks for new summer TV shows:The Royal Wedding (May 19)Prince Harry and Meghan Markle attend an official photocall to announce their engagement at The Sunken Gardens, Kensington Palace on November 27, 2017 in London, England.”
“Happy watching.”


"Safe (May 10) Netflix has released so many movies and new TV shows this year that it's hard to determine which ones deserve priority."
"This ambitious show is made up of a completely Latino actor who deals with identity, culture and sex."
Michael B. Jordan, the new black leopard, plays Montague, a young fireman employed by the government to burn books
"Fahrenheit 451 (HBO, May 19) seems not exciting enough on the day of the royal wedding. Ray Bradbury's anti Utopian movie" Fahrenheit 451 "premiered on HBO."
To prepare for the wedding, you can watch the fox documentary Megan markel: the American Princess (May 11) and a lifelong movie about Megan markel and Prince Harry (May 13)
"The royal wedding starts in London at 12 p.m. on May 19, BST, so Americans have to set their alarm clock in the early morning."
"Max Moby - Indigo / Getty pictures it's going to be the biggest TV event of the summer."
"Prince Harry and Megan markel have officially become a couple since November 2016 and are due to get married in the spring of 2018."
"The best choice for the new summer TV show: Royal Wedding (May 19) on November 27, 2017, Prince Harry and Megan markel attended the official photo ceremony and announced their engagement in the sunken garden of Kensington Palace in London, UK
"Have a good time."



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Channing Tatum and Jenna DewanThe 21 Jump Street star has already moved out of the Los Angeles home he and Dewan shared and the two have been spending more time with their respective supportive group of friends, another source previously told PEOPLE.”
“Both share daughter Everly, who will turn 5 in May.”
“...the knot in 2009”
“But neither of them are people who will stay in something that isn t fully right RELATED VIDEO Channing Tatum Moved Out of Family Home and Has Been Separated from Jenna Dewan for Months Dewan and Tatum first met on the set of their 2006 movie Step Up and tied...”
““They really wanted to make their marriage work,” said the insider.”
“Image zoom Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan | Credit: Ethan Miller/GettyA source close to the couple previously PEOPLE the pair tried to make things work after “growing apart” over the past year.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“Days earlier, he hung out with Bachelor star Arie Luyendyk Jr. at the Honda Indy Grand Prix in Alabama.”
““He always had Jenna and their family to go home to, so having their separation be ‘official’ now has been a big adjustment for him.”Keeping himself busy, last week Tatum stepped out to promote his new animated film Smallfoot at CinemaCon in Las Vegas, Nevada.”


Another source told people earlier: "picture zooming Channing Tatum and Jenna dewans have moved out of their Los Angeles home and spent more time with their respective support groups of friends."
"Each of them has a daughter who will turn five in May."
"The end of 2009"
"But neither of them will stay in some incorrect videos. Channing Tatum moved out of the house and separated from Jenna Dewan for several months. Dewan and Tatum first met on the set of their 2006 film" march in "and got married..."
"They really want their marriage to be successful," the person familiar with the matter said
"Image zooming Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan | source: people familiar with the couple Ethan Miller / gettya said earlier that they were trying to make things go smoothly after" going their separate ways "in the past year."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
A few days ago, he was dating single star Arie luyendyk Jr. at the Honda Indy Grand Prix in Alabama
"He always has Jenna and their family back home, so it's a big adjustment for him to make their separation official now." To keep himself busy, Tatum was at cinemacon in Las Vegas, Nevada, last week promoting his new cartoon smallfoot



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch Dua Lipa get in trouble for leaping into a crowd of fans at her show...”
“Music News...”
“Glor parx floriaandfading March 28 2018 They let me use a Costco card and my work badge once when i forgot mine Lauren laurenlolli518 March 28 2018 Picture GIPHY You Should Download Our Brand New App For All The Latest...”
“I CANT BREATHE IMAGINE BEING ABLE TO JUST HOLD UP A MAGAZINE TO AIRPORT SECURITY TO IDENTIFY URSELF — henny c (@newamericanas) March 28, 2018Is that actually allowed?”
“Social media users couldn't handle this news, with people wondering just how on earth this was allowed.”
“The couple haven't named the airport that allowed him to travel with nothing more than a cover shot... which is probs for the best.”
“The cheek.”
“...his ID and rather than having a public meltdown like your average person he pulled out his XXL magazine cover and the airport security ACTUALLY let him through...”
“Gerald lost his ID and he s trying to use the cover of XXL as part of his additional identification to get through airport security I m so annoyed h halsey March 28 2018 He apparently realised he had lost...”
“...got through airport security by flashing a magazine cover he was on...”


"Watching Du alipa jump into the fan group and cause trouble in the program..."
"Music news..."
"Glor parx floriaandfacing March 28, 2018 they allowed me to use Costco card and my work badge once when I forgot my Lauren Lauren lolli518 March 28, 2018 picture giphy you should download our new app to get all the latest..."
"I can't imagine going to the airport security office with a magazine to confirm my identity - Henny C (@ New Americans) March 28, 2018, is this really allowed?"
"Social media users can't handle this news, people want to know how it's allowed."
"The couple haven't yet named the airport where he'd only need to take a cover photo when traveling... This is the best. "
"Cheek."
“… His ID card, instead of having a public crash like you ordinary people, he took out his XXL magazine cover, airport security actually let him through... "
"Gerald has lost his ID card, and he is trying to use the cover of XXL as part of his additional ID card for passing through airport security. I am very angry with H Halsey. On March 28, 2018, he obviously realized that he has lost..."
“… After passing the airport security check, he saw the cover of a magazine... "



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow...”
“Now On Spotify!”
“Urban talks about what he has planned and what he did for her 40th in the clip below.”
“Norton switched gears by asking Kidman about her upcoming birthday, in which she turns 50!”
“My husband is on the show!“We don’t blame her for wanting the change the subject so fast!”
“News, she quickly said, “Can we move on?”
“But, according to E!”
“They play husband and wife that are described as a troubled couple, but their “sex life is good, if a little kinky,” according to Variety.”
““Considering what Colin and I did in ‘The Killing Of A Sacred Deer’, that was nothing,” she told Norton.”
“When Norton asked if filming the sponge bath scenes were awkward, she referred to another upcoming movie she co-stars with Farrell, called The Killing Of A Sacred Deer.”


"Follow..."
"Spotify now!"
"In the following clip, urban talks about his plans and what he did for her to be 40."
Norton changed his mind and asked Kidman about her upcoming 50th birthday
"My husband is on the show! "We don't blame her for wanting to change the subject so quickly!"
"When the news came, she said quickly," can we continue? "
"But according to e!"
According to the variety, the couple they play are described as a troublesome couple, but their "sex life is good, if it's a bit odd."
"Considering what Colin and I did in kill a sacred deer, that's nothing," she told Norton
When Norton was asked if it was embarrassing to shoot the sponge bath scene, she mentioned another upcoming film, killing the deer, starring Farrell



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[28]”
“I think we should have equal work for equal pay for women all over the world.”
“She was crowned Miss South Africa 2017, and is the second Miss Universe winner from South Africa, following Margaret Gardiner who was crowned Miss Universe 1978.”
“Early life and education [ edit ]Nel-Peters was born on 28 June 1995 in Sedgefield, Western Cape, to Bennie Peters and Anne-Marie Steenkamp.”
“[3] Her half-sister, Franje, had cerebellar agenesis, and Nel-Peters said that she was the most significant motivator in her life; Franje later died on 4 May 2019, which Nel-Peters confirmed on her Instagram.”
“[4][5][6][7] While pursuing a bachelor's degree in business management and entrepreneurship from North-West University, Nel-Peters modeled part-time for Boss Models and Vision Management Cape Town.”
“[8]Nel-Peters graduated from university in March 2017, a few days before winning the Miss South Africa 2017 competition.”
“[9] She is fluent in both English and Afrikaans.”
“[10][11]Pageantry [ edit ]Miss South Africa 2017 [ edit ]Nel-Peters began her pageantry career representing Western Cape in the Miss South Africa 2017 competition on March 26, 2017, which she won.”
“[citation needed] As Miss South Africa, she had the right to represent South Africa in both Miss World 2017 and Miss Universe 2017, but since the dates of the two pageants coincided, she was sent only to Miss Universe, held in Las Vegas, Nevada.”


“[28]”
"I think women all over the world should get equal pay for equal work."
"She won the Miss South Africa crown in 2017, the second Miss Universe winner from South Africa after Margaret Gardner, who won the Miss Universe crown in 1978."
"Nell Peters was born on June 28, 1995 in Sedgefield, Western Cape Province. Her father is Benny Peters and Anne Mary sternkemp."
"Her half sister Frankie suffered from cerebellar hypoplasia, and Nell Peters said she was the most important driving force in her life; Frankie later died on May 4, 2019, and Nell Peters confirmed that on her instagram."
[4] [5] [6] [7] while pursuing a bachelor's degree in business management and entrepreneurship at Northwestern University, Nell Peters worked part-time for boss modeling and vision management in Cape Town
"Nel Peters graduated from university in March 2017 and won the 2017 Miss South Africa contest a few days ago."
"She is proficient in English and Afrikaans."
"[10] [11] gorgeous [Edit] 2017 Miss South Africa [Edit] nel Peters participated in the Miss South Africa 2017 competition on March 26, 2017, representing the Western Cape Province. She started her gorgeous career and won the competition."
"[citation required] as Miss South Africa, she has the right to represent South Africa in Miss World 2017 and Miss Universe 2017, but due to the coincidence of the two beauty contests, she was only sent to the Miss Universe in Las Vegas, Nevada."



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“* The request timed out and you did not successfully sign up.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”
“The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge attend the BAFTAs at Royal Albert Hall on February 18, 2018.”
“What are the most likely royal baby names?”
“This means that royal baby number three will be here before Prince Harry and Meghan Markle’s wedding.”
“About a week later on Oct. 17, the Palace divulged that Kate Middleton is due is sometime in April 2018, just before Princess Charlotte’s third birthday.”
“Middleton made her first public appearance after the third baby announcement at a Oct. 10 reception at Buckingham Palace in honor of World Mental Health Day.”
““The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge are very pleased to announce that The Duchess of Cambridge is expecting their third child,” the Palace wrote.”
“She was affected by the same condition while pregnant with both Prince George and Princess Charlotte.”
“Max Mumby/Indigo/Getty ImagesThe official Kensington Palace Twitter account announced that Kate Middleton was pregnant on Sept. 4, sharing a press release that revealed she was again suffering from severe morning sickness, also known as hyperemesis gravidarum.”


"* the request timed out. You did not register successfully."
Please enter a valid email address
"On February 18, 2018, the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge attended the BAFTA at the Royal Albert Hall."
"What is the most likely Royal baby's name?"
"It means that the third Royal baby will be here before the wedding of Prince Harry and Megan markel."
"About a week later, on October 17, the palace revealed that Kate Middleton's due date was sometime in April 2018, just before Charlotte's third birthday."
"Middleton announced her first public appearance after the birth of her third child at a reception to mark World Mental Health Day at Buckingham Palace on October 10."
"The Duchess of Cambridge are very pleased to announce that the Duchess of Cambridge will have their third child," the palace wrote
"She was also affected when she was pregnant with Prince George and Princess Charlotte."
"Max Mumby / indigo / Getty Images Kensington Palace's official twitter account announced that Kate Middleton was pregnant on September 4 and shared a press release that revealed that she suffered from severe morning sickness again, also known as hyperemesis gravidarum."



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Beckinsale will reprise her role as Selene in the upcoming “Underworld 6”.”
“This is your mother!”
“Kate Beckinsale, 44, dropped by “Jimmy Kimmel Live!” to catch up with her old pal Kimmel.”
“While talking about family, Beckinsale revealed her 18-year-old daughter’s crush on the late-night talk show host.”
“RELATED: Kate Beckinsale Reportedly Files Police Report After Stalker ThreatWhat’s more, her daughter — Lily Sheen — was sitting front row in the live studio audience.”
““You know how they have crushes on Justin Bieber and things like that?” Beckinsale asked Kimmel.”
““She’s got one on you.”But things are a tad complicated in the family.”
““It’s a little bit of a tricky situation because my daughter’s dad is dating Jimmy’s ex-girlfriend — it’s very twisted.”
“It’s a sort of horrible, ‘Human Centipede’-y vibe,” “The Aviator” star revealed.”
“The camera turned to the beautiful 18-year-old who, to her credit, kept her head high and shared a big smile.”


Beckinsale will play Serena in the upcoming underworld 6
"This is your mother!"
Kate Beckinsale, 44, said on "Jimmy Kimmel live."! "To catch up with her old friend Kimmel."
"When it comes to family, Beckinsale revealed her 18-year-old daughter's fascination with late night talk show hosts."
"Related reports: it is reported that Kate Beckinsale submitted a police report after being intimidated by the stalkers. More importantly, her daughter Lily sheen is in the front row of the audience in the studio. "
"Do you know how they fall in love with Justin Bieber or something? "Beckinsale asked Kimmel."
"She has a way with you." But things at home are a little complicated
"It's a bit tricky because my daughter's father is dating Jimmy's ex - it's twisted."
"It's a terrible 'Human Centipede' - y atmosphere," pilot star revealed
"The camera turned to the beautiful 18-year-old girl. To her credit, she held her head high and had a big smile."



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...me...”
“Image zoom Eric Dane and Rebecca Gayheart with daughters Billie and Georgia in June 2017 Credit Rob On Monday Gayheart thanked her fans and followers on social media with a photo of a quote that read Today I am grateful for all the people who are loving and kind to...”
“We kindly ask that you respect our privacy during this time as we navigate the next phase of our lives.”Gayheart and Dane, who rose to fame as Dr. Mark Sloan in ABC’s Grey’s Anatomy, married in 2004.”
““We will continue our friendship and work as a team to co-parent our two beautiful girls as they are the most important thing in the world to us.”
“Image zoom Rebecca Gayheart | Credit: SPOT / BACKGRID“After 14 years together we have decided that ending our marriage is the best decision for our family,” Dane, 45, said in a statement to PEOPLE.”
“Gayheart is also requesting joint legal and physical custody of daughters Billie and Georgia.”
“PEOPLE confirmed on Friday that the mother of two filed court docs for legal separation from Eric Dane after 14 years of marriage, citing irreconcilable differences.”
“The mother of two – daughters Billie, 7, and Georgia, 6 – was also wearing a gold band on her left ring finger.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The actress, 46, was dressed in a grey long sweater and jeans with her hair in a ponytail as she stopped by a friend’s house.”


“… I am
"In June 2017, Eric Dane and Rebecca gaehart took a picture with their daughters Billy and Georgia. On Monday, rob expressed her thanks to gaehart's fans and followers on social media, and attached a photo with a sentence on it, today, I thank all those who love and are kind-hearted... "
"We urge you to respect our privacy during this time and let us pass the next stage of our life." Gayheart and Dane, who married in 2004, became famous as Dr. mark Sloan in ABC's "Grey's anatomy."
"We will continue our friendship, as a team, to raise our two beautiful girls together, because they are the most important in the world to us."
"After 14 years of living together, our decision to end our marriage is the best decision for our family," Dann, 45, said in a statement to people magazine
"Gayheart also asked for common legal and physical custody of his daughters, Billy and Georgia."
On Friday, it was confirmed that the mother of two had filed court documents demanding a legal separation from Eric Dan after 14 years of marriage, citing irreconcilable differences
"This mother of two - Billy, 7, and Georgia, 6 - has a gold ring on her left ring finger."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The 46 year old actress, wearing a grey sweater, jeans and ponytail, passed a friend's house



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know your thoughts!”
“Catelynn feels like the show has absolutely nothing to do with the kids anymore so they re just waiting for MTV to pull the plug Article continues below advertisement Source MTV As fans watched Farrah was fired from the show for her involvement in the adult entertainment video industry as...”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: MTVAs it was previously reported, Are You The One?”
“...star Cheyenne Floyd is allegedly replacing Farrah on Teen Mom OG.”
“Source: MTV“Amber Portwood is pissed off about the new cast member,” a source close to Amber told RadarOnline.com.”
“They ve been doing Teen Mom for ten years and don t think they like the idea of someone who is a total newbie and has never even been on the show before coming on permanently Article continues below advertisement Source MTV Catelynn Lowell and her husband Tyler Baltierra are...”
“...not happy either...”
“A second source told the site, “They all just think it’s stupid that they’re bringing people from outside the franchise instead of bringing the OG’s and the Teen Mom 2 cast together.”
“Maci Bookout loves Chelsea Houska Kailyn Lowry and Amber get along it just makes more sense Source MTV The insider added how Tyler is fed up with all the drama the show has brought them Adding He just doesn t think the show is going to last very much longer...”
“...unless the new cast member brings in amazing ratings but they aren t really holding their breath...”


"Let us know what you think!"
"Caitlin thinks that the play has nothing to do with the children, so they are just waiting for MTV to insert the article. Under MTV, the fans see that Farah is fired because of his involvement in the adult entertainment video industry, because..."
The article continues in the following ad source: mtvas, it was reported before, are you that one? "
“…… Star Cheyenne Freud is said to replace Farah in "teenage mom og."
A source close to amber told reporters: "source: MTV" Amber Portwood was angry at the new actor RadarOnline.com Website. "
"They've been doing" teenage Mom "for ten years. They don't think they like someone who's completely new to the show, and they've never been on the show before. The article continues to be on MTV catelyn Lowell and her husband Tyler baltierra. The following is..."
“… I'm not happy... "
Another source told the website: "they all think it's stupid that they just bring non franchisees together, not the actors of og and young mom 2."
"MACI bookout likes Chelsea houska kailyn Lowry and amber good it just more sense source. MTV insiders add that Taylor is tired of all the plays the show has brought to them. He just thinks it won't last long..."
“… Unless new actors bring amazing ratings, they don't really hold their breath... "



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“May we all keep loving and living.” We’re definitely here for friendly exes — it’s a sign of true friendship.”
““He is an amazing human being, and I’m a much better person because he’s a part of my life.”
““We have and will always be friends,” Rye told Page Six TV then.”
“...friends with Although the couple began dating in the summer of 2017 Rye confirmed that the two had indeed broken up back in March after many noticed the 39 year old CNN correspondent didn t walk the red carpet with Common 46 at the Oscars...”
“It s also a process and a journey to get to understanding how to be full in a relationship and be a full and complete person as much as possible he continued adding that it was fun to have a partner who you can really enjoy and can be really...”
““First of all, I learned that she’s just an amazing, incredible woman,” the Hunter Killer star tells ESSENCE.”
“The Oscar-winning rapper, whose known for remaining good friends with his exes — even hosting an event with ex Serena Williams earlier this week — said he learned a lot from the nearly yearlong relationship when asked.”
“READ MORE LESSGetty ImagesIt was the split heard around Woke Twitter , when Common and political activist and commentator Angela Rye broke up.”


"May we all keep loving and living." We're definitely here for our friendly ex girlfriend. It's a symbol of true friendship
"He's a great man and I'm a better man because he's a part of my life."
"We have always been and will always be friends," ley told TV6 at the time
“…… Although the couple started dating in the summer of 2017, friends confirmed that they did break up in March after many people noticed that the 39 year old CNN reporter didn't walk the red carpet with common 46 at the Oscars. "
"It's also a process and journey to learn how to be full in a relationship and to be as full and complete as possible. He continued, "it's fun to have a partner that you can really enjoy and be..."
"First, I know she is a great, unbelievable woman," the hunter killer star told the cream.
The Oscar winning rapper is known for keeping up with his ex girlfriend and even held an event with former Serena Williams earlier this week. When asked about this relationship of nearly a year, he said he had learned a lot
"Read more lessgetty images when Angela rye, a political activist and commentator, broke up, there was a split around twitter."



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You're a criminal, and you steal like you're a pro."”
“"I need to take back the light inside you stole.”
“I gotta get this off my chest to let it go," she sings.”
“"This is a story that I've never told.”
“In 2013 track “Warrior” Lovato alludes to being a “survivor” of sexual assault.”
“"So sorry if anyone was offended," she concluded.”
“Lovato has since deleted the original tweet and also apologized for the remark.”
“You don’t have to educate me."”
“Of all people I know about sexual abuse.”
“"For all of those coming at me rn, listen to the lyrics of Warrior and maybe you'll have more compassion for someone who made a simple mistake.”


"You're a criminal. Stealing is like an expert."
"I'll get back the light you stole."
She sang, "I have to say it and let it go."
"It's a story I've never told."
"In 2013's martial arts, Lovato alluded to himself as a" Survivor "of sexual assault
"If someone is offended, I'm sorry," she concluded
"Lovato later deleted the original microblog and apologized for this sentence."
"You don't have to educate me."
"Of all the people I know, I know about sexual abuse."
"For all the people who come to me, listen to the lyrics of martial arts, maybe you will have more sympathy for those who have made a simple mistake."



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Though, she later revealed that she was not so “crazy in love” with it, but never let her mother know!”
“Beyoncé and Jay-Z wed in 2008, and for their first ceremony, Beyoncé wore a gown designed by her mother.”
““At the end of the show the Carter babies were included in a family collage [however] the babies in the film clip at the beginning were not their children,” a source said.”
“Beyonce Says About Blue Ivy: “She Introduced Me to Myself”During the show a photo of the pair holding two babies was shared along with the words “LOVE IS UNIVERSAL” and “LOVE NEVER CHANGES.” Many thought the children were Rumi and Sir, but a source told PEOPLE they were not.”
“...s after the pair shared a photo holding another set of twins at one point throughout their show causing slight confusion with fans...”
“Image zoom Credit Raven Varona Parkwood PictureGroup On Thursday Beyoncé s mother Tina Knowles Lawson shared a screen shot of the video of Sir Rumi Blue and their parents writing on Instagram My babies Tina Knowles Instagram confirmed the twins in that photo were in fact Beyoncé and Jay Z”
“In the video above, you can see the gown from every angle.”
“This version incorporated modern elements such as sheer cutouts, an off-the-shoulder neckline and Swarovski crystals and pearls adornments.”
“Galia Lahav announced that she wore a gown from the “Victorian Affinity” collection, which paid homage to Queen Victoria’s wedding dress through the corseted bodice, Chantilly lace and the Victorian bustle train details on the gown.”
“And we just got further proof that it appeared to be a vow renewal ceremony, because a press release on behalf of designer Galia Lahav confirmed that Beyoncé was wearing the couture label’s “Thelma” style wedding dress for a “vow renewal.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


However, she later revealed that she was not so "crazy in love" with it, but never let her mother know
In 2008, Beyonce and Jay-Z got married. At their first wedding, Beyonce wore a dress designed by her mother
"At the end of the show, Carter's children were put into a family collage, but the children in the opening clip were not their children," a source said
"She introduced herself to me," Beyonce said of blue ivy In the program, photos of the two holding two children were shared, along with the words "love is universal" and "love never changes.". Many people think the children are Lumi and Mr. Lu, but a source told people they are not
“… S after the two shared a photo, in their performance, holding another pair of twins at one point caused slight confusion with the fans... "
"Picture zooming credit Raven Varona Parkwood photo group on Thursday, Beyonce's mother, Tina Knowles Lawson, shared a video capture of Sir Rumi blue and their parents on instagram. My child, Tina Knowles instagram, confirmed that the twins in the picture were actually Beyonce and jay z"
"In the video above, you can see the dress from all angles."
This version combines modern elements such as transparent cutouts, off shoulder necklines, Swarovski crystals and Pearl decorations
Galia lahav announced that she was wearing a "Victoria affinity" dress, which pays homage to Queen Victoria's wedding dress with corset, Chantilly lace and Victorian busy train details on the dress
"We just got further evidence that this seems to be an oath renewal ceremony, because a press release on behalf of designer Galia rahaf confirmed that Beyonce was wearing the" Selma "style wedding dress of fashion brand to" renew the oath ". Get push notifications for news, features and more. "



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’m a very obvious liar https://t.co/rF9WATXtLv – christine teigen (@chrissyteigen) December 5, 2017”
“...https://t.co/3tb7fWtYyv – christine teigen (@chrissyteigen) December 5, 2017I cannot lie without laughing.”
“News — and the “Lip Sync Battle” personality apparently isn’t too happy with her more loose-lipped friends either.”
“Teigen fired up her Twitter wrath on Tuesday, calling out E!”
“News for a report on her supposed “pregnancy cravings.”“Bring on the food!”
“Chrissy Teigen’s pregnancy cravings include cheeseburgers, fries, and anything spicy,” E!”
“News tweeted early Tuesday, with a link to a story bearing the title “Chrissy Teigen’s Pregnancy Cravings Will Have You Begging for Junk Food.”Also Read: Chrissy Teigen Apologizes for Nip-Slip: 'I Have Nipples.”
“It's Not Something I'm Proud of' (Video)Teigen apparently found the story hard to swallow, and said as much in a reply to E!”
“News.”
““You guys should do a service to all the celebs who give you hourly content and say who your sources are so we can get rid of the sh–ty ‘friends’ in our lives who sell you stories,” Teigen responded.”


"I'm obviously a liar https://t.co/rF9WATXtLv – Christine Teigen (@ Christine Teigen) December 5, 2017 "
"... website: https://t.co/3tb7fWtYyv – Christine Teigen (@ christyteigen) December 5, 2017 I can't lie without laughing. "
"News - the personality of" mouth fight "obviously doesn't like her more relaxed friends."
On Tuesday, tegan was furious on twitter, shouting "E!"
News about what she called "the desire to be pregnant.". "Bring the food!"
"Chris tegan's desire to be pregnant includes cheeseburgers, French fries and anything spicy," e said
Earlier on Tuesday, a news tweet linked to a report titled "Chris tegan's desire to be pregnant makes you beg for junk food.". The other is: Chris tegan apologizes for nip slip: "I have nipples."
"It's not something I'm proud of" (video) tygan obviously finds the story hard to accept and is replying to e! "
"News."
"You should provide services to celebrities who provide you with content and tell you their sources every hour, so that we can get rid of the" friends "who sell you stories in our lives," tegan replied



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT:Gal Gadot on What Wonder Woman Would Think of the Times Up Movement at the Golden GlobesGal Gadot Says She Has No Time to Be a Diva (Exclusive)Olivia Munn Gives Sarcastic Toast to Hollywood 'Good Guys,' Calls Out Mark Wahlberg at Critics' Choice Awards...”
“Watch the video below for more of what Gadot has said about the Time's Up initiative.”
“Gadot follows in the footsteps of Viola Davis, who won the first award at last year's show.”
“"We will band together to make strides, uniting for equality."”
“"In the past weeks and months, we've been witnessing a movement within our industry and society," Gadot continued.”
“"When I started acting, there were very few female-led movies and even fewer female directors."”
“A real one," the Israeli actress shared.”
“"Throughout my career, I was asked to describe my dream role, and it was clear to me that I wanted to play a strong and independent woman.”
“Wonder Woman director Patty Jenkins presented Gadot with the award, who went on to address Time's Up and the current movement of women speaking out with their stories of sexual harassment and called for more women leading films -- and in the director's chair.”
“The DC superhero movie star was presented the second ever #SeeHer Award at the Critics' Choice Awards on Thursday, which honors more accurate portrayals of women in film.”


"Related content: what does gal gadot" Wonder Woman "think about the progressive movement of the times at the Golden Globe Awards? Gal gado said she didn't have time to be a leading actress (exclusive) Olivia moon ironically cheered to Hollywood's" good people "and mark wolberg yelled" ah... "At the critics' Choice Award
"Please watch the video below to learn more about gadote's views on the era progress initiative."
"Gadote followed in the footsteps of Viola Davis, who won her first prize in last year's performance."
"We should unite, march forward, unite and strive for equality."
"In the past few weeks and months, we have witnessed a movement in our industry and society," gado continued
"When I started acting, there were very few female dominated films and very few female directors."
"Really," said the Israeli actress
"Throughout my career, I've been asked to describe my dream role, and I know very well that I want to play a strong and independent woman."
"Wonder woman director Patty Jenkins presented the award to gado, who then used his sexual harassment story to address time magazine and the current women's movement, and called for more women to star in films - as well as to be directors."
The Washington based superhero won the second most popular award of all time at the critic's Choice Awards on Thursday for more accurate portrayal of women in films



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“).”
“:The insider tells E!”
“Photo: Samir Hussein/WireImageOh hi, were you expecting an invite to Meghan Markle and Prince Harry’s upcoming May 19 wedding?”
“Well, if so, you might want to sit down, because I have some truly troubling news for you.”
“The soon-to-be married couple reportedly cut their royal wedding guest list down by 200 people … all so that they could rearrange the church pews!”
“What Does It Take To Be A Duchess?”
“Inside A Royal Etiquette ClassAccording to E!, the venue where Markle and Prince Harry will tie the very fancy knot — St. George’s Chapel at Windsor Castle — can hold around 800 people.”
“But instead, they’ve decided to only invite 600 to the church ceremony to accommodate an altered seating plan.”
“Per E!”
“News the couple may spread out the chapel’s pews or arrange them diagonally so guests can get a better view of the altar.”


“).”
": insider tells e!"
"Photo: Samir Hussein / wireimageoh Hi, are you looking forward to the invitation for the wedding of Megan Markle and Prince Harry on May 19?"
"Well, if that's the case, you might want to sit down because I have some really disturbing news for you."
"It's reported that the couple who are about to get married have cut their royal wedding guest list by 200 All this is to rearrange the benches in the church! "
"What does it take to be a duchess?"
"In a royal etiquette class! At St. George's Church in Windsor Castle, mark and Prince Harry will have a very strange wedding here, which can accommodate about 800 people. "
"However, they decided to invite only 600 people to church services to adapt to the changed seating arrangements."
"Pell!"
"News - the couple may spread out the church benches or arrange them diagonally so that guests can better see the altar."



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We still make out.”“We’re very fiery passionate people, so when we fight, it’s like the 4th of July!” she added.”
“We cook together.”
“Burke, 46, filed for divorce from Charvet, 45, on Friday in Los Angeles County citing irreconcilable differences in court documents obtained by PEOPLE.”
“The two separated in January.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The actress is seeking joint legal and physical custody of their two children: son Shaya, 10, and daughter Rain, 11.”
“Burke is also mom to daughters Sierra, 16, and Neriah, 18, from her previous marriage to Garth Fisher.”
““They’ve been separated for a couple of months and tried as hard as they could to make their marriage work, but at the end of the day they have to do what’s right for them and their family,” a source tells PEOPLE.”
“Image zoom Credit Chad Hurst Getty The former Dancing with the Stars host and Melrose Place alum met in Mexico and it was the perfect example of right guy wrong time because we had this beautiful affair came back to L A and just stayed friends Burke told Health for...”
“...its April 2014 cover story...”


"We are still intimate." "We are very enthusiastic people, so when we fight, it's like the fourth of July! "She added
"We cook together."
Burke, 46, filed for divorce with chavette, 45, in Los Angeles County on Friday, citing irreconcilable differences in court documents
"The two separated in January."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The actress is seeking common legal and physical custody of their two children: 10-year-old son Shaya and 11 year old daughter Ryan."
"Burke is also the mother of Sela, 16, and nellia, 18, who are her ex-wife to Garth Fisher."
"They've been separated for months and they've done their best to maintain their marriage, but in the end, they have to do the right thing for themselves and their families," a source told people
"Picture zooming credit Chad Hurst Getty, the former star dancing host and Melrose square alumni met in Mexico, which is a perfect example of the right person at the wrong time, because we have this beautiful event back in Los Angeles, just left behind friend Burke to tell health..."
“… April 2014 cover story... "



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The rock ‘n’ roll legend admits that the movements are generally forces for good, but has slammed the “collateral damage” of those he sees as falsely accused, as “there’s no presumption of innocence”.”
“Simmons has denied the claims, and at the time insisted that he intented to “defend myself against any alleged charges you may have been reading about in the media.”Earlier this year, Simmons spoke out on the MeToo movement.”
“The settlement amount is yet to be announced.”
“As she spoke to Simmons and bandmate Paul Stanley, the woman claims that Simmons touched her and “turned standard interview questions into sexual innuendos.”AdvertisementNow, The Blast has secured court documents to confirm that Simmons has reached a settlement.”
“She accused Simmons of inappropriate touching her in an interview on November 1.”
“The original case was filed by an unnamed radio personality last December.”
“KISS star Gene Simmons has reportedly settled a lawsuit that accused him of sexual assault.”


The rock legend admits that these movements are usually forces for good, but criticizes "collateral damage" that he sees as framed, saying "there is no presumption of innocence."
Simmons denied that, insisting at the time that he intended to "defend himself against any charges you might read in the media." Earlier this year, Simmons spoke about the Mayo movement
"The amount of the settlement has yet to be announced."
When she talked to Simmons and band partner Paul Stanley, the woman claimed that Simmons touched her, "turning the standard interview question into a sexual suggestion." Now, the explosion has obtained court documents confirming that Simmons has reached a settlement
"In an interview on November 1, she accused Simmons of touching her inappropriately."
"The original case was filed by an unnamed radio source in December last year."
"Kissing star Gene Simmons is reported to have settled a lawsuit accusing him of sexual assault."



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The cover is a hilarious parody of the 2018 Hollywood Issue of GQ's fellow Condé Nast publication, Vanity Fair, in which Reese Witherspoon appeared to have three legs and Oprah Winfrey had an extra hand.”
“We deeply regret that the results violated GQ's rigorous standards of editorial excellence and the laws of nature."”
“Our intention was to celebrate the three super-funny superstars, who are all that is smart and perceptive and riotous and necessary in comedy right now.”
“...for the egregious mistakes made in the process of creating the cover for our 2018 comedy issue the latest in our pantheon of mostly annual love letters to the funniest humans we know...”
“Unrecognisable Britney Spears in Photoshop fail Stella Maxwell in Victoria s Secret Photoshop fail Victoria Beckham s thigh gap wasn t a Photoshop fail says Vogue editor GQ would like to apologise to Kate McKinnon Issa Rae and Sarah Silverman...”
“READ MORE:* Does Reese Witherspoon have three legs on the cover of Vanity Fair?”
“After releasing the cover, GQ issued an "apology" on their website.”
“Despite having normal legs, Silverman has been given two extra hands - one placed on Rae's shoulder while also somehow planting one on the floor beneath the stage.”
“In the photo, Saturday Night Live actress McKinnon's leg is stretched unnaturally across Insecure creator Rae's lap.”
“The cover of their annual comedy issue stars comedians Kate McKinnon, Issa Rae and Sarah Silverman, with the addition of a few extra limbs.”


"The cover is a funny imitation of another issue of GQ magazine, vanity fair, 2018 Hollywood edition. Reese Witherspoon seems to have three legs and Oprah Winfrey has one more hand."
"We deeply regret that the results violate GQ's strict standards of editorial excellence and the laws of nature."
"Our goal is to celebrate three super funny stars who are smart, sharp, grumpy and indispensable in comedy."
“… We made an amazing mistake in making the cover for our 2018 comedy distribution. This is the latest issue of our Pantheon, mainly a love letter to the funniest human we know every year... "
GQ, the editor of fashion magazine, apologized to Kate McKinnon, Issa ray and Sarah Silverman: "the unrecognizable failure of Britney Spears in Photoshop, the failure of Stella Maxwell in Victoria's Secret Photoshop, and the gap between Victoria's thighs is not a failure in Photoshop."
"Read more: * does Reese Witherspoon have three legs on the cover of vanity fair?"
"After publishing the cover, GQ published an 'apology' on their website."
"Despite his normal legs, Silverman had two more hands - one on Ray's shoulder and the other on the floor under the stage."
"In this picture, McKinnon's leg extends unnaturally to Ray's knee, the unsafe creator, on Saturday night."
The cover of their comedy of the year, starring comedians Kate McKinnon, Issa ray and Sarah Silverman, adds a few limbs



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the video below.”
“As the song went on, it took a noticeably heavier turn and Bell began belting out Metallica's "Enter Sandman."”
“Grohl accompanied on drums.”
“Bell was quick to oblige and launched into a rendition of "Do You Want to Build a Snowman."”
“"If I was to jam a song with you, I would become the coolest dad in the world," Grohl told Bell.”
“...hit Frozen...”
“Grohl welcomed guest Kristen Bell who also appeared in costume as Tom Selleck s Thomas Magnum from the 1980s TV series Magnum P I and told the Good Place star how his children were big fans of her 2013 Disney...”
“Subbing for host Jimmy Kimmel on ABC's late-night program, Foo Fighters frontman Dave Grohl stepped in for holiday duty sporting a white beard, glasses and letterman jacket to impersonate former late-night stalwart David Letterman.”
“It was a pairing only Halloween could provide.”
“Dave Grohl and Kristen Bell Perform 'Frozen', Metallica MashupDo you want to build a sandman?”


"Watch the video below."
As the song goes on, it obviously takes a heavier turn, and bell starts singing out Metallica's into shaman
"GroEL played with drums."
Bell quickly agreed and began singing do you want to make a snowman
"If I sing a song with you, I'll be the coolest dad in the world," GroEL told bell
“… "Freeze..."
"Gross welcomes guest Kristen bell, who also appeared in the 1980s TV series magnum P I in the costume of Thomas magnum played by Tom Selleck, and told good place His children are her 2013 Disney fans.... "
As a stand in for ABC evening host Jimmy Kimmel, foo fighters' leader, Dave Grohl, wearing a white beard, glasses and a Letterman jacket, took part in the holiday performance to imitate the faithful David Letterman of the previous night
"This is a pairing that can only be provided on Halloween."
Dave groal and Christine bell performed "frozen metal mashup." do you want to build a Sandman? "



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Kevin Murphy Hydrate Me Masque amazon.com $53.24 $47.00 (12% off) SHOP NOW7.”
“If you have thick and coarse hair, you can use a richer formula, like .”
“Courtesy Image Cantu Shea Butter Thermal Shield Heat Protectant amazon.com $8.01 SHOP NOW2.”
“Not only are they small enough to pop into your bag, but they're also spiked with hydrating ingredients like coconut oil and shea butter that keep your hair soft, shiny, and static-free.”
“These frizz-smoothing sheets from Ouai.”
“My personal favorite?”
“Help keep your flyaways from popping back up the second you step outside by keeping a smart little arsenal of products with you at all times.”
“Use frizz-smoothing hair sheetsSooo you've decided you want to wear your hair sleek and smooth but the weather says otherwise.”
“Courtesy Image Ouai Anti-Frizz Smoothing Sheets nordstrom.com $18.00 SHOP NOW1.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”


"Kevin Murphy gave me make-up for $53.24 and $47.00 (12% discount) on amazon.com to buy 7 immediately. “
"If your hair is thick and thick, you can use a richer formula, for example."
Photo source: Cantu shea butter insulation board insulation agent amazon.com $8.01 buy 2 now. "
"Not only are they small enough to fit into your bag, they also add moisturizing ingredients such as coconut oil and shea butter to make your hair soft, shiny and static free."
"These curly, smooth sheets come from ouai."
"My personal favorite?"
"Carrying a smart small product library with you at any time can help prevent your flying car from suddenly appearing when you walk out of the house."
"Use curly, smooth patches because you've decided to make your hair smooth, but the weather doesn't say that."
"Courtesy pictures" ouai anti curl smooth paper nordstrom.com Website $18.00 buy 1 now. "
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For additional information, visit SOURCE Live Nation EntertainmentthRelated Links...”
“NV The Colosseum at Caesars Palace Mon Oct 29 Phoenix AZ Comerica Theatre Thu Nov 01 Sugar Land TX Smart Financial Centre at Sugar Land Sat Nov 03 Thackerville OK WinStar World Casino and Resort Sun Nov 04 Tulsa OK Paradise Cove at River Spirit Casino Resort Tue Nov 06”
“Tickets are on sale to the general public starting Friday, May 18 th at 10am local time at Ticketmaster.com.”
“Christina released new song "Accelerate feat.”
“Ty Dolla $ign and 2 Chainz" earlier this month, the first song from her forthcoming and highly anticipated album, Liberation.”
“She will also be performing "Fall in Line," her newly announced duet with Demi Lovato, at the Billboard Music Awards on May 20th.”
“Liberation will be released Friday, June 15th and is available for pre-order now.”
“Every online ticket purchased for Christina Aguilera's 2018 tour includes a standard CD copy of her new album, Liberation.”
“Instructions on how to redeem a copy will be provided by Ticketmaster within 24 hours of ticket purchase via email.”
“CHRISTINA AGUILERA TOUR DATES Tue Sep 25 Hollywood FL Hard Rock Live at Seminole Hard Rock Hotel Casino Fri Sep 28 Atlantic City NJ Mark G Etess Arena at Hard Rock Hotel Casino Sun Sep 30 Washington DC The Theater at MGM National Harbor Wed Oct 03 New York NY”


"For more information, please visit the relevant links of source live nation entertainment..."
"Caesar's palace arena, Nevada Monday October 29 Arizona merica theatre, Phoenix Thursday November 1 candy land, Texas smart financial center Candy Land Saturday November 3 sacraville WINSTAR world casino and resort sun November 4 Tulsa good Paradise Bay River Spirit Casino Resort Tuesday November 2, 2006"
"Tickets will be available to the public from 10 a.m. on Friday, May 18, local time Ticketmaster.com .”
Christina has released her new song "speed up the feat"
"Tedora $ign and 2 chains" earlier this month, her upcoming and much anticipated album, liberation's first song
She will also perform her newly announced duet "line up" with Demi Lovato at the Billboard Music Awards on May 20
Liberation will be released on Friday, June 15, and can now be scheduled
"Every online ticket purchased for Christina Aguilera's 2018 tour includes a standard CD of her new album liberation."
"Ticketmaster will provide instructions on how to exchange copies by email within 24 hours of ticket purchase."
"Christina Aguilera tour date Tuesday September 25 Hollywood Florida hard rock live game Seminole Hard Rock Hotel Casino Friday September 28 mark g etess arena Hard Rock Hotel Casino in Atlantic City, New Jersey Sunday September 30 MGM National Harbor theater, Washington, DC Wednesday October 3 New York"



**Something goes wrong**
“I must have guardian angels.””
““It was a freeing moment,” Fergie revealed.”
“She also battled bouts of drug induced psychosis and dementia.”
““I was hallucinating on a daily basis.”
“It took a year after getting after that drug for the chemicals in my brain to settle so that I stopped seeing things,” the 42-year-old told the U.K.’s iNews in an interview published on Thursday, December 7.”
““I’d just be sitting there, seeing a random bee or bunny.”At one point, the “M.I.L.F $” singer believed the CIA, FBI and SWAT team were tracking her every move and sought refuge at a church.”
““They tried to kick me out, because I was moving down the aisles in this crazy way, as I thought there was an infrared camera i the church trying to check for my body,” Fergie recalled.”
““I bolted past the altar into a hallway and two people were chasing me.”
“I remember thinking: ‘If I walk outside, and the SWAT team’s out there, I was right all along.”
“But if they’re not out there, then it’s the drugs making me see things and I’m going to end up in an institution.”


"I have to have a guardian angel."
"It's a free moment," Ferguson revealed
"She's also fighting drug-induced psychosis and dementia."
"I hallucinate every day."
"It took me a year to apply the drug to the chemicals in the brain so that I didn't see anymore," the 42 year old told inws in the UK in an interview on Thursday, December 7.
"I just sat there and saw a random bee or rabbit." Once, the "m.i.l.f $" singer believed that the CIA, FBI and SWAT were following her every move and taking refuge in church
"They wanted to kick me out because I was moving wildly in the hallway because I thought there was an infrared camera in the church checking my body," Ferguson recalled
"I ran from the altar into the corridor, and two men were chasing me."
"I remember thinking," if I go outside and the SWAT team is outside, I've always been right. "
"But if they're not out there, it's drugs that show me something, and I'll end up in an institution."



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We once again wish the new parents a hearty congratulation and give them our best so that they will become a great parent.”
“She further added,"Both of us are doing great!"”
“...network, she said,"Chase arrived last night at 9:48p - 9lbs 13oz, 23 inches and a full head of hair!"”
“In a statement to the E!”
“"I've almost thrown up a few times on the show, but it's fine."”
“She divulged,"I've been at work every day, so I'm thinking that's pretty good," she shared.”
“She showed the Tweet about her pregnancy, in which she captioned,"When your life is like a movie..."When your life is like a movie... pic.twitter.com/QabDkFNfGB — Carissa Culiner (@CarissaCuliner) June 1, 2017During the time, she stated how she is preparing for the birth of her child.”
“During a live TV show, she gave hints to her co-host of the show, Catt Sadler, and Justin Sylvester.”
“OnlineThe host announced that she is pregnant earlier this year in June.”
“Carissa and her husband Shanon during their wedding, They welcomed their first child Chase,Source: E!”


"Once again, we sincerely congratulate our new parents and extend our best wishes to them to become a great parent."
She further added: "we both did a great job!"
“… Network, "she said," chase arrived at 9:48 last night - 9 pounds, 13 ounces, 23 inches, full of hair! "
"In a statement!"
"I almost threw up a few times on the show, but it doesn't matter."
"I work every day, so I think it's good," she revealed
"She showed her pregnant micro blog, in which she wrote with the title," when your life is like a movie... " When your life is like a movie... pic.twitter.com/QabDkFNfGB -Carissa culiner (@ Carissa culiner) June 1, 2017, during which time, she told how she prepared for the birth of her child
In a live TV show, she hinted to co hosts Carter Sadler and Justin Sylvester
"In June, the host announced that she was pregnant."
Carlissa and her husband Shannon at the wedding, they ushered in their first child chase, photo source: e! "



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[T]he only reason why the show is able to have a reboot is because of the relationships we created.”New episodes of Charmed air Sundays at 9/8c on The CW.”
“...done and created...”
“So bye Update Similarly fellow original cast member Alyssa Milano has called the reboot a hurtful situation saying It s hard for us to see something that we loved so dearly then be taken from us in a way that had absolutely nothing to do with anything that we had...”
“You will not fool them by owning a title/stamp.”
“After The CW placed a pilot order for the reboot, she tweeted that Charmed “belongs to the four of us, our vast amount of writers, crews and predominantly the fans.”
“She came to the project’s defense back in January, saying that she was “intrigued by the idea that a new generation might be comforted.”Original Charmed star Holly Marie Combs, meanwhile, has been critical of the new version from the start.”
“Doherty has had kind words for the Charmed reboot since it was first announced.”
“It’s doing well, ratings-wise, and it’s employing over 200 people.” (Having dipped both weeks since its launch, Charmed is thus far averaging 1.33 million total viewers and a 0.42 demo rating, ranking fifth and fourth among all CW shows.)”
“Embrace it, you guys.”
“And because of you, you made it a show that a younger generation wants to see.”She continued: “You have to think about what Charmed did for you when it was on and think about what that’s going to do for a new generation.”


"The only reason why this TV series can be re broadcast is because of the relationship we have established." CW channel 9 / 8's charming air Sunday
“… Complete and create
"So, the original actor Alyssa Milano said, rebooting is a damaging situation, saying that it's hard for us to see what we love so much and then be taken away in a way that has nothing to do with what we have..."
"You can't fool them by having a title / seal."
"After CW gave the order to restart the pilot, she tweeted that charmed" belongs to the four of us, our writers and crew, mainly fans. "
Defending the project in January, she said she was "interested in the idea that a new generation might be comforted." Meanwhile, the original glamour star Holly Marie combs has been critical of the new edition from the beginning
"Dougherty has had good words about this glamorous restart since it was first announced."
"In terms of ratings, it's doing well, employing more than 200 people." (since its launch, charmed's two-week ratings have declined. So far, its average total ratings are 1.33 million and its demo ratings are 0.42, ranking fifth and fourth among all CW programs.)
"Embrace it, you guys."
"Also because of you, you make this play the program that the younger generation wants to watch." "You have to think about what the curse did for you when it came out and what it will bring to the new generation," she added



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For more on her role on the NBC show, watch below.”
“"She asked my name and told me she loved me.”
“The 35-year-old singer helped a fan, Alex Malerba, surprise his boyfriend and propose to him during one of her recent meet-and-greets at The Venetian in Las Vegas, Nevada.”
“Clarkson knew that the proposal was coming and stood by the couple's side as Alex got down on one knee.”
“RELATED: Kelly Clarkson Shares Sweet Shot of Daughter River Rose Reading With Her Big BrotherMalerba later took to Instagram to share pictures and a video of the moment.”
“"Oh my god, I'm so happy!"”
“...the "Since You've Been Gone" singer said after her fans started tearing up.”
“"I love it!”
“I'm like a part of it!”
“That was so beautiful!"”


"For more information about her role on NBC, see the following program."
"She asked my name and told me she loved me."
The 35 year old singer recently surprised and proposed to Alex maleba, a fan, at a Venetian party in Las Vegas, Nevada
"Clarkson knew the proposal was coming, and when Alex got down on one knee, he stood by the couple."
"Related story: Kelly Clarkson shared a sweet scene with her big brother about her daughter, river rose reading, and malba later shared the photos and videos on instagram."
"My God, I'm so happy!"
"Since you left," the singer said after the fans began to cry
"I like it!"
"I'm like a part of it!"
"It's beautiful!"



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Then again, that will only make the next big death all the more shocking.”
“When news first broke that both Drew and Capshaw would be saying goodbye to the series—apparently not by choice—one report speculated that their write-offs could have something to do with co-star Ellen Pompeo’s $20 million salary, a notion the actress quickly denied.”
“(Matthew had since re-married, but lost his wife during the birth of their baby, Ruby, who survived.)”
“April reconnected with her ex-fiancé, Matthew, whom she left at the altar to be with Jackson in Season 10.”
“Toward the season’s latter half, however, things started to turn around.”
“After a day of traumatic losses earlier this season, April struggled with a severe loss of faith—a devastating turn for the longtime devout Christian.”
“Both actresses were given boxes filled with letters from the cast and crew on their last day of filming—a well-earned token to two actresses who have been with the show for so many years.”
“Either way, the goodbyes were always going to be tough.”
“Grey’s Anatomy fans know how cruel this writers’ room can be, even to longtime cast members—just ask Patrick Dempsey—so it was a relief to see both April and Arizona make it out unscathed, even if April in particular has had a rough season.”
“...week work with homeless communities...”


"Again, that will only make the next big death even more shocking."
"When the news first came out that drew and Capshaw were going to bid farewell to the show, it was obviously not voluntary. A report speculated that their cancellation might be related to the $20 million salary of their co star Alan Pompeo, but the actress quickly denied that."
(Matthew remarried later, but when their child ruby was born, he lost his wife and Ruby survived.)
"April has reestablished her relationship with her ex fiance Matthew, leaving her on the altar with Jackson in season 10."
"However, in the second half of the season, things started to improve
"After a day's loss earlier in the season, April struggled with a serious loss of faith - a devastating turn for long-time devout Christians."
"On the last day of filming, both actresses received boxes full of letters from the crew and staff - a token they deserved over the years."
"It's always hard to say goodbye anyway."
"Gray's anatomy fans know how cruel this studio is, even for long-term actors, just ask Patrick Dempsey, so it's a relief to see April and Arizona intact, even though April is a particularly bad season."
“… Working with homeless communities... "



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Though her look didn't immediately match the dress code, it was still chock-full of delicate details, like ruched sheer sleeves, which were connected to gloves.”
“The airy look was by Off-White, and the model fittingly brought designer Virgil Abloh as her date to the fashionable fête.”
“Her gauzy ensemble didn't quite fit with the theme for the evening ("Heavenly Bodies: Fashion and the Catholic Imagination"), but it did turn heads for a surprising reason: it's seriously reminiscent of the look Kim Kardashian wore to last year's event.”
“Both sisters rocked dreamy, cream off-the-shoulder ensembles and had their hair parted right down the middle:Getty ImagesThis content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Kim's dress last year, courtesy of Vivienne Westwood, was also unexpectedly simplistic for the Comme des Garçons-themed occasion.”
“Nevertheless, she slayed—and Kendall did this year, too.”
“The extra touches also appeared in her beauty look, as Jenner appeared to be wearing extensions in an extra-long ponytail.”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Although her look didn't immediately conform to the dress code, it was still full of delicate details, such as pleated transparent sleeves, which were connected with gloves."
"The light look is grey, and the model has just brought designer Virgil Ablow to the fashionable f ê te as her date."
"Her frivolous ensemble didn't quite fit the theme of the evening (" celestial bodies: fashion and Catholic imagination "), but it did have a surprising reason: it reminded people of Kim Kardashian's dress at last year's event."
"The two sisters are shaking dreamily, the cream on their shoulders is falling off, their hair is on the ground, separated in the middle: Getty Images this content is imported from {embedded name}."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Last year, with Vivienne Westwood's hospitality, Kim Jong Il's dress was surprisingly simplified on occasions with the theme of comme des Gar à ons."
"But she killed people, and Kendall killed people this year."
"These extra embellishments also appear in her beauty, because Jenna seems to have a long pigtail in a very long ponytail."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"I always say to Matilda, 'Your dad loved me before anybody thought I was talented, or pretty, or had nice clothes.'"”
“"I never gave up on love," she continued, before explaining that Ledger will always be part of her and her daughter's life.”
“Williams, who was married to and shares a child with the late actor Heath Ledger, believes that revealing both her and her now-husband's journey might help those embarking on a new relationship after the death of a spouse.”
“Elverum lost his first wife, fellow musician Geneviève Castrée, to cancer just 18 months after welcoming their now-three-year-old daughter.”
“The pair shares another major point of common ground-they both have experienced devastating loss.”
“"I parent to let Matilda feel free to be herself, and I am finally loved by someone who makes me feel free."”
“Williams also revealed that her and Elverum's connection stemmed out of their similar approach to love.”
“I work to be free inside of the moment."”
“Ultimately the way he loves me is the way I want to live my life on the whole.”
“And that's worth something.”


"I always said to Matilda," your Dad loved me before people thought I was talented, beautiful or dressed well. "
"I never gave up love," she went on, explaining that the ledger would always be a part of her life with her daughter
Williams, who married and had a son with the late actor Heath Ledger, believes that revealing her experience with her current husband may help those who start a new relationship after her spouse's death
Elveren's first wife, musician Genevi è ve caster é e, died of cancer just 18 months after welcoming their three-year-old daughter
"The two have another thing in common, they both experienced devastating losses."
"I wanted Matilda to be free, and I was finally loved by someone who made me feel free."
"Williams also revealed that her connection with elveren stems from their similar attitude towards love."
"I work to be free in the moment."
"At the end of the day, the way he loves me is the way I want to live."
"It's very valuable."



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s time, Rhimes… it’s time.”
“So why not now?”
“Maybe one of the people injured in the roller coaster accident is super-brainy and starts spouting off random knowledge about, well, everything… just like Lexipedia would have.”
“Lexie!”
“Another ghost we’d love to see?”
“There are plenty of ways to go with this, and we want need to see MerDer together again.”
“Or perhaps we’ll see a clip of Derek and Meredith taking Zola to a fair when she was younger.”
“McDreamy was a total adrenaline junkie who had a need for speed, so perhaps the roller coaster will remind Meredith of that.”
“We’ll start with the most recent and most imperative: Derek.”
“However, there are plenty of ghosts in Grey Sloan Memorial Hospital’s past that have the potential for an appearance.”


"It's time, Remus It's time. "
"Then why not now?"
"Maybe one of the people injured in the roller coaster accident was super smart, and he began to say, well, everything Like lexipedia. "
"Lexy!"
"Another ghost we want to see?"
"There are many ways to do that and we need to see medel together again."
"Or we'll see Derek and Meredith taking Zola to the market when she was young."
"Mcdimmy is an adrenaline junkie who needs speed, so maybe the roller coaster will remind Meredith of that."
"We'll start with the latest and most important thing: Derek."
"However, in the past of the Memorial Hospital in graysloan, there are many ghosts that are likely to appear."



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More:How common is sexual misconduct in Hollywood?”
“"They have shocked me to my core as I have never been abusive or violent in any way in my relations with women," the statement says.”
“A new lawsuit, filed Friday in Los Angeles County Superior Court, accuses the entrepreneur of rape, according to reports from The New York Times and Billboard.”
“The plaintiff, identified as Jane Doe, is seeking $10 million in damages for forcible rape, intentional infliction of emotional distress and negligent infliction of emotional distress, according to the outlets.”
“Simmons denies the charge as well as the other accusations of sexual assault and misconduct.”
“Per the lawsuit, the woman says she met Simmons, 60, at a concert she attended with her son.”
“After dropping her son off and spending some time together, the lawsuit says Doe hesitantly joined Simmons in his hotel room where she was raped.”
“More:Kimora Lee Simmons addresses sexual-misconduct allegations against ex Russell SimmonsMore:Russell Simmons denies new 'horrific' rape allegationsSimmons "vehemently" refuted all allegations in a statement issued to USA TODAY Monday per spokesperson Angela Pruitt.”
“"I have submitted myself to multiple lie detector tests.”
“Her agent wanted sex.”


"More: how common is sexual misconduct in Hollywood?"
"They shocked me because I never had any abuse or violence in my relationship with women," the statement said
According to the New York Times and billboard, a new lawsuit filed in Los Angeles County High Court on Friday accused the entrepreneur of rape
"According to media reports, the plaintiff, nameless, claimed $10 million for emotional distress caused by rape, intentional emotional distress and negligence."
"Simmons denies this and other sexual assault and misconduct charges."
According to the lawsuit, the woman said she met Simmons, 60, at a concert with her son
"After sending her son home and spending some time together, the lawsuit said DOE hesitated to join Simmons' hotel room where he was raped."
"More: Kimora Lee Simmons deals with sexual misconduct charges against former Russell. Russell Simmons denies new" terrible "rape charges. In a statement to USA today Monday, spokesman Angela Pruitt, samond" strongly "refuted all charges
"I've had multiple lie tests."
"Her agent wants sex."



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The superfan also revealed that he had a giant tattoo of The Rock on his leg.”
““While we have this on, want to go upstairs and photobomb some people?” Fallon asked, to which the WWE star replied, “Umm, what’s that term?”
“Jimmy Fallon and Dwayne “The Rock” Johnson teamed up for some fun and games at Universal Studios Orlando, and they even brought one man to tears while photobombing unsuspecting fans.”
“The Tonight Show host 42 who is promoting his new Race Through New York ride at the theme park challenged the Fate of the Furious star 44 to play Race Through Universal Studios which entailed dressing up as mascot versions...”
“...of themselves...”
“The stars attempted to score as many fan high-fives (worth one point), hugs (worth three points) and photos (worth five points) as they could in three minutes.”
“After dashing around the park and interacting with dozens of tourists, the final tally showed Fallon was the winner with 111 points to Johnson’s 103.”
“The comedian took off his mascot head and celebrated as a huge crowd gathered to watch.”
“Hell, yes!”The duo proceeded to jump behind theme park visitors while they were having their photos taken at Fallon’s brand-new attraction.”
““No tears!” Johnson told him, before taking several photos with the guy.”


"Superfan also revealed that he had a huge rock tattoo on his leg."
"When we put on this, do we want to go upstairs and take pictures of some people? "Well, what does that mean?" Fallon asked
Jimmy Fallon and Dwayne Johnson collaborated with Orlando in Universal Studios for entertainment and games. They even let a person cry when he was using photos to bomb unsuspecting fans.
"Tonight's host 42 is the star of his new race, which is challenging New York's theme park to challenge the fate of the furious star 44, playing the game through universal studios, which needs to be dressed as mascot version."
“… They themselves... "
"Stars try to get as many fans as possible in three minutes, high fives (1 point), hugs (3 points) and photos (5 points),"
"After running around the park and interacting with dozens of tourists, the final statistics showed that Fallon beat Johnson's 103 points by 111 points."
"The comedian took off the mascot's head and celebrated when a large crowd gathered to watch."
"Hell, yes! "While taking photos at the brand new site in Fallon, the two then jump behind the theme park visitors."
"No tears! "Johnson told him and took some pictures with the guy."



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m telling you, I do not smoke weed.””
“Motherfuckers was being prejudiced and picking on who the fuck they thought that was smoking weed, and you got the wrong fucking one.”
“Like, niggas was really being racists.”
““That shit is not fucking right.”
“Advertisement“And then niggas is just gonna pick out of everybody on the floor, Caucasians, that it was us that was smoking the weed in the middle of the night?” she said.”
“As Cardi was escorted out of the hotel by a police officer, she knocked over an object and shouted, “Racist motherfuckers!”In her now-deleted Instagram video, she called out the city and cops for being racist.”
“Nobody smokes, especially when I’m sleeping and I’m wild sick,” she added.”
“I could get, we could all get drug-tested, nobody smokes.”
“I’m not taking that because we do not smoke.”
“If they was to kick us out for something else, all right, but for weed?”


"I tell you, I don't smoke marijuana."
"Damn being biased and picking who the hell they think is smoking marijuana, you get a fuckin 'wrong."
"Like, niggers are really racists."
"That's fuckin 'wrong."
"Advertising," and then the nigger would pick out everyone on the floor, white people, is it us smoking marijuana in the middle of the night? "She said
When Katie was escorted out of the hotel by a police officer, she knocked down an object and yelled, "racist bastard! "In the instagram video that she's now deleted, she's yelling at the city and the police for being racist."
"No one smokes, especially when I sleep, and I'm very sick," she added
"I can get it, we can all get drug tests, no one smokes."
"I don't eat this because we don't smoke."
"If they throw us out for something else, all right, but for Wade?"



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The actress, who is starring in a remake of Overboard, has been seen with rumored boyfriend Michael Barrett.”
“Congrats @simsarna and @amy_and_stausi all the happiness to you both.”On Thanksgiving, Faris hinted her the couple’s wedding and her role in it while sharing an animated video of her officiating the ceremony and Sarna explaining how the two met.”
“Cute warm toes!”Someone else commented, “Ugh just when I thought I couldn’t love @annafaris anymore she wears Ugg’s while I’m sure being by far the best officiant ever.”
“Love,” one user wrote, while another wrote, “Nice Ugg boots.”
“Image zoom Credit: Instagram“In Uggs.”
“Several people loved Faris’ boots, complimenting her in the comments.”
“In photos taken by Melissa Atle for Weddings by Sunnyside, Faris wore a light pink dress with her hair in a bun as she smiled at the camera alongside her friends.”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more.”
“@itsmelissaatle @weddingsbysunnysideLooking for more style content?”
“!” Faris wrote on Instagram, along with, “@simsarna @amy_and_stausi.”Image zoom Credit: Melissa Atle of Weddings by Sunnyside.”


The actress starred in a remake of "the fallen", and was seen with her rumored boyfriend, Michael Barrett
"Congratulations to @ simsarna and @ Amy Yan u and Yan stausi. I wish you happiness." On Thanksgiving Day, Faris hinted at the couple's wedding and her role in the wedding, and shared an animated video of her wedding. Sarna explained how the two met
"Lovely warm toes! Others commented: "well, just when I thought I couldn't love @ annafaris any more, she was wearing ugg, and I'm sure she's the best priesthood to date."
"Love," one user wrote, while another wrote, "beautiful ugg boots."
"Image scaling credit: instagram" in uggs
"A few people liked Faris' boots and praised her in the comments."
"In Melissa Artel's photo of Sunnyside's wedding, Faris is wearing a light pink skirt and her hair is in a bun, smiling at the camera with her friends."
"Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle newsletters for amazing discounts, beauty products and more."
“@ itsmelissaatle@weddingsbysunnysideLooking Looking for more fashion content? "
"! Faris wrote on instagram@ simsarna@amy èu andèu stausi。” Image zooming source: Melissa AtlE of weddings by Sunnyside



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Catch the latest episode in the player below (warning: some language NSFW).”
“Listen to Ring Rust Radio for all of the hot wrestling topics.”
“Natalya used that experience to her advantage, and by virtue of scoring the massive win, she and Naomi seem likely to engage in a long-term rivalry.”
“Sunday's match offered a far greater challenge, however, since Nattie is one of the most veteran women on the entire roster.”
“All three contests were fairly short and weren't especially competitive, as Naomi prevailed against her far less experienced opponent.”
“Naomi's biggest feud prior to Nattie was a three-match series against Lana that included a bout at Money in the Bank.”
“Aside from a match against Charlotte for the title on SmackDown that was interrupted by The Welcoming Committee, Naomi didn't have much to hang her hat on in terms of significant matches until Sunday.”
“She memorably won the SmackDown Women's Championship in her hometown of Orlando, Florida, at WrestleMania, but her booking has been highly inconsistent ever since.”
“...the top of the women s division...”
“She even took to Twitter to bad mouth Naomi and announce her intentions for SummerSlam Video Play Button Videos you might like Naomi has been considered one of WWE s most underrated performers for years and it wasn t until recently that she was given an opportunity to reside at...”


"Capture the latest episode in the player below (warning: some languages are nsfw)"
"Listen to ring rust and learn about all the hot wrestling topics."
"Natalia uses this experience for her own benefit. With this big win, it seems that she and Naomi are likely to compete for a long time."
"However, Sunday's game is a bigger challenge because Nadi is one of the most experienced women on the roster
"The three games were short and the competition was not particularly fierce because Naomi beat a much less experienced opponent
"Before Nadi, Naomi's biggest grudge was three games with Lana, including a money fight in the bank."
"Naomi doesn't have a lot of important games before Sunday, except for the host Committee interrupting Charlotte's title race
"She won the women's wrestling championship in her hometown of Orlando, Florida, but her performance has been very unstable ever since."
“… The top of the women's group
"She even spoke ill of Naomi on Twitter and announced that she planned to launch the Summerslam video play button video. You may like Naomi, who has been considered one of the most underrated actors in WWE for many years, only recently did she have a chance to live in..."



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“!””
““My super bowl partner!!”
“!” Pink wrote.”
““@jtimberlake oooh look who has a new record out!!”
“He released his new album, Man of the Woods, that day.”
“And here we are.”AdvertisementEarlier on Friday, the singer also posted on Twitter a throwback photo of her and the 2018 Super Bowl Pepsi Halftime Show performer, Justin Timberlake, posed backstage at the 2002 MTV VMAs.”
“You can’t write this stuff I swear!”
“And it just so happens that this chance comes when I have two small Petri dish kids who literally cough INTO MY MOUTH and rub their snot on my cheek.”
“And now, my chance has finally come.”
““I’ve been waiting to sing this song [“The Star Spangled Banner”] since 1991 when I saw my idol, Whitney Houston, own this song.”


“!””
"My Super Bowl partner!"
"!" Pinker wrote
"@ jtimberlake Oh, look who has a new record!"
"That day he released his new album the woodman."
"Here we are." Earlier on Friday, the singer also tweeted a retrospective photo of her posing with Justin Timberlake, the 2018 Super Bowl Pepsi midfield performer, backstage at MTV Vmas in 2002
"You can't write these things, I swear!"
"It happened that when I had two little dish kids who coughed in my mouth and wiped their snot on my cheek, the opportunity came."
"Now, my chance has finally come."
"I've been waiting to sing this song since I saw my idol, Whitney Houston, own it in 1991."



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Editors' Recommendations...”
“Animation for the special will be provided by Bento Box Entertainment, with Day, Moynihan, and skit co-creator Streeter Seidell writing and producing the special.”
“The most commercially successful feature to date was 1992’s Wayne’s World, which earned $121.6 million in U.S. theaters and $183 million worldwide.”
“Previous SNL skits that were adapted into long-form features include Wayne’s World and The Blues Brothers, and most recently, 2010’s action comedy MacGruber.”
“Although it’s far from the first SNL skit to be expanded into a television of movie feature, the David S. Pumpkins character is somewhat unique for being a role played by one of the show’s guest hosts instead of an SNL cast member.”
““It’s scary how quickly the original SNL sketch caught on, and we’re thrilled that Tom Hanks is back to keep the fun going,” said George Cheeks, NBC Entertainment’s President of Business Operations and Late Night Programming, in a statement accompanying the announcement.”
“The original “Haunted Elevator” skit aired on October 22, 2016, and immediately became a viral video sensation.”
“Along with Hanks returning to voice David Pumpkins, and Day and Moynihan voicing the skeletons, the special will also feature a character voiced by Emmy-winning Game of Thrones actor Peter Dinklage.”
“In keeping with the theme of the original skit, the trio of weird Halloween characters teach the siblings about Halloween while “answering none of their questions,” according to NBC.”
“According to NBC’s announcement of the Halloween special, the animated tale will be set “in a small suburban town on All Hallows’ Eve,” and feature a young boy and his sister who learn about the true meaning of Halloween from David Pumpkins and his skeleton sidekicks.”


"Editor's recommendation..."
The animation of the special program will be provided by Bento Box entertainment, with day, Moynihan and the co-author of the sketch, Streeter seidell, responsible for writing and producing the special program
By far, the most successful commercial film is "Wayne's world" in 1992, which grossed $121.6 million in American cinemas and $183 million worldwide
"Previous SNL skits have been adapted into growth films, including Wayne's world and the blues brothers, and the latest is the 2010 action comedy macgruber
"Although this is far from SNL's first sketch to be expanded into a film and TV feature, David S. pumpkin is unique in a way, because he is one of the guest hosts of the show, not an actor of SNL."
Announcing the news, George checks, President of NBC Entertainment's business operations and evening shows, said in a statement: "it's frightening that SNL's original skits soon became popular, and we're glad that Tom Hanks has come back to continue the fun."
"The original" haunted elevator "sketch was broadcast on October 22, 2016, and immediately became a viral video sensation."
"In addition to Hanks're dubbing of David pumpkin and day and Moynihan's dubbing of skeleton, there will also be Emmy winner Peter Dinklage in the feature."
To keep up with the theme of the original skit, the three weird characters "don't answer any questions" while teaching their brothers and sisters Halloween, NBC reported
The cartoon, set in "a suburban town on Halloween," will show a little boy and his sister learning about the true meaning of Halloween from David pumpkin and his skeleton buddies, according to NBC's announcement of the special program



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pirates of the Caribbean: Dead Men Tell No Tales arrives in theaters May 26.”
“...and of course rum soaked raisin Captain Jack Sparrow Johnny Depp...”
“If you need even more Turner family news the fifth movie will introduce audiences to Will and Elizabeth s son Henry Brenton Thwaites who embarks on a search for answers about his father accompanied by fierce academic Carina Kaya Scodelario...”
“Nevertheless, it’s a smart match, if it’s not too bold to say.”
“Indeed, she does reappear, although a glimpse may be all you’ll really see of Knightley as Elizabeth Turner (nee Swann).”
“A recent trailer finally offered a new glance at Bloom’s character, however, thus raising the question of whether his wife would make a cameo as well.”
“Flying Dutchman...”
“Their lovebirds Elizabeth and Will Turner essentially bid farewell to audiences at the end of the third film At World s End when Will was remanded to spend the better part of eternity cursed to be captain of the ghostly...”
“And how better to do that than with the reemergence of two of the first film’s key players, Knightley and Orlando Bloom?”
“...to its Curse of the Black Pearl roots...”


Pirates of the Caribbean: dead people don't tell stories
“…… And, of course, the rum soaked raisin Captain Jack Sparrow Johnny Depp... "
"If you need more news about the turners, the fifth film will introduce will and Elizabeth's son, Henry brenton Switz, who, accompanied by carina Kaya Scodelario, starts looking for answers about his father..."
"Still, it's a smart match if it's not too bold to say."
"Indeed, she appears again, although you may only catch a glimpse of Knightley playing Elizabeth Turner (niswan)."
However, a recent trailer has finally given people a new understanding of Bloom's role, which raises the question: will his wife also be guest stars
"Flying Dutch..."
"Their lovers Elizabeth and Will Turner bid farewell to the audience at the end of the third film" the end of the world ". Will was taken back to prison and spent most of the eternity of being cursed as the ghost captain..."
"What could be better than the comeback of the two key characters in the first film, Knightley and Orlando Bloom?"
“… Curse of Black Pearl root... "



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Speculation was it might even happen on Jersey Shore Family Vacation Season 2.”
“The two say they plan to tie the knot soon.”
“The two dated almost four years during college but took a break as Sorrentino rose to fame on the MTV reality show.”
“His fiancé has stood by himSorrentino and his college sweetheart, Lauren Pesce, announced their engagement in April 2018.”
“Next: The woman by his side3.”
“A requirement was he not consume any alcohol.”
“Sorrentino, on probation, also received permission to travel to Florida for the Jersey Shore Family Vacation reunion show.”
“The court granted his lawyer’s request for a delay in sentencing, now set for June 20, 2018.”
“He was charged with filing false tax returns in 2010 and 2012 and not paying taxes on $8.9 million in income.”
“He faces up to five years behind bars.”


"There's speculation that this could even happen in the second season of family vacations on the Jersey coast."
"They said they planned to get married soon."
"They dated for nearly four years in college, but as Sorrentino became popular on MTV reality show, they took a break."
"His fiance has always supported him, and his college sweetheart Lauren pace announced his engagement in April 2018."
"Next: the woman around him."
"One requirement is that he should not drink."
"During his probation, Sorrentino also got permission to go to Florida for the Jersey coast family holiday show."
"The court approved his lawyer's request for an extension of sentence, which is now set for June 20, 2018."
"He was charged with filing false tax returns in 2010 and 2012 and not paying taxes on $8.9 million in income."
"He will face up to five years in prison."



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A source told PEOPLE that the actor is relishing time with his children.”
“In fact, the morning after he announced he had completed rehab, things were business as usual as he was spotted taking his kids to school with Garner.”
“Garner and Affleck filed the docs together and they are both seeking joint legal and physical custody of their three kids.”
“The date of separation, as well as the division of property and any spousal support, is still to be determined.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The divorce filing was originally reported by TMZ.”
“The former couple filed mirror-image paperwork and they each filed “in propria persona” — which means without an on-the-record attorney.”
“Both Affleck and Garner noted that they will keep any earnings they made since they separated, so the separation date they determine could affect the settlement.”
“They announced their split on June 30, 2015.”
“A source tells PEOPLE the filing is “super amicable.”A separate source adds, “They always planned to divorce despite what people said.”


"A source told people that the actor enjoyed his time with the children."
"In fact, the morning after he announced that he had completed his rehabilitation treatment, everything went as usual, because he was found taking his children to school with Ghana."
"Ghana and Affleck have submitted documents together, and they are both seeking common legal and actual custody of the three children."
The date of the separation, as well as the distribution of property and any spousal support, remains to be determined
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The divorce petition was originally filed by TMZ."
"The former couple submitted mirror files, and each of them submitted files" in their own capacity "- which means that there is no lawyer on record."
"Both Affleck and Ghana have pointed out that they will retain any income after separation, so the date they set for separation may affect the settlement."
"They broke up on June 30, 2015."
"A source told people that the application was" very friendly. ". Another source added, "no matter what people say, they always plan to divorce."



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““American Horror Story: Apocalypse” airs Wednesday at 10/9c on FX.”
“The Harmons move into the titular Murder House at the start of the season, after Ben is caught cheating on his wife and the couple tries to pick up the pieces.”
“Wait, who?”
“In the final moments of the American Horror Story Apocalypse premiere Ryan Murphy fans were reintroduced to Assassination of Gianni Versace star Cody Fern in his debut AHS role as Langdon a man with epic hair who has come to save Wilhelmina Venable Sarah Paulson and the other survivors in...”
“...her nuclear shelter...”
“Well, not all of them, just those he deems worthy after examination.”
“Devilish, no?”
“Also Read We Have No Idea What s Going On in American Horror Story Apocalypse Though Fern himself is new to the franchise the name of the character he s playing on the big Murder House Coven crossover might ring a bell to you as he has been an important...”
“...part in the series since its beginning...”
“Allow us to explain.”


"American horror story: Apocalypse" aired on FX 10 / 9 on Wednesday
"The harmons moved into the nominal homicide room at the start of the season because Ben was found cheating on his wife, and the couple tried to clean up the mess."
"Wait, who?"
"At the end of the premiere of the American horror story apocalypse, Ryan Murphy's fans were once again introduced to the premiere of Gianni Versace star Cody fern, who played Langdon, a man with epic hair, to save Wilhelmina Venable Sarah Paulson and other survivors... "
“… Her nuclear sanctuary... "
"Well, not all, just those he thinks are worth checking."
"The devil, isn't he?"
"At the same time, we don't know what happened in the American horror story apocalypse. Although fern himself is a newcomer, the name of his role in the family of big killing, coven crossover, may sound a wake-up call for you, because he has always been an important..."
“… From the beginning, it was part of the series... "
"Please allow us to explain."



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““With sun exposure, be careful.”
““We were both laughing about this,” Grammer told PEOPLE.”
“I’m a spokesperson, and advocate of awareness.”
“We can’t ignore signals that our bodies are giving us when something is wrong.”
““We can’t ignore these symptoms.”
““It’s so important for women to go for check-ups,” she explained.”
“I’m lucky we found it early.”Image zoom Camille Grammer | Credit: Tommy Garcia/BravoWhile she admitted the location of her latest scare was “a little embarrassing to talk about,” Grammer made it clear she wanted to “lift the vail of shame” from below-the-belt cancers.”
“They’ll think, ‘Oh it’s a mole, it’s a pimple, it’s a rash, it’s an ingrown hair from shaving.’ … This isn’t an aggressive cancer, but if it goes undetected, it could spread and metastasize to the lymph nodes and other organs close to the area.”
““Many people, if something shows up like this, they’ll ignore it.”
“My mom had it also and her mom and unfortunately, these cancers seem to come along with the territory.”“Early detection is key,” Grammer added, explaining that SCC can show up anywhere from the skin to the lung to your throat.”


"Be careful in the sun."
"We're all laughing at that," grammer told people
"I am a spokesman and an advocate of consciousness."
"We can't ignore the body's signals when something goes wrong."
"We can't ignore these symptoms."
"It's very important for women to have a test," she explained
"I'm lucky we found it early." Image zooming Camille grammer | credit: Tommy Garcia / bravov when she admitted that the location of the latest panic was "a bit embarrassing", grammer made it clear that she wanted to "lift the veil of shame"
"They think," Oh, this is a mole, this is a papule, this is a rash, this is the hair that grows after shaving. " It's not an invasive cancer, but if it's not found, it can spread and metastasize to lymph nodes and other organs in the adjacent area
"A lot of people, if this happens, will ignore it."
"My mom and her mom do, too, and unfortunately, these cancers seem to come with this area." "Early detection is the key," he added, explaining that squamous cell carcinoma can occur anywhere from the skin to the lungs to the throat



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...and Mr. Franzese” before he got down on one knee.”
“He had a barista call out “Mr.”
“A rep for Franzese told us, “The outpouring of love from friends and family has been amazing and he’s very thankful.”Franzese, 40, proposed to Phillips in 2016 at the Starbucks where they first met.”
“...time to heal before letting everyone know about the split...”
“Joseph Bradley Phillips and I have decided to part ways break our engagement promise and continue on into the future as friends He added that they cared so much for each other that they ignored things that were important to our individual personal growth and noted the couple took some...”
““Sometimes shooting stars shine so brightly that they burn out and now we must go separate ways, but I hope my path always crosses with his,” Franzese — who played Damian in the hit movie — wrote on Instagram.”
“The “Mean Girls” star announced on Tuesday that he and Joseph Bradley Phillips have called off their nearly two-year-long engagement.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Daniel Franzese might want his pink shirt back.”


“… And Mr. franzes "before he goes down on one knee
He hired a barista to call him "Sir"
A representative of franzes told us that "his friends and family loved him so much that he was very grateful." Franz, 40, proposed to Phillips at Starbucks where they first met in 2016
“… It's time to heal before we let everyone know about the split... "
"Joseph Bradley Phillips and I decided to break our engagement and continue to be friends. He added that they were so concerned about each other that they ignored things that were crucial to our personal growth and noticed that the couple took some away... "
"Sometimes meteors shine so brightly that they all go out, and now we have to go our separate ways, but I hope my way always crosses his," Franz, who plays Damian in the hit movie, wrote on instagram
The "bad girl" star announced on Tuesday that he and Joseph Bradley Phillips had cancelled their engagement for nearly two years
"Click send this message to a friend (open in a new window) Click share on twitter (open in a new window) Click share on Facebook (open in a new window) Daniel Franzese may want his pink shirt back."



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET on CBS.”
“After being away from her family for seven years, I understood Grace’s decision to leave.”
“Last week, it was announced that both original cast members would exit ahead of the procedural’s eighth season, which kicked off production this week.”
“Kim posted a lengthy Facebook message to fans explaining that he decided to leave the show after contract negotiations with the network failed.”
“Kim and Park reportedly had been seeking equal pay with stars Alex O’Loughlin and Scott Caan.”
“CBS in turn responded with a statement saying the network offered the duo large and significant salary raises In response Lenkov addressed H50 fans directly in his message on Twitter explaining that both actors were offered unprecedented raises by the extremely generous network but chose to move on Thank you...”
“...for all your messages and support over 7 seasons Lenkov wrote...”
““We are all saddened by the Daniel and Grace news and I wanted to reach out to you directly.”
“The truth is this: Both actors chose not to extend their contracts.”
“CBS was extremely generous and proactive in their renegotiation talks.”


"CBS et."
"Seven years after leaving her home, I understand Grace's decision to leave."
"Last week, it was reported that both former actors would quit before the eighth season of filming this week."
"Kim posted a lengthy message to fans on Facebook explaining that he had decided to leave the show after contract negotiations with the network failed."
"It is reported that Kim Jong Il and park Geun hye have been seeking equal pay for equal work with stars Alex olaflin and Scott Kahn."
"CBS responded in a statement that the TV station had offered them a big raise. In response, renkov explained to H50 fans in a twitter message that the extremely generous TV station had offered them unprecedented raises, but he chose to move on. Thank you..."
“… For all your information and support over the past seven seasons, renkov wrote
"We are all sorry for the news from Daniel and grace. I want to contact you directly."
"The fact is: both actors choose not to extend their contracts."
"CBS has been very generous and active in the renegotiation."



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The mother of six took to Instagram on Tuesday night to thank her husband, Kroy Biermann, after their 4-year-old son Kash underwent surgery following a serious dog bite.”
“WATCH: Kim Zolciak Updates Fans With Hospital Pic After Her Son's Dog Bite: 'Kash Is Doing Incredible!'”
““I don't know what I would do without you @kroybiermann,” she captioned the photo of her hubby in the hospital.”
““Kash just got out of surgery in this pic and he was heading to his room.”
“He woke up looking for his daddy.”
“We left our house in such a hurry Kroy had no shoes on and I literally was half naked w deep conditioner in my hair Those were the least of our worries In the pic Kroy is barefoot with protective covers on his feet as he walked beside Kash s...”
“...hospital bed...”
“Kroy isn’t the only one who has stayed by Kash’s side.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
The mother of six thanks her husband, kroy Biermann, on instagram on Tuesday night for having their 4-year-old son, KASH, operated on after being bitten by a serious dog
"Observation: Kim zolciak updated his fans with a picture of the hospital after his son was bitten by a dog:" KASH did a great job! "
"I don't know what to do without you @ kroybiermann," she added a caption to her husband's photo in the hospital
"In this picture, KASH just came out of the operating room and is walking to his room."
"He woke up to look for his father."
"We left home in a hurry. Chloe didn't wear shoes. I was almost half naked. There was a deep conditioner in my hair. This is the photo we didn't worry about the most. Chloe was barefoot, wearing a protective sleeve, walking next to KASH..."
“… Hospital bed... "
"Chloe is not the only one to stay with KASH."



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The police were called, but said they couldn’t do anything because the age of consent in the state is 16.”
“Although Kramer has denied Dushku’s allegations, he acknowledged that few years later, he had a sexual encounter with the 16-year-old friend of the 15-year-old sister of a stunt woman who worked for him on Virus.”
“Two more women went public today with allegations against Kramer.”
“Dushku starred as the daughter of the characters played by Schwarzenegger and Curtis, and Kramer, who has long been Schwarzenegger personal stunt double, was the film’s stunt coordinator.”
“Kramer, whose talent agency dropped him Sunday, has denied Dushku’s allegations.”
““Whereas he was supposed to be my protector, he was my abuser,” the Bull actress wrote in a lengthy Facebook posting.”
“...wrong during filming of the film s Harrier Jet scene...”
“The action movie s director James Cameron said at TCA on Saturday Had I known about it there would have been no mercy She also claims that after Kramer was confronted by an adult she d confided in he intentionally injured her breaking her ribs in a stunt that went...”
“Since Saturday, several people have come out in support of the actress or to back her claims, including her mother and brother, her former agent, a friend, her legal guardian on the set and co-stars Jamie Lee Curtis and Arnold.”
“...https://t.co/EJJbkdior2 — Arnold (@Schwarzenegger) January 16, 2018Over the weekend, Dushku went public with allegations that Kramer sexually molested her when she was 12 years old during filming of True Lies.”


"The police got a call but said they couldn't do anything because the state's consent age is 16."
"Although Kramer denied Dushku's charges, he admitted that a few years later, he had sex with a 16-year-old friend of a stuntgirl's 15-year-old sister, who had worked on virus treatment for Dushku."
"Two more women are publicly accusing Kramer today."
"Dushku stars in the daughter of Schwarzenegger and Curtis, and Kramer, who has long been Schwarzenegger's personal stunt double, is the stunt coordinator of the film."
Kramer's talent agency dismissed him on Sunday, denying the charges
"He was supposed to be my protector, but he was my abuser," the best actress wrote in a long Facebook post
“… Error shooting Harrier jet airport scene in movie... "
"Action director James Cameron said at TCA on Saturday: 'if I knew about it, I would not have compassion. She also claimed that after Kramer confronted an adult, she confided that he deliberately hurt her and broke her ribs in a stunt performance... "
"Since last Saturday, several people have come out to support the actress or her claim, including her mother and brother, her former agent, a friend, her legal guardian on the set, and co stars Jamie Lee Curtis and Arnold."
“... https://t.co/EJJbkdior2- Arnold (@ Schwarzenegger) over the weekend of January 16, 2018, Dushku publicly accused Kramer of sexually harassing her when she was 12 years old when she was filming "true lies."



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Both of these two ladies inspire us immensely, and we’re so happy that Hawn is finally receiving such an incredible honor!”
“"I had to go down and make an ‘I love Goldie' button because I am literally her biggest fan," Witherspoon said.”
“Reese Witherspoon is a fan of Goldie Hawn, and she made this fact abundantly clear during a speech she gave at the Hollywood Walk of Fame.”
“Both Hawn and her significant other, Kurt Russell, received stars this year.”
“It’s about time.”
“Witherspoon was able to give Hawn her own little tribute at the event, and it was so emotional that she was holding back tears.”
“In her eyes, Hawn is her idol, and someone she looked up to throughout her own acting career.”
“If you want to know how much Witherspoon loves Hawn, check this out: She made her own pin for the big moment.”
“Variety posted the full speech on Twitter, and it’s making us laugh and cry.”
“Witherspoon also said that Hawn helped her figure out the real meaning of feminism.”


"These two ladies have given us great encouragement, and we are very glad that horn has finally won such an incredible honor!"
"I had to go down and make a 'I love Goldie' button because I was her biggest fan," Witherspoon said
Reese Witherspoon, a fan of Goldie horn, made this very clear in a speech on Hollywood's walk of fame
"Horn and her partner Kurt Russell both won the star award this year."
"It's time."
"Witherspoon was able to show her little respect to horn during the event, and she was so emotional that she held back her tears."
"In her eyes, horn is her idol and the person she admired throughout her acting career."
"If you want to know how much Witherspoon loves horn, take a look at this: she made her own pin for this important moment."
"Variety released a complete speech on twitter, which made us laugh and cry."
"Witherspoon also said that horn helped her understand the true meaning of feminism."



Number  201
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“The Bachelor airs on ABC Mondays at 8 p m...”
“22 really is SO young compared to the other girls,” she tweeted on Monday, January 22.”
“...hopefully one of the many 25 26 year olds this season can grant me some of their ancient wisdom She also joked about the controversy writing if i m too young and immature explain how this week i did all my laundry and put it away immediately WITHOUT LEAVING IT”
“IN A PILE ON THE COUCH FOR 3 DAYS”
“#adulting #ready4marriage.”ah, yes.”
“22 really is SO young compared to the other girls.”
“...hopefully one of the many 25/26-year-olds this season can grant me some of their ancient wisdom.”
“— bekah martinez ♡ (@whats_ur_sign_) January 23, 2018if i’m “too young” and “immature”, explain how this week i did all my laundry and put it away immediately WITHOUT LEAVING IT IN A PILE ON THE COUCH FOR 3 DAYS??”
“#adulting #ready4marriage — bekah martinez ♡ (@whats_ur_sign_) January 23, 2018(Some commenters on Martinez’s posts pointed out that fellow bachelorette Maquel, who left the competition earlier in Monday’s episode after learning that her grandfather had died, is only 23.)”


"Wait a minute."
"Bachelor on ABC at 8 p.m. Monday night..."
"Compared with other girls, 22 is really too young," she said on her microblog on Monday, January 22
“…… I hope one of the many 25-26 year olds this season can give me some of their ancient wisdom. She also joked about the controversy and wrote that if I was too young and immature, explain how I washed my clothes this week and put them away immediately. "
"Three days on the couch"
"Flattery, ready to get married." Ah, yes
"22 is really young compared to other girls."
“…… I hope one of the many 25 / 26 year olds this season can give me some of their ancient wisdom. "
“-bekah martinez♡（@whats_ ur_ Sign ♡) January 23, 2018 if I am "too young" and "immature", please explain how I washed all my clothes this week and put them on the sofa immediately instead of piling them on the sofa for three days?? "
"Flattery, ready to get married - Becca Martinez (@ what ţ ur ţ u sign ţ) January 23, 2018 (some commentators pointed out in Martinez's post that Maguire, the single woman who left the competition after learning about her grandfather's death on Monday's show, was only 23 years old.)



Number  202
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s highly unlikely anyway.””
“It’s totally unlike him to strike anybody, especially women.”
“AdvertisementAn insider close to Herbert claimed, “Vince would never hurt Tamar even though their relationship has been fraught with all kinds of problems.”
“However, Herbert denied the charges and said there has never been a physical altercation between the pair.”
“Police booked him due to alleged spousal assault.”
“Furthermore, Herbert found himself in serious trouble this past week when he ended up in jail.”
“As you may know, Braxton made her comments yesterday after she filed for divorce to end her nine-year marriage to Vince Herbert.”
“He wrote, “I was trying to enjoy the last of 2017”, but his ex-girlfriend is attempting to smear him to clear her name.”
“She explained, “I just pray that they leave me out of this.”Reporters from the organization, TMZ, asked her if she had gotten pregnant, and she stated: “not true at all.”It got even messier when her ex, Arenas, took to Instagram and called Laura a liar.”
“Laura added she merely wants to keep her life out of the public’s eye and has done so somewhat successfully in the year of 2017.”


"In any case, it's very unlikely."
"He doesn't hit anyone, especially women, like him at all."
An insider close to Herbert said: "Vince will never hurt Tamar, even though their relationship has been full of all kinds of problems."
"However, Herbert denied the charges and said there had never been a physical conflict between the two men."
"He was registered by the police on suspicion of assault by his spouse."
"In addition, Herbert found himself in serious trouble in the past week and ended up in prison."
"As you may know, Braxton made her comment yesterday after she filed for divorce and ended her nine-year marriage to Vince Herbert."
"I wanted to enjoy the last day of 2017," he wrote, but his ex girlfriend tried to discredit him to clean up his reputation
She explained, "I just pray they don't involve me." TMZ reporter asked if she was pregnant, she said: "it's not true at all." Things got worse when her ex girlfriend arenas went to instagram and said Laura was a liar
"Laura added that she just wanted to keep her life out of the public eye and achieved some success in 2017."



Number  203
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Vanderpump Rules” Premiere Party Ariana Madix, 31, Scheana Shay, 31, Tom Sandoval, 33, and Brittany Cartwright, 27, have yet to get involved.”
“EcoLuxe Lounge at Sundance16 – Day 2 – 2016 Park City Maloney later responded to the drama in an ambiguous tweet.”
“Maloney later responded to the drama in an ambiguous tweet.”
“Stassi Schroeder, 28, even got involved to defend newlywed Katie Maloney, 29, against Kent.”
“In response, Kent attacked the entire cast after the trailer was released.”
““Vanderpump Rules” Star Tom Sandoval’s Project Elev8 Birthday Fund-Rager She went after Kent during filming as well, and even confronted her about dating a married man in the trailer.”
“Kristen Doute, 33, was pinned against Kent, 25, in the battle for James Kennedy last year, and wasted no time attacking her ahead of the new season.”
“As RadarOnline.com exclusively reported , she cut back on filming midway though the season and eventually quit the show.”
“As All of's staff is returning for season five — except for.”
“Vanderpump Rules – Season 5 Lisa Vanderpump's staff is returning for season five — except for Lala Kent.”


Ariana medix, 31, Shanna Shea, 31, Tom Sandoval, 33, and Brittany Cartwright, 27, have yet to attend the premiere of the van der Pol rules
"On the second day of 2016, ecoluxe lounge Park City Maloney of Sundance responded to the incident in an ambiguous tweet."
"Maloney later responded to the play on an ambiguous microblog."
"28 year old stassi Schroeder even took part in defending 29 year old newlywed Katie Maloney against Kent."
"In response, Kent attacked the entire crew after the trailer was released."
Tom Sandoval's elev 8 birthday fund Rager, starring in "the van der Pol rules", also chased Kent in the process of filming and even confronted her when she dated a married man in the trailer
"Kristen Dutt, 33, was pinned down on Kent, 25, in the battle for James Kennedy last year, and she lost no time in attacking her before the new season
"As RadarOnline.com According to an exclusive report on the website, she cut back on filming in the middle of the season and eventually quit the show. "
"All of our employees will be back in the fifth quarter, except us."
"The Vanderbilt rules - Lisa Vanderbilt's employees will return in the fifth quarter - except for Lala Kent."



Number  204
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...on E”
“You re gonna love this no this is the most comfortable these are the best panties So I just kept giving her everything and it s been fun to see her rocking all the new stuff Eric Jessie returns for a third season Wednesday Sept 6 at 10 p m...”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“We re just leaving it up in the air and leaving it in God s hands Jessie James Decker tells PEOPLE of having more kids with husband Eric Decker Jessie James Decker on Expanding Her Family with Eric Decker We re Not Doing Anything Not to Have More Kids Jessie...”
“James Decker is lending her voice to a great cause...”
“The country pop singer, fashion designer, television star and Tide partner spoke to PEOPLE following her attendance at an event for Loads of Hope: a Tide’s community donation project held last Friday, designed to help give families a fresh start.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I liked that it was a way of giving back.”
“These families have crisis or disasters happening … people don’t realize something as small as having clean clothes just makes you feel so good about yourself,” said Decker, 29.”
““I remember being in school and there’s certain kids that weren’t as fortunate and they’d wear the same clothes over and over again and you know that they just hadn’t been washed,” she adds.”


“… "On e"
"You're going to like this. No, it's the most comfortable, it's the best underpants, so I've been giving her everything. It's fun to see all the new things she came back for Season 3 Eric Jessie at 10 p.m. on Wednesday, September 6..."
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"We just put this matter behind us and leave it to God. Jesse James Decker told people that if we want to have more children with her husband Eric Decker, Jesse James Decker will expand the family with Eric Decker. We didn't do anything to have more children, Jesse..."
"James Decker is contributing to a great cause..."
The country pop singer, fashion designer, TV star and trendsetter partner spoke after attending last Friday's "hope for the best" community donation program aimed at helping families get started again
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I like it as a reward."
"These families have crises or disasters People don't realize that small things like clean clothes just make you feel good about yourself. "
"I remember at school, some kids were not so lucky, they wore the same clothes over and over again, you know, they just didn't wash them," she added



Number  205
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Bob Unseld, a family friend, said Sari first told him of the incident in 2013.”
“Tristan Voskuhl, who went to Sam Houston State University with Corrigan, said Corrigan first told her about the incident in 2006 when they were 19 years old.”
““I don’t know, maybe it never really hit people that I was a child at the time and that goes beyond a guy being inappropriate in the workplace to a peer or somebody in his age range,” she said.”
“Corrigan said that to this day, some of the responses she gets to her story are dismissive but she said she feels emboldened to speak out after seeing other women come forward, and hopes more will do so after hearing her account.”
“Bush was standing upright in 2003 when he met Corrigan.”
“Previously, McGrath said Bush “has patted women’s rears in what he intended to be a good-natured manner,” additionally attributing the act to his diminished height after being confined to a wheelchair since 2012.”
““George Bush simply does not have it in his heart to knowingly cause anyone harm or distress, and he again apologizes to anyone he may have offended during a photo op,” Bush spokesperson Jim McGrath said in a statement to TIME.”
“Seven people, including family members and friends, confirmed to TIME that they had been told about alleged groping by Bush of Corrigan prior to the other recent allegations.”
“Five other women have made similar claims against Bush in recent weeks.”
“Courtesy Corrigan FamilyCorrigan said the incident happened while she was being photographed standing next to Bush.”


"Bob Ansel, a family friend, said Sally first told him about it in 2013."
Tristan waskul, who went to Sam Houston State University with Corrigan, said Corrigan first told her about it in 2006, when they were 19
"I don't know, maybe people never really realize that I was a child at the time, which is beyond the scope of a man being inappropriate to his peers or other peers in the workplace," she said
Corrigan said that up to now, she has been dismissive of some of the responses to her story, but she said that after seeing other women stand up, she feels brave to speak up and hopes that after hearing her narration, more people will do so
"Bush stood up when he met Corrigan in 2003."
Earlier, McGrath said Bush had "patted a woman's ass in a kind way" and attributed the behavior to a drop in height since being confined to wheelchairs in 2012
Bush spokesman Jim McGrath said in a statement to time magazine: "George Bush does not want to intentionally cause injury or pain to anyone. He apologizes once again to anyone who offended when taking photos."
"Seven people, including family and friends, confirmed to time that they had been told of Bush's so-called provocation against Corrigan before other recent charges."
"In recent weeks, five other women have made similar charges against Bush."
"Courtesy" Corrigan family Corrigan said she was being photographed standing next to Bush at the time of the incident



Number  206
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Below, shop Zara picks we think Palermo would love!”
“We have to agree: It's always a good idea to treat yourself to a shopping spree on your vacation, right?”
“Sometimes it's nice to travel light because you never know what you might find to bring home."”
“"There's always a backup.”
“I realized that wherever I go, I can stop in at Zara," Palermo told InStyle.”
“"And you know what?”
“Talking about how she's mastered the art of packing for a trip, Palermo said that she doesn't stress about it too much because she always has a fail-safe plan B.”
“Now, thanks to Palermo's interview with InStyle, we learned some insight into her Zara shopping strategy.”
“Whether she's on the red carpet in a suit by the retailer or running errands in a $40 Zara blouse, she has proven to be a major fan of everyone's favorite fast-fashion haunt.”
“Specifically, she's been spotted in stylish Zara pieces numerous times.”


"Here's the Zara collection we think Palermo will like!"
"We have to agree: it's always a good idea to go shopping during the holidays, right?"
"Sometimes it's good to travel light, because you never know what to take home."
"There's always a backup."
"I realized that wherever I went, I could stay in Zara," Palermo told INSTEL
"Do you know?"
"When it comes to how she mastered travel Packaging skills, Palermo said she wouldn't put too much emphasis on it because she always had a breakdown proof plan B
"Now, thanks to Palermo's interview with Inter, we have some idea of her Zara shopping strategy."
"Whether it's walking down the red carpet in a retailer's suit or running errands in a $40 Zara shirt, she has proved to be a major fan of everyone's favorite fast fashion place."
"In particular, she has appeared many times in the fashionable works of Zara."



Number  207
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Thorne Kumail Nanjiani Katherine Langford Maddie Ziegler Grace Vanderwaal The Dolan Twins Hudson Yang Riverdale cast Liza Koshy Marshmello...”
“Kids PRESENTERS ATTENDEES Anthony Anderson Fifth Harmony Logan Paul Adam Scott and Craig Robinson Kaitlin Olson and Thomas Barbusca Ed Sheeran Shawn Mendes Zendaya Chris Pratt Lucy Hale Janel Parrish Victoria Justice Tyler Posey Camila Cabello Millie Bobby Brown Gal Gadot Tyler Hoechlin Grant Gustin Melissa Benoist Olivia Munn Bella...”
“Click inside to see the full list of performers presenters and attendees PERFORMERS Louis Tomlinson and Bebe Rexha Clean Bandit with Zara Larsson Kyle Lil Yachty and Rita Ora The cast of FOX s Star hip hop duo Rae Sremmurd French Montana featuring Swae Lee with Uganda s Triplets Ghetto...”
“In addition, there’s going to be a slew of amazing performances to keep you dancing in your seat!”
“Miley Cyrus will accept the Ultimate Choice Award, Maroon 5 will receive the highly coveted Decade Award and Bruno Mars will be honored with the Visionary Award.”
“There will be dozens of awards given out, including three very special honors.”
“The 2017 Teen Choice Awards are set to air in just a few hours and there are so many celebs set to take the stage this evening!”


"Thorne Kummel nangarni Katherine Langford Mandy Ziegler grace van der valdolan, twin Hudson young Riverdale as Lisa cosy mashmello..."
"Children's presenters Antony Anderson, fifth harmonic, Logan Paul Adams Scott and Craig Robinson, Caitlin Olsen and Thomas babska, ed. Hiran, Sean Mendes zendaya, Chris Platte, Lucy hale, Janel Parish, Victoria's grand judge, Tyler bossica, Camilla, carolmillie Bobbi, brongedo, Tyler hodgling, grant, Gustin Melly "Sabenuva Olivia Munn Bella..."
"Click inside to see a complete list of performers, hosts and attendees. Performers Louis Tomlinson and Bebe Raisa innocent bandits and star hip-hop groups of Zara Larson, Kyle Lear yacht and Rita olafox, ray slymoud fransimona's cast, and sway Lee's collaboration with triplet slums in Uganda..."
"In addition, there will be a series of wonderful performances for you to dance in your seat!"
"Miley Cyrus will win the ultimate choice award, chestnut 5 will win the coveted decade award, and Bruno Mars will win the Vision Award."
"Dozens of awards will be presented, including three very special honors."
"The 2017 youth Choice Award will be broadcast in just a few hours, and there will be so many celebrities on the stage tonight!"



Number  208
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Tommaso Boddi/Getty Images]”
“I told her years ago to ditch him and I’m happy to finally have found out.”Do you think Farrah Abraham and Amber Portwood will ever be friends again on Teen Mom OG?”
“She knows that.”Amber also mentioned wanting to rekindle their friendship and that she is “ready to let everything go.” Amber may be ready, but it looks like Farrah is not on the same page.”
“I still love her to death.”
“I think she did things for publicity.”
““We used to be friends, but I don’t know what happened.”
“Farrah is referring to Portwood’s appearance on E!’s Daily Pop last month, where Amber described Farrah as crazy.”
“Well, that is definitely not going to mend any fences for either of them.”
“From that statement, it seems like Farrah Abraham believes she is never wrong.”
“I’m a great friend; I’m a stand-up individual and in the same sentence she wants to be friends with me, she always says I’m crazy.”So, why is she not ending the feud?”


"[close up by Tommaso boddi / Getty Images]"
"I told her to abandon him a few years ago, and I'm glad to finally find out," do you think Farah Abraham and amber porterwood will be friends again on teen mom
"She knows that." Amber also said she wanted to rekindle their friendship, and she was "ready to let it go." Amber may be ready, but it looks like Farah is not on the same page
"I still love her to death."
"I think what she does is for publicity."
"We used to be friends, but I don't know what happened."
"Farah means Portwood at e! Last month's daily pop, amber described Farah as crazy
"Well, it can't be fixed for both of them."
"Judging from this, Farah Abraham seems to think she never missed it."
"I'm a very good friend; I'm an independent person. In the same sentence, she wants to be friends with me. She always says I'm crazy." So, why didn't she end the feud? "



Number  209
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While it is unclear just how much Munn paid for her appearance, no price seems too high for the chance to appear onscreen alongside legends such as Cate Blanchett, Rihanna, and Skateboard Dog.”
“And then [the producers are] like, “Oh no, the bills come right back to you.”Regardless, Munn said she is “just as excited … as everybody else” for the film’s release in June 2018.”
“...that and then you submit the bills for it because I m part of your movie...”
“In an interview with Entertainment Weekly Radio JoJo Fletcher s once almost sister in law Olivia Munn said that she had to pay for her own makeup and wardrobe in the film s Met Gala scene They re like Do your own glam and I got the dress and all...”
“But for some, the opportunity to appear in the all-female reboot of the Ocean’s Trilogy came with a cost.”
“Photo: Alberto E. Rodriguez/Getty ImagesThe upcoming Ocean’s 8 will reportedly have a number of big-name cameos from celebrities such as Anna Wintour, Kim Kardashian, and this cool dog riding a skateboard.”
“Olivia Munn.”


"It's not clear how much money Munn has spent for his appearance, but it doesn't seem to cost much to have a chance to appear on the screen with legends like Kate Blanchett, Rihanna and skatedog."
"And then [the producer] would say," Oh, no, the bill's coming. " Anyway, Munn said she was "as excited as anyone else" about the film's release in June 2018
“… Then you submit the bill, because I'm part of your movie... "
"In an interview with entertainment weekly radio station JOJO Fletcher, Olivia Munn said that in the scene of met Gala, she had to pay for her own make-up and wardrobe, just like dressing herself up, and I got the dress and everything..."
"But for some, the opportunity to reappear in the ocean trilogy comes at a price."
"Photo: Alberto E. Rodriguez / Getty Images it's reported that the upcoming ocean 8 will have many celebrity guest stars, such as Anna Wintour, Kim Kardashian and this cool skateboarding dog."
"Olivia moon."



Number  210
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let's hope Bruno Mars remixes his whole album and Cardi B is a guest on every single track.”
“...imminent...”
“And the pairing with Bardi whose true gift is having more fun than anyone else around her hits all the feel good throwback notes that make you nostalgic for a time when the threat of nuclear winter felt slightly less...”
“It's like getting sucked into a black hole and encountering the fun inverse of Justin Timberlake going full country in a parallel dimension.”
“It needs its own Harvard Business School case study.”
“AND HELLO IT IS A BOP:Bruno Mars' decision to rebrand as a "32 Things Only ’90s Kids Will Remember" BuzzFeed quiz is truly the greatest musical innovation the world has ever witnessed.”
“Last night, Mars dropped a music video for the remix of "Finesse," already one of the sleeper jams off 24K Magic, and made the wise decision to pay Cardi B a lot of money for a feature.”
“(I would take a bullet for him.)”
“Somewhere along the way, Bruno Mars went from a lovable cornball with a fondness for fedoras to the greatest male performer in the world who now enjoys a wide variety of fun hats.”


"I hope Bruno Mars can mix his whole album, and Katie B is the guest of every song."
“… Imminent... "
"Badi's real talent is to have more fun than anyone else around her. Her pairing with Badi has played all the good retrospective notes, making you miss the time when the threat of nuclear winter weakened a little bit..."
"It's like being sucked into a black hole and encountering Justin Timberlake's interesting opposite of traveling across the country in a parallel dimension."
"It needs its own Harvard Business School case studies."
"Hello, this is a decision by Bruno Mars to" rename the buzzfeed test "32 things that only kids in the '90s will remember." it's the greatest musical innovation in the history of the world. "
"Last night, Mars dropped a music video of the remix 'smart', which has been a feature of sleeping packed with 24K magic and making a wise decision to pay caddy B a lot of money."
"I'd like to take a bullet for him."
"In the process, Bruno Mars went from a cute cornball who loved Fedora to the greatest male performer in the world, and now he likes all kinds of funny hats."



Number  211
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s also placed her entire catalogue back on Spotify with a personally curated playlist on the streaming service delivered on look inside to her favorite songs.”
“Swift treated fans to a secret session last week where 100 selected fans in the U.K. were invited to preview her new album.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Why Taylor Swift Spent 6 Months Out Of The Spotlight: ‘She Felt Like Her Personal Life Was Spinning Out Of Control’The singer has slowly returned to the spotlight after time away.”
““This is like VMAs, this is I think a promo shoot, this is ACM Awards, this is BMI Awards when I bleached my hair — that was a fun phase, wow,” she said.”
“Image zoom Credit: YoutubeSwift also introduces her “former selves” on the set of the video, where the “22” singer explains a bit about each of the outfits they are all wearing.”
“...previous album cycles she said taking clothes off of racks and recalling the events associated with them...”
“In a YouTube video posted Tuesday Swift shows fans where the apocalypse of clothing has all congregated and essentially I ve just done the longest fitting of my entire life One of the craziest things about this video is that it s kind of like calling back to looks of...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The 27-year-old pop star released her highly-anticipated music video in late August, and gave fans nostalgia by bringing back some of her best recognized looks from previous videos.”
“Taylor Swift gave her fans an inside look into her wardrobe room for the “Look What You Made Me Do” music video.”


"She also put her entire catalog back in spotify, and provided a play list of her favorite songs on look inside on the streaming service, which she personally planned."
Last week, 100 fans in the UK were invited to rehearse her new album.
"Related video: why Taylor Swift has been in the spotlight for six months:" she feels her personal life is out of control. "The singer slowly returns to the spotlight after leaving for a while
"It's like Vmas, this is what I think of as a promo, this is the ACM award, this is the BMI award when I bleach my hair - it's an interesting stage, wow," she said
Image zooming credit: YouTube swift also introduces her "former self" in the video, where the "22" singer explains every outfit they wear
“… In the previous album cycle, she said, "take off the clothes from the hanger and recall the events related to them..."
"In a YouTube video released on Tuesday, swift showed fans the gathering place of the Apocalypse of clothing. In essence, I just finished the longest fitting in my life. The craziest thing about this video is that it's a bit like remembering myself..."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The 27 year old pop star released her much anticipated music video in late August, bringing the most recognized look from her previous video back to fans' nostalgia
Taylor Swift had her fans watch the music video "see what you've made me do" in her closet



Number  212
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Steve Almasy, Brandon Griggs...”
““We make excuses for them and, bit by bit, we can lose ourselves entirely.”CNN has reached out to Hardwick’s representatives for comment on this story.”
““The outpouring of support and love I’ve received over the past few days has been incredible and unexpected,” Dykstra wrote in a tweet on Wednesday.”
“Thank you all, from the bottom of my heart.”
“...pic.twitter.com/giXmp2wb9V — Chloe Dykstra (@skydart) June 20, 2018“After years of therapy and rebuilding your support has done so much for me than all of it combined,” she added.”
“Dykstra, 29, recently posted an essay on Medium in which she described an almost three-year relationship with an older celebrity who she said imposed strict rules on her behavior.”
“Without naming him, she alleged that the man forbid her to have male friends, to speak in public or to go out at night without him – and that she “let him sexually assault me” on multiple occasions.”
““Every night, I laid there for him, occasionally in tears,” she wrote.”
“The actress described him as someone who “grew from a mildly successful podcaster to a powerhouse CEO of his own company.” She also said he blacklisted her in the industry.”
“Fans pieced together the details and quickly figured out that she was talking about Hardwick, 46.”


"Steve almasi, Brandon Griggs..."
"We make excuses for them, little by little, we'll lose ourselves completely." CNN has contacted representatives of hadwick to comment on the report
"The outpouring of support and love I've received over the past few days is incredible and unexpected," Dykstra tweeted on Wednesday
"Thank you very much."
“... pic.twitter.com/giXmp2wb9V -Chloe Dykstra (@ skydart) June 20, 2018, "after years of treatment and reconstruction, your support has done too much for me, more than the sum of all this," she added
Dykstra, 29, recently published an article in the media describing her nearly three-year relationship with an elderly celebrity, who she said had strict rules on her behavior
Without revealing his name, she claimed that the man prohibited her from making male friends, from speaking in public, and from going out at night without him - and that she repeatedly "let him sexually assault me."
"Every night, I lay there waiting for him, occasionally weeping," she wrote
The actress described him as a person who "grew from a slightly successful podcast to the super CEO of her company" and said he blacklisted her in the industry
"Fans put the details together and soon found out that she was talking about hadwick, 46."



Number  213
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She confessed that she is currently much more grounded than she was before.”
“...and the fact that not everything has to end with marriage...”
“...the womb asking questions curious from day one and I am grateful for that My curiosity has led me here Advertisement Katy Perry was shortly married to Russel Brand and she confessed that she learned a lot of lessons in her life such as patience the art of saying no...”
“In a new interview with Vogue magazine Katy Perry said that My education started in my 20s and there is so much to learn still she told Vogue as she recalled childhood times in which she was not allowed to interact with gay people Perry said I came out of...”
“It’s awful.”Her strength will get her through all of these difficult times.”
““And you think about it, and you think that’s my friend, that’s my sister, that’s my brother, that’s the person that loves music, you know.”
“It was hard for you guys, it was hard for me because we all love music,” Perry told the concert goer.”
““It was hard.”
“ABS News reported that at the end of the singer’s 20-minute set, a set that was streamed live on Twitter, she addressed the tragic event.”
“Last Thursday night she also played an intimate show at London’s Water Rats club, in which she referred to the horrible bombing in Manchester that took place earlier during the week.”


"She admits that she is more down-to-earth now than before."
“… In fact, not everything ends in marriage... "
“… The uterus has been asking questions curiously since the first day. I am very grateful that my curiosity has brought me here. Katie Perry soon married Russell Brand. She confesses that she has learned a lot in life, such as patience and the art of saying no.... "
"Katie Perry told vogue in an interview that my education started in my 20s and there was a lot to learn, but she told vogue that she recalled her childhood when she was not allowed to associate with homosexuals. Perry said I came from..."
"It's terrible." Her strength will carry her through all these difficult times
"Think about it. You think that's my friend, that's my sister, that's my brother, that's a music lover, you know."
"It's hard for you, and it's hard for me, because we all love music," Perry told the concert audience
"It's hard."
According to ABS news, she spoke at the end of a 20 minute live show on twitter about the tragedy
"Last Thursday night, she also put on an intimate show at the Water Rats club in London, which referred to the terrorist bombing in Manchester earlier this week."



Number  214
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Bucs could run the perfect gameplan.”
“Going with anyone else would be a hipster choice.”
“Reid will need an extra splash of trickery to flummox Tampa.”
“Well, unless the offense explodes as well it may.”
“You cannot play chicken with Brady like the Packers did – it only ends one way.”
“Keep two safeties on the field so the Bucs are forced to run.”
“HF Eliminate the deep ball.”
“If the Bucs do that against KC, this game could be over quickly.”
“Brady threw three interceptions against the Green Bay Packers, but the Packers could only score on one of the ensuing possessions.”
“AL Win the battle of the turnovers.”


"The bookers can do the perfect game plan."
"It's fashionable to go with others."
"Reed needs more tricks to mess with Tampa."
"Well, unless the attack breaks out well."
"You can't play chicken with Brady like a packer - it just ends in one way."
"Put two safes on the court and Bux will be forced to run away."
"Kill the deep ball."
"If bookers do that against KC, the game will be over soon."
"Brady intercepted the Green Bay Packers three times, but the packers could only score in the next attack."
"Al won the rollover."



**Something goes wrong**
“SheFinds receives commissions for purchases made through the links in this post.”
“Check out the jeans everyone is buying for spring and the jeans literally EVERY celeb owns on SHEfinds.”
“From year to year, and even month to month sometimes, new trends are emerging and pushing old ones out.”
“It’s an endless and very frustrating cycle.”
“At the start of the season, you purchased the newest piece of clothing that is so in at the moment, only to find it irrelevant just a couple months later–we’ve all been there.”
“If you’re trying to stay on your fashion A-game and always look your best, it can be hard to keep track of what’s in and what’s not.”
“You don’t ever want to be wearing last season’s hottest item, two seasons too late.”
“That’d be a travesty!”
“So, what’s currently out of style for 2018, you ask?”
“Well, there are two denim trends you definitely won’t catch any of fashion’s it-girls wearing this year.”


"She received a purchase commission through the link in this post."
"Look at the jeans that everyone buys for spring, look at the jeans that every celebrity owns."
"Year by year, and sometimes month by month, new trends are emerging, old trends are being eliminated."
"It's an endless, very frustrating cycle."
"At the beginning of the season, you bought the latest fashion that's in vogue, but only a few months later it didn't matter - we've all been there."
"If you want to keep your fashion A-game and always look the best, it's hard to understand what's popular and what's not."
"You never want to put on the hottest clothes of one season, two seasons are too late."
"That's funny!"
"So, what are the trends in 2018?" you ask
"Well, there are two kinds of cowboy trends, and you'll never see a fashion it girl wearing this year."



Number  216
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Those who have known the quality of my work and the many public statements I have made over the course of my life, must know, that I am a strong supporter of women’s rights.””
“And, I am devastated that anyone should deem me capable of thinking otherwise.”
“Story highlights Actress Angela Lansbury is taking heat on social media for controversial comments Some have excused the 92 year old saying she s from a different time CNN Renowned actress Angela Lansbury is facing criticism after saying women must sometimes take blame for sexual harassment because of the way...”
“...they dress...”
“In an interview Monday with British entertainment media company RadioTimes, Lansbury said women “have gone out of their way to make themselves attractive.”
“And unfortunately it has backfired on us … Although it’s awful to say we can’t make ourselves look as attractive as possible without being knocked down and raped.”PHOTO: everett digital Angela Lansbury and Morgan Fairchild in an episode of "Murder, She Wrote."”
“Lansbury was speaking about the wave of sexual harassment and sexual assault allegations made recently against such powerful men as Hollywood mogul Harvey Weinstein.”
“Her comments went viral, and not in a good way.”
“Some people said they thought the beloved “Murder, She Wrote” actress, 92, was trending because she was deceased but were mortified to hear what she said.”
“...sees Angela Lansbury is trending OH NO SHE BETTER NOT BE DEAD oh wait it s worse https t co zJJVhE2MUm Olly Smith OllyWrites November 28 2017 Others pointed out the irony of the actress playing a mystery writer and amateur detective who advocated for victims in Murder She Wrote...”


"Those who know the quality of my work and the many public statements I have made in my life must know that I am a strong supporter of women's rights."
"Besides, anyone would think that I have the ability to find another way, which makes me sad."
"The highlight of the story actress Angela Lansbury has caused heated discussion on social media due to controversial comments. Some people forgive the 92 year old actress for saying that she comes from another era. CNN famous actress Angela Lansbury said that women sometimes have to take responsibility for sexual harassment because of this way..."
“… They wear... "
In an interview with radio times, a British entertainment media company, on Monday, Lansbury said women "have done everything possible to make themselves more attractive."
"Unfortunately, it's counterproductive for us Although it's terrible to say that we can't look as attractive as possible without being knocked down and raped. " Photo: Angela Lansbury and Morgan Fairchild of Everett digital wrote in an episode of murder
"Lansbury is talking about the recent wave of sexual harassment and assault charges against powerful figures such as Hollywood tycoon Harvey Weinstein."
"Her comments are crazy and not very good."
Some said they thought the 92 year old actress was in fashion because she had passed away, but were ashamed to hear what she said
“… Seeing Angela Lansbury in vogue Oh, no, she'd better not die, etc., what's worse, mom Ollie Smith ollilet November 28, 2017, others pointed out the irony of the actress playing mystery writer and amateur detective, she advocated victims in her murder case... "



Number  217
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Are you excited to see Birdie’s first pic?”
“...is already a daddy s girl Birdie is going to be so loved and so spoiled Natalya continued...”
“Revealing to us EXCLUSIVELY just how thrilled she is for Brie, WWE star Natalya Neidhart gushed about how ‘spoiled’ baby Birdie is going to be, AND that she thinks Daniel will be the diaper king!”
“At over 41 weeks pregnant, Brie Bella, 33, FINALLY gave birth to her and her husband Daniel Bryan‘s(real name Bryan Danielson,) 35, first child on May 9!”
“The two welcomed daughter Birdie Joe Danielson into the world at 11:58 p.m., and already they’re completely in love with the little angel.”
“SO in love in fact that fellow WWE Superstar Natalya Neidhart, 34, is already predicting Birdie will be one adorably spoiled child!”
““I’m so happy for Brie!”
“She’s wanted to be a mom her whole life and now her dreams are finally coming true,” Natalya revealed to HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“She and Bryan are going to make amazing parents and it s going to be such an exciting new journey for them Of course the athlete couldn t help mentioning the couple s newborn daughter who she happens to think...”
““I somehow have a feeling Bryan will be on diaper duty a lot!” LOL.”


"Are you excited to see the first picture of the bird?"
“… It's already my father's daughter. The bird will be loved so deeply and spoiled. Natalia continued
"To tell us how excited she is about Bree, WWE star Natalia nedtat gushes that baby birdie will be spoiled and that she thinks Daniel will be the king of diapers!"
"Bree Bella, 33, was 41 weeks pregnant and finally gave birth to her first child with her husband, Daniel Bryan (real name Bryan Danielson, 35), on May 9!"
"At 11:58 p.m., they welcome their daughter, Bertie Joe Danielson, to the world. They have completely fallen in love with the little angel."
"So in love, in fact, 34 year old WWE superstar Natalia nidat has predicted that bird will be a lovely and spoiled child!"
"I'm so happy for Bree!"
"She wanted to be a mother all her life, and now her dream has come true," Natalia told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"She and Brian are going to be amazing parents and it's going to be an exciting new journey for them. Of course, the athlete couldn't help mentioning the couple's just born daughter. She happened to think of... "
"Somehow, I have a feeling that Brian would go to diaper class a lot!"! "Ha ha."



Number  218
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She then goes on to describe how she "watches baby TV" with her sister even though she doesn't like it and as usual with this hilarious duo, there are a lot of laughs!”
“AdvertisementDescribing it as "magic", Sophia Grace told Ellen that she can't believe her wish to have a baby sister came true.”
“The cousins told Ellen that they've both recently welcomed new siblings: Sophia Grace has a new baby sister and Rosie, a new baby brother.”
“Sophia Grace and Rosie are back on The Ellen Show again and we have to say we missed them of late!”
“VIDEO: "We Actually Got Our Wishes" - Sophia Grace And Rosie Are Back Again!”


Then she went on to describe how she was "watching baby TV" with her sister, even though she didn't like it, as usual with this funny combination, there was a lot of laughter! "
Sophia grace, who advertised it as "magic," told Allen that she couldn't believe her wish for a sister would come true
"Cousins told Allen that they've all had new siblings recently: Sophia grace has a new little sister, and Rosie has a new little brother."
"Sophia grace and Rosie are back on Ellen's show, and we have to say we've missed them lately!"
Video: "we really made our wish come true" - Sophia grace and Rosie are back



Number  219
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...alright that’s all — Dylan Minnette (@dylanminnette) January 8, 2019With the cast now getting the final scripts, it's only a matter of time that filming ends and a release date is announced!”
“...i know i never really tweet about 13 reasons why but i gotta say some of these last few scripts of season 3 are the show’s best.”
“An update on 13 Reasons Why If you or someone you know needs help finding crisis resources please visit https t co cNtjtuNG1p pic twitter com SxGjbYpZF6 Netflix netflix July 16 2019 No one scene is more important to the life of the show and its message that we must...”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“The streaming platform has decided to remove Hannah Baker's suicide scene from the finale of season 1 "on the advice of medical experts, including Dr. Christine Moutier, Chief Medical Officer at the American Foundation for Suicide Prevention," they said in a statement.”
“Season 3 might be a little less graphicAs we await 13 Reasons Why season 3, Netflix has announced that they are making some edits to the show's first season.”
“This content is imported from YouTube.”
“They also released a brand new trailer that gives fans a sneak peek as to what they should expect in this new season and it has a SHOCKING reveal that you won't believe.”


“…… All right, that's it - Dylan Minette on January 8, 2019, the actors now have the final script, and it's only a matter of time before the shooting ends and the release date is announced! "
“…… I know I've never tweeted 13 reasons, but I have to say that some of the last scripts in season 3 are the best. "
"For an update on 13 reasons, if you or someone you know need help finding crisis resources, please visit http t Co cntjtung1p pic twitter com sxgjbypzf6 Netflix Netflix July 16, 2019. No scene is more important than the life of this play. Its message is that we must..."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from twitter."
"The streaming platform has decided to remove Hannah Beck's suicide scene from the season 1 finale on the advice of medical experts, including Dr. Christine moodier, chief medical officer of the American suicide prevention foundation," they said in a statement
"The third season may not be so vivid, because we are waiting for 13 reasons for the third season, and Netflix has announced that they will do some editing for the first season of the show."
"This content was imported from YouTube."
"They also released a brand new trailer to let fans peek at what they should expect in the new season. It has a shocking news that you won't believe."



Number  220
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“No, it’s a joke.””
“Senator, I’m a house nigger.”
“We’d love to have you work in the fields with us.”Mr. Maher said: “Work in the fields?”
“When Mr. Sasse said this did not happen in his state, Mr. Maher said, “I’ve got to get to Nebraska more.”Mr. Sasse replied: “You’re welcome.”
“...up for Halloween...”
“Shortly after 10 p m on Friday Mr Maher the comedian and host of HBO s Real Time was talking to Mr Sasse on his program about the boundaries between adolescence and maturity and how adults in California still dress...”
“HBO denounced the remark as “completely inexcusable and tasteless,” and said it would be edited out of future airings.”
“The HBO late-night host Bill Maher apologized on Saturday for using a racial epithet during an interview with Senator Ben Sasse, Republican of Nebraska, on a live broadcast of his show on Friday night.”


"No, it's a joke."
"Senator, I'm a nigger."
"We want you to work in the fields with us." Mr. Mahe said, "working in the fields?"
When Mr. Sasser said that nothing like this happened in his state, Mr. Mahe said, "I have to go to Nebraska more." Mr. Sasser replied, "you're welcome."
“… Getting ready for Halloween... "
"Shortly after 10 p.m. on Friday night, comedian and HBO real-time channel host Mr. Maher talked with Mr. Sasser about the boundaries between adolescence and maturity, and how California adults dress..."
HBO condemned the sentence as "totally unforgivable and tasteless" and said it would be deleted in future broadcasts
On Saturday, HBO late night host Bill Maher used a racial epithet in an interview with Nebraska Republican Senator Ben Sasse, and apologized for it on Friday night's live show



**Something goes wrong**
“For more on how to help/donate to Hurricane Harvey relief efforts, please click here.”
“Watch below.”
“Other stars like former Bachelor Sean Lowe have been helping out on the frontlines, rescuing people from their homes.”
“Tyler Perry, Sandra Bullock and Leonardo DiCaprio have each donated $1 million to the cause; Miley Cyrus has donated $500,000, and Miranda Lambert and her foundation have helped to rescue hundreds of pets displaced by the disaster.”
“RELATED: Switchfoot and Lifehouse Release New Song for Hurricane Harvey ReliefThe "Look What You Made Me Do" singer is the latest celebrity to step up and support to those affected by the storm, which has left more than 37 people dead.”
“#houstonstrong."”
“"We thank you, Taylor, and we thank everyone for donating to help rebuild our community.”
“RELATED: Solange Knowles to Hold Benefit Concert for Hurricane Harvey Relief Efforts"Taylor Swift has generously made a very sizable donation to Houston Food Bank in honor of her mother who graduated from the University of Houston," read a post on Houston Food Bank's Facebook page.”
“The 27-year-old singer made a "very sizable donation" to the Houston Food Bank after Hurricane Harvey, the organization announced on Friday.”
“Taylor Swift is doing her part!”


"For more information on how to help / donate to Hurricane Harvey rescue efforts, click here."
"Pay attention to the bottom."
"Other stars, like Sean low, a former bachelor, have been at the front line helping to get people out of their homes."
Tyler Perry, Sandra Bullock and Leonardo DiCaprio each contributed $1 million, Miley Cyrus contributed $500000, and Miranda Lambert and her Foundation helped save hundreds of pets that were replaced by the disaster.
Related reports: Switchfoot and Lifehouse released a new song "see what you've made me do" for hurricane Harvey relief. The singer is the latest celebrity to stand up for those affected by the storm, which has killed 37 people
"Houston strong."
"We thank you, Tyler, and we thank you for your contributions to help rebuild our community."
"Related report: Solange Knowles will hold a charity concert for the rescue work of Hurricane Harvey," wrote the face book of the Houston food bank. "Taylor Swift generously donated a large sum of money to the Houston food bank in memory of her mother who graduated from the University of Houston."
The 27 year old singer made a "very substantial donation" to Houston food bank after Hurricane Harvey, the group announced on Friday
"Tyler swift is doing her job!"



**Something goes wrong**
“This show definitely felt like my baby.”WATCH: Video Q&A’s from this season’s hottest contenders »calendar@latimes.com...”
““It’s such a powerful feeling to have people look to you and say ‘What do you think?’ Actors often don’t have any input at all, but I’d been living with ‘The Sinner’ longer than almost anybody, so I had a point of view about the material.”
“It s about the psychological peel Biel s star turn in The Sinner represents a startling departure for the 36 year old actress first introduced to TV audiences as a minister s wholesome teenage daughter in The WB s long running family drama 7th Heaven She later appeared in the...”
““We’re interested in the conceit of the ‘whydunit,’ so we peel, peel, peel away.”
““Other people can do whodunit really well,” Biel says.”
“Jessica Biel as Cora in USA Network’s “The Sinner.” (Brownie Harris / USA Network )Seeking answers, the eight-episode thriller gradually reveals Cora’s toxic backstory, contaminated with psychologically abusive parents, a sickly sister and predatory men in masks.”
“AdvertisementWhy’d she do it?”
“During a picnic by the lake with her husband and young son, Cora gets enraged by a loud song and abruptly stabs a stranger to death in a blood-spattered rage.”
“The character’s psychotic break happens in the first episode.”
“...shattered soul Cora...”


"This show is absolutely like my baby." Watch: Video Q & A of the season's hottest competitors@ latimes.com 。。。”
"How do you feel when someone looks at you and says' how do you feel '? "Actors usually have no opinion at all, but I've spent more time with sinner than anyone else, so I have my own opinions on the material."
"This is about psycho Pierre Bell's star transformation in sinner. It's an amazing transformation for the 36 year old actress. She was first introduced to the TV audience as the priest's healthy daughter in WB's long-term family drama seventh heaven, and later she appeared in seventh heaven..."
"We're interested in whydunit's ego, so we peel, peel, peel."
"Anyone else can do anything well," Bell said
Jessica bell plays Cora (Brownie Harris / CNN) in the American TV network's "sinner". In order to find out, this eight episode thriller gradually reveals Cora's toxic background story, polluted by abusive parents, sick sisters and masked predatory men
"Why did she do that?"
"During a picnic by the lake, Cora, her husband and little son were enraged by a high song and angrily stabbed a stranger to death."
"The character's mental breakdown happened in the first episode."
“… Broken soul, Kola... "



Number  223
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The X-Files Season 11 will premiere on Fox in 2018.”
“Anderson has won an Emmy and Golden Globe and received multiple awards nominations for her role as Dana Scully on the Fox series.”
“#TheFutureisFemale,” Anderson wrote in a retweet of a Washington Post story about the gender disparity.”
“I too look forward to the day when the numbers are different.”
““And 2 out of 207 eps directed by women.”
“Following a TVLine report by that listed the writers for the upcoming 11th season of The X-Files, all of whom are men, Anderson pointed out that only two of the show’s 207 episodes were directed by women (and she directed one of those).”
“Gillian Anderson clearly would like to see more gender equality in The X-Files’ writers room.”


"Season 11 of X-Files will premiere on Fox in 2018."
"Anderson has won Emmy and Golden Globe Awards, and has been nominated for many awards for her role as Dana Scully in the fox series."
"The future is women," Anderson wrote in forwarding a report on gender differences in the Washington Post
"I'm also looking forward to the day when the numbers are different."
"Two of the 207 EPS are directed by women."
After a tvline report listed the upcoming X-Files Season 11 screenwriters, all male, Anderson pointed out that only two episodes of the series 207 were directed by women (she directed one of them)
"Ajiao Anderson obviously wants to see more gender equality in the X-Files playroom."



Number  224
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See what else Scheana had to say about the emotional reunion, below.”
“I felt like I just owed that to him because we've been friends for half our lives."”
“It was incredibly difficult to watch Scheana Shay and Mike Shay's confrontation at this season's Vanderpump Rules reunion.”
“The exes were visibly upset with one another over how their relationship ended and what happened after they decided to call it quits, including Shay learning about the identity of Scheana's new boyfriend, Robert Valletta, for the first time.”
“Though Scheana and Shay seemed to end the reunion on good terms, giving each other their best wishes as they embraced, the experience still didn't sit well with the SURver.”
“"I had sent him an email after the reunion because...I felt I was very harsh in certain parts of it, I felt a little cold in other parts of it, " Scheana revealed to E!”
“News prior to the reunion airing.”
“"And then, the way he found out about Rob, I felt I needed to just give a little more of an explanation.”
“Scheana said that she never received a reply from Shay, but she heard through a mutual friend that he had read it, and "that was enough for me," she said.”
“"It was weird, but I think that day did bring some closure to me, at least," she said.”


"See what she said about this emotional reunion. See below."
"I think I owe him that because we've been friends for the rest of our lives."
"It's too hard to see the duel between Shanna Shea and Mike Shea at the reunion of van der Pol's rules this season."
"The two predecessors were obviously upset about how their relationship ended and what happened after they decided to break up, including Shea's first knowledge of the identity of her new boyfriend, Robert Valletta."
"Although shayana and Shay seem to have ended their reunion well and exchanged best wishes while embracing each other, this experience still can't satisfy Saville."
"I sent him an email after the reunion because I think I'm harsh in some places, I feel a little cold in others, "Shanna told e!"
"Reunite the pre broadcast news."
"Then, from the way he found rob, I think I need to give him a little more explanation."
Shanna said she had never received a reply from Shay, but she heard that he had read it through a mutual friend, and she said, "that's enough for me."
"It's strange, but I think that day did bring me some closure, at least," she said



Number  225
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Despite that, the insider said the family “respect her decision.””
“I love you to infinity!”While Thompson and the mother of one seem to be doing well despite a cheating scandal that occurred in April just days before Khloé was due to give birth, a source told PEOPLE that the reconciliation didn’t go over well with the KarJenner clan.”
“The KKW beauty mogul, 37, celebrated her sister’s 34th birthday on Wednesday and documented all of it on her Instagram Story.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Tristan Thompson, Khloé’s boyfriend, was also present at the festivities so Kim took the opportunity to rebuild their relationship – well, their social media relationship at least.”
““All right guys, what do you think?”
“It’s Khloé’s birthday, should I ask this guy to unblock me?” she asked, revealing to all of her fans that Thompson, 27, had blocked the TV reality star on Instagram in the wake of his cheating scandal.”
“Thompson, who was in the background with Khloé standing over his shoulder, began to laugh.”
“Image zoom Kim and Khloe Kardashian with Tristan Thompson“For Khloé’s birthday it’s only right,” he said.”
““I got you.”“Was that a yes?” Kim asked him, to which Thompson said, “Si.”Image zoom Credit: kim kardashian instagra story, june 27, 2018Kim celebrated but then decided to make Thompson unblock her then and there.”


"Nevertheless, the family" respects her decision, "the person familiar with the matter said
"I love you to infinity! "Although Thompson and the mother of one child seem to be doing well, and although there was a fraud scandal in April just a few days before Heroe was about to give birth, a source told people that the reconciliation of the kajana family is not going well."
The 37 year old kkw tycoon celebrated his sister's 34th birthday on Wednesday and recorded it on instagram
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Chloe's boyfriend Tristan Thompson also attended the celebration, so Kim took the opportunity to rebuild their relationship - well, at least on social media."
"Well, guys, what do you think?"
"Today is khlo é's birthday. Should I ask this guy to help me out? "She asked and revealed to all her fans that Thompson, 27, had blocked the reality TV star's cheating scandal on instagram."
"Thompson is standing behind and heloe is standing on his shoulder. He laughs."
"Kim and Kardashian took a picture with Tristan Thompson to celebrate Carol's birthday," he said
"I got you." "Yes? When Kim asked him, Thompson replied, "yes." Photo zooming credit: Kim kardashan instagra story, June 27, 2018 Kim celebrates, but later decided to let Thompson lift her ban at that time and there



Number  226
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We have no doubt that Canadians will continue to fall in love with this beautiful and heartwarming series for seasons to come."”
“"Anne With an E delivered a rich first season, drawing in both new and existing fans to the world of Avonlea.”
“"We are thrilled to be able to announce a third season of Anne With an E before season two premieres in Canada," said Sally Catto, general manager of programming at CBC.”
“Season three of the series will introduce characters and stories that will tackle issues including identity, feminism, bullying and gender parity.”
“I will explore important, contemporary themes that I hope will continue to resonate with, and inspire and uplift, our audience."”
“Added showrunner Walley-Beckett, "Our beloved Anne [Amybeth McNulty] will be 16 years old when we return to this season full of romantic complications, bold adventures and dramatic discoveries.”
“"We are excited to continue our partnership with CBC and Northwood and bring the series back for a third season."”
“"Through the storytelling of Anne With an E, the classic Canadian tale has transcended borders and found fans across our global membership," said Cindy Holland, vp original content at Netflix.”
“The coming-of-age story, from Northwood Entertainment and executive producers Moira Walley-Beckett (Breaking Bad) and Miranda de Pencier, will begin production on the third season in the winter for a debut later in 2019.”
“Netflix launched season two July 6; it comes to the CBC on Sept. 23.”


"We have no doubt that Canadians will continue to love this beautiful and warm series in the coming seasons."
"Annie with E did a great job in the first season, attracting new fans and existing fans to the world of avanlia."
"We are very happy to announce the launch of the third season of Annie before the second season premieres in Canada," said Sally Cato, general manager of CBC's program division
"The third season of the series will introduce characters and stories that will address issues of identity, feminism, bullying and gender equality."
"I will explore important contemporary themes that I hope will continue to resonate with, inspire and enhance the audience."
Host Wally Beckett added: "when we return to this season of romance, adventure and dramatic discovery, our beloved Anne (amebeth McNulty) will turn 16."
"We're happy to continue working with CBC and Northwood and bring the series back to season three
Cindy Holland, vice president of Netflix's original content, said: "through the story of Annie and E, this classic Canadian story has transcended national boundaries and found fans among our global members."
"The coming of age story, directed by Northwood entertainment and executive producers Moira Walley Beckett and Miranda de pencier, will begin shooting in the third winter season and premiere later in 2019."
"Netflix released its second season on July 6; it will be released on September 23 at CBC."



Number  227
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“25/25 SLIDES © Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“12/25 SLIDES © NBC/Photofest Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“2/25 SLIDES © Mark J. Terrill/AP/REX/Shutterstock Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“3/25 SLIDES © Walter McBride/Gettty Images Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“4/25 SLIDES © Trae Patton/NBC via Getty Images Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“Slideshow continues on the next slide5/25 SLIDES © Broadimage/REX/Shutterstock Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“6/25 SLIDES © Chris Haston/NBCU Photo Bank/NBC Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“7/25 SLIDES © REX/Shutterstock/Rex USA Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“8/25 SLIDES © Trae Patton /NBC via Getty Images Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“9/25 SLIDES © Denise Truscello/WireImage Microsoft may earn an Affiliate Commission if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”


"25 / 25 slides} if you purchase certain content through the recommended links in this article, Microsoft may receive affiliate commission."
"Slide 12 / 25} NBC / photofest if you purchase certain content through the links recommended in this article, Microsoft may receive an affiliate commission."
"2 / 25 slides} mark j.terrill/ap/rex/shutterstock if you buy something through the links recommended in this article, Microsoft may receive an affiliate commission."
"3 / 25 slides} Walter McBride / Getty Images if you purchase products through the recommended links in this article, Microsoft may receive affiliate commission."
"4 / 25 slides} trade Patton / NBC via Getty Images if you buy something through the recommended links in this article, Microsoft may receive affiliate commission."
"Next slide continue with 5 / 25 slides} broadimage / Rex / shutterstock if you buy something through the links recommended in this article, Microsoft may receive affiliate commission."
"6 / 25 slides} Chris haston / nbcu photo bank / NBC if you purchase certain content through the links recommended in this article, Microsoft may receive an affiliate commission."
"7 / 25 slides} Rex / shutterstock / Rex USA if you buy something through the recommended links in this article, Microsoft may receive affiliate commission."
"8 / 25 slides} trade Patton / NBC via Getty Images if you buy something through the links recommended in this article, Microsoft may receive affiliate commissions."
"9 / 25 slides} Denise truscello / WireImage if you purchase products through the recommended links in this article, Microsoft may receive affiliate commission."



Number  228
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So it becomes a very complex relationship.”Follow @htshowbiz for more...”
“And it goes without saying how he lived up to all of them.”
“It wasn’t any different for Emma Watson.”
“The Harry Potter star shares it was an honour for her to share screen space with Hanks in their upcoming techno-thriller, The Circle.”
“The film is being helmed by James Ponsoldt.”
““Getting to act with Tom Hanks in any scene is bit of a dream.”
“So like anything where it was the three of us (Hanks, Ponsoldt and her) it was kind of fun...,” says the 27-year-old.”
“Tom Hanks plays the character of Eamon Bailey in the techno-thriller titled The Circle.”
“(REUTERS)The actor was earlier quoted by the International media as saying that she started working on the film with a lot of expectations from Tom Hanks.”
““There’s no way he’s going to be as nice as everyone says he is and whatever else.”


"So it becomes a very complicated relationship." Follow @ htshowbiz to learn more
"Needless to say how he did it."
"It's no different for Emma Watson."
"Harry Potter stars share the honor of sharing screen space with Hanks in the upcoming tech thriller the circle."
"This movie is directed by James ponsalter."
"It's a dream to work with Tom Hanks in any scene."
"So it's like the three of us (Hanks, ponsalter and her) together, it's all fun..." The 27 year old said
"Tom Hanks plays the role of IMON Bailey in a technology thriller called strange circles."
"(Reuters) international media earlier quoted the actor as saying she started filming the film with Tom Hanks' expectation."
"He can't be as good as they say, no matter what else."



Number  229
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I understand where they are coming from, but I disagree with that being a good reason not to speak up.””
“However, it turns out that that wasn’t ALWAYS the case.”
“Zedd/InstagramThe INSIDER Summary:Zedd and Selena Gomez had a very short-lived romance back in 2015.”
“Zedd recently opened up in an interview about the dark side to dating the superstar.”
“The EDM star detailed a time when he was "pissed" after getting caught up in a media frenzy.”
“While he knew what he was getting into, Zedd had no idea that the relationship would change his life.”
“Oh my!”
“Zedd and Selena Gomez were one of our favorite short-lived romances.”
“They both seemed so sweet and so good for each other!”
“However, there was a dark side.”


"I understand where they come from, but I don't agree that it's a good reason not to talk."
"However, it turns out that is not always the case."
"Zedd / instagram insider summary: Zedd and Selena Gomez had a very short relationship as early as 2015."
"Zeder recently revealed the dark side of dating the superstar in an interview
"The EDM star detailed a period of time when he was" very angry "after falling into a media frenzy
"Although he knows what he's in, Zeder doesn't know that this relationship will change his life."
"My God
"Zeder and Selena Gomez are one of our favorite short-lived relationships."
"They both look so sweet, they're so nice to each other!"
"But there is also a dark side."



Number  230
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Imperfection is where great change and growth happens with us.””
“She wrote on Instagram in March 2017, “Even with a little bump in the road, nothing or nobody can be greater or make me feel more successful than @hank_baskett.”
“The Kendra on Top star, 32, admitted on Instagram that she and the former NFL player, 35, are facing more marital issues, but also denied a recent report that claimed the couple are “faking it for TV.”“1.”
“...how do u fake marital problems?”
“...makes absolutely no sense,” Wilkinson wrote on Wednesday, February 21.”
““2.”
“Yes we are having issues 3.”
“My job has been reality tv for 13 years 4.”
“My show was a comedy and light hearted til sad times happened then we had to change my show from comedy to drama.”
“Not what i wanted but was a part of my journey and story The Girls Next Door alum said that everyone knows about her issues with Baskett including producers and network friends and family She continued My job is reality TV and I love my job unfortunately these issues at...”


"Imperfection is where we change and grow."
"In March 2017, she wrote on instagram," even if the road is a little bumpy, there is nothing greater than @ Hank è u basketball, and no one can make me feel more successful than @ Hank è u basketball. "
Kendra, 32, admitted on instagram that she and the 35 year old former NFL player face more marital problems, but denied a recent report that claimed the couple "pretended on TV."
“… How do you pretend to have marital problems? "
“…… It doesn't make sense, "Wilkinson wrote on Wednesday, February 21
““2.”
"Yes, we have problem 3."
"I've been working on reality shows for 13 years."
"My show was comedy and lightness until the sad time happened, and then we had to change my show from comedy to drama."
"It's not what I want, it's part of my journey and story. The girl next door's alumni said that everyone knows her problems with basketball, including producers and online friends and family. She continues my work as a reality show, and I love my work. Unfortunately, these problems are..."



Number  231
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Both of the brothers removed their hats upon entrance to the chapel.”
“However, the heir to the throne added gold chained tassels.”
“Prince William arrived by his side, wearing the same uniform.”
“On the left side, he accessorized for four medal ribbons in honor of K.C.V.O., Afghanistan with rosette, The Queen's Golden Jubilee and The Queen's Diamond Jubilee.”
“...pants and white gloves signaling the Major rank...”
“Prince Harry who rose to become a Captain of the Army during his ten year service arrived at St George s Chapel at Windsor Castle wearing a black tunic with a white belt a red accented hat black and red...”
“Based on British tradition, it is an honor for a groom to demonstrate his alliance to the armed forces during his nuptials by wearing his formal uniform.”
“'s royal wedding ensemble is a lot like 's 2011 wedding outfit.”


"The brothers take off their hats as soon as they enter the church."
The heir to the throne, however, was given a gold chain
"Prince William came up to him in the same uniform."
On the left, he decorated four ribbons commemorating Afghanistan's k.c.v.o. with rosettes, the Queen's golden jubilee and the Queen's Diamond Jubilee
“… Trousers and white gloves indicate the position of a major... "
"Prince Harry was promoted to captain in the army during his ten years of service. When he came to St. George's Church in Windsor Castle, he was wearing a black tunic, a white belt and a red and black hat..."
"According to British tradition, it is an honor for the groom to show his alliance to the army in his formal uniform during the wedding."
"The royal wedding dress is very much like the wedding dress of 2011."



Number  232
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Moon actor previously dated Piper Perabo, while Bibb was married to businessman Rob Born from 2003 to 2004.”
“She reminds me of a young Mary Tyler Moore.”The pair met in Los Angeles in 2007 while he was filming Frost/Nixon.”
“… She’s really talented and funny herself.”
““She keeps me laughing.”
““She’s my beloved,” he told Us.”
“She’s very funny.”Later that night, Rockwell elaborated on his love for the model.”
“When Bibb chimed in, “And a healthy sense of humor,” her boyfriend added, “Yes, humor is important.”
“News cohost Giuliana Rancic with a laugh on the red carpet at the 2018 SAG Awards.”
““Communication and good sex,” he told E!”
“...the Oscar winner revealed yet another secret to their strong bond...”


"The lunar actor has dated Piper Perabo before, while Bieber married businessman rob, who was born between 2003 and 2004."
"She reminds me of a young Mary Tyler Moore." The two met in Los Angeles in 2007 while he was filming Frost / Nixon
“…… She's really talented and interesting herself
"She makes me laugh."
"She's my lover," he told us
"She's funny." Later that night, Rockwell recounted his love for models
"When Bieber interjected," and healthy sense of humor, "her boyfriend added," yes, humor is important. "
"Juliana ranch on the news network laughs on the red carpet of the 2018 sag awards ceremony."
"Communication and good sex," he told e! "
“… The Oscars reveal another secret of their close ties... "



Number  233
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"It would be nice for the guy to come over and be respectful and nice while my mom takes prom pics," the star added.”
“"I would want to go with someone who's not afraid, or doesn't think that he's too cool, to show up at my house with a rose corsage."”
“File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoKylie Jenner (R) and sister Kourtney Kardashian attend the InStyle and Warner Bros. Golden Globes after-party on January 10, 2016.”
“File Photo by David Silpa/UPI | License PhotoKylie Jenner attends the Harper's Bazaar Icons party on September 9, 2016.”
“The reality star accompanied high school junior Albert Ochoa to his prom at Rio Americano High School in Sacramento, Calif., on Saturday.”
“File Photo by Andrea Hanks/UPI | License PhotoApril 10 (UPI) -- Kylie Jenner surprised high school students Saturday by showing up as their classmate's date to prom.”
“The 19-year-old reality star accompanied high school junior Albert Ochoa to his prom at Rio Americano High School in Sacramento, Calif., with friend Jordyn Woods, according to E!”
“News.”
“AdvertisementJenner shared a photo on Snapchat of herself and Woods traveling on a private jet before arriving at Tsakopoulos Library Galleria for the dance.”
“The star wore a one-shoulder, blush-colored dress and a white corsage.”


"It would be great for him to come over and show respect and friendship when my mom takes Prom pictures," the star added
"I want to go with someone who's not afraid, or doesn't think he's too cool, and show up at my house with a bouquet of roses."
"Information photo of Jim ruymen / UPI | Kylie Jenner (right) and her sister Kourtney Kardashian attend the Party of InStyle and Warner Brothers Golden Globe Awards on January 10, 2016."
"Information photo of David silpa / UPI | license photo Kylie Jenner attended Harper's Bazaar icon party on September 9, 2016."
On Saturday, the reality star accompanied high school student Albert Ochoa to his prom at Rio America high school in Sacramento, California
Kylie Jenner surprised high school students when she appeared at the ball on April 10 as her classmate's date
According to e
"News."
"Jenner shared a photo of her and woods travelling on a private plane on snapchat and then went to the tsakopoulos library Galleria for a dance."
The star is wearing a one shoulder light red dress and a white brooch



Number  234
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And Leonardo DiCaprio was spotted in Sin City on Friday, surely there for the titanic bout.”
“The night before the fight, Sean “Diddy” Combs and Cedric the Entertainer were seen reveling at CIROC Vodka and AQUAhydrate’s kickoff party at the Palazzo Las Vegas.”
“Cute as ever, J-Rod both posted the snap on social media.”
“J.Lo struggled to contain her modesty as she posed with Kraft and her former Yankee beau.”
“Sizzling couple Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez traveled there by private jet courtesy of New England Patriots owner Robert Kraft.”
“Celebrities descended on Las Vegas in droves on Saturday to take in the fight of the summer: Floyd Mayweather vs. Conor McGregor.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)A post shared by Jennifer Lopez (@jlo) on Aug 26, 2017 at 10:34am PDTThey’re having a brawl!”


"Leonardo DiCaprio was found in sin city on Friday, definitely there for the Titanic race."
The night before the game, Sean Dee cooms and artist Cedric reveled at the kick-off Party of ciroc vodka and aquahydrate at the Las Vegas palace
"As cute as ever, j-rod posted this snapshot on social media."
"When Rowe was photographed with Kraft and her former Yankee boyfriend, she tried to restrain her modesty."
"The hot couple, Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez, went there by private jet, which was provided by New England Patriots owner Robert Kraft."
"Last Saturday, celebrities came to Las Vegas in droves for the summer battle: Floyd Mayweather vs. Connor McGregor."
"Click to send this email to a friend (open in a new window) Click to share on twitter (open in a new window) Click to share on Facebook (open in a new window) a post shared by Jennifer Lopez (@ JLO) at 10:34 am on August 26, 2017, they are fighting!"



Number  235
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The pair first fuelled speculation they had rekindled their romance after they were spotted kissing on the streets in New York City in May.”
“She's helped me to look at things from a positive angle."”
“...a second chance by spending quality time together on Zayn s farm in Pennsylvania...”
“The source told E!”
“News: "Gigi and Zayn are in a much better place since splitting.”
“"They needed the space apart for a bit and are now are giving things a second chance.”
“They are very happy together and everyone around them can see it."”
“Gigi's mother Yolanda is said to be supportive of the pair giving things another go as she "adores" the 25-year-old hunk.”
“They continued: "Gigi and Zayn have been spending a lot of time on Zayn's farm in Pennsylvania alongside Yolanda's.”
“"Zayn loves being in the rural area because he can clear his head.”


"In May this year, the two were found kissing on the streets of New York, which first sparked speculation that they had rekindled their relationship."
"She helped me see things from a positive perspective."
"Second chance, spend a good time at Zane farm in Pennsylvania..."
"The source told e!"
News: "since the breakup, Gigi and Zane have been in a much better situation."
"They need to separate the space a little bit, and now it's giving them a second chance."
"They're happy together, and everyone around them can see it."
"It is said that Gigi's mother Yolanda supports the two to try again because she" adores "the 25-year-old handsome man."
They went on: "Gigi and Zane spent a lot of time on Zane's farm in Pennsylvania and on the farm in Yolanda."
"Zane likes to stay in the countryside because he can clear his head."



**Something goes wrong**
“Pass the popcorn!”
“A good friend of mine works with Michael Capponi, and I connected her and Bethenny.”
“Just make sure they don’t touch my two-egg scramble.”
“I seem crazy, no?”
“Clearly I’m not having a good week.”
“Adam, of three years, announces he went on a date, and that takes me by surprise.”
“But it’s not as surprising as the passive-aggressive digs my friend continues to make about me.”
“I see you…Bethenny can invite whomever the hell she wants to Puerto Rico, but could it be that I didn’t express any interest in going because she didn’t express any interest in having me go?”
“I didn’t know she and Dorinda were going until they were already there.”
“While she talks smack about me on the show, I’m saying how proud I am of her.”


"Pass me the popcorn!"
"A good friend of mine works with Michael caponi, and I connected her with besseigne."
"Just make sure they don't touch my two eggs."
"I seem crazy, don't I?"
"Obviously I've had a bad week."
"Three year old Adam announced that he was going on a date, which surprised me."
"But that's not surprising, because my friends have been teasing me."
"I see you Besseini can invite anyone she wants to go to Puerto Rico, but is it because she doesn't express any interest in letting me go, so I don't have any interest in going to Puerto Rico? "
"I didn't know she and Dorinda were going until they were already there."
"When she talked about me on the show, I was saying how proud I was of her."



Number  237
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Which of today’s TVLine Items piques your interest?”
“The series premieres Friday, Aug. 24.”
“* Netflix has released a second trailer for the drama The Innocents, about two teenagers who run away to be together and then discover that one of them has the ability to shape-shift.”
“* Iddo Goldberg (Salem) has joined the cast of TNT’s upcoming Snowpiercer series, playing an engineer, per Deadline.”
“* Freeform’s black-ish spinoff grown-ish will return for Season 2 in January 2019.”
“* CBS will air the special Carpool Karaoke: When Corden Met McCartney Live From Liverpool, featuring new footage, on Monday, Aug. 20 at 8/7c.”
“* Mark Tallman (Rise) will recur during Season 20 of Law & Order: SVU as Gavin Riley, the chief of detectives who’s looking to make his presence felt on his way to becoming governor someday, per Deadline.”
“* Michael McGrady (Ray Donovan) and Ruffin Prentiss (The Arrangement) will recur during Season 2 of CBS’ SEAL Team as a commanding officer and a EOD (Explosives Ordinance Disposal) tech, respectively, Deadline reports.”
“The current season wraps its run on Thursday, Sept. 6.”
“Well…* HGTV has renewed Flip or Flop for a 15-episode Season 8, our sister site Deadline reports.”


"Which of today's tvline projects interests you?"
The play will premiere on Friday, August 24
*Netflix released the second trailer for "the innocent," about two teenagers running away from home to be together and finding out that one of them has the ability to transform
*Iddo Goldberg (Salem) has joined the cast of TNT's upcoming Snowman series, playing an engineer, every deadline
"* freeform's black derivative, grow ISH, will return to the second quarter in January 2019."
*CBS will air its special "carpool karaoke: when core met McCartney live from lifepool" at 8 / 7 on Monday, August 20, with new footage
"* mark Talman (rise) will appear in law and order: SVU season 20 as Gavin Riley, the detective director, who hopes to make his presence felt on the way to becoming governor one day within the deadline."
"* Michael McGrady (ray Donovan) and Rufin prentice (arrangement) will return as commander and explosive ordnance disposal (EOD) technician in season 2 of CBS seals, respectively, with a deadline to report."
"The season will end on Thursday, September 6."
"Well *According to the deadline of our sister website, HGTV has staged a remake of Season 8's 15 episodes. "



Number  238
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Drop ’em in a comment below.”
“Your hopes for the rest of its freshman season, as well as its second outing?”
“New episodes of The Good Doctor air Mondays at 10/9c, with its finale currently penciled in for March 26.”
“Its freshman run resumes Monday, March 12 at 10/9c,with its finale set to air March 26.”
“Season to date, The Good Doctor is averaging 10 million total viewers and a 1.8 demo rating, making it ABC’s most watched and second highest-rated program (behind Grey’s Anatomy).”
“The show’s cast also includes Nicholas Gonzalez, Antonia Thomas, Chuku Modu, Beau Garrett, Irene Keng, Hill Harper, Richard Schiff and Tamlyn Tomita.”
“ pic.twitter.com/2qTiDhiERO — The Good Doctor (@GoodDoctorABC) March 7, 2018The Good Doctor stars Freddie Highmore (Bates Motel) as Shaun Murphy, an autistic young surgeon who moves to California to work at a prestigious hospital.”
“Congratulations to #TheGoodDoctor!!!”
“The announcement was made Wednesday on the show’s social media accounts:The doctor is in for a SECOND season!”
“ABC is riding high(more) on The Good Doctor, renewing the hit medical drama for a second season.”


"Put them in the comments below."
"What are your hopes for the rest of your freshman year and a second trip?"
The new episode of "good doctor" will air on Monday at 10 / 9 degrees Celsius, with the final episode on March 26
"On Monday, March 12, at 10:9 a.m., the freshman run will continue, and the last episode will be broadcast on March 26."
"So far, the average total audience rating of" good doctor "is 10 million, and the trial rate is 1.8%, making it the highest and second highest ratings program of ABC (second only to Gray's anatomy)
"The cast also includes Nicholas Gonzalez, Antonia Thomas, juku modu, Bo Garrett, Eileen Ken, Hill Harper, Richard Schiff and Tamlyn Tomita."
“  pic.twitter.com/2qTiDhiERO -Good doctor (ABC) 2007-03-03 Freddie haymore (Bates Motel) plays Sean Murphy, a young autistic surgeon who moves to a famous hospital in California
"Congratulations to the good doctor!"
The news was announced on the show's social media on Wednesday: "doctors are in season two again!"
ABC has high hopes for the good doctor and will continue the popular medical drama for the second season



Number  239
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...on June 29.”
“Season 2 of WAGS Miami premieres on E!”
“...show.”
““Lots of bling, candles everywhere and gold touches.”The couple got engaged during a November 2016 episode of the hit E!”
““Everything is very formal beach glamour, it’s a beach wedding, but still very glam,” Roberts told Us of her vision.”
“Their beach-glam wedding also featured lots of candles and gold touches.”
““I wanted to be able to dance the night away,” Roberts told Us.”
“It was perfect.”The bride wore two dresses for her big day: During the ceremony she opted for a Milady-designed mermaid gown, which featured bling everywhere, and for the reception, she changed into a Lena Bernisha-designed dress with a detachable train.”
““The island is close to Aruba, but closer to Venezuela and South America and it’s only a two-hour flight from Miami.”
““I really wanted to pick a place that no one I knew had been before … so it would be an experience not just for me and Phil, but for everyone,” Roberts told Us of the location ahead of their big day.”


“… 29 June. "
"Swing Miami" Season 2 premiere
“… Performance. "
"There's jewelry everywhere, candles and gold ornaments everywhere." The couple got engaged on the hit show E in November 2016! "
"It's all very formal beach glamour, it's a beach wedding, but it's still very dazzling," Roberts told us of her vision
"Their beach wedding also has a lot of candles and gold decorations."
"I want to dance at night," Roberts told us
"It's perfect." The bride wore two dresses on her big day: at the wedding, she chose a mermaid dress designed by miradi, which was full of shining decorations; at the reception, she changed into a dress designed by Lina bernissa with a detachable train
"The island is very close to Aruba, but closer to Venezuela and South America, only two hours' flight from Miami."
"I really want to choose a place that no one I know has been to So it's an experience not only for Phil and me, but for everyone, "Roberts told us about the site before their big day



**Something goes wrong**
““Thanks for all your love & support and please remind your Congresspeople that every kid deserves the care Billy got.””
“...has actual feelings and he doesn t seem to be that worried about other people s feelings But seven years after the feud first began they have chosen to bury the hatchet...”
“On a recent Awards Chatter podcast with The Hollywood Reporter, the Jimmy Kimmel Live!”
“...host admitted that he and Leno “made peace” after his baby boy, Billy, underwent open heart surgery as a newborn earlier this year.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Jay and I have made peace,” Kimmel, 49, shared.”
““After my son had his operation, he called me and he was very nice.”Kimmel and Leno’s feud dates back to 2010, when there was a late-night talk show shakeup during which Leno replaced Conan O’Brien as the host of The Tonight Show.”
“Following Kimmel and Leno s initial back and forth bashing Kimmel admitted at the time to sucker punching Leno the two continued in their public squabble with Kimmel telling Playboy in March 2013 I always feel bad if I hurt anybody s feelings but I don t believe Jay Leno...”
““You can’t argue with [Leno’s] success and his longevity,” the Live!”
“Image zoom Credit: Jimmy Kimmel/Instagram“Billy is three months old today and doing great,” he wrote on social media.”


"Thank you for your love and support. Please remind your Congressman that every child deserves Billy's attention."
“…… He doesn't seem to be so worried about other people's feelings when he has real feelings, but seven years after the beginning of the disagreement, they chose to sever the relationship.... "
"In a recent live chat podcast with a Hollywood Reporter, Jimmy Kimmel award!"
“…… The host admitted that he and Renault "reconciled" after his baby boy, Billy, underwent open heart surgery as a newborn earlier this year
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Jay and I have made up," said Kimmel, 49
"My son called me after his operation. He was very kind." Kimmel's feud with Renault can be traced back to 2010, when Renault replaced Conan O'Brien as the host of the "Tonight Show" after a late night talk show adjustment
"After Kimmel and Renault's initial repeated attacks, Kimmel admitted that they continued to quarrel in public at that time. Kimmel told Playboy in March 2013 that if I hurt anyone's feelings, I always feel very sad, but I don't believe in Jay Renault..."
"You can't argue with [Renault's] success and longevity," the live broadcast said
"Credit for image zooming: Jimi Kimmel / instagram." Billy is three months old today and does a good job, "he wrote on social media



Number  241
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“His upcoming album is scheduled for release sometime before the end of this year.”
“They’re all very different,” he stated.”
“He not only has the number one song it the world right now, but he managed to rock the stage at the season 12 finale of the show.”
“The 39-year-old singer performed the fresh hit alongside Daddy Yankee and the show’s contestant Mark Isaiah who carried out with grace Justin Bieber’s verses and chorus.”
“Fonsi joined Bieber on stage during the Purpose Tour’s show in Puerto Rico, and there they played the remix for the first time together, and it was unbelievable.”
“Before Fonsi hit the NBC stage, he admitted that he is honored to be there on that special night for him.”
“The preparation for his performance took some time to come out as great is it did.”
““It’s tough when it gets down to the finals.”
“These final four voices, performers are amazing,” he admitted being proud to be there.”
““I don’t have a favorite.”


"His upcoming album is scheduled to be released by the end of this year."
"They're all very different," he said
"He not only has the number one song in the world, but also shakes the stage in the finale of season 12."
"The 39 year old singer performed the new song with Yankee dad and the show's contestant mark Isaiah, who performed with grace Justin Bieber's verse and chorus."
In Puerto Rico's purpose tour, Fonsi joined Bieber's stage, where they played the remix together for the first time, unbelievable
"Before he made his debut on NBC, he admitted that he was honored to be there on that special night."
"It took him a while to prepare for his performance so well."
"It's hard to get to the final."
"These last four voices, the performers are amazing," he admitted, very proud to be there
"I don't have a favorite."



Number  242
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“How does the current order of succession stack up?”
“Eugenie is currently eighth in line to the throne, but will be ninth in line after the arrival of William and Kate's third child.”
“The couple became engaged in Nicaragua earlier this month and will tie the knot in the autumn at St George's Chapel in Windsor - the church hosting Prince Harry and Meghan Markle's wedding in May.”
“Eugenie, 27, was pictured with her ring at Buckingham Palace in official photographs marking their forthcoming big day.”
“Image: The ring is an oval padparadscha sapphire surrounded by diamonds, set on a gold bandThe oval padparadscha sapphire surrounded by diamonds is set on a gold band and is similar in shape and design to her mother the Duchess of York's engagement ring.”
“Eugenie began dating Mr Brooksbank, 29, around seven years ago after they met while skiing in the Swiss resort of Verbier.”
“AdvertisementImage: The pair at the Qatar Goodwood Festival in 2015The Stowe-educated socialite was the manager of Mayfair nightclub Mahiki and is now the UK brand ambassador of Casamigos Tequila, which was co-founded by actor George Clooney.”
“Buckingham Palace said Eugenie's parents, the Duke of York and his former wife Sarah Duchess of York, were delighted to announce the engagement.”
“I always say that the river flows well to it s destiny because of the guidance of a solid rock engagement eugieandjack TheDukeOfYork TheDukeOfYork pic twitter com hvCnnOwZpo Sarah Ferguson SarahTheDuchess 22 January 2018 Sarah Ferguson tweeted a series of pictures showing Princess Eugenie with Mr Brooksbank saying I always...”
“...say that the river flows well to it s destiny because of the guidance of a solid rock...”


"What is the current succession order?"
"Eugenie is now the eighth in line to the throne, but she will be the ninth in line after the birth of William and Kate's third child."
"The couple were engaged in Nicaraguan earlier this month and will be married in the fall at St George's chapel in Windsor, where Prince Harry and Meghan Markle married in May."
Eugenie, 27, took a group photo with the ring at Buckingham Palace, an official photo commemorating their upcoming important day
Information picture: this ring is a diamond inlaid oval padpaladosha sapphire, inlaid in a gold ring. The oval padpaladosha sapphire with diamonds is set on a gold ring, similar in shape and design to the engagement ring of her mother, the Duchess of York
Seven years ago, Brooksbank, 29, met while skiing in the Swiss resort of Weber, and Eugenie began dating him
"Advertising image: two people at the Goodwood Music Festival in Qatar in 2015. Stoy graduated from University as the manager of mahiki, the Mayfair nightclub, and is now the British brand ambassador of casamigos tequila, co founded by actor George Clooney."
Buckingham Palace said Eugenie's parents, the Duke of York, and his ex-wife, Sarah, the Duchess of York, were happy to announce their engagement
"I always say that this river is heading for its destiny because of a solid rock contact that guides Eugene and Jack's duchiofeak's duchiofeak picture tweet website hvcnnowzpo Sarah Ferguson Sarah the Duchess January 22, 2018 Sarah Ferguson tweets a series of photos showing Princess Eugenie and Mr. Brooksbank saying that I always..."
“… The river flows to its destiny because of the guidance of a solid rock



Number  243
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...best lives in Greece...”
“I try not to worry who I m standing next to and just share good moments with you guys Ming who recently graduated from high school reposted her little sister s message saying I literally aspire to be my sister Currently the Simmons sisters and their mom are living their...”
““We all want to look nice in our photos but I’ve tried to let all of that go and just post pictures where I look happy or was actually having a good time.”
““I’ve dealt with a lot of negativity on Instagram, comments saying I’m not as pretty as my big sister (who is the best by the way),” she added.”
““It’s easy to get insecure when your sister and mom are models.”Nowadays, however, she just wants her pics to reflect the times where she’s happy.”
“News reports.”
“E”
“I used to be very picky about pictures and not really show my face and would often not post pictures of cool events or important moments because I didn t like my smile or I was standing next to my beautiful sister she shared in the since expired message as...”
“The youngest Simmons made an emotional statement on her Instagram stories sharing how she felt insecure about her appearance.”
“Aoki Lee, the 15-year-old daughter of Russell Simmons and Kimora Lee Simmons, recently opened up about online trolls and dealing with anxiety over being what people considered “not as pretty” as her 18-year-old sister, Ming Lee.”


“… The best life in Greece... "
"I try not to worry about who I'm standing next to, just to share a wonderful moment with you. Recently, Ming, who just graduated from high school, forwarded her sister's message, saying that I really want to be my sister. Now Simmons sisters and their mother live their lives..."
"We all want our photos to look beautiful, but I try to let them go, just post them where I look happy or actually happy."
"I've had a lot of negative comments on instagram that I'm not as beautiful as my sister (she's the best, by the way)," she added
"It's easy to feel insecure when your sister and mom are both models." Now, however, she just wants her photos to reflect her happy times
"News coverage."
“E”
"I used to be very picky about photos, and I didn't really show my face, and I didn't often post photos of cool events or important moments, because I didn't like my smile, or I was standing next to my beautiful sister, and what she shared in her expired messages was..."
"The youngest Simmons made a touching comment on instagram to share her insecurity about her appearance."
Aoki Lee, the 15-year-old daughter of Russell Simmons and Kimora Lee Simmons, recently made public about the Internet troll and dealt with the anxiety that people thought she was not as bright as her 18-year-old sister Ming Lee



Number  244
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO: Sideswiped’ Star Rosanna Arquette Reveals Why the Film Came at Such a Crucial Time in Her Life...”
“We’re in PTSD,” the actress said.”
“It’s been really painful for all of us.”
““It’s been fractured and hard since Alexis passed.”
“During her visit, Arquette also revealed her family is suffering “PTSD” over her sister Alexis’ death almost two years ago.”
““But that was in the old, old days.”Beatty is of course now married to Annette Bening, who Arquette described as “the greatest.” The two wed in 1992 and share four children — Stephen Ira, 25, Benjamin, 23, Isabel, 20, and Ella, 17.”
“The night’s other guest, Laverne Cox, asked Arquette the question on everyone’s mind: “Why did you say no to Warren Beatty, girl?”“He’s very handsome, beautiful, but it just didn’t feel like it was for me,” she explained.”
““Warren Beatty,” she answered, to a surprised-looking Cohen.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The actress, 58, was on Thursday’s Watch What Happens Live with Andy Cohen where she was asked by a fan if she’d ever turned down a Hollywood star when her own was rising in the ’80s thanks to films like Desperately Seeking Susan and The Big Blue.”


"Related video: Sideswipe 'star Rosana Arquette reveals why the film appears at such a critical moment in her life..."
"We have PTSD," the actress said
"It's painful for all of us."
"It's broken since Alexis died, and it's hard."
During the visit, Arquette also revealed that her family suffered from "post-traumatic stress disorder" due to the death of her sister Alexis two years ago
"But that's in the past." Beattie is now of course married to Annette bening, whom Arquette describes as "the greatest.". They married in 1992 and have four children - 25-year-old Stephen Ella, 23-year-old Benjamin, 20-year-old Isabel and 17-year-old Ella
Another guest that night, raven Cox, asked Arquette the question in everyone's heart: "why do you say no to Warren Beatty, girl? "He's handsome and beautiful, but I don't think he's right for me," she explained
"Warren Beatty," she replied, and Cohen looked surprised
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The 58 year old actress was asked by a fan on Thursday's "living with Andy Cohen" whether she turned down a Hollywood star when she rose in the 1980s with films such as desperate looking for Susan and giant blue



Number  245
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“The singer is honest, obsessed with her team, and packs some seriously impressive style goals to boot.”
“During the elimination night for the Top 11, she made it even more apparent that she’s her contestants' biggest fan in just one comment caught on camera.”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Though Sarah Grace and Kymberli Joye were saved by America’s votes, Kelly’s other charges, Chevel Shepherd and Lynnea Moorer, were two of the last three on the stage.”
“Fortunately for 16-year-old Chevel—who continues to stun viewers week after week—host Carson Daly called her name, securing her spot in the top 10.”
“Kelly was, of course, thrilled that Chevel was moving forward, and immediately hopped up to give the young artist a big hug—and some reassurance.”
““It’s not in any order,” she quickly told Chevel, who fanned herself as she joined her coach.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"The singer is honest, obsessed with his team and has some impressive style goals to guide."
"On the night of the last 11 knockout, a sentence captured by her camera clearly showed that she was the biggest fan of the contestants."
This content was imported from {embedded name}
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Although Sarah grace and Kimberly joy were rescued by the American vote, Kelly's other charges, shevel Shepard and Lina Muller, were two of the last three on stage."
"Fortunately, 16-year-old chevel stunned the audience week after week, and the host Carson Daly gave her a name to ensure her place in the top ten."
"Of course, Kelly was excited about chevel's progress and immediately jumped up to give the young artist a big hug and some comfort."
"It's not an order," she quickly told chevel, slapping herself as she joined her coach



Number  246
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Davidson also confirmed in mid-May that he had split from his longtime girlfriend Cazzie David, around the same time he wrapped his fourth season performing on SNL.”
“The couple’s surprise outing came just hours after both Davidson and Grande gushed over their engagement bliss on social media.”
“...and John Mayer was there too During a surprise night out in New York City the No Tears Left to Cry singer 24 supported Davidson as he performed an unannounced set at the Comedy Cellar in New York City on Friday and John Mayer who s currently touring the country...”
“...with Dead Company was there too...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Sharing a photograph of the group outing stand up comedian Sherrod Small who appeared in Mayer s music video for Who Says and has also performed in comedy bits on VH1 with the singer songwriter didn t skimp on the heart emojis as he congratulated the Almost Newlyweds Pete good...”
“...move Small added alongside the smiling photo in which Grande and Davidson made silly faces while Mayer 40 smiled...”
““She’s smart, funny and adorable.”
“Congrats.”Davidson also shared a photograph from the outing, calling the legendary comedy venue his “home.”“Went home last nite,” the Staten Island native captioned an image of himself smiling during his set in the Big Apple.”
“On Saturday, after sharing two very loving tributes to one of her dogs, Grande also appeared to share a video in which almost every other word out of her mouth was Davidson’s name.”


"Davidson also confirmed in mid May that he had broken up with his longtime girlfriend, Katie David. At about the same time, he finished his fourth season performance at SNL."
"Just hours after Davidson and grand talked about their engagement on social media, the couple made a surprise trip."
“…… John Mayer was also there on a surprise night in New York. The singer of cry without tears supported Davidson on the 24th. He performed an unannounced scene in the comedy cellar of New York on Friday, while John Mayer is currently on a national tour.... "
“… My best friend is there too... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Share a photo of a group tour stand up comedian, Sherrod smalle, who appeared in Mayer's music video for who said, and also performed comedy clips on VH1. The singer and songwriter didn't miss his inner expression when congratulating Peter Goode, who was almost newly married..."
“… Moving small plus next to the smile photo, in which grand and Davidson make stupid faces, while Mayer 40 smiles... "
"She's smart, funny and cute."
"Congratulations." Davidson also shared a photo of his trip, calling the legendary comedy venue his "home.". "I went home last night," the Stanton Islander wrote on the set of "Big Apple" with a smile of his own
"On Saturday, after two very emotional tributes to one of her dogs, she seemed to share a video in which almost every word in her mouth was Davidson's name."



Number  247
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But it’s the months that follow, and how he chooses to use his platform now, that will define the sincerity of his words.”
““It didn’t feel right to comment on it right away,” Jake says.”
“The video sparked immediate backlash online, and Paul removed the video from his channel and posted two apologies in the days that followed.”
“On January 3rd, he tweeted “taking time to reflect no vlog for now see you soon,” and hasn’t been heard from since — until now.”
““I know I’ve made mistakes,” says Paul in his newest vlog, as mournful piano music plays behind him.”
““I know I’ve let people down.” Paul says he has spent the last three weeks trying to address his ignorance about the issue of suicide and wants to share what he has learned in hopes of making a difference.”
“The video opens with a first-person account of a suicide attempt from Kevin Hines, a man who jumped off the Golden Gate Bridge, and it features a conversation between Paul and Dr. John Draper, the director of the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline.”
“Paul also plans to donate $1 million to suicide prevention organizations.”
“Although Logan has been silent on the subject until today, Jake Paul — Logan’s brother and another popular influencer — addressed the controversy briefly in a video posted January 22nd.”
““I think what Logan did was very, very, very wrong, and he made a huge mistake,” Jake says.”


"But the next few months, and how he chooses to use his own platform now, will determine his sincerity."
"It's not right to comment now," Jack said
"The video immediately caused a strong reaction on the Internet. Paul deleted the video from his channel and apologized twice in the following days."
On January 3, he tweeted that "take time to reflect, no vlog for the time being". Since then, there has been no news until now
"I know I made a mistake," Paul said in his latest video log, as sad piano music sounded behind him
"I know I let people down." Paul said that in the past three weeks, he has been trying to solve his ignorance of suicide and hopes to share with you what he has learned in order to make a difference
"This video begins with the first person description of Kevin Hines, a man who jumps off the Golden Gate Bridge, and a conversation between Paul and Dr. John Draper, director of the national suicide prevention lifeline."
"Paul also plans to donate $1 million to suicide prevention organizations."
"Although Logan has remained silent on this issue to this day, Jack Paul, Logan's brother and another popular influencer, spoke briefly about the controversy in a video released on January 22."
"I think what Logan did was very, very, very wrong, he made a huge mistake," Jack said



Number  248
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“The Playboy impresario died on Sept. 27 at the age of 91 from cardiac arrest.”
“According to documents obtained by ET Hefner s trust states that if any of his beneficiaries which include his four children Christie David Marston and Cooper and his widow Crystal frequently uses or consumes any illegal substances and is dependent on the drug or chemical substance they will be removed...”
“...from his trust...”
“If the trustees reasonably believe that a beneficiary of any trust routinely or frequently uses or consumes any illegal substance so as to be physically or psychologically dependent upon that substance or is clinically dependent upon the use or consumption of alcohol or any other legal drug or chemical substance...”
“...that is not prescribed by a board certified medical doctor or psychiatrist in a current program of treatment supervised by such doctor or psychiatrist and if the Trustees reasonably believe that as a result the beneficiary is unable to care for himself or herself or is unable to manage his...”
“...or her financial affairs all mandatory distributions to the beneficiary all the beneficiary s withdrawal rights and all of the beneficiary s rights to participate in decisions concerning the removal and appointment of Trustees will be suspended reads the trust...”
“The document also states that the trustees can request drug testing and treatment from any of the beneficiaries if they suspect any drug abuse.”
“They also have the power to resume the distribution of funds to the person if and when "examinations indicate no such use for 12 months" and when the "Trustee in their discretion determine that the beneficiary is able to care for himself or herself" and manage their financial affairs.”
“According to Hefner's death certificate, obtained by ET at the time, secondary causes included respiratory failure, septicemia and drug-resistant E. Coli.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Playboy CEO died of cardiac arrest on September 27 at the age of 91."
"According to documents obtained by ET Hefner trust, if any of his beneficiaries, including his four children, Christie David Marston and Cooper, and his widow, Christo, regularly use or consume any illegal substance and rely on it, they will be removed..."
“… From his trust... "
"If the trustee reasonably believes that the beneficiary of any trust regularly or regularly uses or consumes any illegal substance so as to be physically or psychologically dependent on it, or clinically dependent on the use or consumption of alcohol or any other lawful drug or chemical substance..."
“…… It is not prescribed by a doctor or psychiatrist certified by the board in the current treatment plan under the supervision of that doctor or psychiatrist, and if the trustee reasonably believes that the beneficiary is therefore unable to take care of or manage himself... "
“…… Or all of its financial mandatory allocation to the beneficiary's drawing rights and all of the beneficiary's rights to participate in decisions regarding the removal and appointment of the trustee will be suspended... "
"The document also states that trustees can ask any beneficiary for drug testing and treatment if they suspect drug use."
They also have the right to resume the distribution of funds to the person if "the inspection shows that there is no such use within 12 months" and "the trustee, in its sole discretion, decides that the beneficiary can take care of himself" and manage the finance
"According to the Hefner death certificate obtained by et at that time, the secondary causes included respiratory failure, sepsis and drug-resistant Escherichia coli."



**Something goes wrong**
“She most recently starred on the Sky Atlantic series Riviera, which completed a first season in July.”
“A post shared by Stiley Jay (@missjuliastiles) on Aug 1, 2017 at 6:15pm PDTStiles is known for such films as 10 Things I Hate About You, Save the Last Dance and The Bourne Identity.”
“Alright, I couldn't resist.”
“"We're really slow on the wedding planning so I haven't really been soliciting advice."”
“"I'm not getting a ton of marital advice," she added.”
“"We stayed on an island that was really beautiful and there was a lot of great snorkeling."”
“"All around, it was a really wonderful trip," Stiles told People in August.”
“The couple met on the set of the 2015 movie Go with Me, and got engaged in Isla Grande, Columbia, on Christmas Eve in 2015.”
“Stiles' rep confirmed in June that Stiles and Cook, an actor and camera assistant, will welcome a baby later this year.”
“Advertisement"Alright, I couldn't resist," she captioned the picture.”


"She recently starred in the sky Atlantic series, the Riviera, which completed its first season in July."
"A post shared by stiley Jay (@ missjulistiles) at pdtstiles at 6:15 p.m. on August 1, 2017 is famous for films such as" 10 things I hate you, the last dance and Bourne Identity. "
"Well, I can't help it."
"We were really slow on wedding planning, so I didn't ask for advice."
"I didn't get much marriage advice," she added
"We live on a very beautiful island, where there are a lot of great snorkeling."
"It was a wonderful trip," stiles told people in August
"The couple met on the set of the 2015 movie" walk with me "and got engaged to Grand Island in Columbia on Christmas Eve 2015."
"Stiles representatives confirmed in June that stiles and cook, an actor and camera assistant, will have a baby later this year."
"Ad" well, I can't help it, "she added a title to the picture."



Number  250
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“StarStruck Teen Spirit The Secret Life of the American Teenager Seasons 1 5 Wendy Wu Homecoming Warrior Wizards of Waverly Place The Movie Leaving May 7 The Host Leaving May 12 Talladega Nights The Ballad of Ricky Bobby...”
“Lemonade Mouth Little Einsteins Seasons 1 2 My Fake Fiancé Phineas and Ferb the Movie Across the 2nd Dimension Phineas and Ferb Seasons 1 4 Princess Protection Program Princess A Modern Fairytale Read It and Weep Revenge of the Bridesmaids Sharpay s Fabulous Adventure Special Agent Oso Seasons 1 2”
“...s Christmas Hello Sister Goodbye Life High School Musical High School Musical 2 Jump In...”
“Julie Newmar Leaving May 2 12 Dates of Christmas Beauty the Briefcase Cadet Kelly Camp Rock Camp Rock 2 The Final Jam Cow Belles Cyberbully Disney s The Cheetah Girls Disney s The Cheetah Girls 2 Disney s The Cheetah Girls One World Frenemies Geek Charming Good Luck Charlie It...”
“Leaving May 1Bridget Jones’s DiaryCasperChappieCharlotte’s WebField of DreamsGoodFellasOcean’s ElevenSaharaSilent HillThe Exorcism of Emily RoseThe Hurt LockerTo Rome With LoveTo Wong Foo, Thanks for Everything!”
“Check out the list below for all the titles leaving Netflix in May.”
“The DCOM exodus takes up most of this month’s list, but rom-coms Bridget Jones’s Diary and To Rome With Love are also on last call, as well as Ocean’s Eleven, GoodFellas, and The Hurt Locker.”
“Both Camp Rock films and all three Cheetah Girls movies are leaving alongside one-off classics like Cadet Kelly, Cow Belles, Wendy Wu: Homecoming Warrior, and more.”
“The streaming service is saying goodbye to a laundry list of Disney Channel Original movies, including the mega-hit HSM, as well its sequel, High School Musical 2, and the spin-off, Sharpay’s Fabulous Adventure.”
“Buckle up, Disney fans: High School Musical is just one of many DCOMs leaving Netflix in May.”


"Star shining youth spirit secret life of American youth season 15 Wu Wendi's return to weaverish place warrior Wizard Movie leaves may 7 host leaves May 12 taradega night Ricky Bobbi's ballad..."
"Lemon mouth Little Einstein season 12 my fake fiance Phineas and Faber movie through the second dimension Phineas and Faber Season 14 Princess Protection Plan princess a modern fairy tale read it and crying Bridesmaid Sharp's mythical adventure revenge agent OSSO season 12"
“… S Christmas Hello sister goodbye life high school musical High School Musical 2 jump in... "
"Julie Newmar left 12 Christmas beauty dating briefcase students Kelly Camp Rock Camp Rock 2 last jam cow beauty cyber overlord Disney cheetah Girl Disney cheetah Girl Disney 2 Disney cheetah girl a world French geek charm good luck Charlie it..."
"Leave Bridget Jones's diary on May 1st, casperchappiecker harlotte's dream net, Goodfellas ocean's eleven Sahara silent hilthe Emily Rose's exorcism, injured lock and love, go to Rome Wong foo, thank you for everything!"
"Check out all the works listed below that left Netflix in May."
"DCOM's departure made up the majority of this month's list, but the diary of Romes Bridget Jones and going to Rome with love were also the last, as well as ocean 11, Goodfellas and the bomb disposal unit
"Whether it's a summer camp rock movie or all three cheetah girl movies, they will leave with one-time classics like Cadet Kelly, cow belles and Wendy Wu: Homecoming warrior."
"The streaming service is leaving the Disney Channel's list of original movies, including the super popular HSM, its sequel High School Musical 2, and its derivative" the wonderful adventures of Sharpay. "
"Disney fans, buckle up: high school musicals are just one of many dcoms that left Netflix in May."



**Something goes wrong**
“They noted in court records that those who were present at the home that morning “provided inconsistent and, at times, contradictory statements.””
“Investigators have said they are most concerned with who obtained the fentanyl, and have yet to charge anyone in Prince’s death.”
“...relievers...”
“Prince was found dead in the elevator of his home in Chanhassen Minn on April 21 2016 by Mr Johnson and others after he ingested the fatal amount of fentanyl which is often used to manufacture counterfeit pills that are sold on the black market as oxycodone and other pain...”
“In at least one instance, Prince procured an opiate prescription in the name of Kirk Johnson, a personal friend and employee since the 1980s, according to investigators.”
“But they sketch a picture of how this musician, a strict proponent of clean living who suffered from chronic hip pain, concealed his opioid addiction using a variety of methods, including mixing various prescription pills in bottles for everyday products like Bayer and Aleve.”
“The documents do not solve the mystery of where Prince got the powerful opioid fentanyl that killed him.”
“Search warrants and affidavits from the Carver County Sheriff’s Office, which is leading the continuing homicide investigation in conjunction with the Drug Enforcement Administration, were unsealed on Monday.”
“...a close aide according to newly released court documents related to the investigation into the accidental opioid overdose that killed Prince last year...”
“At the time of Prince s death his Paisley Park home and recording compound in Minnesota were strewn with a sizable amount of narcotic painkillers for which he did not have prescriptions including some hidden in over the counter vitamin and aspirin bottles and others issued in the name of...”


"They pointed out in court records that those who were at home that morning" provided contradictory statements, sometimes even contradictory statements. "
Investigators say they are most concerned about who got fentanyl and have yet to make any charges against the prince's death
“… The benefactor... "
"Prince was found dead on April 21, 2016 by Mr. Johnson and others in the elevator of his home in Chanhassen, Minnesota, because he ingested a lethal amount of fentanyl, which is usually used to make counterfeit drugs and sold on the black market as oxycodone and other painkillers..."
At least once, Prince bought an opium prescription in the name of Kirk Johnson, a personal friend and employee since the 1980s, according to investigators
"But they sketched a picture of how this musician, a strict advocate of clean life, suffers from chronic hip pain, and how he conceals his opioid addiction in various ways, including mixing prescription drugs in bottles for daily use such as Bayer and Alef."
"These documents do not solve the mystery of where Prince got the powerful opioid fentanyl that killed him."
Search warrants and affidavits from the carver County Sheriff's office were unsealed on Monday. The carver County Sheriff's office is leading an ongoing homicide investigation with the DEA
“… A close aide, according to the latest court documents, is involved in the investigation into the accidental opioid overdose that killed Prince last year. "
"When the prince died, his home and recording field in Paisley Park, Minnesota, were littered with a large number of narcotic painkillers. He had no prescription, including some painkillers hidden in over-the-counter vitamin and aspirin bottles, and some with In the name of. "



Number  252
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



**Something goes wrong**
“Back then, actresses were expected to provide their own get-ups for award ceremonies, without the help of stylists.”
“Before the ceremony, Ms. Moreno explained that it had been fashioned for her in Manila.”
“The full skirt was made from the weighty brocade cloth typically used for a kimono obi.”
“Side Story in 1962”
“Presenting the Academy Award for best foreign language film to the Chilean movie A Fantastic Woman Ms Moreno scored major style points by dressing in a repurposed version of an outfit she wore to collect her own Oscar for West...”
“...stage in front of millions and to do it in heels...”
“Beyond her gift for collecting statuettes she is an EGOT having earned an Emmy a Grammy an Oscar and a Tony Ms Moreno is sharp minded and witty a longtime dancer nimble enough as an octogenarian to skitter across a...”
“The 86-year-old actress belongs to a specific elite.”
“In an Academy Awards ceremony centered on an exceptional number of gifted nominees over 40 — many of them women — the standout fashion moment was unquestionably that of Rita Moreno.”


"At that time, actresses were asked to dress up for the awards ceremony without the help of stylists."
Before the ceremony, Ms. Moreno explained that it was designed for her by Manila
"The whole skirt is made of heavy brocade, usually for kimonos."
"The story of 1962"
"The best foreign language film Oscar will be awarded to Ms. Moreno, the Chilean film" a magical woman ". She wears a redesigned dress and collects for her Oscar West, winning the main fashion points..."
“… Performing in front of millions of people, wearing high heels... "
"In addition to the gift of collecting statuettes, she is also a conceited person with Emmy, Grammy, Oscar and Tony Awards. Ms. Moreno has a keen mind and quick wit. She is a long-term dancer. She is as agile as an old man in her 80s. She can work in Jump up and down. "
"The 86 year old actress belongs to a certain elite class."
"At an academy awards ceremony, there are a large number of talented nominees over 40, many of them women, and this prominent fashion moment is undoubtedly Rita Moreno."



Number  254
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I play him at the Grove every time I go shopping."”
“And when we play together, we're at our best."”
“"When we sat down together, it just came to life in ways I'd never seen before or since," says Messing.”
“Moving forward with the show, it fits like a glove."”
“"We've all become brothers and sisters and family.”
“It can be hard to try to recapture past glories, but Hayes says the cast immediately fell back into their old groove.”
“"Now the message is 'we are us,' and we represent a lot of people in the country, gay and straight, and we're not apologizing for who we are."”
“That's all changed, says McCormack.”
“MORE: What to expect from your favorite TV showsWhen Will first aired, NBC asked the writers to stress the friendships among the characters and downplay the fact that two of them, Will and Jack, were gay.”
“Adds Mutchnick, "We never would have gone in that direction if we weren't ending the show."”


"Every time I go shopping, I play with him in the woods."
"When we play together, we are at our best."
"I've never seen this lifestyle when we're sitting together," messing said
"Looking forward, it fits like a glove."
"We're all brothers and sisters and family."
"It's very difficult to recapture the glory of the past, but Hayes said the actors immediately returned to their original state."
"The message now is' we are US'. We represent a lot of people in this country, gay and straight. We will not apologize for our identity."
"Everything has changed," McCormack said
"More: what to expect from your favorite TV show? When will first aired, NBC asked the writers to emphasize the friendship between the characters and downplay the fact that two of them, will and Jack, are gay."
Mutchek added: "if we don't finish the show, we won't move in that direction."



Number  255
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Resources:”
“I encourage all adults to have a healthy sex life to not be sex shamed and feel sexually liberated."”
“...loving mother and protector of my family and I fight for what is right and creating a better safer world...”
“While none of the defendants made any comments regarding the settlement Abraham had this to say As my MTV executives crew cast have all bought my branded products over the years I know my truth of being Farrah Abraham the...”
“The terms of the settlement are unknown, as they haven't been made public.”
“Settling the LawsuitAbraham filed papers on Tuesday stating that she was voluntarily dismissing with prejudice all of the claims she had made in her lawsuit after reaching a settlement with the defendants.”
“Abraham also claimed that Freeman made threats against her about "ending her career with MTV, sabotaging future deals Ms. Abraham had in place with MTV, and defaming her."”
“...entertainment industry...”
“Abraham claimed in her lawsuit that right before she was fired from the show Freeman and his production crew harassed humiliated discriminated against disrespected ridiculed degraded and sex shamed Abraham for her recent decision to pursue opportunities in the adult...”
“The lawsuit claimed harassment, wrongful termination based upon gender discrimination, and retaliation based upon gender discrimination.”


Related resources:
"I encourage all adults to have a healthy sex life, not to be sexually humiliated and feel sexually liberated."
“… My loving mother and the protector of my family and I fight for justice and create a safer world... "
"Although none of the defendants commented on the settlement agreement, Abraham said that because my MTV executives have bought my brand products over the years, I know the truth that I am Abraham Farah..."
"The terms of the settlement are unknown because they have not yet been made public."
"Settlement of legal proceedings Abraham filed a document on Tuesday saying that after reaching a settlement with the defendant, she voluntarily rejected all her claims in the lawsuit with prejudice."
Abraham also claimed that Freeman threatened her with "ending her career at MTV, undermining Abraham's future agreement with MTV and slandering her."
“… Entertainment... "
"Abraham claimed in her lawsuit that just before her dismissal, Freeman and his producers harassed, humiliated, disrespected, ridiculed, insulted and sexually humiliated Abraham because she recently decided to look for opportunities in adults..."
The lawsuit claims harassment, wrongful termination based on sex discrimination and retaliation based on sex discrimination



**Something goes wrong**
“...when the timing is right we will find our way to each other In the end Grimaldi came out of this a stronger person and wants nothing but the best for Viall...”
““It wasn’t the distance that was ever an issue.”
“...moving past her heartbreak...”
“Six months ago, fans of ABC’s The Bachelor watched Nick Viall and the Canada native fall in love and get engaged on last season’s finale.”
“Five months later, the duo announced their split, saying in a statement, “We gave this relationship our all and we are saddened that we did not get the fairytale ending we hoped for.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Now, the 29-year-old is opening up about why things didn’t work out and how she plans on moving forward.”
““My relationship with Nick and experience on The Bachelor has given me so many amazing and memorable moments in my life, and I am forever grateful,” Grimaldi exclusively tells PEOPLE in this week’s issue.”
““Nick and I were always transparent about the challenges in a relationship.”
“We certainly had ours.”
“I fell for him hard and when you fall in love that hard your heart breaks even harder Image zoom Credit David Crotty Patrick McMullan via Getty Images In the end as much as we loved each other and tried to make it work we just realized we were different...”


“…… When the time is right, we will find our way to each other. Finally, Grimaldi will come out of this and become a stronger person. He just wants to fight for the best thing for Villar.... "
"Distance is never an issue."
“… Over her heartbreak... "
"Six months ago, fans of ABC's Bachelor saw Nick Villar fall in love and get engaged with this Canadian native in the finale of last season."
Five months later, the two broke up and said in a statement: "we've given everything for this relationship and we're sad that we didn't get the fairy tale ending we wanted." Get news, feature, etc
"Now, at 29, she's starting to say frankly why things didn't work out and how she plans to move on."
"My relationship with Nick and my single experience have given me many amazing and unforgettable moments in my life, and I will always be grateful," Grimaldi told people exclusively in this week's People magazine
"Nick and I are always transparent about the challenges in love."
"Of course we have our own."
"I'm deeply in love with him. When you fall in love, your heart breaks even more. Finally, David crotti Patrick McMullen thanks through Getty Images, just as we love each other and try to make them work, we just realize that we are different... "



Number  257
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image: Instagram/@Heidipratt...”
“Cute or what?”
“Scroll through the following gallery of images and you'll quickly understand why.”
“He has his very own Instagram account and while he's posted just 22 images so far, has already clocked up more than 60,000 dedicated fans.”
“Gunner looks set to be a reality star just like his mama and papa.”
“But whether you liked or loathed them, you couldn't help but be moved by the genuine joy they showed when they welcomed baby boy Gunner Stone into the world in October 2017.”
“Heidi's many cosmetic surgeries and Spencer's bad boy behaviour meant the duo were the most loved/hated of the cast.”
“Speidi, as the couple was dubbed by the tabloids, were often front and centre of the show as they kissed, broke up, kissed and, well, you know what comes next.”
“The duo were regulars on the series The Hills, the reality TV show that followed their lives along with those of their co-stars/friends Lauren Conrad and Kristin Cavallari.”
“And they're clearly loving every moment - Heidi in particular.”


"Picture: instagram / @ heidipratt..."
"Lovely or what?"
"Scroll through the gallery below, and you'll soon find out why."
"He has his own instagram account, and although he has only published 22 images so far, he has attracted more than 60000 loyal fans."
"The shooter looks like his parents, destined to be a reality TV star."
"But whether you like them or hate them, you can't help but be moved by the real joy they showed when they welcomed baby boy gunner stone to the world in October 2017."
"A lot of Heidi's plastic surgery and Spencer's bad boy behavior mean they are the most loved / hated of the actors."
"Speedy, this couple is called by the tabloids, and they are often the protagonists of the show. They kiss, break up, kiss, well, you know what happens next."
"The pair are regular guests of the series mountain, a reality show that focuses on their lives with their co stars / friends Lauren Conrad and Christine cavalari."
"Obviously, they like every moment, especially Heidi."



Number  258
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jenner made Sacramento high school student Albert Ochoa’s celebrity dream date come true, accompanying him to the Rio Americano High School prom along with her longtime bestie Jordyn Woods.”
“Met Gala Though fans won t get to watch the prom extravaganza unfold until Sunday s season premiere the actual event took place back in April...”
“They would post photos and they were all at the prom and I was like I can t see it It really just made me sad FROM PEN Rose Byrne Reveals the Rolls Royce of Spanx She Wore to the...”
““They probably all thought I hated them — but I just couldn’t see it.”
““It was really sad, actually.”“I had to unfollow all of my friends that I went to school with,” she added.”
““Wait, why didn’t you go to prom?”“I was home-schooled,” explains Jenner.”
““This doesn’t even look like me!” she says with a laugh.”
“As she slips into another option, her assistant and close friend Victoria Villarroel scrolls through her phone, looking up her own old prom pictures.”
“News, twirling around in a plunging rose gold gown.”
““It’s a little booby for me and Albert, you know?” she says in the clip shared by E!”


Jenna made Sacramento high school student Albert Ochoa's star dream come true and accompanied him and her longtime friend Jordan woods to the dance of Rio America high school
"Although fans of met Gala can't watch the ball before the premiere on Sunday, the actual event happened in April..."
"They'll post pictures, they're all at the ball, and I don't think I can see them, which really makes me sad. It's revealed from roseborn that Rolls Royce's spank is what she's wearing..."
"They may all think I hate them - but I just can't see it."
"In fact, it's really sad." "I had to give up all my friends who went to school with me," she added
"Wait, why don't you go to the ball? "I go to school at home," Jenner explained
"It's not like me at all! "She said with a smile
"As she entered the alternative, Victoria villarroel, her assistant and close friend, flipped through her cell phone to find her old Prom photo."
"News, wearing a drooping rose gold robe around."
"It's kind of silly for me and Albert, you know?"? She said in the video shared by E! "



Number  259
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...plan for as long as possible...”
“But I want these exact pancakes before turning her attention to another sweet delicacy writing Oh my god now I want a f ing ice cream sandwich RELATED VIDEO Khloé Kardashian Misses Her In Shape Body Back in January Kardashian said she wanted to stick to her diet and workout...”
“But now that she's entered her third trimester and is weeks away from her due date, all that has gone out the window!”
“Khloé Kardashian Says She s Given In to Her Pregnancy Cravings I ve Been Eating Like a Beast The 33 year old Keeping Up with the Kardashians star who is expecting her first child a girl with boyfriend Tristan Thompson updated fans on her pregnancy diet on her app and...”
“...website on Thursday...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I’ve been eating like a beast and I don’t like it, LOL,” wrote Kardashian, nearly a month after expressing how much she misses her pre-pregnancy body.”
““In my second trimester, I was giving in to my cravings in moderation—but now in my third, I just don’t have the self-control I used to have,” she added.”
““Like it seriously all went out the window in my eighth month!”Luckily, Kardashian isn’t letting herself get too upset about it.”
““I’m not sweating it because I’ll get back on track,” the Revenge Body host wrote.”


“… Plan as long as possible... "
"But I want these pancakes, and then turn her attention to another sweet delicious writing. Oh, my God, now I want an ice cream sandwich related video. Khlo é Kardashian misses her body shape in January. Kardashian says she wants to stick to her diet and exercise..."
"But now she's in her third three months, weeks before her due date, and everything's gone!"
"Khlo é Kardashian said she has given in to the desire to be pregnant. I've been eating like a beast. 33 year old Kardashian star is expecting her first child. A girl and her boyfriend Tristan Thompson update her pregnant diet fans and
“… Thursday's website... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I've been eating like a wild animal, and I don't like it, ha ha," Kardashian wrote. Nearly a month later, she expressed how much she missed her pre pregnancy body
"In the second three months of my pregnancy, I gave in to my desires in moderation, but now in the third three months, I don't have the self-control I used to have," she added
"I really like it. In my eighth month, everything is gone!"! "Fortunately, Kardashian didn't feel too bad about it."
"I'm not going to sweat because I'm going to get back on track," the vengeful host wrote



Number  260
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Supermodels Reunite to Pay Tribute to Naomi Campbell:”
“Enninful was presented the honor from none other than Oprah and used his acceptance speech as a clarion call for inclusion and diversity in fashion.”
““At first I didnt understand the magnitude of it, but as I see the online reaction to it right now, I understand that its important,” he said.”
““It means that someone is paying attention, that what I am doing is important.”Rae’s stylist Jason Rembert knew Jean-Raymond was going to be the right designer for the host’s dress from the start.”
““The collaboration just felt right.”
“Kerby is a talented designer who is opening many doors for others.”
“Issa is a fixture in media who is doing the same.”
“I m inspired by both he said adding that the message he hopes Rae sent in her jumpsuit is that being your true and authentic self is always going to be a win He summarized her looks of the evening including a bright green suit and slinky red dress worn...”
“...onstage as unapologetically black Blackness was a central topic at last night s awards which honored British Vogue editor in chief Edward Enninful with the Media Award and modeling legend Naomi Campbell with the Fashion Icon Award...”
““In a world that is increasingly divided, we must remember: We are more alike than we are different.”


"Supermodels reunite to salute Naomi Campbell"
"Enninful has won the award from Oprah and used his acceptance speech as a clarion call for fashion tolerance and diversity."
"At first I didn't understand the importance of it, but when I saw the reaction to it on the Internet, I understood the importance of it," he said
"It means someone is paying attention and what I'm doing is important." Rae's stylist Jason rembert knew from the beginning that Jean Raymond would be the right designer for the host dress
"It feels good to work together."
"Kerby is a talented designer who opens many doors for others."
"Issa is a frequent visitor to the media and does the same thing."
"Both of these things inspired me," he said, hoping Ray's Jumpsuit message was that being who he was was was always a win. He summed up her dress that night, including a bright green suit and a tight red dress... "
“…… On the stage, the unapologetic black was the central topic of last night's award ceremony, which awarded Edward Enninful, editor in chief of vogue, the Media Award and Naomi Campbell, the fashion icon award of model legend... "
"In an increasingly divided world, we have to remember that we are similar, not different."



Number  261
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““So we always try to make sure to see each other.”“I don’t think it’s hard if the love is there,” she continued.”
“The two recently celebrated Adams’ 34th birthday in early May with Hyland sharing a sweet message to her boyfriend on Instagram in which they cuddled in bed.”
“The former Bachelorette star revealed how the two managed their relationship in the public eye during his appearance on PeopleTV‘s Chatter on Friday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It’s been really weirdly normal,” Adams said of how the two kept their relationship private.”
“That question gets asked a lot because you expect the answer to be like it s crazy because it s in the spotlight but for whatever reason it s been really nice and normal and wonderful The two sparked romance rumors in October after they were spotted dressed up for...”
“Halloween together...”
“A source told PEOPLE at the time, “They’ve been friends for a while and now they’ve been hanging out and spending more time together.”
“They re flirty Image zoom Wells Adams and Sarah Hyland Credit Rachel Murray Getty Adams revealed more about their romance on Chatter admitting they first made contact on social media when he slid into her DM s explaining they struck a conversation when he referenced Harry Potter while on The...”
“Bachelorette...”


"So we always try to make sure we see each other." "I don't think it's hard if love is there," she continued
"The two recently celebrated Adams' 34th birthday in early May. Helan sent a sweet message to her boyfriend on instagram, and they cuddled up in bed."
"The former single actress exposed how the two managed their relationship in public view on people's TV's chatter program on Friday."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's really normal," Adams said of how the two keep a personal relationship
"This question has been asked a lot, because you expect the answer to be like crazy, because it's in the spotlight, but for whatever reason, it's really good, normal and wonderful, both sparking romantic rumors. After October, they were found dressed up as..."
"Halloween together..."
"They've been friends for a while, and now they spend more and more time together," a source told people at the time
"They're flirting characters, and zoom wells Adams and Sarah Hyland credit Rachel Murray Getty Adams revealed more about their romance on chatter, admitting that they first contacted on social media when he slipped into her DM, explaining that they talked about it when he mentioned Harry Potter..."
"Single woman..."



Number  262
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“American Idol is set to debut its very first season on ABC, its 16th season overall, on March 11.”
“The star then launched into a unique performance of Peggy Lee’s “Why Don’t You Do Right?” as the judges watched on.”
“Kelly Ripa may have been brightening America’s morning on Live since 2001, but it turns out the former soap actress has another career in mind – kind of.”
“The star recently tried her hand at singing in a hilarious new segment for Live with Kelly and Ryan where she tried her hand at becoming the next Carrie Underwood or Kelly Clarkson.”
“Following in the footsteps of Today’s Hoda Kotb and Kathie Lee Gifford after they auditioned for The Voice, E!”
“News reported that Ripa headed to the American Idol audition room to show off her vocal skills in a new clip, performing for judges Luke Bryan, Lionel Richie, and Katy Perry.”
“The hilarious clip shows Ripa giving her best singing performance for the trio as she joked before heading into the room I don t think they ve mentally prepared for what I have to offer after claiming on the March 9 episode of Live that she has the voice of...”
“...an angel After getting a pep talk from her Live co host who s also presented American Idol since it first began back in 2002 Ripa made her way to audition and even asked Lionel to hold up her lyrics on a huge board so she didn t forget the...”
“...words...”
“Following her audition, Katy told Kelly that she thought her performance was “different” as Lionel awkwardly complimented the host on how she connected with the words of the song.”


American Idol will premiere its first season on ABC on March 11, its 16th season
Then, the star launched the unique performance of Peggy Lee's "why didn't you do it right"? "In the eyes of the judges."
"Kelly Ripa may have been on the scene since 2001 to add a lot of color to American morning, but it turns out that the former soap opera actor has another career - to some extent."
"The star recently tried to sing in a funny new episode of living with Kelly and Ryan, and she tried to be the next Kelly Underwood or Kelly Clarkson."
"Follow in the footsteps of today's Hoda Cobb and Cathy Lee Gifford, after they've heard the sound, e!"
"According to the news, Ripa went to the American Idol audition room to show her vocal skills in a new clip, performing for judges Luke Bryan, Lionel Ritchie and Katie Perry."
"This funny clip shows that Ripa performed her best performance for the trio. Before entering the room, she joked," I don't think they have claimed that she has... "
“… An angel got an encouraging speech from her live host. She also introduced American Idol. Since 2002, Ripa asked her to audition, and even asked Lionel to put her lyrics on a huge board, so that she would not forget... "
“… Text... "
Katie told Kelly after the audition that she thought her performance was "different" because Lionel awkwardly praised the host for how she connected with the lyrics of the song



Number  263
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The film industry has a real opportunity to do the same.”It’s currently unclear where production stands on “Rub and Tug” after Johansson’s exit.”
““Hollywood changed how Americans understand gay and lesbian lives, and TV is starting to do the same for transgender people with authentic transgender portrayals being major hits with critics and audiences.”
““In light of recent ethical questions raised surrounding my casting as Dante Tex Gill, I have decided to respectfully withdraw my participation in the project,” Johansson told Out Magazine, which first reported the news, in a statement.”
““Our cultural understanding of transgender people continues to advance, and I’ve learned a lot from the community since making my first statement about my casting and realize it was insensitive.”
“I have great admiration and love for the trans community and am grateful that the conversation regarding inclusivity in Hollywood continues.”
“According to GLAAD LGBTQ characters dropped 40 in 2017 from the previous year with no representation of trans characters in any major studio release While I would have loved the opportunity to bring Dante s story and transition to life I understand why many feel he should be portrayed by...”
“...a transgender person and I am thankful that this casting debate albeit controversial has sparked a larger conversation about diversity and representation in film the statement continues...”
““I believe that all artists should be considered equally and fairly.”
“My production company, These Pictures, actively pursues projects that both entertain and push boundaries.”
“We look forward to working with every community to bring these most poignant and important stories to audiences worldwide New Regency won an auction for the movie on July 2 and it was set to be directed by Rupert Sanders who previously worked with Johansson on Ghost in the Shell...”


"The film industry has a chance to do that, too." It's not clear what will happen to the production company after Johnson exits
"Hollywood has changed the American understanding of homosexual life, and TV has begun to do the same thing for transgender people. The real image of transgender people has become the main hot spot for critics and audiences."
"I have decided to respectfully withdraw my participation in this project in view of the moral issues recently raised about my role as Dante tex gill," Johnson said in a statement
"Our understanding of transgender culture is improving, and since I first made a statement about my cast, I've learned a lot from the community and realized that it's insensitive."
"I have great admiration and love for cross community people and thank Hollywood for continuing the dialogue on inclusiveness."
"According to the data of GLAAD LGBTQ, the number of characters in 2017 decreased by 40 compared with the previous year. No transgender character has ever appeared in any film released by a large studio. I really wanted to have the opportunity to bring Dante's story to real life. I understand why many people think he should be portrayed as..."
“… As a transgender, I'm grateful that this debate about the cast, though controversial, has led to a broader dialogue about the diversity and representativeness of films. The statement continues... "
"I think all artists should be treated equally and fairly."
"My production company, these pictures, is actively pursuing projects that both entertain and drive boundaries."
"We look forward to working with every community to bring these most poignant and important stories to audiences around the world. The new Regent won the auction of the film on July 2, directed by Rupert Sanders, who worked with Johnson on ghost in the shell..."



Number  264
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The movie hits theaters March 16th 2018.”
“Now a young woman of 21 without any real focus or purpose, Lara navigates the chaotic streets of trendy East London as a bike courier, barely making the rent.”
“The trailer features a ton of exciting and adventurous new footage of Alicia Vikander as Lara Croft in action and kicking ass!”
“There are actually a few moments that are pretty breathtaking.”
“If you're not already excited about this movie, this trailer might actually do the trick and get you on board.”
“I'm actually really impressed!”
“This looks like it's going to be a badass film!”
“Lara Croft is the fiercely independent daughter of an eccentric adventurer who vanished when she was scarcely a teen.”
“Determined to forge her own path, she refuses to take the reins of her father’s global empire just as staunchly as she rejects the idea that he’s truly gone.”
“Kamen as Sophie Croft s flatmate and best friend...”


"The film will be released on March 16, 2018."
"Laura is now a 21-year-old young woman without any real goals and goals. As a bicycle courier, she shuttles through the chaotic streets of fashionable East London and hardly earns rent."
"There are lots of exciting, adventurous new scenes in the trailer, Alicia vicander playing the role of Laura Croft, action and ass!"
"In fact, there are moments that are quite amazing."
"If you're not really interested in this movie, this trailer may really get you on stage."
"I'm really moved!"
"It looks like a villain movie!"
"Laura Croft is the only daughter of an eccentric adventurer who disappeared before she was a teenager."
"She is determined to open up her own path and refuse to take charge of her father's global empire, just as she is determined to refuse that her father has really gone."
"Carmen plays Sophie Croft's roommate and best friend..."



Number  265
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"I mean you stood there like a little wet noodle, like a little fanboy.”
“"President Trump, I just saw your press conference with President Putin and it was embarrassing," Schwarzenegger said in a Facebook video on Monday, unshaven and appearing distraught.”
“...actions to punish Russia...”
“Trump stunned the world on Monday by shying away from criticising the Russian leader for Moscow s actions to undermine the election and cast doubt on US intelligence agencies prompting calls by some US lawmakers for tougher sanctions and other...”
“Los Angeles: Former California governor Arnold Schwarzenegger has lashed out at US President Donald Trump's rebuke of American intelligence agencies during a news conference with Russian President Vladimir Putin.”


"I mean you stand there like a little wet noodle, like a little fan."
"President trump, I just saw the press conference between you and President Putin. It was embarrassing. I didn't shave. I was upset," Schwarzenegger said in a Facebook video on Monday
“…… Punishing Russia's actions... "
"Trump's evasion of criticizing Russia's leaders for undermining the election on Monday and his suspicion of US intelligence agencies shocked the world and prompted some US Congressmen to call for tougher sanctions and other measures..."
"Los Angeles: former California Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger lashed out at US President trump and accused US intelligence agencies at a news conference with Russian President Vladimir Putin."



Number  266
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He continues to ask her trick questions to see if it’s her because he can’t seem to recognize her due to her actions.”
““Imitadora,” which means imitator in Spanish, is all about Romeo feeling like he’s with an imposter of the woman that he loves.”
“In this story, Romeo is an agent that was burned by his girlfriend, played by Jessica Cediel.”
“We love that the musician likes to showcase his acting skills in his videos and this one is no exception.”
“On Tuesday, the 35-year-old singer released the music video for his single “Imitadora,” and it’s definitely sexy.”
“Romeo Santos, you just made us blush!”


"He continued to ask her some small questions to see if it was her because he didn't seem to recognize her behavior."
"Imitadora" means "imitator" in Spanish, which means that Romeo feels that he is with a liar of a woman he loves
"In this story, Romeo is an agent who is burned to death by his girlfriend, played by Jessica cedil."
"We like the musician, we like to show his acting in the video, and this time is no exception."
"On Tuesday, the 35 year old singer released a music video of his single" imitadora. "It's absolutely sexy."
"Romeo Santos, you make us blush!"



Number  267
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And I'm like, 'This isn't really my aesthetic, but I'll wear it because you love me.'"”
“She continued, in the way only Miley can, "Sometimes I replace it with an actual unicorn or a Looney Tune, and he's kind of like, What's going on?'”
“They don't look that good together because they kind of mix up."”
“The talk-show host congratulated the 23-year-old, to which Cyrus replied, "It's very weird because this is, like, real jewelry, and most of my jewelry is made out of gummy bears and cotton candy.”
“...engaged...”
“A photo posted by Miley Cyrus mileycyrus on Jan 18 2016 at 7 07am PST However during an interview on The Ellen DeGeneres Show on Thursday afternoon an overall wearing Cyrus confirmed to DeGeneres that the pair are once again...”
“...strawberry inspired outfit of the day...”
“Given her history of provocative social media posts no one could quite be sure if the return of the ring was an indication of their on again engagement or if she just happened to think the accessory worked with her...”
“After quietly resuming their relationship earlier this year, Cyrus raised a few eyebrows when she posted a photo to Instagram in which she's wearing her old engagement ring.”
“The pair became engaged in 2012 before calling off the engagement in 2013.”


"I said," it's not my aesthetic, but I'll wear it because you love me. "
"She went on, in a way that only Miley could do," and sometimes I replace it with a real Unicorn or a madman's song, and he's kind of like, what's going on? "
"They don't look good together because they're a little confused."
The host of the talk show congratulated the 23-year-old girl and Cyrus replied, "it's strange because it's like real jewelry. Most of my jewelry is made of bear glue and marshmallow."
“… Engagement... "
"On January 18, 2016, at 7:07 a.m. PST, Miley Cyrus released a photo. However, in an interview at the Ellen DeGeneres Show on Thursday afternoon, Cyrus, who was wearing a full suit, confirmed to DeGeneres that they were again.... "
“… Strawberry inspired clothing of the day... "
"Given that she has published provocative posts on social media, no one can be completely sure whether the return of the ring is a sign of their re engagement, or whether she just happens to think that the accomplice works with her..."
Earlier this year, Cyrus quietly resumed their relationship by posting a photo on instagram showing her wearing an old engagement ring, which attracted some attention
"The two were engaged in 2012 and cancelled in 2013."



Number  268
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...lived out of the back of a truck and bartended according to Vanity Fair which also reported that Trump Jr stopped talking to his father during this time...”
“He simply said Put on a suit and meet me outside and closed the door A spokesperson for the Trump family told Vanity Fair this story is completely false After graduating Trump Jr initially declined to join the family business instead moving to Aspen Colorado where he hunted fished camped...”
“You think you know everything.”
“You’re not quite a man, but you think you are.”
““Listen, it’s tough to be a 12-year-old.”
“But he added that in retrospect he may have been “manipulated” into that belief by his mother.”
“Trump Jr. told the magazine that at the time he blamed the divorce on his father, who had been having an affair with model Marla Maples.”
“Trump Jr. was 12 at the time and didn’t speak to his father for a year after the highly publicized split, New York magazine reported in a 2004 article about the Trump children.”
“Image zoom Credit: Ron Galella, Ltd./WireImageAs a preteen, Trump Jr.’s relationship with his father was fraught following Trump’s separation from his first wife, Ivana Trump, the mother of eldest children Donald Jr., Ivanka and Eric.”
“Trump Jr., 39, first emerged as one of father’s fiercest defenders during the presidential campaign — and before that worked side-by-side with his dad while running the family business — but the pair haven’t always been as close are they are today.”


“… Living in the back of the truck, and according to vanity fair, a bartender, the paper also reported that little trump stopped talking to his father during this time... "
"He just said to put on his suit, wait for me outside, and then close the door. A trump family spokesman told vanity fair that the story was completely wrong. After graduation, little trump initially refused to join the family business, but moved to Aspen, Colorado, where he hunted, fished, camped..."
"You think you know everything."
"You're not a real man, but you think you are."
"Listen, it's hard to be a 12-year-old."
But in retrospect, he added, he may have been "manipulated" by his mother into this belief
"Little trump told the magazine that he blamed his father for the divorce, who had been having an affair with model Mara MEPs."
"Little trump was 12 years old at the time and didn't speak to his father for a year after he broke up," New York magazine reported in a 2004 article about Trump's children
"Credit for image zooming: Ron galella, Ltd. / WireImage as a preschool child, after trump separated from his first wife, Ivana trump, little trump had a very tense relationship with his father, Ivanka and Eric were the mother of his eldest son, Donald little."
"Little trump, 39, became one of his father's fiercest defenders for the first time during the presidential campaign - before that, he worked side by side with his father and ran a family business - but they were not always as close as they are today."



Number  269
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We're told cops showed up too, but everyone had split by then.”
“Ultimately, Chris was able to leave without anyone getting hurt ... but not before some very tense moments.”
“However, we're told Migos and some friends followed Chris to his car and surrounded him.”
“We're told Chris kept walking while all of this was going on -- perhaps, wisely, realizing he don't need any heat from Johnny Law.”
“Play video content TMZ.comWitnesses tells us someone in Chris' group pushed Quavo, and then one of the Migos guys jumped in ... but then he got punched.”
“...time and when they came face to face with Chris crew things got tricky...”
“Sources at the party tell us Chris had just finished premiering his new music video with Future at the event near Microsoft Theater in downtown L A We re told the guys from Migos were walking in at the same...”
“Exclusive DetailsMigos and Chris Brown's tempers just got things jumping at the BET Awards after-party ... so much so, cops had to respond.”


"We were told the police were coming, but then everyone left."
"In the end, Chris was able to leave without any injuries... But not before some very tense moments. "
"However, we were told that migos and some friends followed Chris into his car and surrounded him."
"We heard that Chris was walking all the time, and it was all going on - maybe, wisely, he realized he didn't need any of Johnny law's calories."
"Play video content" TMZ.com The witness told us that someone in Chris's team pushed kwavo, and then a Miggs man jumped in... But then he was beaten. "
“… When they meet Chris Crewe face to face, things get tricky... "
"Sources at the party told us that Chris had just finished the premiere of his new music video" the future "at an event near the Microsoft theater in downtown Los Angeles. We heard that people from migos came in at the same time..."
"Exclusive details, smiley face and Chris Brown's temper just made things complicated at the prize presentation ceremony after the party... So the police have to respond. "



Number  270
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Magazine about the intimate ceremony.”
““Ozzy on one couch and me on the other, and suddenly, he sends me this email.”
“...divorce...”
“The Talk co-host, 64, told The Telegraph in an interview Saturday that “there wasn’t just one woman; there were six of them.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Some Russian teenager, then a masseuse in England, our masseuse [in the U.S.], and then our cook,” Osbourne continued.”
““He had women in different countries.”
“Basically, if you’re a women giving Ozzy either a back rub or a trolley of food, God help you.”The TV host also spoke on discovering her husband’s infidelity with hairstylist Michelle Pugh.”
“Image zoom Credit: Bryan Steffy/Getty Images“We were sitting on the couch watching the telly,” she recalled.”
“Why did you send me this stupid email I asked and when Ozzy told me that he hadn t sent me anything I grabbed his phone and said Look And of course it was a message meant for one of his bloody women The X Factor judge said she was...”
“Sharon and I have been through so much, and this honestly feels like a new beginning,” Ozzy told Hello!”


"A magazine about intimacy rituals."
"Oz was sitting on one sofa, I was sitting on another, and all of a sudden, he sent me an email."
“… Divorce... "
"There is more than one woman, there are six," the 64 year old co host told the Daily Telegraph on Saturday She can get push notification through news, feature, etc
Osborne went on: "some Russian teenagers, then British masseurs, our masseurs [in the United States], then our cooks."
"He has women in different countries."
"Basically, if you're a woman massaging Oz's back or delivering food, God bless you." The TV host also talked about the discovery of her husband's infidelity with hairstylist Michelle puff
"We sat on the sofa watching TV," she recalled
"I asked why you sent me this stupid email. When oz told me that he didn't send me anything, I grabbed his mobile phone and said, look, of course, this is an email to a damned woman. Judge x said she is..."
"Sharon and I have been through so much, and it really feels like a new beginning," oz told you



Number  271
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“1 Keith WINNER Scrubbing in With Becca Tilley Tanya Rad Anna Faris Is Unqualified LADYGANG Chicks in the Office People s Champion Award Bryan Stevenson Fashion Icon Award Victoria Beckham People s Icon of 2018 Melissa McCarthy...”
“The Moral Instruments Drama TV star Ellen Pompeo Grey s Anatomy WINNER Mariska Hargitay Law Order Special Victims Unit KJ Apa Riverdale Darren Criss The Assassination of Gianni Versace American Crime Story Katherine Langford 13 Reasons Why Comedy TV star WINNER Jim Parsons The Big Bang Theory Donald Glover Atlanta...”
“Check out the list of winners (in bold) and nominees to see which celebrities, movies, TV shows and songs took home a PCAs trophy.”
“Check back as we update the People's Choice winners throughout the night.”
“Movie of 2018 Black Panther WINNER Avengers Infinity War Incredibles 2 Fifty Shades Freed A Quiet Place Drama movie WINNER Fifty Shades Freed 12 Strong Red Sparrow Midnight Sun A Quiet Place Comedy movie Love Simon Blockers WINNER The Spy Who Dumped Me Mamma Mia Here We Go Again Crazy...”
“Rich Asians Action movie Black Panther WINNER Avengers Infinity War Deadpool 2 Jurassic World Fallen Kingdom Ocean s 8 Family movie WINNER Incredibles 2 A Wrinkle in Time Hotel Transylvania 3 I Can Only Imagine Christopher Robin Male movie star Chris Hemsworth Avengers Infinity War Robert Downey Jr Avengers Infinity...”
“War WINNER Chadwick Boseman Black Panther Chris Pratt Jurassic World Fallen Kingdom Nick Robinson Love Simon Female movie star WINNER Scarlett Johansson Avengers Infinity War Sandra Bullock Ocean s 8 Anne Hathaway Ocean s 8 Lily James Mamma Mia Here We Go Again Bryce Dallas Howard Jurassic World Fallen Kingdom...”
“Drama movie star John Krasinski A Quiet Place Emily Blunt A Quiet Place Jennifer Lawrence Red Sparrow Chris Hemsworth 12 Strong WINNER Jamie Dornan Fifty Shades Freed Comedy movie star WINNER Melissa McCarthy Life of the Party John Cena Blockers Nick Robinson Love Simon Amanda Seyfried Mamma Mia Here We...”
“Go Again Mila Kunis The Spy Who Dumped Me Action movie star Chris Hemsworth Avengers Infinity Wars Ryan Reynolds Deadpool 2 Chadwick Boseman Black Panther WINNER Danai Gurira Black Panther Chris Pratt Jurassic World Fallen Kingdom Show of 2018 This Is Us Grey s Anatomy The Big Bang Theory 13”
“Reasons Why WINNER Shadowhunters The Mortal Instruments Drama show This Is Us Grey s Anatomy 13 Reasons Why WINNER Riverdale The Handmaid s Tale Comedy show The Big Bang Theory Modern Family Black ish WINNER Orange Is the New Black The Good Place Male TV star Andrew Lincoln The Walking...”


"1. Keith prize winner and Becca Tilley Tanya rad Anna Faris are unqualified ladies in the office character Champion Award, Bryan Stevenson fashion idol award, Victoria Beckham's character idol Melissa McCarthy in 2018..."
"Moral instrument" TV star Ellen Pompeo Gray's anatomy award winner Mariska hagritty law and order special victims group kJ APA Riverdale Darren Criss assassination of Gianni Versace American crime story Katherine Langford Comedy TV star winner Jim Parsons 13 reasons for the big bang theory Donald Glover Atlanta
Check out the list of winners (in BOLD) and nominees to see which celebrities, movies, TV shows and songs have won the PCAs trophy
"When we update the winners of people's choice all night, please check back."
"2018 movie Panther champion Avenger Infinite War incredible 250 shadows liberate a quiet place drama movie champion 50 shadows liberate 12 Powerful Red sparrows midnight sun a quiet place comedy movie Simon blocker champion who dumped my spy Mamma Mia, we are crazy again..."
"Rich Asian action movie Black Leopard winner nemesis endless war dead pool 2 Jurassic world fallen Kingdom ocean 8 family movie winner incredible 2 wrinkle hotel in time Transylvania 3 I can only imagine Christopher Robin actor Chris Hemsworth nemesis endless war Robert Downey little nemesis endless..."
"War winner Chadwick poseman Panther Chris Platt fallen kingdom of Jurassic world Nick Robinson Simon actress winner Scarlett Johansen Avenger Infinite War Sandra Bullock ocean 8 Anne Hathaway ocean 8 Lily James mom mia, let's go back to the fallen kingdom of Jurassic world Howard in Bryce Dallas..."
"Drama movie star John krazinski a quiet place Emily Bronte a quiet place Jennifer Lawrence mahjong Chris Hemsworth 12 champion Jamie Donan 50 film free comedy movie star champion Melissa McCarthy party life John Senna block Nick Robinson Simon Amanda Seyfried Mamma Mia Here we are... "
"Once again, Mila Kunis dumped my spy action movie star Chris Hemsworth, the endless war of Avengers Ryan Reynolds Deadpool 2 Chadwick boseman Panther champion Danai guirra Panther Chris Pratt, the Fallen King of the Jurassic world show 2018, this is gray's anatomy big bang theory 13"
"The reasons of winner shadowhunters the verman instruments drama program this is the anatomy of gray in the United States 13 reasons winner River's maid story comedy program big bang theory modern family black winner orange is a good place for new black man, male TV star Andrew Lincoln the walking..."



Number  272
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...no mention of their romance...”
“It feels like an ambush to me and I m the one who wrote it Fisher and Ford reunited on the big screen for 2015 s Star Wars The Force Awakens and following Fisher s death in December 2016 he issued a statement remembering her fearless spirit though he made...”
““It was strange.”
“For me,” he said in GQ’s new cover story.”
“In 2016, Fisher dropped a bombshell on fans of the franchise when she revealed in her memoir, The Princess Diarist, that she and Ford had an affair while on the set of the film that started the franchise,1977’s Star Wars: Episode IV – A New Hope.”
“At the time, Fisher was 19 and Ford was 33 – and married to his first wife, Mary Marquardt, with whom he had two children.”
“The steadfastly private actor admitted that he was given advance warning that Fisher planned to write about their affair (“to a degree”), but declined to go into detail about his reaction.”
““Oh, I don’t know.”
“I don’t know,” he said.”
““You know, with Carrie’s untimely passing, I don’t really feel that it’s a subject that I want to discuss.”When asked whether he’s read Fisher’s nearly 300-page memoir, Ford responded shortly, “No.”


“… No mention of their romance... "
"To me, it's like an ambush. I wrote it. Fisher and Ford met on the big screen of" Star Wars: the awakening of the force "in 2015. After Fisher died in December 2016, he issued a statement to commemorate her fearlessness, even though he made..."
"It's strange."
"For me," he said in GQ's new cover story
"In 2016, Fisher revealed in her memoir the diary of the princess that she and Ford had an affair on the set of the 1977 Star Wars: Episode 4 - New Hope series, which surprised fans of the series."
"Fisher, 19, and Ford, 33, married their first wife, Mary Marquardt, and had two children."
"The determined private actor admitted that he had been warned beforehand that Fisher planned to write about their extramarital affairs (to some extent), but declined to elaborate on his reaction."
"Oh, I don't know."
"I don't know," he said
"You know, because of Carrie's untimely death, I don't think it's a subject I want to discuss." Asked if he had read Fisher's nearly 300 page memoir, Ford quickly replied, "No."



Number  273
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“ELLE UK first reported that the Keeping Up With The Kardashians star might be pregnant back in September, and since then the family have done their best to drop hints about Khloé's pregnancy.”
“In late March, Khloé revealed her baby's name initial would be a 'T', just like her father's, and has been struggling with pregnancy lips for months.”
“God always has this plan, and I just want to do it on my time and when I felt comfortable to do so,' she explained.”
“'I wanted to have a baby for so long, and it was just the perfect timing in my eyes.”
“In an interview on The Ellen DeGeneres Show in January, the star opened up about her decision to wait until announcing her pregnancy.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Elle UK reported for the first time that the star of" keep up with Kardashian "may have been pregnant as early as September. Since then, the family has done their best to hint that Heroe is pregnant."
"At the end of March, heloe revealed that her baby's initials would be a't ', just like her father's name. She has been struggling with her pregnant lips for months."
"God always has plans like this, and I just want to finish them on time when I feel comfortable," she explained
"I've wanted to have a baby for so long. In my eyes, this is the perfect time."
"In January, in an interview with the Ellen DeGeneres Show, the star made public his decision to wait until the announcement of pregnancy."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from instagram."



Number  274
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“TMZ reported in March that the “Goosebumps” rapper bailed because his and Kylie Jenner’s daughter Stormi was born on February 1, two days before the scheduled show.”
“In addition, his agent reportedly received a $10,000 booking fee and had arranged for a private jet to fly Scott to the venue.”
“...the steps to get Travis there As previously reported in March PJAM claims it paid Scott a 150 000 advance of his 200 00 performance fee for a show at Myth Live Nightclub in Maplewood Minnesota one day ahead of the February 4 Super Bowl...”
“Rather than suing these so called promoters hold have apologized and taken responsibility for their inability to provide the agreed upon transportation King added that Scott apologizes to any fans who were duped by these promoters into showing up at the cancelled show even after the promoters failed to take...”
““In an obvious effort to shake Travis down and avoid the consequences of their breaches, they filed a spurious lawsuit while spreading falsehoods in the press,” said King in the statement.”
“King called Martini, Agar, Johnston and Johnston “three wannabe promoters” in a statement to Us Weekly.”
“Scott’s attorney, Howard King, state that the men — who run events company PJAM LLC — breached their contact and owe the entertainer a balance of his fee.”
“In a Tuesday, April 17, counterclaim obtained by Us Weekly, Scott claims that Minnesota-based promoters Alex Martini, Jefferson Agar and Patrick Johnston failed to set up travel arrangements for his return to Los Angeles following the performance.”
“The 25-year-old rapper has fired back at “wannabe promoters” with a countersuit after being sued for cancelling a February 3 Super Bowl LII concert in Minneapolis.”
“Travis Scott won’t have his name dragged through the mud.”


TMZ reported in March that "goose bumps" rapper was released on bail because he and Kelly Jenner's daughter, Tommy, were born on February 1, two days before the scheduled show
"In addition, his agent was reported to have received a $10000 booking fee and arranged a private plane for Scott to fly to the venue."
“… The steps to get Travis there, as previously reported in March by pjam, claim that it paid $150000 in advance for Scott's 200000 performance at the mythical live nightclub in Maplewood, Minnesota, the day before the super bowl on February 4... "
"Instead of suing the so-called promoters, holder apologized and took responsibility for their inability to provide the agreed means of transportation. Kim added that Scott apologized to any fans who had been cheated by the promoters and even appeared on the cancelled show after the promoters failed to take action.... "
"It is clear that in order to bring down Travis and avoid the consequences of default, they spread lies in the media and filed false lawsuits," king said in a statement
In a statement to us weekly, king said Martini, agar, Johnston and Johnston were "three people who want to promote"
Scott's lawyer, Howard king, said pjam LLC, the company they run, violated their contract and owed the artist the balance of a fee
"In a counterclaim received by us weekly on Tuesday, April 17, Scott claimed that Minnesota promoters Alex Martini, Jefferson agar and Patrick Johnston failed to arrange a trip back to Los Angeles after the show."
The 25-year-old rapper was charged with cancelling the Super Bowl LII concert in Minneapolis on February 3, and then countered the "wanted promoter" with a counterclaim
"Travis Scott won't let his name get dragged into the mud."



Number  275
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Trust, helmed by Danny Boyle, will air on March 25.”
“Swank plays his mother, Gail—the same role played by Michelle Williams in 2017’s All the Money in the World—and will appear in 8 of its 10 episodes.”
“She’s currently back on the circuit to promote her new FX series, Trust, about the kidnapping of John Paul Getty III.”
“Swank has since gingerly stepped back into the acting world, first by playing a small role in last year’s Steven Soderbergh heist movie, Logan Lucky.”
“...she launched an athleisure line called Mission Statement in the fall of 2016”
“And if it wasn t me taking care of him I think I would always look back and regret that opportunity to be able to take care of him and help him through this extraordinary time And even when she was taking time away from the screen Swank kept busy...”
““There is nothing I want to do more other than being with my dad in this time of need.”
““I’m his sole caretaker now.”Though there were certain job opportunities that she had to pass on, making the choice to care for her father was an easy one, said Swank.”
““My dad is living with me,” she told HuffPost Live.”
“I took three years off to be with him and help him through that life journey.”Swank first revealed the news about her father’s condition back in 2015, announcing her acting hiatus shortly after his surgery.”


"Trust, run by Denny Boyle, will air on March 25."
"Swank's mother, Gail, plays the same role as Michelle Williams in 2017's the world's money, and will appear in 8 of 10 episodes."
"She is currently touring her new FX series, trust, about the kidnapping of John Paul Getty III."
Swank then gingerly returned to show business, starting with a small role in Steven Soderberg's film Logan lackey last year
“…… In autumn 2016, she launched a "mission statement" sports and leisure line
"If I didn't take care of him, I think I would look back forever and regret that I had the chance to take care of him and help him through this extraordinary time. Even when she took time off from the screen, Swank was busy..."
"There's nothing I want to do more than be with my dad at this time of need."
"I'm his only caretaker now," Swank said Although she had to give up some job opportunities, it was easy to choose to take care of her father. "
"My dad lives with me," she told huffport live
"I took three years off to be with him and help him through that journey of life." Swank first disclosed information about her father's condition in 2015 and announced that he would stop acting shortly after his operation



Number  276
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Got it?”
“...in this post so uh keep that Tuesday night open sew you can be glued to your TV”
“Shot in an outdoor setting the series will also focus on the characters and camaraderie of those who enjoy creating their own crafts all under the comedic guidance of Poehler and Offerman The show debuts on NBC Tuesday July 31 at 10 p m Maybe there should be more puns...”
“According to the show’s log line, “Over the course of each episode, the contestants must tackle a different theme, hand-making items in different disciplines — the difficulty of which increases with every episode until a winner is crowned.”
“...series will follow eight all around makers from all walks of life as they compete in a series of craft projects with the hopes of impressing Poehler Offerman and expert judges...”
“Ahead of its premiere later this month the network released a promo this week featuring Poehler and Offerman competing against each other in a craft themed pun off I macraméd you and I can macrabreak you just as easily Titled Making It previously titled The Handmade Project the six episode...”
“Last year, Amy Poehler and Nick Offerman teamed up to host a craft competition show for NBC.”


"Do you understand?"
"In this article, keep it open on Tuesday night, you can stick it on the TV"
"Shooting outdoors, the series will also focus on the personalities and friendships of people who like to create their own crafts under the guidance of Boller and Overman's comedies. The play will premiere on NBC at 10 p.m. on Tuesday, July 31. Maybe there should be more puns... "
According to the program's lines, "in the course of each episode, contestants have to deal with different themes, hand-made projects in different disciplines - the difficulty increases with each episode until a winner is crowned."
“…… The series will follow eight all-round producers from all walks of life to compete in a series of craft projects, hoping to impress the poet Overman and the expert judges.... "
"Before the premiere later this month, the TV station released a promotional video this week, in which Poehler and offerman compete in a pun with the theme of handicraft. I can give you and I can give you a simple title, making the title before it a six episode handmade project..."
Last year, Amy poller and Nick Overman teamed up to hold a craft competition for NBC



Number  277
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoomHere are the full season 25 pairings:”
“PEOPLE’s special issue 25 Seasons of Dancing with The Stars is out Sept. 15.”
““We are thrilled to have Len, Bruno and Carrie Ann back in the ballroom and look forward to welcoming guest judges wherever possible,” a rep for DWTS tells PEOPLE.”
“But Carrie Ann Inaba, Len Goodman, and Bruno Tolioni will all be holding their judging paddles when the show premieres on Sept. 18.”
“Julianne Hough will not be returning alongside as a judge for season 25 of the ABC reality dance competition, PEOPLE can reveal exclusively.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Dancing with the Stars judges’ panel will be a little less crowded this fall.”
“PEOPLE is celebrating the Sept. 18 premiere of Dancing with the Stars‘ 25th season with 25 days of exclusive interviews, fun retrospectives, and new details about what fans can expect from the milestone season.”
“Season 25 of Dancing with the Stars premieres Sept. 18 on ABCDancing with the Stars Season 25 Judges Revealed: Find Out Who's Back — and Who's Not!”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”


"Zoom in and out here is the complete match for season 25:
"The 25th season of people's special issue dancing with the stars will be broadcast on September 15."
A representative of DWTS told people: "we are very happy that len, Bruno and Carrie ANN are back in the ballroom and look forward to welcoming the guest judges as much as possible."
"But at the premiere on September 18, Carrie Ann Rice Leaf, Ron Goodman and Bruno torioni will all be judges."
It can be revealed exclusively that Julian Hoff will not return as a judge of the 25th season of the ABC reality show dance competition
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Dancing with stars, the jury will be less crowded this fall."
"People are celebrating the premiere of season 25 of dance with the stars on September 18, with 25 days of interviews, interesting reviews and new details of fans' expectations for this milestone season."
"Dance with the stars" season 25 premiere September 18 "dance with the stars" season 25 judges announced: find out who's back and who's not! "
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."



Number  278
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““There is a wide canyon between mere allegation and truth, and we are confident that any sober calculation of the facts will prove no legal wrongdoing occurred.”
“Weinstein has never at any time committed an act of sexual assault, and it is wrong and irresponsible to conflate claims of impolitic behavior or consensual sexual contact later regretted, with an untrue claim of criminal conduct,” his lawyers said.”
“...the Golden Globes as a symbol of protest against harassment in Hollywood...”
“On Saturday, McGowan, 44, spoke out against the “silent protest” and women who were supposedly taking part who had worked with disgraced producer Harvey Weinstein in the past — calling out Meryl Streep in particular.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Actresses, like Meryl Streep, who happily worked for The Pig Monster, are wearing black @GoldenGlobes in a silent protest,” she wrote on Twitter, referring to Weinstein.”
““YOUR SILENCE is THE problem,” McGowan continued.”
““You’ll accept a fake award breathlessly & affect no real change.”
“I despise your hypocrisy.”
“Maybe you should all wear Marchesa,” she added, referencing Weinstein’s estranged wife Georgina Chapman’s fashion line.”


"There is a huge gap between pure accusations and facts, and we believe that any calm calculation of facts will not prove any legal error."
Weinstein's lawyer said: "Weinstein has never committed sexual assault at any time. It is wrong and irresponsible to confuse the accusation of non political conduct or consensual sexual contact with the accusation of untrue criminal conduct."
“… The golden globe as a symbol of protest against Hollywood harassment... "
On Saturday, McGovern, 44, publicly opposed the "silent protest" and the women who are said to have participated in the protest, having worked in the past with notorious producer Harvey Weinstein - especially Meryl Streep
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Actresses like Meryl Streep, who happily work for the pig monster, wear black @ Golden Globes as a sign of silent protest," she wrote on twitter, referring to Weinstein
"Your silence is the problem," McGovern continued
"You'll pant for a fake Award & it won't affect real change."
"I despise your hypocrisy."
"Maybe you should all wear Marchesa," she added, referring to the fashion collection of Georgina Chapman, Weinstein's separated wife



Number  279
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“If the burning doesn't subside after a few hours, Dr. Eisenberg says a guy who was grapefruited should see a doctor.”
“"The urethra isn't designed to handle grapefruit juice," he tells Health.”
“But if you've done everything you can with whipped cream and chocolate syrup, we just heard about an item that supposedly makes oral sex way hotter for a guy: grapefruit.”
“Grapefruit?”
“Really.”
“This citrus fruit had a small but memorable role in the hit flick Girls Trip, when the character played by Tiffany Haddish demonstrates the move on a banana.”
“Apparently "grapefruiting" was popularized by a 2014 YouTube video.”
“In it, a woman named Angel instructs viewers to cut the ends off of a grapefruit, make a hole in the middle, then put it over a guy's penis (once it's warmed up to room temperature).”
“To get our top stories delivered to your inbox sign up for the Healthy Living newsletter By moving it back and forth over his erection while also using your mouth the move is supposed to make a guy feel like...”
“...he s receiving oral sex and having intercourse at the same time...”


If the burn does not subside after a few hours, grapefruit patients should see a doctor, Dr. Eisenberg said
"The urethra is not for grapefruit juice," he told health
"But if you've done everything you can with cream and chocolate syrup, we've just heard about a thing that's said to make men's oral sex hotter: grapefruit."
"Grapefruit?"
"Really."
"This citrus fruit played a small and memorable role in the hit movie girl's journey, when Tiffany hadish's character demonstrated the action on a banana."
"Obviously, a YouTube video in 2014 promoted grapefruit
In this film, a woman named Angel instructs the audience to cut the end of a grapefruit, make a hole in the middle, and then put it on a man's penis (once the grapefruit is heated to room temperature)
"In order to get our headlines sent to your in box, sign up for healthy life newsletters, move back and forth when he has an erection, and use your mouth at the same time, this kind of movement should make a man feel like..."
“… He's having sex at the same time as oral sex... "



Number  280
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“...maintained by a third party and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses...”
“Emma Watson The actress paired her new fringe with an orange lip Getty Images 19 of 19 Elisabeth Moss The actress went for young and fresh makeup and a pretty up do Next 11 Make Up Products A Listers Genuinely Love Advertisement Continue Reading Below This content is created and...”
“Portman The actress wore a brown smokey eye Getty Images 16 of 19 Viola Davis Viola Davis paired warm glamorous make up with an afro Getty Images 17 of 19 Naomi Campbell Naomi Campbell wore her hair sleek and paired it with a smokey eye Getty Images 18 of 19”
“Huppert The actress went for old school Hollywood glam with a red lip and side parting 13 of 19 Jessica Biel The actress wore a pink lip Getty Images 14 of 19 Sarah Jessica Parker The actress and designer wore a grey smokey eye Getty Images 15 of 19 Natalie...”
“...of 19 Jessica Chastain The actress went for old school Hollywood glamour with a side parting and red lip to the Golden Globes Getty Images 11 of 19 Salma Hayek The actress wore her hair in loose curls with bronzed make up for the Golden Globes 12 of 19 Isabelle...”
“Getty Images 8 of 19 Millie Bobby Brown The actress wore a cat eye eyeliner flick with a sleek bun to the awards show Getty Images 9 of 19 Sadie Sink The Stranger Things 2 actress opted for pink eyeshadow with a ponytail to the Golden Globes Getty Images 10”
“...awards show...”
“...the Golden Globes Getty Images 6 of 19 Emilia Clarke The actress wore her hair in a bleached sleek bob alongside a hot pink lipstick to the 75th Annual Golden Globes Getty Images 7 of 19 Kendall Jenner The model wore a messy bob with a nude lip to the...”
“...an orange lip with classic eyeliner at the Golden Globes Getty Images 4 of 19 Saoirse Ronan The actress wore her hair slicked back and make up fresh to the Golden Globes Getty Images 5 of 19 Allison Williams The actress wore a bronze smokey eye with an updo at...”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
“… Maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address... "
"Emma Watson matches her new Tassels and orange lips with Getty's picture 19 / 19 Elizabeth moss pursues young and fresh make-up and beautiful make-up to make 11 kinds of cosmetics. An audience really likes the advertisement. Continue to read the following content is to create and..."
"Portman actress wearing brown smoke eye Getty picture 16 / 19 Viola Davies with warm and charming makeup and African Getty picture 17 / 19 Naomi Campbell combs her hair round and matches with smoke eye Getty picture 18 / 19"
"Herbert, the actress, loves the old-fashioned Hollywood glamour, red lips and 13 out of 19 sides, Jessica bell, the actress with pink lips, Sarah Jessica Parker, the actress and designer with gray smoke eyes, and 15 out of 19 photos of Natalie..."
“…… Jessica chastan, a 19-year-old actress who likes old-fashioned Hollywood glamour, appeared at the Golden Globe Awards in the 11th episode of Getty's album, 19-year-old Salma Hayek, in the way of side separation and red lips. With loose curly hair and bronze makeup, she took part in the 12th episode of Isabel, 19-year-old... "
In the image of Gatti 8, the 19 actress Millie Bobby Brown wore a cat eye eyeliner and presented the presentation with a sleek bun. 19 of Gatti's 9 photos, 2 of the stranger 2, who had sunk down, chose pink eye shadow and GATTY with the ponytail to the Golden Globe award 10.
“… "Award ceremony..."
"The Golden Globe Awards GETTY image 6's 19 Amelia Clark actress wears her hair in a hot pink lipstick next to a bleached smooth Bob to the seventy-fifth golden ball award GATTY image 7 19 Kendall Jenna model dressed in a messy Bob with bare lips to..."
"An orange lip, under the classic eyeliner, in the Golden Globe GATTY image 4, the 19 Saiorse Ronan, the actress put on her hair, disguised herself as 19 Allison Williams's Golden Globe Award GETTY image 5, the actress wearing a bronze smoked eye.



Number  281
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...and friend Porsche Taylor told PEOPLE She should be recognized and known as more than just the stunt driver who passed away...”
“My heart pours out to them along with each and every person she touched in this world Image zoom Credit Splash News RELATED VIDEO Ryan Reynolds Heartbroken Over Death of Deadpool 2 Stuntwoman Harris s first passion was encouraging women to join the sport of road racing and her manager...”
““On Monday we tragically lost one of our own — Joi SJ Harris.”
“My heart has been breaking the past two days and I have been searching what to say or do,” Beetz, who was cast as Domino, wrote in a statement shared on Instagram.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I know that what I feel is nothing compared to what her loved ones, friends + family, are feeling.”
“My heart and my love goes out to her and them all.”
“The cast and crew send peace, healing, and their deepest condolences,” she concluded her message.”
“According to Entertainment Weekly, Harris is thought to be the stunt double for Beetz.”
“A woman donning the costume for the mutant Domino was spotted on a black Ducati motorcycle in the area for a sequence days earlier.”


“…… Her friend, Porsche Taylor, told people that she should be recognized and known, not just the dead stunt driver... "
"My heart poured out to them with everyone she met in this splash news related video. Ryan Reynolds was heartbroken by the death of Deadpool 2 stuntman Harris, whose first passion was to encourage women to join road racing and her manager..."
"On Monday, we lost one of our friends, Joey SJ Harris."
"My heart has broken over the past two days and I've been looking for what to say or do," Bates wrote in a statement shared on instagram, where he played dominoes
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I know that my feelings are nothing compared with those of her loved ones, friends and family."
"My heart and my love are dedicated to her and them."
"The actors and crew expressed their peace, recovery and deepest mourning to us," she concluded
Harris is believed to be Bates' double, Entertainment Weekly reported
"A few days ago, a woman in a mutant domino costume was found on a black Ducati motorcycle in the area."



Number  282
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Suddenly there’s a movement and maybe she’s going to be, for the first time in her life, accepted by society for who she is, as she is.”
“She’s getting radical somehow, someway.”
“I opened it and I screamed and an entire restaurant full of people turned and looked at me, which was mortifying, but just so exciting.”
“It’s very official and sweet.”
“[It had] The Incredibles family at the bottom and [it was on] Pixar letterhead.”
“I still have the PDF of it in my phone.”
“SB: I was in public and I opened [the e-mail] and screamed really loud.”
“HelloGiggles: What were your first feelings when that happened?”
“SB: Mm-hmm.”
“HelloGiggles: You didn’t audition, they just called you?”


"All of a sudden, there is a movement. Maybe she will be accepted by the society for the first time in her life, because she is such a person."
"Somehow, she became more and more radical."
"I opened the door and screamed. The whole restaurant was full of people and they turned to look at me. It was embarrassing, but it was so exciting."
"It's formal, it's sweet."
"[its] bottom is an incredible family, and [its] letterhead is Pixar."
"I still have PDF files on my phone."
"I'm in public, opening (email) and screaming."
"Hello giggles: what was your first feeling when that happened?"
"Well, well."
You didn't audition, they just called you? "



Number  283
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s continuing to train and perform in her Stars on Ice tours.”
“I think that was really telling for me.”FROM PEN: Confetti, Sweets and Dogs: How Julianne Hough Had a Picture Perfect Wedding to Brooks LaichBut she’s not gone from the ice forever.”
““After giving it a lot of thought, I always say, no, I feel really good about the capacity I’m here in right now.”
““People ask me now at competitions, do you wish you were out there?” Davis explained about stepping away from the competitive aspect of the sport.”
“This engagement comes at a time when Davis, along with her skating partner White, said they wanted to take a break from the Olympics to focus more time on their personal lives.”
“This is another big moment for the Michigan-based couple: Earlier this year, they announced they got a dog, a mini sheepadoodle they named Bilbo Baggins (Bilbo is even the star of her own Instagram account!).”
“She captioned the post “7/13/17,” representing the day they got engaged.”
“She announced the engagement by posting a photo on Instagram of her serious ice — a gorgeous square-cut canary yellow diamond ring.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Olympic figure skater and Dancing with the Stars champ just announced her engagement to Fedor Andreev, a former professional figure skater and son of her longtime coach, Marina Zoueva, whom she has been dating for over six years.”


"She continues to train and perform among the stars of the ice tour."
"I think it's really convincing to me." Pen: confetti, candy and dog: how Julian Hoff married Brooks rich perfectly, but she didn't leave the ice forever
"After careful consideration, I always say," no, I feel very good about my ability now. "
"Now people ask me in the game, do you want to be out there? "Davis explained, stay away from the competitive aspects of the sport."
"The engagement comes as Davis and her skating partner white say they want to take a break from the Olympics and spend more time in their personal lives."
It's another big moment for the Michigan couple: earlier this year, they announced that they had a dog, a miniature sheepskin dog, and they named it Bilbo Baggins. "
The title of her post is "7 / 13 / 17", representing the day of their engagement
"When she announced her engagement, she posted a picture of her serious ice on instagram - a gorgeous square cut canary yellow diamond ring."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The Olympic figure skater and star dancing champion has just announced her engagement to Fedor Andreev, a former professional figure skater and the son of her longtime coach Marina zueva, who has been dating for more than six years."



Number  284
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The duo’s best friends — one of whom officiated the ceremony from the ocean!”
“Image zoom Jordin Sparks and husband Dana Isaiah photographed by Karla Ruiz at the Grand Fiesta Americana Coral Beach in Cancun Mexico Credit Karla Ruiz Image zoom Jordin Sparks and husband Dana Isaiah photographed by Karla Ruiz at the Grand Fiesta Americana Coral Beach in Cancun Mexico Credit Karla Ruiz...”
“Pregnant Jordin Sparks Shows Off Her Growing Belly in a Bikini on Cancun BabymoonJordin Sparks is celebrating the good life.”
“Joining her husband, fitness model Dana Isaiah, on a beachy babymoon, the singer and actress stayed at the Grand Fiesta Americana Coral Beach in Cancun, Mexico, this past weekend.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The couple spent the bulk of their time at the resort’s HydroSpa and lounging around their own pool at the Presidential Suite, but did hit the beach a few times to enjoy the waves.”
“Sparks, 28, is due to give birth to a baby boy — the couple’s first child — at the end of April.”
“She was photographed Monday alongside Isaiah, showing off her baby bump in a white bikini and matching cover-up.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”


"Two best friends - one of them is married at sea!"
"Karla Ruiz's Jordin Sparks and her husband Dana Isaiah's grand Fiesta Americana coral beach in Cancun Mexico credit Karla Ruiz's picture zoom Jordin Sparks and her husband Dana Isaiah's grand Fiesta Americana coral beach in Cancun Mexico credit Karla Ruiz..."
"Pregnant Jordin Sparks is wearing a bikini to show off her growing belly in Cancun. Babymon Jordin Sparks is celebrating a wonderful life."
The singer and actress spent the weekend with her husband, fitness model Dana Isaiah, in a stroller at the grand Fiesta Americana coral beach in Cancun, Mexico
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The couple spent most of their time at the resort spa, strolling around the swimming pool in the presidential suite, but did go to the beach a few times to enjoy the waves."
"Sparks, 28, will give birth to a baby boy at the end of April - the couple's first child."
On Monday, she was photographed with Isaiah, wearing a white bikini to show off her small lump and cover it up accordingly
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."



**Something goes wrong**
“In the year following its release, five Teenage Dream tracks would hit No.”
“Beyond the VMAs, Perry — and Teenage Dream — thrived.”
“"I’m very honored to have anybody like my song and nominate me for a chance to win.”
“...she said.”
“"It’s a very challenging VMA!"”
“In a backstage interview, Perry was bowled over — and grateful — for the consideration in the Best Female Video category, especially.”
“She’s all smiles, and for good reason: In addition to the performance, “I Kissed A Girl” earned Perry nominations in a number of categories, including Best New Artist and Best Female Video, and she was just thrilled to be joining the ranks of Rihanna and Britney Spears.”
“She followed that up with “I Kissed A Girl,” and in the accompanying clip, Perry, walks off-stage after the performance, cracks up at host Russell Brand’s praise of her single and his newfound (and X-rated) appreciation for cherry chapstick.”
“Perry updated it for a 2008 audience thanks to her cheeky "Like A [Jonas]" tweaks.”
“First, she tried her hand at Madonna’s “Like A Virgin,” which Madge performed on the VMA stage back in 1984.”


"In the year after its release, five songs of" dream of youth "will rank first."
"Outside of VMA, Perry's and teenagers' dreams flourish."
"I'm honored to have someone like my song and nominate me for a chance to win."
“…… She said
"This is a very challenging VMA!" "
"In a backstage interview, Perry was very happy about the consideration of the best women's video category, especially the women's video category."
"She's smiling, and for good reasons: in addition to the performance, I kiss a girl has also won Perry's nominations for best new artist and best female video, and she's happy to join Rihanna and Britney Spears."
Later, she made another film "I kissed a girl". In the accompanying clip, Perry walked off the stage after the performance and expressed dissatisfaction with the host Russell Brand's praise of her single and his new discovery (and x-level) appreciation of cherry corolla
Perry updated the 2008 audience to thank her for her brazen "like a [Jonas]" fine tuning
"First of all, she tried Madonna's like a virgin, which Maggie performed on the VMA stage in 1984."



Number  286
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I was holding up production, a production that costs thousands of dollars per minute, all for my stupid comment about my stupid toes.”
“"I tried to sweetly wiggle away from her, my eyes flitting to the crew that was waiting nearby.”
“We were shooting a summer scene the exterior of the funeral for Alison the Queen Bee of Rosewood and even though I don t remember exactly how cold it was outside I can tell you it was too cold to...”
“***When I shot the pilot of Pretty Little Liars, it was December in Vancouver, and I was 24 years old.”
“Here I am, 31 years old, and I'm still denying my body the one thing it is asking me to do: take care of it.”
“I keep swimming.”
“I know I should get out of the water before I hurt myself or make myself sick, but I just don't.”
“Suddenly, I'm in very familiar territory.”
“I wasn't even sure if I had toes anymore.”
“Soon, it's in my bones, so much that even though I knew I was kicking my legs, I couldn't tell you where they ended and the water began.”


"I put off production, which costs thousands of dollars a minute, because of my stupid comments, my stupid toes."
"I tried to sweetly walk away from her, my eyes passing the crew waiting nearby."
"We're shooting summer scenes for Alison's funeral. Although I don't remember how cold it was outside, I can tell you it's too cold to..."
"* * when I shot the pilot of pretty little liar, it was December in Vancouver, when I was 24 years old."
"I'm here, 31 years old, and I still refuse one thing my body asks me to do: take care of it."
"I've been swimming."
"I know I should get out of the water before I get hurt or sick, but I just don't do that."
"All of a sudden, I entered a very familiar field."
"I'm not even sure I have toes."
"Soon it was in my bones, so even if I knew I was kicking my legs, I couldn't tell you where they ended and where the water started."



Number  287
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“On May 25, 2011, after being ruled competent to stand trial in March 2010 and convicted that December, Mitchell was sentenced to life in federal prison.”
“They reported their sightings to police, who immediately followed up on the lead and pulled over a car carrying Mitchell, Barzee and Smart.”
“Her alleged kidnappers, Brian David Mitchell, a drifter who the Smarts had briefly employed at their house, and his wife, Wanda Barzee, were charged with the kidnapping, as well as burglary and sexual assault.”
“In the middle of the night on June 5, 2002, Elizabeth Smart, then 14 years old, was taken at knifepoint from her bedroom in her parents’ house in the upscale Federal Heights neighborhood of Salt Lake City.”
“Her captor slid into the house undetected after cutting open the screen of an open window.”
“Elizabeth’s younger sister, Mary Katherine, with whom she shared her bedroom, was the only witness to the kidnapping.”
“Mary Katherine did not inform her parents until two hours after the incident, frightened that the man might return for her if she called out to alert them.”
“She was initially unable to identify her sister’s attacker.”
“Elizabeth was taken to a crude campsite in the woods just three miles from her family’s home–close enough that she could actually hear the voices of searchers calling for her in the days following her abduction.”
“There, it is alleged that Mitchell, who calls himself Emmanuel and professes to be a prophet with his own Mormon sect, sexually assaulted her.”


"On May 25, 2011, Mitchell was found entitled to trial in March 2010 and sentenced to life imprisonment after being convicted in December."
"They reported their sightings to the police, who immediately followed up the clues and stopped a car carrying Mitchell, bazer and smart."
Her kidnapper, Brian David Mitchell, is a homeless man who has worked for a short time in their home. His wife, Wanda bazer, is charged with kidnapping, burglary and sexual assault
"At midnight on June 5, 2002, Elizabeth Smart, then 14, was taken away with a knife from her parents' bedroom in the upscale federal highland community of Salt Lake City."
"Her captors sneaked into the house after cutting the screen of an open window and were not found."
Elizabeth's sister, Mary Catherine, shared a bedroom with her and was the only witness to the kidnapping
Mary Catherine didn't inform her parents until two hours after the incident. She was afraid that if she called the police loudly, the person might come back for her
"She couldn't initially identify the person who attacked her sister."
"Elizabeth was taken to a shabby campsite in the woods just three miles from her home - close enough that she could really hear the searchers calling for her in the days after she was kidnapped."
There, Mitchell is said to have sexually assaulted herself by calling herself Emmanuel, a prophet of her own Mormon religion



Number  288
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Then they start having kids.”FROM PEN: Ryan Seacrest is Already a Fixture in Kelly Ripa’s HouseFor her part, Hough, 29, was over the moon with how her special day turned out.”
“They’re all married.”
“I’ve got several exes who have gotten married.”
“We dated years ago and remain friends.”When his co-host Kelly Ripa asked if he was having mixed feelings about hearing about an ex’s big day, Seacrest — who recently moved in with girlfriend Shayna Taylor — said, “No.”
“I’ve seen that lake.”
“So congratulations, Julianne.”Seacrest, whose two-year relationship with Hough ended in 2013, said of the scenic wedding destination: “I’ve been on that lake.”
““They are terrific people … how super talented she is.”
““I know this family,” Seacrest continued.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Idaho...”


"And then they started having children." From Peng: Ryan Seacrest is already a regular show for Kelly Ripa's family, because her part, Hoff, 29, is very excited about the ending of her special day
"They are all married."
"I have several ex girlfriends who are married."
"We dated years ago and are still friends." When host Kelly Ripa asked him if he had mixed feelings about hearing about his ex girlfriend's big day, Seacrest, who recently lived with his girlfriend Shana Taylor, said, "No
"I've seen that lake."
"Congratulations, Julian." "I've been to that lake," Seacrest, who ended his two-year relationship with Hoff in 2013, said of his wedding destination
"They're great people She's so talented. "
"I know the family," Seacrest continued
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Idaho..."



Number  289
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The fact that we were teeter-tottering on two, I felt like three was probably in the cards.'”
“...posted a photo of herself at the album signing to Instagram on Wednesday night...”
“...her toned legs...”
“Dressed to impress Jessie modeled a pair of black leather boots posing with her hands in her pockets and beaming for the cameras as she showcased her beautiful bump The mother of two s outfit featured maroon and midnight blue horizontal stripes and was hemmed above the knee to showcase...”
“The Vicenza-born country artist dressed to impress in a stylish sweater dress.”
“Jessie was also seen stopping by Universal Studios Hollywood on Wednesday to visit the Hallmark Channel show Home And Family.”
“Loved all of you #southerngirlcitylights'.”
“She wrote: 'Thanks to all my cali girls and boys for coming out to the album signing tonight at the grove!”
“Hot mama The singer and reality star 29 showed off her bump in a sage green jumpsuit as she attended a signing of her new record at The Grove Oh baby The musician swept her hair back and wound it into a ponytail accessorizing the look with multiple necklaces Jessie...”
“While sat on a couch at Home And Family, she was seen holding a gift from the show - a little baby onesie with the program's name on the front.”


"As a matter of fact, we are two wobbly, I think three may be in the card."
“… Signed an instagram album on Wednesday night and posted a photo of myself... "
“… Her strong legs... "
"To impress, Jesse wore a pair of black leather boots with her hands in her pockets, smiling at the camera and showing her beautiful breasts. The mother of two s's dress features maroon and midnight blue stripes, and the trim above the knee is for display... "
"The country artist, who was born in Vicenza, is very impressive in his fashionable woolen dress."
"Jesse was also seen on Wednesday at Universal Studios Hollywood, visiting the home and family of Holzer Mark channel (Hallmark Channel) (Home And Family)," Studios said.
"I love all your southern girls"
She wrote: "thank you to all my Carly girls and boys for coming to Grove tonight for the album signing party!"
"When the singer and reality star of spicy mom attended the signature meeting of the new record in grove oh baby on the 29th, she wore a sage green Jumpsuit to show her figure. The musician rolled her hair back, tied it into a ponytail, and decorated Jesse with many necklaces..."
"When she was sitting on the sofa at home and in her family, she was seen with a performance gift in her hand - a little baby with the name of the show written on the front."



Number  290
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When he wants to work, Kylie is supportive.””
“...and a peachy nude called Nova Credit Kylie Jenner Instagram The collection comes with two eye palettes the first of which is called Calm Before the Storm...”
“...a new Kylie Cosmetics collection during her pregnancy...”
“The beauty mogul, 20, unveiled the latest eye palettes, lipsticks and lip glosses from her makeup company on her Instagram stories, and revealed how her newborn daughter Stormi was a major influence in the design.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Jenner shared an Instagram video of the collection, named the Weather Collection, which boasts lightning bolts as an ode to the daughter she gave birth to earlier this month.”
“Image zoom Kylie Jenner debuted a new collection that took inspiration from her newborn daughter Stormi | Credit: Kylie Jenner/InstagramImage zoom“⚡ The Weather Collection ⚡ Launching Feb 28 3pm pst.”
“Check out my stories to see a closer look  @kyliecosmetics,” she wrote in the caption.”
“On her Instagram stories, Jenner revealed that her latest collection grew as her then unborn baby did.”
““So, before I open my newest collection I just wanted to tell you guys a little bit of the background,” she said.”


"When he wants to work, Kelly is for him."
“… There is also a peach nude series called Nova credit Kylie Jenner instagram, which comes with two eye masks, the first one is called calm before the storm... "
“… Kelly's new cosmetics line during her pregnancy... "
"The 20 year old beauty tycoon released the latest eye makeup, lipstick and lipstick from her cosmetics company on Instagram, and revealed how her newborn daughter Stormy had a major impact on design."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Jenna shared a video on instagram called "weather collection," which features lightning as a tribute to her daughter, who was born earlier this month
"Image zoom Kylie Jenner launched a new series inspired by her new daughter, stormi | photo source: Kylie Jenner / instagram image zoom" ⚡  Weather series ⚡  Released at 3 p.m. Pacific Standard Time on February 28. "
"Look at my story, take a closer look at @ kyosmetics," she wrote in the title
"On instagram, Jenner revealed that her latest collection grew up like her unborn child."
"So before I open my latest collection, I just want to give you some background," she said



Number  291
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Lauren Burnham/InstagramImage zoom Credit: Lauren Burnham/Instagram...”
“Despite their highly criticized love story (just ask the state of Minnesota) the two remain hopeful for their future.”
“Image zoom Credit: Arie Luyendyk Jr/InstagramTheir international excursion comes just days after the two cuddled up at the opening race of the IndyCar season.”
“...marveling at a black sand beach exploring rainbow streaked waterfalls and sneaking mountainside smooches...”
“Her first photo of the getaway read Finally escaped Another of Luyendyk Jr bravely venturing near the rough North Atlantic read Freakin love this nerd Image zoom Credit Lauren Burnham Instagram Image zoom Credit Lauren Burnham Instagram The reality stars appear to have played tourist by driving down the coast...”
“Image zoom Credit: Arie Luyendyk Jr/InstagramImage zoom Credit: Arie Luyendyk Jr/InstagramBurnham’s social media posts were equally enthusiastic.”
““So much beauty here in Iceland including this one.”He continued to share insights into their adventure on his Instagram Stories, capturing the couple’s “cappuccinos in bed,” their rental car and more pictures of the happy duo kissing.”
““Posted this because I sent this to my mom and she said she’s never seen me happier,” he said.”
“The race car driver-realtor also shared an additional picture on his Instagram with a sentimental caption.”
“The two are all smiles in the selfies.”


"Image scaling source: Lauren Burnham / instagram image scaling source: Lauren Burnham / instagram..."
"Despite the criticism of their love story (just ask Minnesota), they are still hopeful about their future."
"Photo zooming credit: Little Ali luyandik / instagram, their international trip was just a few days after the first race of the Indy season."
“… Explore the rainbow waterfall on the black beach and surprise at the secret hillside kiss... "
"Her first photo of escape finally escaped. Little luyandike bravely ventured to approach the rugged North Atlantic, read the nerd photo of crazy love, enlarged the photo of Lauren Burnham, enlarged the photo of Lauren Burnham, the reality TV stars in the photo seemed to play a tourist, driving down the coast..."
"Thanks to image zooming: Arie luyendyk Jr / instagram image zoom: Arie luyendyk Jr / instagram Burnham's social media posts are equally enthusiastic."
He continued to share their adventures on instagram, taking pictures of the couple's "cappuccino in bed," their car rental and more happy kissing
"I sent this letter because I sent it to my mother, who said she had never seen me so happy," he said
"The racing driver's agent also shared an additional picture on instagram with a sentimental title."
"They both laughed in the selfie."



Number  292
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Game of Thrones season 8 spoilers: Jon and Sansa were reunited in the sixth series...”
“...and Jon because of his new love interest to whom he has pledged his loyalty...”
“Please see our Privacy Notice for details of your data protection rights.”
“The pair had spent most of the programme apart before they were finally reunited in season six, but Jon Snow’s (played by Kit Harington) involvement with Daenerys Targaryen (Emilia Clarke) may be a problem.”
“Yesterday saw Game of Thrones fans get their first glimpse at the final series when Entertainment Weekly published the first official picture for season eight.”
“The publication also released a behind-the-scenes report on the HBO series and it hints at something very interesting.”
“It looks like the season will feature a lot of hints toward the very first instalment.”
“It read: “Instead of King Robert’s procession arriving, it’s Daenerys and her army.”
“What follows is a thrilling and tense intermingling of characters some of whom have never previously met many who have messy histories as they all prepare to face the inevitable invasion of the Army of the Dead But it goes on to add that there may be tension between Sansa...”
“The report continued: “Sansa isn’t thrilled that Jon bent the knee to his fancy new Targaryen girlfriend, at least not at first.” So, it could be that she comes round to the idea eventually.”


Game of Thrones Season 8 spoiler: Jon and Sansa reunite in season 6
“… And Jon, because he's interested in his new love, he assures him of his loyalty... "
"For more information about your data protection rights, please refer to our privacy statement."
"Before the final reunion of season 6, the two spent most of their time on the show separately, but the relationship between Jon Snow (played by kit Harrington) and Denise tangleyan (played by Amelia Clark) may be a problem."
"Yesterday, fans of game of Thrones saw the first official picture of entertainment week's eighth season for the first time."
"The publication also released a behind the scenes report on the HBO series, suggesting something very interesting."
"It looks like there will be a lot of hints about the first season this season."
It says, "it's not King Robert's team that arrives, it's daenerys and her army."
"Next is a mix of exciting and nervous characters, some of whom have never seen before many who have a chaotic history, as they are all ready to face the inevitable invasion of the dead army, but it goes on to add that there may be tension between the Sansha..."
"Sansa was not at all excited about Jon bending his knee to his new tangurian girlfriend, at least at first," the report went on So she may eventually accept the idea



Number  293
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The sex of the couple’s baby on the way is unconfirmed at this point, but a son wouldn’t be a surprise.”
“Image zoom Credit: Kim Kardashian InstagramImage zoom Credit: Kim Kardashian Instagram“Welcome to Chrissy’s Pan Am flight!”
“The pregnant star celebrated her big day with a Pan Am-themed bash as guests traveled back in time and got in the retro ’60s spirit with cabin-crew chic costumes including block color tops, pencil skirts, pillbox hats as well as double-breasted ensembles.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The soirée was complete with stewardesses and pilots dressed in the now-defunct airline’s wardrobe!”
“Image zoom Credit: Kim Kardashian InstagramTeigen channeled Jackie Kennedy Onassis, wearing a black fascinator with a boxy orange top and skirt by Sergio Hudson that was cinched at her baby bump with a belt.”
“Husband John Legend looked dapper in a mix of tartan patterns that also followed the party’s theme.”
“Image zoomImage zoom Credit: John Legend InstagramLooking for more style content?”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more.”
“We don’t know where we’re going, we don’t know what we’re doing but we don’t care.”


"At present, the sex of the couple's baby on the road has not been confirmed, but it's not surprising to have a son."
Picture scaling credit: Kim Kardashian instagram picture scaling credit: Kim Kardashian instagram welcome to Chris's Pan American flight
"The pregnant star celebrates her big day with a Pan Am themed carnival, as the guests go back to the past and wear cabin crew's chic costumes in the retro spirit of the 60s, including block coat, pencil skirt, top hat and double breasted ensemble."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"At the party, the flight attendants and pilots were wearing the airline's wardrobe that no longer exists!"
"Image zooming credit: Kim Kardashian's instagram Teigen channels Jackie Kennedy Onassis in a black camouflage dress, paired with an orange square top and Sergio Hudson's skirt, which is tied with a belt and her little lump tightly."
"Her husband, John Legend, looks smart in a checkered suit and follows the theme of the party."
"Image scaling image scaling credit: John Legend instagram looking more style content?"
"Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle newsletters for amazing discounts, beauty products and more."
"We don't know where we're going, we don't know what we're doing, but we don't care."



Number  294
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“This has hit him very hard.”“With Brad Grey, Brad Pitt was one of the few people who knew he was sick.”
“Brad Pitt can’t catch a break this year.”
“It was recently revealed that the divorced actor is currently mourning the shocking loss of both Soundgarden rocker Chris Cornell and Paramount’s Brad Grey.”
“As Radar readers know, Cornell, 52, was found dead on the bathroom floor of his hotel room after an apparent suicide.”
“Meanwhile, last weekend, Grey, the former Paramount Pictures chairman and CEO, died of cancer.”
“He was just 59.”
““He is devastated and in shock,” a source told E!”
“News of Pitt’s reaction to the sad news.”
““He is trying to process the loss of two great friends.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"It hit him a lot." "With Brad gray, Brad Pitt is one of the few people who knows he's sick."
"Brad Pitt can't rest this year."
"It's been reported recently that the divorced actor is mourning the shocking deaths of Soundgarden rock singer Chris Cornell and Paramount's Brad gray."
"Radar readers know that Cornell, 52, apparently committed suicide and was found dead on the bathroom floor of a hotel room."
Meanwhile, gray, the former chairman and CEO of Paramount Pictures, died of cancer last weekend
"He was 59 at the time."
A source told e
"Pete's reaction to the bad news is not good news."
"He's trying to deal with the loss of two good friends."



Number  295
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See what Fredrik and Bethenny mean by checking out this first look at their new series, below.”
“I mean I know it is."”
“Bethenny Frankel and Fredrik Eklund are a BFF match made in heaven.”
“We mean, they even have the most perfect celebrity couple name ever: Beklund.”
“But actually, Fredrik recently revealed to The Daily Dish that he often feels like his friendship with Bethenny has taken on a whole new level.”
“"You know, she's one of those, like, demanding personalities.”
“When she speaks, she's in your face, she's in your head, she's in your heart.”
“I feel like I'm married to her," Fredrik recently shared with The Daily Dish about his friendship with Bethenny.”
“"And we joke about that, like that I'm her gay husband.”
“There is a really loving friendship at the bottom of it, and now there's this business venture."”


"Take a look at what Frederick and Bethany's new series means at first glance."
"I mean I know it is."
"Bethany Frankel and Frederick Eklund are made in heaven."
"We mean, they're even the most perfect celebrity couple ever: becklund."
"But in fact, Frederick recently revealed to the daily mail that he often feels that his friendship with besseini has reached a new level."
"You know, she's kind of, like, demanding."
"When she talks, she's in your face, she's in your head, she's in your heart."
"I feel like I'm married to her," Frederick recently shared his friendship with besseini in the daily mail
"We joked that I was her gay husband."
"At the bottom is a true love and friendship, and now there is this kind of business adventure."



Number  296
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But there’s no network on board as of yet.”
“Original series creator Joss Whedon is also on board as a producer.”
“Sources say that the reboot will cast a black actress in the titular role.”
“...it to comment on aspects of the current political and cultural climates...”
“So maybe it could be time to meet a new Slayer The new Buffy version is being described as a contemporary and richly diverse take on the original series building on the mythology of the original and using aspects of...”
““But here we are, twenty years later… And the world seems a lot scarier.”
“Owusu-Breen writes the original show and characters “can’t be replaced.”“There is only one Buffy,” she wrote on Twitter.”
“Monica Owusu-Breen (Alias, Midnight Texas), who’s drafting a new iteration of the cult classic that ran from 1997 to 2003, responded to some of the online backlash against the proposed new version of the show.”
“...to replace beloved favorites...”
“Original series can t be replicated I wouldn t try to Buffy the Vampire Slayer Close Streaming Options The writer behind the reboot of Buffy the Vampire Slayer is assuring fans that the new version in development won t try...”


"But there is no network on board at the moment."
"The creator of the original series, Jos Wheaton, is also a producer."
"It is reported that this restart will allow a black actress to play a role in name only."
“…… It is necessary to comment on all aspects of the current political and cultural climate... "
"So maybe it's time to meet a new slayer, the new bafi version is described as a contemporary, rich and diverse aspect based on the original series, built on the original myth, and used..."
"But twenty years later, we came here The world seems more terrible. "
"Auusu brin is the screenwriter of the original series, and the role" can't be replaced. " "There's only one Buffy," she wrote on twitter
"Monica Ausu brin (not her real name, from midnight Texas) is drafting a new version of the cult classic from 1997 to 2003. She has responded to some online objections to the new version of the play."
“… Replace favorite
"The original series can't be copied. I won't try to turn off the streaming option of Buffy the vampire killer. After the restart of Buffy the vampire killer, the author assures the fans that the new version being developed won't try..."



Number  297
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Yesterday, following boyfriend Tristan’s opening up about his daughter, the 33-year-old new mum took to Twitter to reveal the adorable nickname she has for her one-month-old.”
“‘I can’t believe my baby will be a month old tomorrow,’ the reality star wrote on Twitter Wednesday.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“I can’t believe my baby will be a month old tomorrow  why does this make me happy and sad all at the same time.”
“Thank you Jesus for my sweet peanut  — Khloé (@khloekardashian) May 10, 2018‘Why does this make me happy and sad all at the same time,’ admitted the new mother before revealing her baby girl’s nickname.”
“‘Thank you Jesus for my sweet peanut,’ she gushed.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Yesterday, the 33 year old new mother tweeted her lovely nickname for her one month old daughter after her boyfriend Tristan disclosed her daughter's news
"I can't believe my child will be a month old tomorrow," the reality TV star tweeted on Wednesday
"This content was imported from twitter."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"I can't believe my baby is going to be a month old tomorrow. Why does it make me happy and sad?"
"Thank Jesus for giving me sweet Peanuts - khlo é (@ KhloeKardashian) may 10, 2018" why does this make me happy and sad at the same time? " The new mother admitted before revealing the baby girl's nickname
"Thank you for the sweet peanuts Jesus gave me," she gushed
"This content was imported from instagram."



Number  298
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Celebrate SJP’s birthday by browsing through her best style moments through the years!”
“), including her outfit choices.”
“Many things have changed since Parker’s entry into Hollywood (bye-bye, big brown hair and bangs!”
“Is there anything this mother of three can’t do?!”
“And in true Carrie Bradshaw fashion, Parker also took on a major role reminiscent of her SATC character this year—acting as guest editor for Nordstrom’s style blog, The Thread.”
“...stores...”
“If I m going to ask people for their hard earned dollars I d better be making shoes I want to wear the Sex and the City alum says of her SJP by Sarah Jessica Parker line available at Nordstrom...”
“From gracing our February cover to starring on Broadway in The Commons of Pensacola, Parker somehow fit in shoe designer on her already filled-to-the-brim resume.”
“The style icon, who turns 49 today, has had quite the busy year.”
“Happy birthday, Sarah Jessica Parker!”


"Browse SJP's most fashionable moment in many years, celebrate SJP's birthday!"
Including her clothing choices
"A lot of things have changed since Parker came into Hollywood (goodbye, big brown hair and bangs!"
"Is there anything the mother of three can't do?"
"In real carrier Bradshaw fashion, Parker also plays an important role reminiscent of her role at SATC this year, as guest editor of the thread, a Nordstrom fashion blog."
“… Shop... "
"If I want to ask people for their hard-earned money, I'd better make the shoes I want to wear. This is the SJP series of Sarah Jessica Parker that the alumni of" sex and the city "mentioned. It's available in Nordstrom..."
"From her February cover to her Broadway role in Pensacola's house of Commons, Parker somehow joined the ranks of shoe designers in her already full resume."
"This fashion icon turns 49 today. It's been a busy year."
"Happy birthday, Sarah Jessica Parker!"



Number  299
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But nearly all fashion experts say there is one hard rule of thumb - never wear a white dress or outfit to a wedding unless you’re the bride!”
“UltimatelyIt’s your choice.”
“Do you have to wait for Memorial Day to wear white or can you wear it anytime?”
“So how did this, “No white before Memorial Day or after Labor Day” fashion rule start?”
“According to fashion reporters, it began in the 1930’s with the ultra-rich wearing only white in the summer.”
“Light clothing gave the look of leisure, while dark clothing was mostly for working people.”
“This idea expanded in the 1950’s among the middle class.”
“GRITS (Girls Raised In The South) held to this hard and fast rule of no white before or after Labor Day.”
“Some say it’s a southern thing, because it’s so hot in the south.”
“According to Bronwyn Cosgrave, author of The Complete History of Costume & Fashion: From Ancient Egypt to the Present Day, fashion rules are meant to be broken by those who can pull it off, notes Cosgrave, and white "looks really fresh when people aren't expecting it."”


"But almost all fashion experts say there's a hard rule of thumb - never wear a white dress or suit to a wedding unless you're a bride!"
"In the end, it's your choice."
"Do you have to wait until memorial day to wear white, or can you wear it at any time?"
So how did the fashion rule of "no white clothes before Memorial Day or after Labor Day" begin
"According to the fashion reporter, it started in the 1930s when the super rich only wore white clothes in the summer."
"Light colored clothes give people a sense of leisure, while dark colored clothes are mainly for office workers."
"The idea expanded in the middle class in the 1950s."
"Gravel (girls who grew up in the South) sticks to the hard and fast rule that white people are not allowed to enter before or after labor day."
"Some people say it's in the south, because it's too hot in the south."
"According to Bronwyn Cosgrave, author of the complete history of clothing and fashion: from ancient Egypt to today, fashion rules are destined to be broken by those who can succeed. Cosgrave points out that white" looks really fresh when people don't expect it. "



Number  300
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They really gave it another solid try.”Despite things not working out for Affleck and Shookus, the insider added the pair “will always have love for each other.”Scroll down to see the timeline of Affleck and Shookus’ relationship.”
“...to part ways...”
“She has a kid and an ex husband and a job in New York and Ben has his family and a job in L A and while they love and respect each other they just realized it wasn t going to work an insider explained to Us of their decision...”
“After briefly rekindling their romance in February 2019, multiple sources confirmed to Us Weekly that the two split for a second time in April.”
“The pair went public with their romance in July 2017, but they called it quits in August 2018.”
“The actor found love with the Saturday Night Live producer after his 2015 split from estranged wife Jennifer Garner.”
“It’s over for Ben Affleck and Lindsay Shookus.”


"They really made another solid attempt." Although the relationship between Affleck and shokus did not go well, the insider added that the two "will always be in love." Scroll down to see the timeline of the relationship between Affleck and shokus
“… Go our separate ways... "
"She has a child and an ex husband. She has a job in New York. Ben has his family and a job in Los Angeles. Although they love and respect each other, they realize that it won't work. An insider explained their decision to us..."
"After a brief rekindling in February 2019, a number of sources confirmed to us weekly that the two broke up for the second time in April."
"The two had a public relationship in July 2017, but announced their separation in August 2018."
"The actor found love with the producer of Saturday night live after breaking up with his separated wife, Jennifer Garner, in 2015."
"Ben Affleck and Lindsay schokus are over."



Number  301
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The newlyweds were also spotted touring Verona and Florence, where they stopped to take a few photos with fans.”
“In the photo, taken by Fassbender, the group smiled for the camera as Vikander, 29, showed off her wedding band.”
“WATCH: Michael Fassbender and Alicia Vikander Got Married in an Ultra-Private Ibiza CeremonyThe couple later honeymooned in Italy where they were spotted at the Osteria del Cappello restaurant in Bologna on Sunday, as seen in a fan’s selfie that was shared on Twitter.”
“The Swedish actress wore a white, summery gown with matching heart sunglasses, while the Irish-German actor showed off his abs in an unbuttoned shirt and a pair of shorts.”
“Ahead of the ceremony, Fassbender and Vikander were spotted hanging out with friends and family on the Spanish island Friday.”
“Image zoom Credit: Zach Hilty/BFA/REX/ShutterstockThe pair exchanged vows at the luxurious La Granja farmstead resort surrounded by friends and family, sources previously told PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Vikander was styled in a look from the 2018 Spring ready-to-wear line.”
“The 29-year-old actress attended the Louis Vuitton “Volez, Vogez, Voyagez” exhibition opening in New York on Thursday night flashing her wedding ring — her first public appearance since marrying Michael Fassbender in Ibiza earlier this month.”
“Alicia Vikander Flashes Wedding Ring at First Appearance After Wedding to Michael FassbenderAlicia Vikander is stepping out as a married woman.”


"The newlyweds were also found touring Verona and Florence, where they stopped to take a few pictures with their fans."
"In this picture taken by Fassbender, vikander, 29, smiles at the camera as she shows her wedding ring."
Observation: Michael Fassbender and Alicia vicander got married at a very private wedding in Ibiza. The couple later honeymooned in Italy and were found at Osteria del Cappello restaurant in Bologna on Sunday, as can be seen in a self portrait of a fan shared on twitter
The Swedish actress wore a white summer suit and matching heart-shaped sunglasses, while the Irish German actor showed off her abdominal muscles in a button less shirt and shorts
Before the ceremony, faspinder and vicander were found hanging out with friends and relatives on the Spanish island on Friday
"Credit for image zooming: Zach hildi / BFA / Rex / shutterstock the source told people earlier that the two exchanged vows at the luxury La granja Farm Resort surrounded by friends and family."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Vikander's look comes from the 2018 spring ready to wear collection."
The 29 year old actress showed her wedding ring at the opening exhibition of Louis Vuitton's "Wallace, WAGGS, hangagz" in New York on Thursday night, her first public appearance since her marriage to Michael faspin in Ibiza earlier this month
"Alicia vicander and Michael Fassbender put on their wedding ring on their first appearance after their marriage. Wickander is a married woman. "



Number  302
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Stories:Khloé Kardashian Is Officially Six Months Pregnant TodayA Pregnant Khloé Kardashian Wore the Sparkliest Naked Jumpsuit on Christmas EveKim Kardashian Was Finally Asked, Point-Blank, Whether Kylie Jenner and Khloé Kardashian Are Pregnant...”
“Watch all of this go down:Unfortunately, it looks like we won't receive anything more concrete until Kylie herself says something—probably on Snapchat.”
“In September Kim Kardashian West confirmed she and Kanye West are having their third child via surrogate.”
“Three months later Khloé Kardashian revealed she is expecting her first baby ever with basketball-player boyfriend Tristan Thompson.”
“However, Kylie Jenner is still keeping mum about rumors that she's also pregnant.”
“Save for calling her new lip kits "babies" in a video a few months ago, Jenner is doing an excellent job at keeping people in the dark about this whole thing.”
“Sure, her sisters may have come to her defense a few times when the speculation got out of hand, but Jenner's yet to confirm the actual news.”
“We straight up don't know whether she's pregnant yet.”
“And Khloé's new interview with Ellen DeGeneres doesn't bring us any closer to the truth, either.”
“The Good American entrepreneur sat down with DeGeneres this week to talk about her newly announced pregnancy, but before long the conversation pivoted to Kylie.”


"Related story: khlo Kelly Kardashian is officially pregnant for six months. Today, pregnant Carol Kardashian put on her brightest nude dress on Christmas Eve. Kim Kardashian was finally asked whether Kelly Jenner and Carol Kardashian are pregnant..."
"Looking at it all in the past: Unfortunately, we won't get any more specific information until Kelly says something on snapchat herself."
"In September, Kim Kardashian West confirmed that she and Kanye West were having a third child through surrogacy."
"Three months later, Kardashian revealed that she was pregnant with her first child ever with her basketball player boyfriend Tristan Thompson."
"However, Kelly Jenner is still silent about the rumors that she is also pregnant."
In addition to her new lipstick called baby in a video a few months ago, Jenna did a good job in letting people absolutely ignorant of the whole thing.
"Of course, when the speculation got out of control, her sisters may have defended her several times, but Jenner hasn't confirmed the real news."
"We don't know if she's pregnant."
"And Heroe's new interview with Ellen DeGeneres doesn't bring us closer to the truth."
"This excellent American entrepreneur sat down with DeGeneres this week to talk about her just announced pregnancy, but it wasn't long before the topic turned to Kelly."



Number  303
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Stories:Kendall and Kylie Jenner's Day Off Involved Lots of Staring at Each Other in Silence...”
““I didn’t expect it to happen like this.”
“Kim and her husband Kanye West have three: North, Saint, and Chicago.”
“Kourtney co-parents Mason, Penelope, and Reign with her ex partner Scott Disick.”
“Rob Kardashian has a daughter, Dream, with his ex Blac Chyna.”
“Kendall's younger sister, Kylie, welcomed her first baby (a daughter named Stormi Webster) with boyfriend Travis Scott in February.”
“And just last month, Khloé Kardashian welcomed her first child (also a daughter, named True) with boyfriend Tristan Thompson.”
“In a new interview with Elle magazine, Kendall admits that even she can barely keep up with the amount of babies joining the Kardashian-Jenner group.”
“"[My family is] forever growing,” Jenner said while chatting with Lana Del Rey for the magazine.”
““Every time I think it’s eased up, someone’s popping out a baby.”Kendall specifically talked about Kylie's birth during her interview.”


"Related story: Kendall and Kelly Jenner have a lot of people staring at each other silently during their holidays..."
"I didn't expect that."
"Kim and her husband Kanye West have three homes: North, holy city and Chicago."
"Courtney is the co parent of Mason, Penelope and Regan, as is her former partner Scott Disick."
"Rob Kardashian and his ex girlfriend Blake chener have a daughter, dream."
"Kendall's sister, Kelly, and her boyfriend, Travis Scott, had her first child in February
"Just last month, Kardashian and her boyfriend Tristan Thompson ushered in her first child (and a daughter named true)
"In a new interview with Elle magazine, Kendall admits that it's hard for even her to keep up with the number of babies joining the Kardashian Jenner group."
"It's always growing," Jenner said in a chat with Lana Drey for the magazine
"Every time I feel the situation eases, someone is going to have a baby." Kendall specifically talked about Kelly's birth in the interview



Number  304
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We are so lucky to be your girls forever,” she recently shared on social media.”
““I have never loved you more than I do right now.”
“You are not alone.”Adjusting to life at home with a newborn, Lauren, who married Aaron, 38, in 2013, continues to gush about her growing family.”
“...virtual hug to all the mamas out there who have had any type of issue breastfeeding or are dealing with anything physically or emotionally difficult be it with you or your child...”
“There are so many things that can happen an oversupply of milk leading to infection your baby having trouble latching having an undersupply being aware of this will be so helpful so that you will know how to avoid or handle these things She continued I wanna give a big...”
“Take a class, do your research or have conversations with other mothers,” Lauren offered.”
“If I could give an upcoming mother any advice for this chapter it would be to become well educated about breastfeeding.”
““I’m feeling a responsibility to share this so that any new [mama-to-be] reading this is aware of these potential issues.”
“Lauren hopes her story will inspire and educate fellow moms and parents-to-be.”
“For the [mamas who have been there, I know you feel me,” she penned.”


"We are so lucky to be your daughter forever," she recently said on social media
"I've never loved you as much as I do now."
"You're not alone." In 2013, 38 year old Lauren married Allen. In order to adapt to the newborn life at home, Lauren continued to talk about her growing up family
“… Virtual hugs for all mothers who have breastfeeding problems or are dealing with any physical or emotional difficulties, whether it's you or your child... "
"There are too many things that can happen, too much milk can lead to infection, your baby has locking difficulties, insufficient supply, it will help to realize this, you will know how to avoid or deal with these things, she continued, I want to give a big..."
"Go to class, do research, or talk to other mothers," Lauren said
"If I can give anyone who is going to be a mother any advice about this chapter, it's to have a good breastfeeding education."
"I think it's my responsibility to share this article so that anyone who reads it (mother to be) can be aware of these potential problems."
"Lauren hopes her story will inspire and educate future mothers and parents."
"For the mothers who have been there, I know you feel me," she wrote



Number  305
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...identification data the State s charge must be dismissed...”
“The attorneys said in court documents obtained by PEOPLE that because Mr Soules indisputably stopped his vehicle returned to the injured driver contacted law enforcement provided aid to the injured driver arranged for medical treatment for the injured driver remained until emergency personnel responded to the injured party and provided...”
“According to court documents obtained by PEOPLE on Tuesday, the Bachelor alum, 37, has “entered a plea of guilty to the crime of: Leaving the Scene of an Accident Resulting in Serious Injury, an aggravated misdemeanor.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In the documents the State of Iowa moved to amend the trial information to charge Soules with leaving the scene of an accident resulting in serious injury and the Bachelor alum filed a written guilty plea to the amended charge conditioned his plea of guilty upon the court s acceptance...”
“...of the terms of the parties plea agreement But if the court rejects the plea agreement the defendant will be afforded the opportunity to withdraw his guilty plea the documents state...”
“According to his written conditional guilty plea submitted to the Iowa District Court on Tuesday and obtained by PEOPLE the aggravated misdemeanor charge carries a maximum penalty of imprisonment of not more than two 2 years and or by a fine of not more than six thousand two hundred and...”
“...fifty dollars 6 250 00 and a minimum penalty of a fine of six hundred twenty five dollars 625 00 along with a suspended jail sentence or a deferred judgment He later states that in exchange for his guilty plea the court will order a confidential presentence investigation report PSI”
“...be completed in advance of sentencing and this document will be provided to the State and to me...”
“I also understand that the instant plea to the aggravated misdemeanor will resolve any and all criminal matters, investigations, etc.”
“...arising from the accident on April 24, 2017 and no further prosecution or charges will be brought against me.”


“… Identity - the state's charge must be dropped... "
"The lawyers said in the court documents that people had obtained that since Mr. suers had indisputably stopped his vehicle and sent it back to the injured driver, law enforcement was contacted, assistance was provided to the injured driver and medical treatment was arranged for the injured driver until the first responders responded to the injured party and provided..."
According to court documents obtained on Tuesday, the 37 year old single alumni "pleaded guilty to the following crimes: leaving the scene of the accident resulting in serious injury and serious misdemeanor." Get news, feature, etc
"In the document, Iowa moved to amend the trial information, accusing sules of leaving the scene of the accident causing serious injury, and the single alumni pleaded guilty to the amended charges in writing, provided that the court accepts his plea of guilty..."
“…… But if the court refuses the plea agreement, the defendant will have the opportunity to withdraw his plea. The document states that... "
"According to a written conditional plea he filed with the Iowa District Court on Tuesday, people were given aggravated misdemeanor charges, punishable by up to two years' imprisonment and or a fine of up to 62 million..."
“… He later said that in exchange for his plea, the court would order a confidential court investigation report. "
“…… Completed before sentencing, this document will be provided to the state and me.... "
"I also understand that an immediate plea to aggravated misdemeanor will resolve any and all criminal issues, investigations, etc."
“…… Caused by the accident of April 24, 2017, there will be no further charges or charges against me. "



Number  306
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Adding: 'He's a very loyal person, so he was not going to bail when the going got tough.'”
“Unfortunately, at the time, all evidence pointed to the contrary.”
“Still A-OK: Lena and Jack are just fine now as they thrive as friends; seen in February 2017'Normally i would never address rumors but i resent having the most important friendships and working relationships in my life reduced to dumb hetero normative gossip,' he tweeted at the time.”
“After rumors started swirling about Lorde in January, Antonoff took to Twitter to squash them, just a month after his split from a five year relationship with the New York native.”
“It was awful, and I couldn't do anything about it except trust that what he was saying to me was true.'”
“'We haven't talked since Jack and I broke up.”
“'I have never spoken to Ella [Lorde] about it.”
“Happier times: Lena and Lorde seen here in 2017 with John Legend haven't spoken in nearly a year'I can never know someone else's life,' Lena explained to the outlet.”
“'I don't think anything happened between them,' added the TV star.”
“Their relationship, she explained, 'probably lasted longer than it should have.'”


He added: "he's a very loyal person, so he won't be bailed out in difficult times."
"Unfortunately, all the evidence at the time points in the opposite direction."
He tweeted at that time: "it's OK: Li Na and Jack are very good now, because they are very good friends; in February 2017, he tweeted," usually I don't talk about rumors, but I hate that the most important friendship and working relationship in life become stupid heterosexual normative gossip. "
In January of this year, rumors about Lord began to stir up. Just five years after he broke up with Lord, Antonov made his own comments on twitter
"It's terrible. There's nothing I can do about it. I can only believe what he said to me is true."
"We haven't talked since Jack and I broke up."
"I never told Ella about it."
"A happier time: Li Na and Lord and John Legend, who were here in 2017, haven't spoken for nearly a year." I'll never know other people's lives, "Li Na explained to the media
"I don't think what happened between them," the TV star added
"Their relationship, she explained," may last longer than it should. "



Number  307
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In every photo in which she appears, Kylie’s abdomen is somehow blocked from view.”
“And once again, the jury is out on whether or not Kylie is pregnant.”
“Next: This is Kylie’s excuse for those prego-looking photos.”
“So, is she trolling us or trying to tell us something?”
“Moreover, she captioned it “BABY” with a winking face emoji.”
“‘Nothing’s Gonna Hurt You Baby’ SnapJenner, meanwhile, continued to confuse her many social media followers by posting a video to Snapchat with the song “Nothing’s Gonna Hurt You Baby” by Cigarettes After Sex playing in the background.”
“Next: Is Kylie just trolling her own fans?”
“During an episode of Live with Kelly and Ryan, the Kardashian-Jenner family matriarch texted Ryan Seacrest to say that “Kylie is not confirming anything.”In November, the momager appeared on Ellen DeGeneres’ talk show and avoided any questions pertaining to whether the Life of Kylie star is preggers.”
“Mama Kris refused to confirm newsKris Jenner hasn’t been forthcoming at all about if her youngest daughter is expecting either.”
“Mrs. West tweeted a pretty feisty response to the publication that the story sounded “very fake.”Next: Making appearances on these shows haven’t revealed much either.”


"In every picture she appears, Kelly's abdomen is blocked."
"Again, it's not clear if Kelly is pregnant."
"Next: that's Kelly's excuse for those pregnancy photos."
"So, is she playing with us or is she trying to tell us something?"
In addition, she added the title "baby" to it with a blinking emoticon
At the same time, snapjenner released a video on snapchat. After playing sex in the background, she also used cigarettes to sing a song "nothing can hurt your baby" to confuse her many social media followers
"Next: is Kelly bullying her fans?"
In an episode of living with Kelly and Ryan, the Kardashian Jenner family's female parent texted Ryan Seacrest: "Kelly didn't confirm anything." In November, the mother appeared on Ellen DeGeneres's talk show, avoiding any questions about whether Kelly Starr's life was pregnant
"Chris's mother refused to confirm that newschris Jenner was not at all willing to see if her youngest daughter was pregnant."
Mrs. West's response to the report on twitter was fierce, saying it sounded "very fake.". Second, I didn't reveal too much information when I appeared in these programs



Number  308
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Shop The Look...”
“Elevate your own travel outfits with The Zoe Report's Garner-inspired picks, ahead.”
“The mom of three has made cozy-yet-fashionable her signature look, as evident by the perfect ensemble she just pulled together at Los Angeles International Airport on Wed. afternoon.”
“Jennifer Garner's airport style is about to serve as some serious inspiration for your next getaway (reminder: holiday season is on the horizon).”
“Choosing a travel outfit that's comfortable but not sloppy is no easy feat — take it from celebrities, whose airport appearances are broadcasted constantly.”
“This holiday season, you'll want to dress cozy enough for the cabin, but still stylish enough to face friends and family confidently on arrival — and for that, you'll need an ensemble like Garner's.”
“On Weds., the 46-year-old dressed for LAX like a pro in a chocolate-colored knit turtleneck and a wool-and-cashmere cropped gray coat.”
“Garner's double-breasted Khaite Carlotta jacket was a stylish warm layer for perpetually frigid plane rides and loose fitting enough to move around in.”
“The Camping actor paired her basic skinny jeans with minimalistic black-leather loafers, which she wore earlier in the day sans socks.”
“Garner carried a mid-sized black-leather tote, the ideal carry-on, and wore her hair half-up, a style that keeps wispy flyaways out of your face but still looks refined.”


"Buy appearance..."
"Upgrade your travel gear with the Ghana inspired highlights of the Zoe report, right ahead."
The mother of three has made her signature look comfortable and stylish, as evidenced by her perfect ensemble at Los Angeles International Airport on Wednesday. Good afternoon
"Jennifer Garner's airport style is going to be an important source of inspiration for your next trip (reminder: holiday is coming)"
"It's not easy to choose a comfortable but not sloppy travel outfit - Take celebrities who often show up at airports."
"This holiday, you will want to be comfortable enough, but you still need to have enough sense of fashion when you arrive in the cabin and confidently face your friends and family - for this, you need ensemble like Ghana."
At the wedding, the 46 year old dressed like a professional in a chocolate knitted turtleneck and an irregular grey coat of wool and cashmere
"Ghana's double breasted kayte Carlotta jacket is a fashionable and warm jacket, which is suitable for flying in the ever cold air and is loose enough to walk in."
The camping actress paired her basic skinny jeans with simple black leather shoes, which she wore earlier in the day without socks
"Ghana is carrying a medium-sized black leather bag. It's an ideal handbag. Her hair is half cocked. This kind of hairstyle can keep your face free from the trace of flying man, but it looks very delicate."



Number  309
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  310
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...saying that nannies landscapers and housekeepers would need a ride home was a simple statement...”
“...pic twitter com 98khN83DrY ForAmerica ForAmerica July 3 2018 Heard who has been tweeting often about the family separation policy and describes herself as an activist in her twitter bio later said that her misstep shouldn t distract from the real issues She implied that her original tweet the one...”
“The internet saved a copy for you.”
“We noticed you deleted the racist tweet that preceded this one.”
“But that didn’t stop people from asking where her previous tweet went.”
“But then she followed up with, “everybody better give their housekeepers, nannies, and landscapers a ride home tonight…”After the backlash began, Heard deleted the tweet and replaced it with one critiquing checkpoints as a whole.”
“That part is fine.”
“The actress tweeted yesterday about an ICE checkpoint in Hollywood, close to where she lives.”
“Photo: Dimitrios Kambouris/2018 Getty ImagesAmber Heard is learning that the internet never forgets.”
“Amber Heard.”


“…… It's a simple saying that nannies, gardeners and housekeepers need a ride home... "
“… Pic twitter com 98khn83dry forAmerica on July 3, 2018, she heard that she often posted news about the family separation policy on twitter, and said that she was an activist in her twitter resume. Later, she said that her mistake should not be transferred to the real problem she suggested, and her original tweet was that... "
"The Internet has saved a copy for you."
"We noticed that you deleted the previous racist tweet."
"But that doesn't stop people from asking where her previous Weibo went."
But then she said, "you'd better send their housekeeper, nanny and gardener home tonight..." After strong opposition began, Hurd deleted the microblog and replaced it with an overall criticism checkpoint
"That's a good part."
"The actress tweeted yesterday that there is an ice checkpoint in Hollywood, close to where she lives."
"Photo: Dimitrios kambouris / 2018 Getty Images amber heard that the Internet will never forget."
"I heard it."



Number  311
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was less dramatic this time.”Although the couple attempted to make their relationship work, an insider told PEOPLE that Chyna became frustrated with Kardashian over time.”
““They are both trying to be mature about it.”
“...his daughter Dream 7 months and his former fiancé Blac Chyna at Disneyland...”
“Both parents documented the fun-filled day on social media, starting with Kardashian sharing an image of his daughter’s must-have souvenir: Mickey Mouse ears hat with the date embroidered.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The trio were all smiles as they met and posed for family photos with Mickey and Minnie Mouse, but Dream got a little restless while on the “It’s a Small World” ride.”
“All it took was a Lion King-like lift and some kisses from dad to get the little girl giggling again.”
“Image zoom Credit: Source: Blac Chyna SnapchatImage zoomImage zoomChyna wore pink mouse ears while Dream donned a polka dot pink top and Minnie Mouse hat.”
““Thank You @disneyland for the best first Father’s Day trip with my baby,” Kardashian captioned an image of his daughter donning the headwear on Instagram.”
“The ex-fiancés, who first split in March 2016, experienced their fair share of ups and downs throughout their yearlong romance, right from the outset of their relationship last January.”


"It's not so dramatic this time." Although the couple tried to make their relationship normal, a person familiar with the matter told people that as time went on, chener was frustrated with Kardashian
"They're all trying to grow up."
“… His daughter dreams of seven months at Disneyland with his ex fiance Blake Chyna... "
"Both parents recorded this fun day on social media. First, Kardashian shared a picture of her daughter's essential souvenir: Mickey mouse ear cap embroidered with date."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"When they meet, they all smile and take pictures with Mickey and Minnie Mouse, but Meng is a little fidgety during the journey of" this is a small world. "
"Just raise your hand like the lion king, and with some of dad's kisses, the little girl starts to giggle again."
"Image zooming credit: image source: blac Chyna snapchat image zoom image zoom Chyna is wearing pink mouse ears, while dream is wearing a dot pink jacket and Minnie Mouse cap."
Kardashian added a caption to her instagram photo of her daughter wearing a headdress: "thank you @ Disneyland for the best first father's day trip with my children."
"The former fiance split up for the first time in March 2016, and they have experienced a year of ups and downs since their relationship began last January."



Number  312
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She released her debut album Invasion of Privacy last Friday (April 6) and it’s already certified gold.”
“Just like the “Bodak Yellow” spitter waited until the right time for her to reveal to the world she’s bringing a new life, she’ll do the same for the gender reveal.”
“...and altogether deleting I m passing my daughter crown down Cardi hasn t confirmed the gender of her child...”
“I m passing my daughter crown down The Shade Room is quick with the screenshots and snapped the caption before Hennessy made minor corrections to the captions changing baby Cardi to ur baby swapping the pronouns her for the baby...”
“Your pregnancy is mine we pregnant can’t believe we’re having a baby!”
“I’m going to be able to hold baby you and give her all the kisses and hugs!”
““Growing up, you would always break me off a piece of your plate without asking … and now that baby Cardi coming is like it’s coming true!”
““You always been like a second mom to me so I know you gonna be the best mommy everrrr,” Hennessy wrote initially, according to The Shade Room.”
“Hennessy wished her well , saying Cardi always wanted to be a mom and now it’s finally happening.”
“Hennessy posted a still shot of her sister in the form-fitting white dress she rocked for Saturday Night Live along with a heartfelt caption congratulating Cardi.”


"She released her debut album invasion of privacy last Friday (April 6), which has won gold medal certification."
"Just as a 'bodak yellow' spitter waits until the right time to show the world the new life she has brought, she will do the same for gender display."
“…… I'm going to pass my daughter's crown to Katie, but she hasn't confirmed her child's gender yet... "
"I passed my daughter's crown to the shady room. Before Hennessy made some minor changes to the subtitles, I quickly photographed the subtitles with screenshots and snapshots, changed baby Cardi to ur baby, and changed the pronoun she to baby..."
"Your pregnancy is mine. We're pregnant. I can't believe we're going to have a baby!"
"I want to hold your child and give her all the kisses and hugs!"
"When you grow up, you always break me off the plate without asking Now little caddy is coming. It seems to be coming true! "
"You've always been like my second mom, so I know you'll always be the best mom," Hennessy initially wrote, according to the shadow room
"Hennessy blessed her, saying that Caddy had always wanted to be a mother, and now it has finally come true."
"Hennessy posted a still photo of her sister in a white dress that fits, a makeover for Saturday night's live broadcast, and a caption of heartfelt congratulations to Katie."



Number  313
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““That said, we are just friends.”She has not publicly commented on any date with Jones, neither at the time nor since the New York interview was published.”
““I have tremendous respect for Lance and all he has accomplished,” she told People.”
“Richard Pryor’s widow Jennifer Pryor first tweeted, and then confirmed to TMZ that her husband did, indeed, have a sexual relationship with Marlon Brando, as Jones claimed in his interview.”
“Pryor’s tweet read, “Hey girl: It was the 70's: enough cocaine and good music-one could fuck a radiator and send it flowers in the morning!”
“# noshame“Ivanka Trump still has yet to comment.”
“The original story continues below.”
“Quincy Jones used to date Ivanka Trump—or so he says.”
“In a wide-ranging interview with New York magazine’s David Marchese, the music producer casually mentioned, as an aside, that he went on a date with the First Daughter about 12 years ago.”
“Marchese didn’t let that one go.”
““He’s a crazy motherfucker,” Jones, now 84, said of Donald Trump.”


"That is to say, we are just friends." She did not comment publicly on any dates with Jones, either at the time or after the New York interview
"I have great respect for lance and his achievements," she told people
"Richard Pryor's widow, Jennifer Pryor, tweeted and then confirmed to TMZ that her husband did have sex with Marlon Brando, which Jones claimed in the interview."
"Hey girl: it's the 1970s: enough cocaine and wonderful music, one can operate a radiator and send flowers in the morning!" wrote Pryor's Micro blog
Ivanka trump, the "nohsham" president, has yet to comment
"The original story continues below."
"Quincy Jones had a meeting with Ivanka trump, that's what he said."
"In an extensive interview with New York Magazine David Marchese, the music producer casually mentioned that he dated his first daughter about 12 years ago."
"Marceser didn't let that one go."
"He's a crazy asshole," Jones, 84, said of Donald Trump



Number  314
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As season 1 went on, you saw similarities between their family dynamics.”
“BY: I love Bash and Carmen and love that other people have rallied behind this unconventional friendship.”
“I feel like where we find Carmen, she kind of conquered her fear at the end of season 1 with her match with Welfare Queen, but now it’s a question of whether she can continue to fight for what she wants to reach her dreams.”
“And it’s about the new relationships that form and the new rivalries as well.”
“They’ve also started find a little bit of fame, so it’s how they deal with that, being micro-celebrities.”
“The season is looking at the ladies now that they’ve won and are now on an official show.”
“Sam [Sylvia–played by Marc Maron–the director of the GLOW wrestling series within the show] hired some crewmen to do that.”
“They move the whole process back into their gym and try to recreate it to make it look like the hotel where they shot they pilot.”
“When we pick up in season 2, they are trying to get everything they need to make a full season of the show.”
“Britney Young: At the end of season 1, the team had just shot the pilot.”


"As the first season goes on, you see similarities in their family dynamics."
"Author: I love Bash and Carmen, and I love other people united behind this unconventional friendship."
"I think where we found Carmen, she overcame fear at the end of the first season and played against queen welfare, but the question now is whether she can continue to fight for the dream she wants to achieve."
"It's about the formation of new relationships and new competition."
"They're also starting to find a bit of fame, so that's how they deal with it, becoming micro celebrities."
"This season is about the ladies, who have won and are now making their debut."
"Sam (Sylvia played by Mark Malone, the director of the light wrestling Series) hired some crew to do it."
"They moved the whole process back to the gym and tried to remake it to look like the hotel they shot."
"When we play in the second season, they are trying to get everything they need to make the show the whole season."
"Britney young: at the end of the first season, the team just shot the pilot."



Number  315
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“So I think this is what Chloe Kim must have felt like after doing back-to-back 1080s in the Olympic halfpipe.”
“If I fall over, pick me up cause I've got some things to say.”
“"Okay, so I'm hyperventilating a little bit.”
“Read the full transcript of her speech below.”
“Even McDormand, who declared she "keep[s] her politics private" in her Golden Globes acceptance speech earlier this year, couldn't resist a rallying cry with her Oscar platform.”
“McDormand's sentiment was an appropriate cap to awards season 2018, which saw women lead the charge against sexual harassment and abuse in the entertainment industry with the #MeToo movement and the Time's Up initiative.”
“...distribution of the setting for the film as long as it s sensible for the plot...”
“...something actors put into their contracts to ensure gender and racial equality in hiring on movie sets According to The Hollywood Reporter the phrase originated with Stacy Smith director of USC Annenberg s Media Diversity Social Change Initiative The clause would state that tertiary speaking characters should match the gender...”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"So I think that's what it's like for Chloe king to score 1080 points in a row in the Olympic semi-finals."
"If I fall, help me up, because I have something to say."
"Well, I'm a little out of breath."
"Please read the full text of her speech below."
Even mcdorman, who declared "keeping political secrets" in his speech for the Golden Globe Award earlier this year, can't help calling on him to use his Oscar platform
"McDormand's view is an appropriate constraint on the 2018 awards season, in which women take the lead in combating sexual harassment and abuse in the entertainment industry with the support of the metoo campaign and the times."
“… As long as the plot is reasonable, the distribution of the film's background... "
“… What actors add to their contracts to ensure gender and racial equality in hiring on the set, according to a Hollywood Reporter, the phrase originated from director Stacy Smith of the University of Southern California Annenberg's media diversity social change initiative, which states that third language roles should be gender matched.... "



Number  316
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He was just out of time.”RELATED VIDEO: Selma Blair Has ‘Begun Another Dog Love Adventure’ After Death of Beloved Pooch, Ducky...”
“We both wore glasses.”
“On Wednesday’s Hollywood Medium, Henry, 22, sits down with the Cruel Intentions star, helping her get closure on a love long lost.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““He died in his dorm room at college,” Blair tells Henry in a clip released Tuesday.”
““He had epilepsy his whole life and was definitely careful about it, but then he died suddenly the day before his birthday.”
“And I still don’t know how he died, but he was my love.”“I was in love with him since I first saw him in first grade,” she continues, getting emotional.”
““You know, we both had a lazy eye.”
“But he was the most beautiful boy in the world to me.”
“When grandparents go, you expect it.”


"He just doesn't have time." Related video: Selma Blair "starts another dog adventure" after the death of her beloved dog, dakie
"We all wear glasses."
"In Hollywood media on Wednesday, the 22-year-old Henry and" cruel intent "star sat down to help her end a long lost love."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"He died in his college dorm," Blair told Henry in a video released on Tuesday
"He had epilepsy all his life. He must have been very careful, but he died suddenly the day before his birthday."
"I still don't know how he died, but he's my lover." "I fell in love with him from the first time I saw him in first grade," she continued, excited
"You know, we all have lazy eyes."
"But to me, he is the most beautiful boy in the world."
"You expected it when your grandparents left."



Number  317
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“RELATED CONTENT:Pete Wentz Explains the Real Story Behind Fall Out Boy's 'Young and Menace' - Go Behind the ScenesPete Wentz on Ashlee Simpson Divorce: 'I Thought It Was a Forever Thing'Pete Wentz Shows His Pregnant Girlfriend NakedChrissy Teigen Is Pregnant With Baby Number Two!”
“Congratulations to the parents-to-be!”
“The 38-year-old bassist shares Bronx with his ex-wife, Ashlee Simpson-Ross, who also has a 2-year-old daughter, Jagger Snow, with her current husband, Evan Ross.”
“Wentz and Camper, 28, began dating in 2011 and welcomed Saint in 2014.”
“Last month, the proud dad shared a sweet video of his two boys goofing around with silly string, and we can only imagine how much fun they'll have when their little sister arrives!”
“...coming to our family in 2018... love Pete, Meagan, Bronx and Saint," Wentz wrote.”
“We’re kicking the year off with news of the best gift yet: ??”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"This video is not available because we were unable to load the sponsor's email."
"Related content: Peter Wentz explains the true story behind the" youth and threat "of the lovelorn boy - walking behind the scene of Ashley Simpson's divorce:" I thought it was a forever thing. "Peter Wentz shows his pregnant girlfriend, Narcissus tigan, who is pregnant with baby number two!"
"Congratulations to the parents to be!"
"The 38 year old bassist shares the Bronx with his ex-wife Ashlee Simpson Ross, who also has a 2-year-old daughter Jagger snow and her current husband Evan Ross."
"Wentz, 28, and camper started dating in 2011 and ushered in the saints in 2014."
"Last month, the proud father shared a sweet video in which his two sons stroll around with stupid ropes. We can only imagine how happy they will be when their little sister arrives!"
“…… Come to our house in 2018... "Love Pitt, Migan, the Bronx and the saint," Wentz wrote
"Our opening news this year is the best gift:?"? "



Number  318
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Chris FifeImage zoom Credit: Chris FifeOutside Carrington Manor...”
“...s space enough for them both to rule the world...”
“And to celebrate their return, Dynasty showrunner Sallie Patrick will be blogging major episodes for EW throughout the show’s first season.”
“This week, she’s sharing some insights on Cristal’s first day as COO and so much more.”
““Company Slut”This week’s episode was directed by the marvelous Cherie Nowlan and was written by Chris Fife.”
“I’ve written with Chris on two shows before Dynasty (Life Unexpected and Revenge), and it was a no-brainer for me when staffing this show that he had to be a part of it.”
“He’s not only a fan of the OG Dynasty, but he’s an encyclopedia of soap and all-around wonderful person to have in the writers’ room.”
“For someone who can write catty lines so well, he’s actually quite a nice guy.”
“Company Slut is a packed hour spanning from a wish fulfilling montage in which Cristal chooses what to wear for her first day as a COO she s trying to keep her chin up after all the drama with her sex tape to a much darker ending when Cristal tries...”
“...to make amends with Claudia Blaisdel Much of the drama in Dynasty comes from the moments when good intentions go terribly wrong...”


"Image scaling credit: Chris Feifei image scaling credit: Chris Feifei othside Carrington estate..."
“… There's enough space for them to rule the world... "
"To celebrate their return, Dynasty performer Sally Patrick will write an important episode for EW in the first season of the show."
"This week, she will share some insights about Cristal's first day as coo and more."
This week's episode of company slut is directed by Cherie Nolan and written by Chris Feifei
"Before Dynasty, I wrote two shows (unexpected life and revenge) with Chris. When I put people on this show, he had to be involved in it, which was easy for me."
"He is not only a fan of the og Dynasty, but also an encyclopedia of soap. He is an all-round man in the writer's room."
"For a person who can write so well, he is actually a good person."
"Company slut is a crowded hour, from a wish fulfillment montage to choose what to wear, her first day as coo, she tries to keep her chin after all the drama with her sex tapes to a darker end when Kristal tries to..."
“…… In order to make amends to Claudia bresdell, many of the dramas of this dynasty came from the wrong moment of kindness... "



Number  319
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The group disbanded after he passed away, but Lima and Fischetti recently reunited for a tour.”
“Cronin died after a battle with leukemia.”
“ @TheRealLFOLFO lost its lead singer and lyricist Rich Cronin in 2010.”
“She said he's doing fine.”
“She said Devin is under and he was happy-go-lucky as ever.”
“She said he's doing fine.”Just got a call from a nurse in the operating room.”
“Thursday morning, LFO updated fans via Twitter, writing, “Just got a call from a nurse in the operating room.”
“Fischetti said in the video that Devin could lose a kidney, spleen, part of his colon and more in the surgery.”
“Brad added that an adrenal gland is normally the size of the top of an acorn, while Devin described his own as Hulk-sized, saying it was the size of a tall sundae, and "covering everything."”


"After his death, the group dissolved, but Lima and fischerti recently got together again for a tour."
"Cronin died after fighting leukemia."
"@ thereeallfolfo lost lead singer and songwriter rich Cronin in 2010."
"She said he was fine."
"She said Devon was terminally ill and he enjoyed it as much as ever."
"She said he was fine." Just got a call from the operating room nurse
On Thursday morning, LFO updated its fans with the latest news via Twitter, saying: "I just got a call from the operating room nurse."
In the video, fischerti said that Devon may lose his kidney, spleen, part of colon, etc. during the operation
Brad added that the adrenal gland is usually the size of an acorn top, while Devon described his adrenal gland as the size of the Hulk. He said the adrenal gland is only the size of gaussanday and "covers everything."



Number  320
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“With reporting by Kayley Stumpe...”
“The Hills: New Beginnings is set to premiere in 2019.”
““I’m so torn,” Montag, who shares the baby with Spencer Pratt, told Us Weekly at Switch Boutique in Beverly Hills, on Saturday, December 15, for a MeMe London jewelry event.”
““I know one minute I’m like, ‘OK.”
“We re having the baby and we re doing it next month And then the next I m like Oh let s wait a year It s hard because I want them to be close in age and at the same time maybe I need a little more time in...”
“...between Fellow Hills alum Kristin Cavallari is a proponent of having kids back to back...”
““I talked to Kristin about it and she’s like, ‘Just knock ‘em out!” Heidi said.”
“(Cavallari and Jay Cutler are parents of Camden, 6, Jaxon, 4, and daughter Saylor, 3.)”
“Earlier this month, Justin Bobby Brescia told Us a pregnancy might be coming” on the Hills revival.”
“When Montag was asked on Saturday if she is the cast member with a bun in the oven, she replied: “Maybe.”


"Kelly stump's story..."
"Mountain: a new start" will premiere in 2019
Montag, who shares a baby with Spencer Pratt at the switch boutique in Beverly Hills on Saturday, December 15, told us, "I'm so sad."
"I know that one minute I'll say, 'OK.'"
"We're going to have a baby. Next month we're going to have a baby. Next month I'm going to have to wait for a year. It's hard because I want them to be the same age. At the same time, maybe I need more time..."
“…… Christine Cavallari, an alumnus from the same mountain, is a supporter of back-to-back childbirth. "
"I talked to Christine about it, and she said, 'bring them down! "Said Heidi
(Cavallari and Jay Cutler are the parents of 6-year-old Camden, 4-year-old Jackson and 3-year-old daughter sailor.)
Earlier this month, Justin Bobbie Brescia told us that pregnancy might be around the corner
When asked on Saturday if she was an actress baking bread in the oven, Montague replied, "maybe."



Number  321
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(sic)'Just chilling: The duo hung out in their hotel room with pal 2 Chainz...”
“Sitting pretty: Kim sat in-between 2 Chainz' wife Kesha Ward and pal Lala Anthony'He loves being ramped up.”
“And proving just how much fun she had Kim Kardashian shared a collection of behind the scenes photos from the evening on Monday.”
“The 38-year-old reality star, dressed in a sparkly pink mini dress appeared to get up to mischief with her husband Kanye West, 41.”
“Giddy: Kim Kardashian has shared a collection of photos from the behind the scenes at the Versace Pre Fall 19 Fashion Show on December 3The duo looked like giggling teenagers as they ran down a hallway holding hands in one of the images.”
“In another the mother-of-three poked her tongue out as she flashed a cheeky look over her shoulder at the camera.”
“Kim dazzled in a sparkling pink mini dress which showed off her cleavage and some Yeezy PVC heels.”
“Kim and Kanye were also pictured with 2 Chainz and wife Kesha Ward as well as LaLa Anthony as they all hung out in a hotel room before the fashion show.”
“Cheeky: The 38-year-old reality star showed off her curves in a sparkling pink mini dressFlawless: Kim's glam team worked hard to create her look for the star-studded showMeanwhile Kim has revealed she thinks that husband Kanye can't be 'suppressed'.”
“The reality star - who has kids North, five, Saint, three, and ten-month-old Chicago with Kanye - opened up to the Keeping Up with the Kardashians cameras about Kanye's emotion-filled rants in light of his controversial remarks to TMZ earlier this year.”


(SIC) "creepy: they're in a hotel room with their friend 2 chainz..."
"It's a beautiful seat: Kim is sitting between his wife, Keisha ward, and his friend, Lala Anthony. He likes to be promoted."
"To prove how happy she is, Kim Kardashian shared a set of behind the scenes photos on Monday night."
Dressed in a shimmering pink miniskirt, the 38 year old reality TV star seems to be getting up to mischief with her 41 year old husband, Kanye West
"Dizzying: on December 3, Kim Kardashian shared a set of behind the scenes photos at Versace's pre fall 19 fashion show. When they run into the corridor hand in hand in one of the photos, they look like giggling teenagers. "
"In another film, the mother of three shows a cheeky expression in front of the camera."
"Kim was dazzled with a sparkling pink miniskirt, cleavage exposed, and a pair of shiny PVC high heels."
"Before the fashion show, Kim and Kanye also posed with 2 chanz and his wife Kesha ward and Lala Antony as they strolled in the hotel room."
"Cheeky: the 38 year old reality TV star shows her curves flawlessly in a shimmering pink miniskirt: Kim's Glam team works hard to build her look on the star studded show, and Kim reveals that she thinks her husband Kanye can't be" suppressed. "
The reality star and Kanye had five children, five children, three children and ten month old children in Chicago. In view of Kanye's controversial remarks about TMZ earlier this year, he disclosed Kanye's emotional roar to the camcorders of the Kardashian family



Number  322
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I never want to take money out of anyone’s pockets and that’s not who I am, but in this instance, it’s hard to say,” the reality star concluded.”
““I think it will be hard for any of the women to forgive.”As for Parks’ exit from the series — Us Weekly previously confirmed she’s out for season 10 — Whitfield is uncertain how she feels.”
“It’s hard to establish trust with someone like that because, for me, it seemed that she showed no remorse for what she did and for her actions,” Whitfield explained.”
““I don’t know, it’s so hard right now.”
“...near future...”
“We were all in shock When asked if she thinks Parks will be forgiven Whitfield who is currently on her Wives Fiancées and Side Chicks of Hotlanta book tour told Us she doesn t see them mending things in the...”
““I was in shock!”
“Porsha Williams...”
“My heart dropped so far Whitfield recalled of the explosive moment when host Andy Cohen called out Parks for spreading the megawatt lie that fellow castmate Kandi Burruss and her husband Todd Tucker were planning to drug and take home...”
“Sheree Whitfield tells Us Weekly that she doesn’t see her Real Housewives of Atlanta costars forgiving Phaedra Parks anytime soon after that bombshell reunion finale last week.”


"I never want to take money out of anyone's pocket, it's not me, but in this case, it's hard to say," concluded the reality TV star
"I think it's hard for any woman to forgive." As for parks's exit from the series, which US weekly confirmed earlier that she would be in season 10, Whitfield was not sure how she felt
"It's hard to build trust with someone like this because to me, she doesn't seem to have any remorse for what she's done and what she's done," Whitfield explained
"I don't know. It's too hard now."
“… In the near future... "
"We were all shocked when asked if she thought parks would be forgiven. Whitfield said she didn't see them in Mending things in the kitchen. Whitfield is currently with her wife, fiancee and hotlanta book tour chicks
"I'm scared!"
"Bertha Williams..."
"Whitfield recalled the explosive moment when Andy Cohen, the host, shouted at parks to spread a megawatt lie, and castr's companions Kandi Burrus and her husband Todd Tucker were planning to take drugs and take them home..." he said
"Shirley Whitfield told us weekly that she didn't see her Real Housewives forgive Fedra parks after last week's big happy ending."



Number  323
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See Jenner unpack those fashion memories, while scanning every nook and cranny of her space, in the 360-degree video, above.”
“Then, of course, there are all those priceless archive looks—remember the chain-mail dress Jenner wore on her 21st birthday, or that body-skimming number on the Met Gala red carpet last year?”
“Here you’ll find trophy pieces of the coolest kind, including those bubblegum pink Balenciaga legging boots; the teeniest, tiniest Louis Vuitton bags; and rare vintage Vivienne Westwood finds.”
“More of a fitting room than a closet, the second space is where all the fun happens, where Jenner puts together her most daring and unexpected outfits; there’s even a colorful mood board of fashion inspiration.”
“Jenners like to wear every year during the holidays...”
“The first closet a traditional walk in is packed to the rafters with weird and wonderful fashion treasures Think 7 inch Alaïa stompers given to her by her brother in law Kanye West the Birkin bag she uses as a carry on the hilarious novelty print onesies that the Kardashian...”
“The supermodel has not one but two wardrobes inside her apartment in Los Angeles, and invited Vogue in for the grand tour earlier this summer.”
“It certainly makes the prospect of peeking inside her closet—with Google Daydream’s 360-degree technology, no less—even more intriguing.”
“), the supermodel has a healthy appetite for the most tricky-to-pull-off trends; in fact, she’s been responsible for setting a few of them in motion.”
“Between her penchant for retro fanny packs and her obsession with statement shoes (thigh-highs, transparent booties—you name it, she’s tried it!”


"In the 360 degree video above, Jenna scans every corner of her space while opening up those fashion memories."
"So, of course, there's the priceless look. Remember the dress Jenner wore on her 21st birthday, or the slim size on the red carpet at the met last year?"
"Here you'll find the coolest trophies, including those bubble gum pink barista boots; the youngest and smallest louis vuitton bag; and the rare vintage found by Vivienne Westwood."
"It's not so much a wardrobe as a fitting room. The second space is where all the fun happens. Jenna puts her boldest and most unexpected clothes here. There is even a colorful mood board for fashion inspiration."
"Janice likes to wear it on holidays every year..."
"The rafters in the first traditional walk-in wardrobe are full of weird and wonderful fashion treasures - think about the 7-inch ala GA stomping shoes that her brother-in-law Kanye West gave her - her Birkin bag - inherits Kardashian's funny and novel printed items..."
The supermodel, who doesn't have one but two wardrobes in her Los Angeles apartment, invited vogue to a big tour earlier this summer
"This undoubtedly makes the prospect of Google's daydream 360 degree technology peeping at her wardrobe more attractive."
"In fact, the supermodel has a healthy appetite for the toughest trends; in fact, she is responsible for guiding some of them."
"Between her fondness for Vintage Fanny's bags and her obsession with personalized shoes (thigh high, you can think of transparent boots, she's tried them!"



Number  324
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Check it out:Scott Disick and Sofia Richie Kiss, Fuel Romance Rumors By Packing on the PDA in Miami This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“There was even a congratulatory dessert for the couple.”
“Last month, they joined a few friends in sunny Miami, Florida, and shared quite a few kisses during a group dinner.”
“Instagram StoryThese two really love their beach vacations.”
“In another photo shared on her Instagram, Richie is seen once again cuddling up to her guy in front of some surfboards.”
“PHOTOS: Scott Disick and Sofia Richie Kiss, Show Major PDA During Miami Getaway"Taco night," Richie captioned a photo on her Instagram Story of her cuddled up to Disick while a mariachi band played behind them.”
“BackgridThe 19-year-old model also couldn't help but share a few pics on her social media of the PDA-filled getaway with the 34-year-old reality star.”
“The rumored new couple are enjoying a romantic vacation in Puerto Vallarta, Mexico, and were spotted sharing a smooch while riding a jet ski on Monday.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Check out: Scott Disick and Sophia Ritchie Keith," come on, romantic rumor "on Miami PDA is not available because we can't load sponsor information
"There's even a dessert for the couple."
Last month, they were in sunny Miami, Florida, with a few friends and kissed a lot of people at a group dinner
"Instagram story these two guys really like their beach vacation."
"In another picture shared on instagram, rich once again hugs her boyfriend in front of her surfboard."
"Photo: the kiss of Scott Disick and Sophia Ritchie, showing the main PDA during the" taco night "in Miami," Ritchie added a title to a photo on her instagram, in which she and Disick cuddle up and a mariachi band plays behind them. "
"The 19-year-old model couldn't help sharing a few photos on social media about her elopement with the 34 year old reality TV star on a PDA."
The couple, who are rumored to be enjoying a romantic holiday in the port of bayarta, Mexico, were found taking a group photo while riding a motorboat on Monday



Number  325
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Santa read my wish list and said ‘girl, you do you.’ ””
““I’m all alone on Christmas but you won’t hear a boo-hoo,” the actress sings.”
“...red glitter dress twirling around with Secret Service agents...”
“He s a big guy with a red hat who only works one day a year huge supporter of the coal industry who keeps a list of which kids he likes and which ones deserve to be punished The skit ends with another dance number including Melania Trump in a...”
““We’ve got a lot in common.”
““I’m in a very important meeting with another powerful world leader,” the fake president said.”
““This one needs a fresh coat,” the fake Melania says in the skit, pulling out a spray bottle labeled “blood.”The president then pretends to call and tells his wife that he is tied up with business and will not be home for Christmas.”
“...month...”
“But now you re free to say Merry Christmas all year unless you re a migrant child in detention The first lady even brings up the mockery surrounding this year s White House Christmas decorations which included a hall filled with dramatic red trees something Melania Trump defended earlier this...”
“She then launches into song and dance in the Oval Office to a tune called “Make America Christmas Again.”“It used to be illegal to say ‘Merry Christmas,’ you’d be punished at the slightest mention, ouch!” the fake Melania Trump sings.”


"Santa looked at my wish list and said," girl, do you want to. "
"I'm on my own at Christmas, but you don't hear the whine," the actress sang
“… The red flashing skirt rotates with the secret service... "
"He's a big man in a red hat who only works one day a year and is a huge supporter of the coal industry. He lists the children he likes and the children who should be punished. The sketch ends with another dance number, including Melania trump in a
"We have a lot in common."
"I'm having a very important meeting with another powerful world leader," the fake president said
"This one needs a new coat," said fake mearen. In a sketch, he took out a spray bottle marked with blood. Then the president pretended to call his wife to tell her that he was busy with business and would not be home for Christmas
“… Month... "
"But now you're free to say Merry Christmas, and unless you're a detained immigrant child, the first lady will even make fun of this year's White House Christmas decorations, including a hall full of dramatic mangroves, which Melania trump defended earlier this year..."
Then she started singing and dancing in the Oval Office, singing a song called "let America have Christmas again.". "It used to be illegal to say" Merry Christmas ". You will be punished when you mention it. Ouch! "Fake Melania trump singing."



Number  326
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Kendall, a Vogue model, was also present.”
“She is expecting her first baby with rapper Travis Scott.”
“Kourtney is seen in a black bikini as she has a meal on the beachThere's her man!”
“Food for thought: There are more images on Snapchat.”
“Kourtney is seen in a black bikini as she has a meal on the beach.”
“There are more images on Snapchat.”
“Below her was the beach and to the side Bougainvillea plants in full bloom.”
“The looker was toned and tanned in the snap as she had one foot in the pool and the other on the border.”
“Looking good: The beauty also wore a white bikini with white illesteva sunglasses while in a swimming pool in Punta MitaIn an Instagram snap shared Tuesday, the Keeping Up With The Kardashians star was wearing a white bikini with white illesteva sunglasses while in a swimming pool.”
“The two have been on several trips together during their one year relationship, including NYC, Paris and Egypt.”


"Fashion model Kendall was also present."
"She's looking forward to her first child with rapper Travis Scott."
"Courtney is eating on the beach in a black bikini. This is her man!"
"It's worth thinking about: there are more pictures on snapchat."
"Courtney is eating on the beach in a black bikini."
"There are more images on snapchat."
"Below is the beach, and next to it is the blooming bougainvillea."
"One foot of the onlooker is in the swimming pool, the other foot is on the boundary, and suddenly he becomes black and strong."
"It looks good: the beauty is still wearing a white bikini, white illesteva sunglasses, and in a pool in pontamita. In an instagram snapshot shared on Tuesday, the Kardashian star was in the pool wearing a white bikini and white illesteva sunglasses
"In one year's interaction, the two have visited several times together, including New York, Paris and Egypt."



Number  327
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He loves it.’”
“Nothing is serious just a good time.”
“Kourtney Kardashian’s ex has attended the Club Revolve party on Saturday night, and he was accompanied by a mystery girl who was later confirmed to be Emma Blanchard.”
“According to a source, the couple has arrived at the exclusive party in the same SUV around midnight.”
“Scott and Emma were seen openly making out while sipping on cocktails.”
“‘At one point, Scott and Emma slipped into a room behind a curtain to get more privacy,’ the source said.”
“The couple left the party together at 3 a.m. A second source said the hookup is nothing serious.”
“‘Scott is not looking for a relationship.”
“He is just enjoying his summer and having fun while flirting and hooking up with some ladies.”
“It looked like he was really enjoying himself at the Revolve party This is only the latest of Scott s flings because we know that he has been spending time with tons of women since splitting up with Kourtney Kardashian back in July 2015 and especially over the last few...”


"He likes it very much."
"Nothing serious, just a good time."
"Kurtany Kardashian's ex girlfriend was at the club spin party on Saturday night with a mystery girl who turned out to be Emma Blanchard."
"According to sources, the couple arrived at the exclusive party in the same SUV around midnight."
"Scott and Emma have been seen making out openly while sipping cocktails."
"On one occasion, Scott and Emma sneaked into the room behind the curtains to get more privacy," the source said
"The couple left the party together at 3 a.m. A second source said the relationship was not serious. "
"Scott is not looking for relationships."
"He's just enjoying the summer, having a good time flirting and hooking up with some ladies."
"It looks like he had a good time at the spin party. It's just Scott's latest carnival, because we know he's been with a lot of women since he broke up with Courtney Kardashian in July 2015, especially in the past few years..."



Number  328
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Personally, I’ve found relief from minor heartburn by adding 1 teaspoon of vinegar to water and drinking.”
“Apple cider vinegar is a simple and really inexpensive remedy for low stomach acid.”
“Folklore claims that Cleopatra once dissolved a pearl in vinegar and drank it in order to win a bet with Marcus Antonius (Marc Antony).”
“Organic unfiltered vinegars have a long history of use, having been discovered thousands of years ago!”
“How Apple Cider Vinegar is MadeThe word vinegar comes from the latin words vinum (wine) and acer (sour) and in essence vinegar is just that: sour wine.”
“Raw, unfiltered and unrefined versions contain many more beneficial properties for culinary uses.”
“Refined and clear vinegars are great for cleaning as they don’t leave residue.”
“Clear and pasteurized vinegars typically do not contain the mother culture and don’t carry the same benefits.”
“Unrefined vinegars have a murky appearance and typically still contain the mother culture.”
“Pasteurized vs. Unrefined & Unfiltered Apple Cider VinegarIn ACV particularly, “the mother” is a complex structure of beneficial acids that seem to have health benefits.”


"As far as I'm concerned, I add a teaspoon of vinegar to the water and drink it to relieve the mild heartburn."
"Apple cider vinegar is a simple and cheap medicine for low acid in the stomach."
"According to folklore, Cleopatra once dissolved a pearl in vinegar and drank it in order to win a bet with Marcus Antonius (Mark Antonius)
"Organic unfiltered grapes have a long history of use and were discovered thousands of years ago!"
"How to make apple cider vinegar the word vinegar comes from Latin vinum (wine) and Acer (acid), the essence of vinegar is: sour wine."
The raw, unfiltered and unrefined versions contain many more culinary benefits
"Delicate and transparent vines are great for cleaning because they don't leave any residue."
"Clean and pasteurized grapes usually do not contain parent cultures and do not have the same benefits."
"Unrefined vineyards are dark in appearance and usually still contain the parent culture."
Pasteurized and unfiltered cider, especially the "mother" in ACV, is a kind of complex beneficial acid structure, which seems to be beneficial to health



Number  329
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Raisa ended her Instagram post about being a donor with a simple message for Gomez: "Love you sis, so glad we’re on this journey together."”
“"Selena and I were in the same group and we just clicked."”
“Richard Shotwell/Invision/AP and Dimitrios Kambouris/Getty Images The INSIDER Summary:Selena Gomez shocked everyone when she recently shared that she got a kidney transplant over the summer.”
“The kidney donor was Gomez's best friend Francia Raisa.”
“Raisa took to Instagram to express her support for Gomez.”
“She said, "Love you sis, so glad we’re on this journey together."”
“Selena Gomez shocked fans when she announced in a personal Instagram post that she had recently undergone a kidney transplant.”
“Gomez’s friend Francia Raisa was the kidney donor, and her message about helping the singer — and others — is an emotional one.”
“"I am beyond grateful that God would trust me with something that not only saved a life, but changed mine in the process," the "Secret Life of the American Teenager" actress wrote in her own Instagram post.”
“She shared the same photo that Gomez used to make her announcement — a pic of the two girls in side-by-side hospital beds, hooked up to machines as they hold hands and smile at each other.”


Lisa ended her post on instagram about becoming a donor with a simple message to Gomez: "love you, sister, I'm glad we're on this journey together."
"Serena and I were in the same group, we just clicked."
"Richard shotwell / invasion / AP and Dimitrios cumbrics / Getty Images inside summary: Serena Gomez was shocked when she recently told everyone that she had a kidney transplant in the summer
"The kidney donor is Gomez's best friend, Francia Raisa."
"Raisa expressed her support for Gomez through instagram."
She said, "I love you, sister, and I'm glad we're together."
"Selena Gomez shocked fans by announcing in her personal instagram post that she recently had a kidney transplant."
"Gomez's friend, Francia Risha, is a kidney donor, and her message about helping singers and other people is very emotional."
"I'm very grateful to God for believing in something that not only saved a life, but also changed my life in the process," the actress of "the secret life of American teenagers" wrote in her instagram post
"She shared the same picture that Gomez used when he made his statement - a picture of two girls lying side by side on a hospital bed, holding hands and smiling on the machine."



Number  330
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can always count on Teigen to keep it real—from losing baby weight to piercings, to dealing with infertility, this woman’s open about it all, and we love her for it!”
““If the piercing is performed carefully and cared for conscientiously, there is little risk, no matter what the age of the child,” according to HealthyChildren.org.”
“The celeb mom told E!”
“News that she’s going to let Luna decide if and when to pierce her ears.”
““She doesn’t have her ears pierced, and I’m going to let her decide when she wants to do that,” she said at a launch party for a new Forevermark jewelry line.”
“Teigen’s decision seems to have something to do with the fact that she wasn’t allowed to decide about getting her own ears pierced as a child.”
““I remember when I was little what I went through.”
“My mom did it for me,” she told E!.”
“There is disagreement around when is the best time to get a little girl’s ears pierced, and even doctors don’t really have a straight answer.”
““However, as a general guideline, postpone the piercing until your child is mature enough to take care of the pierced site herself.”For Dr. David Levine, it’s all about waiting to see what an individual child wants.”


"From losing baby weight to piercing a hole to dealing with infertility, you can always count on tegan to be real. This woman is open to all this, and we love her for it!"
According to the introduction, "if the puncture operation is careful and the nursing is serious, no matter how old the child is, the risk is very small." HealthyChildren.org Website. "
"Celebrity mom told me!"
"She's going to let Luna decide whether and when to pierce her ears."
"She doesn't have a pierced ear and I'll let her decide when to wear it," she said at the forevermark jewelry launch
"Tegan's decision seems to have something to do with the fact that she was not allowed to decide to have her own ear hole surgery when she was a child."
"I remember when I was a child."
"My mother made it for me," she told me
"When is the best time for a little girl to have an ear hole? We have different opinions. Even the doctor has no definite answer."
"However, as a general guideline, postpone the puncture until your child is mature enough to take care of the puncture site." Dr. David Levin says it's all about waiting for what a child wants



Number  331
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maybe she will change her mind, she does that, who knows."”
“"I was talking to her at David's birthday party and he said, 'You've got to do something.'”
“The six-year-old daughter of Victoria and David Beckham played with her mum’s old Spice Girls dolls, with Victoria taking to her Instagram stories to share the fun with her followers.”
“Victoria is known for her part as Posh Spice in the nineties pop group, and it looks like little Harper enjoyed playing with the mini version of her mum.”
“Victoria posted three pictures of Harper’s playtime for fans to see.”
“In one photo, Harper can be seen looking at the five dolls of Posh Spice, Sporty Spice (Mel C), Baby Spice (Emma Bunton), Ginger Spice (Geri Halliwell) and Scary Spice (Mel B).”
“Victoria captioned the picture: “When u find out mummy was a pop star!!”
“Xxx” In another photo Harper is sitting on the floor holding the Baby Spice and Posh Spice dolls.”
“Victoria wrote Spice up your life The third picture shows the five dolls laid out with the caption Harper loves her Spice Girls dolls READ David Beckham shares sweet photo of Harper on his motorbike Take me with you Dadda It s quite a while since Victoria s Spice Girl...”
“...days so it was surely fun for mum to teach her Harper about the pop group...”


"Maybe she'll change her mind, she'll do it, who knows."
"I spoke to David at his birthday party and he said," you have to do something. "
"Victoria and David's 6-year-old daughter play with their mother's Old Spice doll, and Victoria shares her instagram story with her followers."
"Victoria is famous for playing hot chicks in the '90s pop band, and it seems that little Harper likes to play with her mother's mini version."
"Victoria posted three photos of Harper's playtime for fans to see."
"In one photo, Harper can be seen looking at five dolls: fashionable spice girl, sports spice girl (Mel C), baby spice girl (Emma Bunton), Geri Halliwell and horror spice girl (Mel b)."
Victoria wrote in the title of the photo: "when you find out mom is a pop star!"
In another photo, "XXX" Harper sits on the floor, holding baby Spice Girls and trendy spice dolls
"Victoria wrote" add spice to your life ". The third picture shows five dolls. It says that Harper loves her Spice Girl dolls. Read David Beckham's sweet picture of Harper riding a motorcycle. Take me with you, Dad. It's been a while since Victoria's spice girl..."
“… God, so it must be fun for mom to teach her Harper about pop bands... "



Number  332
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And a lot of adults and parents were against Dungeons & Dragons because they thought it like led to Satanism and murder and suicide and cult behavior.”
“It was kind of when it first really broke out.”
“Especially Veronica who doesn t want to be separated from her man Also Read Why Sabrina Didn t End up on Riverdale Or on the Big Screen Speaking of Veronica she tells her dad in this episode You have no daughter So how is that going to affect the Lodge...”
“And yeah, on the outside, we’re definitely going to see everyone working to get Archie out.”
“...favorite movies...”
“You know we always do kind of noir and crime stuff and we wanted to do some there are some great obviously classic noirs that are set in prisons and jails so we wanted to do sort of like almost an homage to Shawshank Redemption which is one of my...”
“We are definitely going to see Archie in juvenile detention.”
“Aguirre-Sacasa: “That’s it for the trial stuff.”
“Now that he’s pled guilty and he’s in juvenile detention, what can you say about his fate?”
“TheWrap: You’ve said that Season 3 won’t be too heavy on the courtroom stuff with Archie.”


"Many adults and parents are against the dragon and the underground city because they think it will lead to Satanism, murder, suicide and cult behavior."
"It was like this when it really broke out."
"Veronica, in particular, doesn't want to be separated from her man. She also read why Sabrina didn't show up in Riverdale or on the big screen. Talking about Veronica, she tells her dad in this episode that you don't have a daughter, so what impact will it have on the hut..."
"Yes, outside, we're sure to see everyone trying to get Archie out."
“… My favorite movie... "
"You know, we always do something black and criminal, we want to do something that has some great obviously classic black settings in prisons and prisons, so what we want to do is almost like a kind of homage to Shawshank Redemption, which is one of my..."
"We will definitely see Archie in custody."
Agilesaka: "this is what the trial is about."
"Now that he has pleaded guilty and is in juvenile custody, what can you say to his fate?"
"The wrap: you said the third season wouldn't be too harsh on Archie in court."



Number  333
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Can we give him the best boyfriend award already?”
“Meghan was not in attendance at the ceremony per royal protocol, but Harry made the three-hour round trip to Kensington Palace, where his date was staying, picking her up for the wedding reception.”
“...she shared.”
“"So, my cup runneth over and I’m the luckiest girl in the world!"”
“Her closing quote, while cryptic, sure said a lot.”
“November 1, 2016: A Cryptic QuoteCanada's Vancouver Sun published a Q&A in which Meghan discussed her collection for retailer Reitmans.”
“That very day, Meghan posted an adorable banana couple hugging on her Instagram page, followed by a high-tea snap on November 1.”
“The Sunday Express reported that Prince Harry had been secretly dating the Suits star, and according to one source the royal was "happier than he’s been for many years."”
“October 31, 2016: The Secret's OutThe day it all began—at least for the public.”
“Matchmaker, matchmaker, make us a royal match next time, OK?”


"Can we award him best boyfriend?"
"Megan didn't attend the wedding in accordance with royal etiquette, but Harry went back and forth for three hours to Kensington Palace where his date was staying to pick her up for the wedding banquet."
“… She shared
"So, I'm running out of glasses. I'm the luckiest girl in the world!"
"Her conclusion, though obscure, did say a lot."
"November 1, 2016: Canada's Vancouver Sun published a mysterious quote in which Megan discussed her collection for retailer reitmans."
"On that day, Megan posted on her instagram website the news of a lovely banana couple embracing each other, followed by a snapshot of the climax on November 1."
The Sunday Express reported that Prince Harry had been secretly dating the suit star and that he was "happier than he has been for many years," according to a source
"October 31, 2016: the secret is finally revealed, at least for the public."
"Matchmaker, matchmaker, will you give us a royal wedding next time?"



Number  334
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maybe next time the late night host will let Theroux give him the real deal, all he’ll have to do is buy him a couple of drinks first.”
“And the results were actually very impressive.”
“While Justin suggested a daring neck tat, Conan countered by offering up his oblique to really let this large unicorn rendering shine.”
“...draw one of his original pieces on him...”
“...on Maple Bateman there and ladybugs I can do those are pretty good FROM PEN Mimosa Popsicles and Shrimp Cups Are The Perfect Treats For an Awards Night Party Since Conan has no real tattoos he asked the actor to...”
“The talk show host asked What s your best tattoo of all the tattoos that you give to little kids to which Theroux replied confidently I do a pretty good unicorn I ve done that one a couple of times...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Something Conan had a whole lot of questions about.”
“Bateman s two young daughters much to their father s chagrin...”
“In case you didn t know Theroux is a bit of a Sharpie savant sharing an image on his Instagram account back at the beginning of April of himself giving a couple of impromptu poolside semi permanent tattoos to Jason...”


"Maybe the next night's host will ask seru to give him a real deal. All he has to do is buy him a drink first."
"The results are really impressive."
"Justin suggested a bold neck pin, but Conan used his oblique angle to fight back and let the big Unicorn shine."
“… Draw an original on him... "
“… In the maple leaf Bateman there and ladybug I can do these are very good pens Mimosa popsicle and shrimp cup is a perfect treatment for an award party, because Conan does not have a real tattoo, he asked actors... "
"The talk show host asked you what's your best tattoo among all the tattoos you gave children. Theroux confidently replied," I've made a pretty good unicorn. I've done it several times... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Conan has a lot of questions."
"Bateman's two daughters upset their father..."
"If you don't know Theroux is a bit like Sharpie savant, he shared a photo on instagram in early April when he gave Jason some temporary semi permanent tattoos by the pool..."



Number  335
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We hope that the two of them will somehow be able to sort thing out for the sake of both families.”
“AdvertisementShe has been begging her husband to let it all go, because she is afraid that all this diss coming from Jay-Z may affect once again Kanye’s health.”
“They used to be like brothers before Kanye started running his mouth about Beyonce during his Saint Pablo Tour and he went too far.”
“This is what Jay-Z said about Kanye according to the latest interview that he had on the Rap Radar podcast.”
“?”
“#Jayz #Beyoncé #BlueIvy #444 A post shared by JAY-Z (@jayzfanspot) on Aug 6, 2017 at 6:07pm PDT‘Kanye is my little brother.”
“He’s talked about me a hundred times,’ Jay-Z stated this week.”
“He even made a song called Big Brother.”
“We ve gotten past bigger issues but you brought my family into it now it s a problem Fans thought Jay Z might have put their beef behind him by talking about Kanye on his new album 4 44 but it looks like he s not ready to let it...”
“...go just yet unfortunately...”


"We hope the two of them can solve the problem for the benefit of the two families."
"She has been pleading with her husband to let it all go, because she is worried that all of Jez's misfortunes will affect kenye's health again."
"They used to be like brothers, nagging Beyonce when Kanye started touring San Pablo. He went too far."
"That's what Jay-Z said in his latest interview with Kanye on the rap radar podcast."
“?”
"A post shared by # jayz # Beyonc é# blueivy Ţ 444 Jay-Z (@ jayzfanspot) on PDT at 6:07 p.m. on August 6, 2017, Kanye is my brother."
"He's talked about me a hundred times," Jay-Z said this week
"He even made a song called big brother."
"We've gone through a bigger problem, but you've brought my family, and now it's a problem that fans think jay z might put their beef behind him on his new album 444 talking about Kanye, but it seems he's not ready to let it..."
“… Let's go. Unfortunately... "



Number  336
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Just get out of my house.””
“Beatty’s moved on much faster than Kimmel has, it seems: “I don’t care what you do,” he tells the repeat Oscar host.”
“As it turns out, Kimmel’s been talking to Warren Beatty, himself an Oscar winner and one of the presenters, along with Faye Dunaway, who read the wrong name and ushered the La La Land crew on stage last year.”
““The worst part is,” he concludes, “they want me to do it again.”Of course, all of this just falls on deaf ears.”
“It just piles up.” In fact, he admits he sees the Oscar statue everywhere, burns his tux, and feels like he’s losing his mind.”
““I can’t even open the mail because of all the envelopes.”
““You know, I dream about it every night,” Kimmel says.”
“...shuffling onstage amid total chaos...”
“In a new promo for this year s Academy Awards telecast Kimmel talks about the trauma of hosting the 2017 Oscars which ended with the wrong best picture winner being read and the awestruck team behind Moonlight the actual winner...”
“Jimmy Kimmel can't get over last year's Best Picture blunder in new Oscars promoJimmy Kimmel still has last year’s Oscars on his mind.”


"Get out of my house."
Biddy walked much faster than Kimmel, and it seemed, "I don't care what you do," he told the Oscars host
"It turns out that Kimmel has been talking to Warren Beatty, himself one of the Oscar winners and presenters, and Faye Dunaway, who misspelled his name and brought the Los Angeles staff onto the stage last year."
"The worst part," he concluded, "is that they want me to do it again." Of course, all of this went unheeded
In fact, he admitted that he saw Oscar statues everywhere, burned his tuxedo and felt like he was crazy
"I can't open the mail because there are so many envelopes."
"You know, I dream about it every night," Kimmel said
“… Hobbling on stage in chaos... "
"In a new promotional video for this year's Oscars, Kimmel talked about the trauma of hosting the 2017 Oscars, which ended with the wrong best picture winner being interpreted, and the awe inspiring team behind the moonlight is the real winner..."
"Jimmy Kimmel can't overcome his mistakes in last year's new best picture Oscars, and he's still thinking about last year's Oscars."



Number  337
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She explained: “@kaaviajames [is] pronounced Kah-Vee-Uh James.””
“I’ve waited this long so fo sho I was gonna get in there.”Union also gave her followers some tips on how to pronounce her daughter’s name.”
“Union is her middle name.”
“She said, “We wanted to include my family in her name so the “James” is from my uncle James Francis Glass who is also my godfather.”
“...which is Kaavia James Union Wade...”
“Union shared on her Instagram account She has 102 nicknames including but not limited to Kaav Kaavi Kaavi Baby Kaavi J Jamie KJ Nugget Nug Pooters The actress whose daughter was born via a surrogate due to her struggles with miscarriages also explained the origin of Kaavia s full name...”
“It’s still hard to let go.”Meanwhile, Union recently revealed her daughter already has “102 nicknames.”She and Wade wasted no time creating plenty of alternative names for Kaavia.”
“The actress said: “I’m already getting choked up.”
“Union Dwyane Wade Their New Baby that she s still struggling to come to terms with being unable to carry the child herself...”
“Union who made the announcement with a photo of her and Wade sitting together in a hospital bed told Oprah Winfrey in an interview Everyone started talking about why she sic acting like she just had a baby Despite her baby joy Gabrielle admitted during Oprah at Home with Gabrielle...”


"Kaaviajames is pronounced Kah Vee uh James," she explained
"I've been waiting so long, so I want to go in." The Union also offered her followers some advice on how to pronounce her daughter's name
"The union is her middle name."
"We want to include my family in her name, so 'James' was written by my uncle James Francis glass, who is also my godfather," she said
“… It's Cavia James Eun Wade... "
"Union shared 102 nicknames on instagram, including but not limited to kaav kaavi kaavi baby kaavi J Jamie kJ nugget NUG pooters. The actress's daughter was born through a surrogate mother due to miscarriage. She also explained the origin of kaavia's full name..."
Meanwhile, the Union recently revealed that her daughter already has "102 nicknames.". She and wade lost no time in creating a lot of alternative names for kavia
"I'm choking," the actress said
"Dwyane Wade, their new baby, is still struggling to accept the child she can't carry herself..."
"A picture of her and wade sitting together on a hospital bed told Oprah Winfrey that in the interview, everyone began to talk about why she was just like a baby, even though Gabriel admitted that she was happy when Oprah and Gabriel came home together."



Number  338
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I practice human kindness, and I believe that we each have the right to determine what we are and what we are not,” she tweeted, “NO ONE ELSE can hold that power.””
“Pinkett Smith ended her Twitter thread with what some may interpret as a direct response to Remini’s claim.”
“Remini has not responded to Pinkett Smith’s rebuttal.”
“Although she acknowledged she has studied Dianetics, Scientology’s main text, and Study Technology, a teaching method developed by Scientology founder L. Ron Hubbard, she also said she’s studied and participated in aspects of other religions as well.”
“By Tuesday, however, The Huffington Post reported that the actress responded to Remini's claims on Twitter.”


"I practice benevolence and I believe that each of us has the right to decide who we are and not who we are," she tweeted
"Pinkett Smith ended her twitter post, which some might think is a direct response to ramini's claim."
"Ramini did not respond to Pinkett Smith's rebuttal."
"Although she admitted that she had studied dianity, the main text of Scientology, and the teaching method" learning technology "developed by L. Ron Hubbard, the founder of Scientology, she also said that she had studied and participated in all aspects of other religions."
"By Tuesday, however, the Huffington Post reported that the actress had responded to Remini on twitter."



Number  339
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ah, the fickleness of young love!”
“She then sings a few lines from the tune.”
“The singer posted a sweet video of her daughter River Rose swooning over Coldplay front man, Chris Martin.”
““I like him and he’s beautiful,” the girl informs her mom in the clip.”
“So my daughter wants to marry Chris Martin and is obsessed with his song Yellow.”
“She wants to marry the boy in the video which I have informed her he is not a boy anymore and has kids older than her but she will have none of it she is determined RiverRose Yellow Lello pic twitter com 6MvgeSSVoN Kelly Clarkson kelly_clarkson August 8 2018 River...”
“Rose is especially obsessed with the Coldplay hit Yellow or as she calls it Lello You like his song Clarkson can be heard asking her daughter in the video...”
““I like his song, and I wanna kiss him,” River replies.”
“Coldplay singer Chris Martin has captured the heart of Kelly Martin's 4-year-old daughter!”
“"This should be fun."”


"Ah, the impetuosity of young love
"Then she sang a few lines."
"The singer released a sweet video of her daughter, rivers, fainting on Coldplay leader Chris Martin."
"I like him, he's beautiful," the girl told her mother in the clip
"So my daughter wanted to marry Chris Martin and was obsessed with his song yellow."
"She wants to marry the boy in the video, I have told her that he is no longer a boy, the child is older than her, but she will not get married, she decided to riverrose yellow Lello pic twitter com 6mvgessvon Kelly Clarkson Kelly Clarkson River on August 8, 2018..."
"Ross is particularly infatuated with Coldplay hit" yellow "or what she calls" Lelo, you like his song. "Clarkson asks her daughter in the video..."
"I like his songs and I want to kiss him," Reeve replied
"Coldplay singer Chris Martin has captured Kelly Martin's 4-year-old daughter's heart!"
"It should be fun."



Number  340
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Any amazing quality a great mother should have, Shawniece already has and more.””
““She’ll be loving, caring and selfless.”
“Married at First Sight season 6 stars Shawniece Jackson and Jephte Pierre are first-time parents to a baby girl they welcomed (three weeks early!)”
“...on Monday, Aug. 20, her rep confirms to PEOPLE exclusively.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Born after just five hours of labor at 7:47 a.m., the newborn — who was named in honor of Pierre’s mom Laura and Jackson’s mom Denise — weighed 5 lbs., 15 oz., and measured 17¾ inches long.”
““Seeing my daughter and holding her for the first time was magical,” Jackson tells PEOPLE.”
““There are no words that can describe that feeling.”
“I remember, before she was born, thinking about her features and if she’d have hair.”
“I was born bald.”


"Niece Xiao has had any amazing qualities a great mother should have, and there are many more."
"She will be full of love, care for others, selfless dedication."
The stars of love at first sight Season 6, Shawnee Jackson and jeffert Pierre, are the parents of their first baby girl (three weeks ahead of time!)
“…… On Monday, August 20, her representative made an exclusive confirmation to people. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The baby, born five hours after giving birth at 7:47 a.m., is named in honor of Pierre's mother, Laura, and Jackson's mother, Denise. It weighs five pounds, weighs 15 ounces, and is 17 – inches long."
"It's amazing to see my daughter for the first time and hold her," Jackson told people
"That feeling is indescribable."
"I remember, before she was born, I was thinking about her looks and whether she had hair."
"I was born bald."



Number  341
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We did it!’ And that’s what we did.”Nicole Kidman Forgot Stephen Was Also In ‘Bewitched’Click inside to watch the rest of Nicole Kidman’s appearance on The Late Show…Nicole Kidman: Big Questions With Even Bigger Stars...”
““There’s something incredible about going home and going, ‘Baby!”
“I sort of ordered some room service, and that was it – which I know is like, ‘Oh,’” Nicole continued about her Oscar.”
“So, to win and Emmy and be in love and have my family… It’s amazing.”“I was alone.”
““I was flailing, emotionally and personally.”
“I didn’t have a partner to share it with,” added Nicole, who at the time had recently broken up with Tom Cruise.”
““It was amazing to take home two and go, ‘You get one each.’”“When I won my Oscar, I was not in a great place in my life.”
““I was so glad to win the two Emmys, because I have [two] daughters,” the 50-year-old actress told host Stephen.”
“Nicole Kidman made an appearance on The Late Show with Stephen Colbert on Wednesday (November 1) and revealed the sweet reason why winning two Emmys for Big Little Lies was more meaningful than winning her Oscar for her role in The Hours.”


"We did it! "That's what we do." Nicole Kidman forgets that Stephen is also on the magic show. Click inside to watch Nicole Kidman's other appearances on the evening show Nicole Kidman: the big problem with bigger stars... "
"It's incredible to go home, baby!"
"I ordered some room service, and that's it - I know it's like 'Oh,'" Nicole continued to talk about her Oscar
"So, to win an Emmy, to love each other, to have my family That's great. " "I'm alone."
"I'm emotional and personal."
"I don't have a partner to share with me," Nicole added, adding that she had just broken up with Tom Cruise
"It's amazing to take two home and say, 'each of you take one.' "When I won the Oscars, my life didn't go well."
"I'm happy to win two Emmys because I have two daughters," the 50 year old actress told host Stephen
"Nicole Kidman and Stephen Colbert appeared on the evening show on Wednesday (November 1) and revealed a sweet reason why it makes more sense to win two Emmy Awards for" little lies "than to win an Oscar for the role in" hours. "



Number  342
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"But then I found you & realized that everything I anticipated you to be doesn't even compare to how incredibly amazing you are..."Photo via Getty.”
“Someone that would touch my life so profoundly & give me a whole new reason to breathe.”
“"Someone who would make me happier than I ever dreamed I could be.”
“AdvertisementShe wrote:"Never in a million years did I think I would find someone so completely perfect for me.”
“The Simple Life star recently paid tribute to her beau with a sweet Instagram post.”
“The couple sparked engagement rumours earlier this week when she was spotted with a dazzling diamond ring while they were strolling around the ski town.”
“AdvertisementThey went public with their relationship on social media in February 2017 with a sweet Instagram photo.”
“I immediately said yes!”The pair first met at a party during Oscars season almost a decade ago, but lost touch and didn't end up reconnecting until two years ago.”
“On the emotional moment, the 36-year-old businesswoman said:“I was so excited and surprised!”
“"He is perfect for me in every way and showed me that fairytales really do exist!”According to the publication, the couple were posing for a picture in the ski town when he got down on one knee.”


"But then I found you & and realized that nothing I expected could match your astonishment..." Photo source: Getty
"Someone who can touch my life so deeply gives me a new reason to breathe."
"Someone who can make me happier than I think."
"For millions of years, I never thought I would find such a perfect person," she wrote in the ad
"The simple life star recently posted a sweet post on instagram to pay homage to her boyfriend."
"Earlier this week, the couple was found wearing a dazzling diamond ring while wandering in the ski City, sparking rumors of engagement."
"Ad they made their relationship public on social media in February 2017 and posted a sweet photo on instagram."
"I agreed immediately! "They first met at a party in the Oscars season almost 10 years ago, but they lost touch and didn't get back in touch until two years ago."
In a moment of excitement, the 36 year old businesswoman said, "I'm so excited and surprised!"
"He suits me in every way and shows me that fairy tales do exist! "According to the publication, the couple were posing for photos in ski city when he fell on one knee."



Number  343
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As for Chrishell, she’s simply wanting ahead to a full night time of music that features performances from Kelly Clarkson, Pink and Florida Georgia Line.”
“Justin is serving as a presenter for this night’s reside telecast on the Microsoft Theater.”
“His bride, nevertheless, selected a beautiful colourful gown that shined brilliant beneath the solar of Los Angeles.”
“The This Is Us star opted for a basic black go well with and handed on a tie.”
“Lower than a month after Justin Hartley married Chrishell Hartley, the newlyweds stepped out on the 2017 American Music Awards pink carpet and—pink alert—they served up critical relationship objectives.”


"As for krischer, she just wanted to advance to a full musical time, from Kelly lackson, pink and Florida to Georgia line performances."
"Justin is the host of Microsoft theater live TV tonight."
However, his bride chose a beautiful colored dress that glittered in the Los Angeles sun
"This is the American star who chose the basic black match and handed in the tie."
"Less than a month after Justin Hartley and Chris hellhartley got married, the newlyweds set foot on the pink carpet and pink alert of the 2017 American Music Awards and achieved their key love goals."



**Something goes wrong**
“I never thought I would, but this is a spectacular human being, and I am celebrating that I get to share my life with him.”For more from Jessica, visit WSJ.com.”
“But I always look back on that moment as knowing that, OK, if anything happens to me, I’m capable of fighting back.”
“Magazine‘s Talents & Legends issue.”
“Here’s what the Molly’s Game actress had to share with the mag:On how her past informs her choices: “My mom was a single mom; I don’t know who my biological father is, and I grew up in a household that was really financially unstable.”
“There was a turning point in my life where we were living with someone I didn’t like very much, a boyfriend of my mom’s.”
“And he did somethingâ€”my room was messy or whatever and he had taken my clothes, and I was telling him to give me back my stuff â€”and he slapped me.”
“And I just kicked him in the genitals, and he fell to the ground immediately.”
“It was me, my sister and my brotherâ€”and I remember looking at my sister’s face, and we were both like, ‘Oh, my God, what did I just do?’ And then I ran out of the house.”
“He never messed with me again.”
“I actually love being married.”


"I never thought I would, but this is a great person and I celebrate being able to share my life with him." More from Jessica, visit the Wall Street Journal. "
"But I always think back to that moment because I know, well, if anything happens to me, I have the ability to fight back."
Genius and legend magazine
"Here's what Molly's game actress has to share with the audience. McGonagall: how to say that her past tells her the choice:" my mother is a single mother; I don't know who my biological father is. I grew up in a very unstable family. "
"There's a turning point in my life where we live with someone I don't really like, my mom's boyfriend."
"He did something - my room was in a mess, he took my clothes, I told him to give me back my things - he slapped me."
"I just kicked his genitals and he fell to the ground."
"It's me, my sister and my brother," I remember looking at my sister's face and thinking, "oh my God, what did I just do? "Then I ran out of the house."
"He never bothered me again."
"I really like getting married."



Number  345
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Drama surrounded the fact that Brandi Glanville did not immediately notify the child’s father.”
“Eddie’s divorce was finalized in September 2010.”
“There were rumors that Rimes and Cibrian were having an affair while they were co-starring in Northern Lights.”
“The couple went public in August 2009 and Cibrian filed for divorce and cited irreconcilable differences.”
“There was a lot of drama with Brandi Glanville.”
“Eddie Cibrian even issued a statement to E!”
“Online that asked his ex to stop talking about him and Rimes’ relationship.”
“He apologized for cheating and wished for healing and moving forward.”
“Shortly thereafter in December he became engaged to LeAnn Rimes.”
“In March 2014 Cibrian’s son Mason had been rushed to the hospital.”


"It's dramatic that brandy Granville didn't immediately inform the father."
"Eddie's divorce was finalized in September 2010."
"Rumor has it that REMS and West Bryan had an extramarital affair when they co starred in the aurora borealis."
"The couple went public in August 2009, and cibrian filed for divorce, citing irreconcilable differences."
"Brandy Granville has a lot to do."
"Eddie shiblaine even made a statement to Eddie shiblaine!"
"Online, he asked his ex boyfriend to stop talking about his relationship with Remus."
"He apologizes for cheating and hopes to recover and improve."
"Shortly after that, in December, he was engaged to Ryan rimes."
"In March 2014, cibrian's son Mason was rushed to the hospital."



Number  346
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— Rob Schneider (@RobSchneider) July 2, 2018”
“— Busy Philipps (@BusyPhilipps) July 2, 2018Congrats @Lakers on getting @KingJamesAll Lebron needs is the janitor &3 guys from the concession stand to make it to the Finals!”
“The Cavaliers forward declined to exercise his $35.6 million 2018-2019 player option and became an unrestricted free agent on Friday, June 29, and reportedly fielded offers from the Cavaliers, Rockets and 76ers before going with the Lakers.”
“To say Twitter had some feelings about this would be an understatement.”
“LeBron James to the Lakers: an actual reaction pic.twitter.com/QpHxLMXtKY — Jonathan B.”
“...mrjonjjb July 2 2018 Meanwhile veteran Charles Barkley called into NBA TV and said James move was not a shock at all I was hoping he stayed in Cleveland but I don t think it was a shock we ve been talking about it for six months but man they...”
“...got a long way to go Former Laker Kareem Abdul Jabbar tweeted I am sure the Lakernation is rejoicing The acquisition of LeBron James means that the Lakers are just a smidgen away from being real contenders...”
“Congrats to @MagicJohnson & @LALakersLive et al.”
“Cross your fingers for news from San Antonio.”I am sure the Lakernation is rejoicing The acquisition of LeBron James means that the Lakers are just a smidgen away from being real contenders.”


"- rob Schneider (@ robschneider) July 2, 2018"
"- busy Phillips (@ busyphilipps) on July 2, 2018, congratulations to the @ Lakers for getting @ kingjames all! What LeBron needs is a gatekeeper and three guys to get to the finals from the franchise booth!"
"The Cavaliers forward refused to exercise his $35.6 million option to play in 2018-2019 and became an unrestricted free agent on June 29 (Friday). It is reported that he accepted offers from the Cavaliers, rockets and 76ers before joining the Lakers."
"If Twitter has some feelings about it, it's downplaying."
"LeBron James to the Lakers: a real reaction pic.twitter.com/QpHxLMXtKY -Jonathan B
“…… Mr. jonjb, on July 2, 2018, veteran Charles Barkley called NBA TV and said that James' transfer is not shocking at all. I hope he stays in Cleveland, but I don't think it's a shock. We've been talking about it for six months, but they... "
“… There's still a long way to go, Jabbar, a former Laker, tweeted. "I believe the Laker team is very happy to buy LeBron James, which means that the Laker is only a little away from becoming a real competitor."
"Congratulations@ MagicJohnson&@LALakersLive And so on. "
"Pray for the news of San Antonio." I believe the Lakers are happy with LeBron James' acquisition, which means they are only a little bit away from becoming a real competitor



Number  347
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s insane to me.”Fantastic Beasts: The Crimes of Grindelwald will be released Nov. 16.”
““It’s like my wildest dream … I could not have fathomed that when I was in the fourth grade reading these books, there would be a character I play that exists in this universe.”
“That’s pretty much how it all got started,” Williams told EW.”
“She sent me these emails about this really amazing character that she had been working on.”
““I hung out with J.K. [Rowling], and she had reached out to me a couple of days after we met.”
“Williams, a diehard Harry Potter fan, was announced as part of the cast back in October.”
“Lest we get ahead of ourselves, Rowling later tweeted that the next Fantastic Beasts film, The Crimes of Grindelwald, will only feature a “hint” of Lally, and that her “true glory” will be revealed in the third film.”
“While the duo dined out together, they decided to share they announcement on social media: Williams will play Professor Eulalie “Lally” Hicks, who teaches at Ilvermorny School of Witchcraft and Wizardry, America’s equivalent of Hogwarts.”
“This particular secret has to do with the upcoming Fantastic Beasts and Where to Find Them sequel — specifically, the character played by Jessica Williams.”
“Fantastic Beasts: The Crimes of Grindelwald Close Streaming OptionsThe unofficial tagline of Harry Potter and the Cursed Child might be “Keep the Secrets,” but J.K. Rowling herself just let a big one spill during the intermission of the play’s Broadway opening night.”


Monster: the crime of Greenwald will be released on November 16
"It's like my wildest dream I can't imagine that when I read these books in the fourth grade, there will be a character I play in this universe. "
"That's how it all started," Williams told the Wall Street Journal
"She sent me these emails about a very amazing character she's been working on."
"I'm with J.K. (Rowling) and she contacted me a few days after we met."
Williams, a big fan of Harry Potter, was announced as one of the actors in October
"I'm afraid we'll be surprised. Rowling later said on her micro blog that the next fantasy beast movie" the crime of Greenwald "will only have Larry's" hint ", and her" real glory "will be revealed in the third movie."
While the two were having dinner together, they decided to share their announcement on social media: Williams will play professor yulalie Hicks, who teaches at the irfmoney School of witchcraft and wizardry in Hogwarts
"This particular secret has to do with the upcoming monsters and where to find their sequels - especially Jessica Williams."
The unofficial slogan of the movie "magical beast: the crime of Greenwald" may be "keep a secret," but J.K. Rowling himself revealed a big secret during the interval on Broadway premiere night



Number  348
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Pre-order my new sci-fi novel Herokiller, and read my first series, The Earthborn Trilogy, which is also on audiobook.”
“Brian Yorkey, Joy Gorman, Mandy Teefey, Kristel Laiblin, Tom McCarthy, Steve Golin and Selena Gomez are returning as EPs.”
“The original run of the Netflix original was one of the most talked-about series of the year, often by fans who loved it, sometimes by critics who lamented how it handled its tough issues like suicide and rape.”
“But season 2 has come and gone with…almost no buzz at all.”
“It was a very, very strange phenomenon.”
“I don’t think I’d ever seen a show go from all anyone could talk about to a complete void of coverage for its sophomore season, yet that’s exactly what happened with 13 Reasons Why.”
“The theory was that, perhaps, after a relatively conclusive ending to season 1 (13 episodes, 13 tapes, the end), that simply no one was watching the second season.”
“But that appears not to be the case as Netflix has announced today that yes, 13 Reasons Why is returning for season 3.”
“They also gave these details alongside the announcement:Production on the new season will resume later this year.”
“The new season will premiere in 2019.”


Pre order my new science fiction "hero killer", read my first series, also in the audio book "the birth of the Earth Trilogy"
"Bryan joki, Joey Gorman, Mandy Tiffany, crystal leiblin, Tom McCarthy, Steve Goering and Serena Gomez will return as earnings per share."
"The original version of Netflix is one of the most watched series this year. It's often sought after by fans who love it, and sometimes by critics who lament how it deals with thorny issues such as suicide and rape."
"But the second season has come and gone There is hardly any excitement. "
"It's a very, very strange phenomenon."
"I don't think I've ever seen a show change from a topic that anyone can talk about to a completely unreported sophomore, but that's the truth. There are 13 reasons."
"The theory is that maybe after the end of the first season (13 episodes, 13 tapes, the end), no one will watch the second season."
"But that doesn't seem to be the case, because Netflix announced today that, yes, there are 13 reasons for the third quarter return."
"They also provided these details with Ann cement: production of the new season will resume later this year."
"The new season will premiere in 2019."



Number  349
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“With God's blessing, anniversary #23"”
“Con la bendición de Dios, Aniversario"That translates into: "Because every boss needs a good boss.”
“He and his wife Mireddys González married in 1994 and this is what Daddy Yankee had to say in honor of his wife: "Porque un Jefe necesita de una buena Jefa.”
“I would melt.”
“I mean look at how romantic he is....a jet filled with flowers and balloons?”
“Most of us know the the 41-year old Despacito singer for his catchy tunes, so seeing him post something not related to his music is definitely a breath of fresh air.”
“He shared a post of a private jet full of balloons and gorgeous flower arrangements to celebrate his 23rd wedding anniversary.”
“Reggaeton icon, Daddy Yankee, took to Instagram to share a rare photo that gave us insight to his private life.”


"God bless the 23rd anniversary"
"Because every boss needs a good boss."
"He married his wife, miredith Gonzalez, in 1994, and that's what Yankee dad said in memory of his wife:" porque UN Jefe necesita De Una Buena jefa“
"I'll melt."
"I mean, look how romantic he is A jet full of flowers and balloons
"Most of us know that the 41 year old despacito singer's tune is very attractive, so it's absolutely fresh air to see him publish something unrelated to his music."
"To celebrate his 23rd wedding anniversary, he shared a private plane full of balloons and gorgeous flower arrangements."
"Reggae idol, Yankee dad, shared a rare photo on instagram to let us know about his private life."



Number  350
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But the real question: would anyone bother to watch?”
““Rematch?” Phelps tweeted after “losing” to the ocean predator.”
““I’m sorry you feel that way … I thought it turned out incredible,” he said.”
“The much-hyped race between Olympic gold medalist Michael Phelps and a great white shark was anticlimactic to some, because the man and fish did not actually race, as the channel suggested.”
“The “race” constituted Discovery Channel calculating the speed of a great white shark (over 100 meters) and superimposing shark footage over Phelps.”
“The Olympian swam the the distance in the shark’s natural habitat, off the coast of South Africa in 56-degree waters.”
“Phelps clocked in at 38.1 seconds compared to 36.1 seconds for the great white shark.”
“The Washington Post pointed out that both of those speeds are significantly faster than César Cielo’s 100-meter world record of 46.91 seconds set at the 2009 World Aquatics Championships, although Cielo obviously holds that record without the help of a wetsuit and monofin, which Phelps wore.”
“Regardless of Phelps’ abilities, Discovery’s perceived false advertising eclipsed viewers’ sentiments.”
“After the race comments like the following appeared to be the major takeaway Turns out Michael Phelps races a shark was really just Michael Phelps swims alone and then compares his time to a shark s time Gary Parrish GaryParrishCBS July 24 2017 Me pretending to be ok with Michael...”


"But the real question is: does anyone want to see it?"
"The second round? Phelps tweeted after "losing" to ocean predators
"I'm sorry you feel that way I think the results are incredible, "he said
Olympic gold medalist Michael Phelps's match with a great white shark was hyped, which disappointed some people because the man and the fish didn't actually compete as the TV station said
"Game" formed the exploration channel, calculated the speed of the great white shark (more than 100 meters), and superimposed the shark lens on Phelps
"Olympia is 56 degrees off the coast of South Africa, swimming far away in the shark's natural habitat."
"Phelps scored 38.1 seconds, while great white shark scored 36.1 seconds."
The Washington Post pointed out that both events were significantly faster than the world record of 46.91 seconds in 100m set by Cesar ziello at the 2009 World Water Championships, although ziello apparently kept the record without the help of Phelps' diving suit and single fin swimsuit
"No matter what Phelps is capable of, the fake ads that discovery perceives cover up the mood of the audience."
"At the end of the game, comments like the following seem to be the main takeaway. The results show that Michael Phelps only swims alone in the shark game, and then compares his time with that of the shark. Gary parish Gary parish CBS July 24, 2017 I pretend I have no problem with Michael..."



Number  351
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I really pride myself on the people that I surround myself with and how I take care of myself, so my ground is stable beneath me.'”
“You just have trust that there is a plan.”
“The Glee star, who just hit the big 3-0 on August 30, posed for the cover of People's new Special Wellness Issue and explained just how she keeps her figure looking so amazing.”
“'I've never loved my body more than I do right now,' she said.”
“'And I'm so grateful that I feel that way.'”
“Talkin body Lea Michele posed for the cover of People magazine s Special Wellness Issue Totally naked Earlier this year the star showed off some major body confidence and stripped down for Women s Health UK Feeling good She said she s never loved her body more than she does...”
“...now The actress who just turned 30 is thrilled that she s found security in her figure To the public eye it might seem that Lea s always been in good shape rocking sample sizes on the red carpet...”
“But the New York native admitted that when she first moved to Los Angeles for Glee in 2009, she hadn't yet figured out 'how to make things work' when she could no longer walk the streets of Manhattan to get in her daily fitness.”
“She said her weight 'fluctuated' a lot during that time, since she was suddenly driving everywhere and spending tons of time in her trailer.”
“Since then, she's managed to find what works for her — and that's a super-healthy diet and workouts that she actually enjoys.”


"I'm really proud of the people around me and how I take care of myself, so my land is stable under me."
"You just have to believe in a plan."
"The glee star, who just won a 3-0 grand slam on August 30, posed on the cover of people's new special issue health and explained how she made her body look so amazing."
"I've never loved my body as much as I do now," she said
"I'm grateful that I feel that way."
"Earlier this year, talking body lea Michele posed naked on the cover of people's health issue. The star showed some important body confidence. For the sake of British women's health, she took off her clothes and felt very good. She said she had never loved her body as much as she does now..."
“…… Now the actress, who has just turned 30, is very excited because she has found the security of her figure in public. It seems that Leah is always in good shape when she shakes the horn on the red carpet... "
"But the New York native admits that when she first moved to Los Angeles in 2009 to join glee, she had not figured out how to make things work because she could no longer walk on the streets of Manhattan to exercise her daily body."
"She said that her weight fluctuated a lot during this period because she suddenly drove around and spent a lot of time in the trailer."
"After that, she finally found the right way for herself - the super healthy diet and exercise she really liked."



Number  352
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“1 women's skier in the downhill for eight years, from the 2007/2008 season to 2015/2016.”
“In an even longer streak, she was the No.”
“...enough to win a medal in her final downhill race of the Pyeongchang Winter Olympics and almost certainly the last of her Olympic career...”
“It's the third Olympic medal overall for Vonn.”
“"It was tough to contemplate this being my last Olympic downhill," Vonn said afterward.”
“"I struggled to try to keep the emotions together, but I left it all on the mountain like I said I would."”
“"I gave it all today, skied a great race.”
“Sofia just skied better than I did," Vonn said, referring to the top finisher, Italy's Sofia Goggia.”
“"I thought I executed the line really well on the whole course, perhaps too well," Vonn said.”
“"I tried too hard to stay on the perfect line.”


"From the 2007 / 2008 season to the 2015 / 2016 season, a woman skier has been skiing downhill for eight consecutive years."
"In the longer winning streak, she was number one."
“…… Enough to win a medal in the last downhill competition of the Pingchang Winter Olympic Games, it's almost certainly the last time of her Olympic career... "
"This is Feng's third Olympic medal."
"It's hard to imagine that this is the last time I'm going downhill at the Olympics," Feng said later
"I tried to put my emotions together, but I left everything on the mountain, as I said."
"I'm going all out today. The skiing competition is wonderful."
"Sofia skis better than I do," Feng said, referring to the number one Italian, Sofia GOJA
"I feel like I've done a good job in this business throughout the process, maybe great," Feng said
"I try so hard to be perfect."



Number  353
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Trump was back tweeting at 8:05 p.m., praising the day’s “Great Tax Cut rollout.”“The lobbyists are storming Capital Hill, but the Republicans will hold strong and do what is right for America!”It was as if he never left.”
“The account was down for 11 minutes, and has since been restored.”
“We are continuing to investigate and are taking steps to prevent this from happening again.”
“The company’s tweet: Earlier today @realdonaldtrump’s account was inadvertently deactivated due to human error by a Twitter employee.”
“...it would be conducting a full internal review...”
“We are continuing to investigate and are taking steps to prevent this from happening again But then two hours later Twitter updated its statement saying that an investigation showed the deactivation was done by a Twitter customer support employee who did this on the employee s last day Twitter said...”
“— Twitter Government (@TwitterGov) November 3, 2017For those few minutes, visitors to Trump’s account were simply met with the message, “Sorry, that page doesn’t exist!”“The account was down for 11 minutes, and has since been restored,” the statement read.”
“Twitter initially posted a statement Thursday night saying Trump’s “account was inadvertently deactivated due to human error by a Twitter employee.”Earlier today @realdonaldtrump’s account was inadvertently deactivated due to human error by a Twitter employee.”


Trump sent another tweet at 8:05 p.m., praising the "great tax cuts" of the day. "The lobbyists are going into the capital hill, but the Republicans will stick to it and do what's good for the United States! "He never seems to have left."
"The account was closed for 11 minutes and then restored."
"We are continuing to investigate and take measures to prevent this from happening again."
"The company's Twitter: earlier today, the account of @ realdonalddump was inadvertently disabled due to human error by a twitter employee."
“… It will conduct a comprehensive internal review... "
"We are continuing to investigate and take measures to prevent this from happening again, but two hours later, twitter updated its statement, saying that the investigation showed that the suspension was completed by a twitter customer support employee who did so on the last day of the employee, twitter said..."
"- twitter government (@ twittergov) November 3, 2017 in these minutes, visitors to trump's account will only receive one message," sorry, that page doesn't exist! "The account was closed for 11 minutes and then restored," the statement said
"Twitter initially issued a statement on Thursday night saying that Trump's account" was inadvertently disabled due to human error by a twitter employee. " Earlier today, the account of @ realdonalddump was inadvertently disabled due to human error by a twitter employee



Number  354
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"She's noticed, and suddenly, she's told me and others in our circle, 'I don't want to eat because I'm watching my figure,' or, 'I weigh too much,'" Lakshmi revealed.”
“While the 46-year-old Top Chef star usually tries to fit into a size "0" dress each awards season, she revealed that she's ditching the diet this year -- and for good reason!”
“WATCH: Padma Lakshmi on Gaining Weight: 'Only Benefit Is What It Does to Your Boobs!'”
“"I find myself in the unique position of eating for a living while still being expected to look a certain way… let's call it 'red carpet ready," she wrote in a guest column for The Hollywood Reporter.”
“"While I can clearly point to the many ways our society constantly reinforces this pressure, the truth is, my own vanity also plays a big role.”
“I want to look good, to be fit and to fit into those fancy couture dresses."”
“"It's always a nail-biting extravaganza at fittings, praying that a few pretty dresses that came down the runway on a teenage model who is a size 0 will miraculously fit my 40-something body," she continued.”
“"It's like a poem: no meat, no wheat, no cheese, no fried foods or sweets.”
“And, of course, no alcohol."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"She noticed that, all of a sudden, she told me and the rest of our circle," I don't want to eat because I'm looking at my body, "or" I'm too heavy. "
Although the 46 year old top chef star usually wears a "0" size dress in every award season, she revealed that she will give up dieting this year, which has a good reason! "
"Observation: Padma Lakshmi talks about weight gain:" the only benefit is what it does to your chest! "
"I found myself in a unique position to live on food while being expected to show up in some way Let's call it "red carpet ready."
"Although I can clearly point out that our society is increasing this pressure in many ways, the fact is that my own vanity has also played a big role."
"I want to be good-looking, healthy and suitable for those high-end women's clothes."
"It's always a thrilling event, praying that the beautiful dresses worn by a size 0 model on the catwalk will miraculously fit my 40s," she added
"It's like a poem: no meat, no wheat, no cheese, no fried food or candy."
"Don't drink, of course."



Number  355
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  356
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Anyway, whatever you do, have fun!”
“Just take care of yourselves, you hear?”
“Maybe meditate a bit or go for a run.”
“Drink some water.”
“Give your fingers a stretch.”
“Don't forget to rally your fellow fans with the hashtag #AlphaMaleMadness, and to take the occasional break.”
“As always, you can vote as many times as you want for as many actors as you want, as long as you get those votes in before the polls close this Sunday.”
“You can submit those votes starting riiiiiight now!”
“Only one actor can survive each battle, and only your votes can determine which actor that is.”
“Alpha Male Madness 2018 continues with round two, consisting of 16 scientifically-crafted battles.”


"Anyway, whatever you do, have fun!"
"Take care of yourself, do you hear me?"
"Maybe meditate, or go for a run."
"Drink some water."
"Extend your finger."
"Don't forget to use the label" letter Craziness "to rally your fans and take a break once in a while."
"As always, just put those votes in before the end of this Sunday's voting and vote for as many actors as you want."
"You can start voting now!"
"Only one actor can survive every battle. Only your vote can decide who is an actor."
"Alpha men's crazy 2018 continues with the second round, including 16 scientifically designed battles."



**Something goes wrong**
“In September, she made a cameo in another CBS show, the reboot of “Murphy Brown,” where she applied to be Brown’s personal secretary.”
““And that there are real people that have to make decisions that have husbands and children.”This is the second in a run of surprise cameos for Clinton.”
““I think what’s so great about the show is that it actually discusses events that could be taking place,” Albright said.”
“...that she enjoys how the show engages with real news issues...”
“Even in this moment of peril remind Americans of our nation s original motto something that I think about a lot and which seems more important today than ever E Pluribus Unum Albright who made her first cameo on Madam Secretary in 2015 said in video provided exclusively to CNN”
““I think what we’re all saying is talk about what unites us,” Clinton says to Leoni’s character in the episode.”
“Tea Leoni after a white nationalist group commits a terrorist attack in Washington DC and spoke about the importance of cultural diversity in America...”
“CNN Former secretaries of state Hillary Clinton Colin Powell and Madeleine Albright offered their fictional successor Elizabeth McCord some advice on the rise of white nationalism in America Sunday on CBS s Madam Secretary The three secretaries of state popped up in the season premiere to counsel McCord played by...”
“Former Secretaries of State Hillary Clinton, Colin Powell and Madeleine Albright joined Téa Leoni on the set of "Madam Secretary."”


In September, she made a guest appearance on another CBS show, Murphy brown, and applied to be Brown's personal secretary
"There are also real people who have to make decisions. They have husbands and children." This is Clinton's second unexpected guest appearance
"I think the best thing about the show is that it actually discusses what might happen," Albright said
“… She likes how the show deals with real news issues... "
"Even in this time of crisis, it reminds Americans of our country's original motto, which I've thought a lot about, and it seems more important today than ever. In 2015, e pluribus unum Albright made her first guest appearance as Madam secretary, in a video provided exclusively to CNN
"I think we're all talking about what unites us," Clinton told the character in the play
"After a white nationalist group launched a terrorist attack in Washington, D.C., and talked about the importance of cultural diversity in the United States, tyre Lionel said
Former CNN secretaries of State Hillary Clinton Powell and Madeleine Albright gave their fictional successors Elizabeth McCord some advice on the rise of white American nationalism on CBS's "Madam Secretary" on Sunday. The three secretaries of state suddenly appeared at this season's premiere, playing the role of McCord
Former secretaries of State Hillary Clinton, Colin Powell, and Madeleine Albright starred in "Mrs. Secretary of state" with TYA Lionel



Number  358
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Despite their relationship strife, they were committed to fighting for each other, their marriage and their family.”
“That scarred me.”Finding Trust AgainThe couple, who has been open about their experience with couples therapy, participated in a season of WE tv’s Marriage Boot Camp: Reality Stars, and viewers watched as the couple just couldn’t seem to put their past behind them.”
“Image zoom Credit: Kendra Wilkinson/Instagram“It got pretty bad, [but] not to the point where I would harm my family,” she told PEOPLE in 2011.”
““Hank’s dad and his grandfather were both named Hank, so it was very important to us to carry on the family tradition.”After giving birth, Kendra opened up about her battle with postpartum depression.”
““We’ve already decided to name our son Hank Baskett IV,” she previously said.”
“Becoming ParentsSix months after tying the knot, Kendra and Hank welcomed their son.”
“Later that month, the former Playmate married Hank at her onetime residence, the Playboy Mansion, in Los Angeles.”
“That’s all that matters,” the former NFL star told PEOPLE about helping Kendra balance pregnancy and wedding planning.”
““I want her to enjoy this wedding because if she’s happy, I’m happy.”
“...first child together in December...”


"Despite the conflict in their relationship, they are committed to fighting for each other, marriage and family."
"It scares me a lot." The couple made public their experience of husband and wife treatment and participated in a season of we TV marriage training camp: Reality TV stars. The audience watched the couple as if they could not forget their past
"The credit for image zooming: Kendra Wilkinson / instagram," she told people in 2011, "it's getting pretty bad [but] not to the point where I'm going to hurt my family."
"Hank's father and grandfather are both called hank, so it's very important for us to inherit the family tradition." After giving birth, Kendra talked about her struggle with postpartum depression
"We have decided to name our son Hank Basquet IV," she said earlier
Ten months after their marriage, Kendra and Hank became parents for their son
Later that month, the former playmate married hank at the Playboy building in Los Angeles, where hank used to live
"That's the most important thing," the former NFL star told people, helping Kendra balance her pregnancy and wedding plans
"I want her to enjoy the wedding, because if she's happy, I'm happy too."
“… In December, the first child was together... "



Number  359
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Because of his outspokenness after the challenge, it was Jacob who was chosen to be the first person to check-in at Ghost Island-Inn.”
“This meant that although the person would be alone on the spooky Ghost Island, they would be safe from being voted out at Tribal Council.”
“The tribe that lost the challenge received minimal items such as rice, a pot, and very little fishing gear.”
“The first tribe to finish received an entire shelter-building kit, along with eggs, and flint for fire.”
“Instead, this season began with a mini-challenge to declare what tribe will earn what materials.”
“Unlike recent seasons, there was no “shipwreck” start, which meant gathering as many materials as needed for the Tribe’s camp.”
“First HourThings are changing up this season!”
“This is one season you do not want to miss!”
“On this season, castaways will be sent to Ghost Island to reverse the curse.”
“Ghost Island is filled with relics from the past 35 seasons from previous castaways whose torch was snuffed too soon.”


"Because of the outspokenness after the challenge, Jacob was chosen as the first person to stay in the Ghost Island Hotel."
"It means that although this person will be on ghost island alone, they won't be eliminated at the tribal council."
"The tribe that failed in the challenge received very few items, such as rice, a jar, and very few fishing gear."
"The first completed tribe received a complete set of shelter building tools, as well as eggs and flint."
"Instead, the season begins with a small challenge, which is to announce which tribe will get what material."
"Unlike in recent seasons, there is no 'shipwreck' beginning, which means collecting as much material as possible for the tribal camp."
"The first hour of the season is changing!"
"It's a season you don't want to miss!"
"In this season, abandoned children will be sent to ghost island to reverse the curse."
"Ghost Island is full of relics of the past 35 seasons, which are left by abandoned children who used to extinguish the torch prematurely."



Number  360
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He's dedicated to clean living and eating right.””
“He's had a lot of time to focus on himself.”Another insider shared with the publication, "He does a lot of weight training.”
“He's been outdoors a lot, hiking and walking.”
“He's exercising.”
“He's focusing on himself again, watching what he eats, and has a chef making him healthy meals.”
“A source recently told Us Weekly, "He lost a bunch of weight.”
“He was also noticeably thinner.”
“On the red carpet, Pitt appeared to be in good spirits while smiling for the cameras.”
“SplashNewsLast night, actor Brad Pitt made a surprise appearance at the Hollywood premiere of "The Lost City Of Z,” which he executive-produced.”


"He's committed to a clean life and the right diet."
"He has a lot of time to focus on himself," another industry source shared with the magazine. "He does a lot of weight training."
"He's often outdoors, hiking and walking."
"He's exercising."
"He focused on himself again, looking at what he was eating and asking the chef to cook healthy meals for him."
"He lost a lot of weight," a source recently told us weekly
"He's noticeably thinner, too."
"On the red carpet, Pete is in good spirits when he smiles at the camera."
Last night, actor Brad Pitt made a surprise appearance at the Hollywood premiere of "lost Z city."



Number  361
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She was released the next morning without bail.”
“Her breath test reportedly registered an .15., and the legal limit is .08 percent.”
“FROM COINAGE: See Where 6 Stars Were Before They Were FamousDe Lesseps was driving a 2003 Land Rover after midnight when police said she was driving without headlights, according to The East Hampton Star.”
“D’Agostino had no comment about the incident.”
““I look forward to defending her vigorously in court,” de Lesseps’ attorney, Edward Burke Jr., told Page Six.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“7 for driving while under the influence in Sag Harbor, New York.”
“PEOPLE confirms the Real Housewives of New York City reality star’s 22-year-old child was arrested on Apr.”
“Real Housewives of New York Star Luann D'Agostino's Daughter Victoria, 22, Arrested for DWILuann D’Agostino‘s daughter Victoria de Lesseps is facing legal troubles.”


"She was released the next morning without bail."
According to the report, her respiratory test result was 0.15%, and the legal limit was 0.08%
When she was driving a 2003 Land Rover after midnight, police said she had no headlights, the East Hampton Star reported
"Dagostino did not comment on the incident."
"I look forward to defending her forcefully in court," dreisep's lawyer, Edward Burke, told page 6
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Seven years for drunk driving in port saga, New York."
"People confirmed that the real housewife of the 22-year-old New York reality TV star was arrested on April 1."
"Victoria, the 22-year-old daughter of New York star LuAnn D'Agostino, faces a legal dispute over the arrest of Victoria de Lesseps, daughter of dwiluann D'Agostino, for her real housewife."



Number  362
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We wanted to see if you would tell us if you s— yourself.”Ultimately, Kendall puts it best: “You guys are like, 12,” she says.”
“When they run out of ideas, Kourtney asks her Twitter followers for some suggestions on how to prank a sleeping person.”
“ET) on E!”
“You Won't Believe the Savage Prank Kourtney and Khloé Kardashian Tried to Pull on a Sleeping Kendall JennerKourtney and Khloé Kardashian can solemnly swear that they are up to no good.”
“In a sneak peek at Sunday’s episode of Keeping Up with the Kardashians, the sisters travel to Santa Barbara — and when Kendall Jenner falls asleep first, they decide to pull a prank on her.”
“(As Kourtney claims, she was “asking for it.”)Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Can we cover her with baby powder?” asks Khloé, 33.”
““What if we put a blueberry up her a—?” suggests Kourtney, 38.”
“After skipping over the boring ones — “let them rest,” “leave Kendall alone” — one person replies with a particularly … creative response.”
““We wanted you to shart yourself,” explains Khloé as the three crack up.”


"We want to see if you're willing to tell us if you're yourself." In the end, Kendall put it best: "you're like, 12 years old," she said
"When they don't have an idea, Courtney asks her twitter followers for advice on how to trick people into sleeping."
"ET) on e!"
"You won't believe the wild pranks of Courtney and heloe Kardashian, trying to woo the sleeping Kendall jennell. Courtney and heloe Kardashian can solemnly swear that they are engaged in unprofitable business."
"While peeking at Sunday's follow Kardashian, the sisters went to Santa Barbara - when Kendall Jenner fell asleep first, they decided to play a prank on her."
(as Kourtney put it, she was "asking for trouble") to get news, feature, and other push notifications
"Can we cover her with baby powder? Asked heloe, 33
"If we put her a blueberry -? "Courtney suggested, 38."
"Skip the boring words -" let them rest, "leave Kendall alone" - one person with a special Creative answers
"We want to give you a share," explained Heroe, as the three broke up



Number  363
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Prior to its official release at midnight, West livestreamed the album listening party on the app WAV.”
“According to TMZ, the last-minute soiree was held at a ranch outside Jackson Hole, where ‘Ye has been working on his follow up to 2016’s The Life of Pablo.”
“Others who documented their getaway to the mountainous state on Thursday evening included Nas, Fabolous, Kid Cudi, 2 Chainz, Ty Dolla Sign, Pusha T, Desiigner, Scooter Braun and Teyana Taylor.”
“Kim Kardashian, Scott Disick, Chris Rock, Jonah Hill, Scooter Braun and more were among the familiar faces spotted by fellow attendees.”
“Hollywood Flocks to Wyoming for Kanye West’s Secret Album Listening PartyThe rapper drops his eighth studio album on Friday, and to celebrate he invited an exclusive group of celebrities, reporters and music industry types to Jackson Hole, Wyoming for a private listening party.”


Before the official release at midnight, West broadcast the album listening party live on the app wav
"According to TMZ, the last-minute party was held at a ranch outside Jackson Hole, where ye has been doing follow-up work for the 2016" the life of Pablo. "
"Other people who recorded their escape to mountainous states on Thursday night include NAS, fabolous, kid Cudi, 2 chainz, ty dolla sign, pusha T, designer, Scooter Braun and Teyana Taylor."
"Kim Kardashian, Scott Disick, Chris Locke, Jonah hill, and Scott Braun were all familiar faces to the participants."
Hollywood flocked to Wyoming for Kanye West's Secret album concert. Rapper gave up his eighth studio album on Friday. To celebrate, he invited a group of celebrities, journalists and musicians to Jackson Hole, Wyoming, for a private concert



Number  364
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So romantic.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“The evidence comes thanks to one eagle-eyed Twitter user who notices that they both have a tiny cloud inked on their finger:23rd May 2018: Ariana Grande hits back at a fan who tells her she should have stayed with Mac Miller.”
“23rd May: Fans notice that this 'casually dating couple' have matching tattoos already!”
“She seemed quite smitten.”21st May: News breaks that these two are definitely an item - but according to People magazine, the couple have only “just started” dating, and it’s still “very casual”.”
“He was hanging out with her and her friends with his arm around her.”
““They seemed very lovey-dovey.”
““After Ariana’s performance, they were backstage and he had his arm around her,” a source tells People.”
“Getty Images20th May 2018: As the dust settles on their former relationships, Ariana and Pete are seen getting close at the Billboard Music Awards.”
“He too shares a sweet message calling his ex a "very talented girl."”


"It's so romantic."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
A sharp eyed twitter user noticed a small cloud on both faces, which is evidence date: May 23, 2018: Ariana grand hit back at a fan who told her she should be with Mike Miller. "
"May 23: fans notice that this' casual date couple 'already has a matching tattoo!"
May 21: it is reported that the two men are definitely a project, but according to people magazine, the couple are only "just starting" dating and are still "very casual"
"He put his arms around her with her friends."
"They look lovely."
"After Ariana's performance, they were backstage and he held her," a source told people
"Getty Images May 20, 2018: Ariana and Pete are getting closer and closer at the Billboard Music Awards when their previous relationship is settled."
He also shared a sweet message, calling his predecessor "a very talented girl."



Number  365
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
““Kourtney never knows when he is going to fly off the handle or go nuts about something.”But sadly for Scott, Kourtney and Younes’ relationship appears to be going from strength to strength.”
“Kourtney, 38, has moved on with 24-year-old model Younes Bendjima, while Scott, 34, is now dating 19-year-old Sofia Richie.”
“But despite being “happy” in his new relationship, Scott is still jealous of Younes, who has been with Kourtney for over a year after meeting in Paris around the time of Kim’s robbery.”
“Kourtney and Younes Getty Images“Scott is still insanely jealous of Younes,” a source told E!”
““He just can't come to terms with the fact that Kourtney has found true happiness with someone else.”
““Scott just never thought it would last this long with Younes or become so serious.”
“Nobody really did.”Scott and Sofia Getty ImagesThe source added that he “can't deal with someone else having Kourtney.”
“He can't control his emotions about it and lets it all out.”
“A source previously told People magazine: “It's definitely serious.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Courtney never knew when he would go mad or mad about something." But for Scott, it's sad that Courtney's relationship with yones seems to be developing by force
"Courtney, 38, is dating model younes bendjima, 24, and Scott, 34, is dating 19-year-old Sofia Richie."
Although Scott is "happy" in his new relationship, he is still jealous of younes because he has seen him in Paris for more than a year before and after Kim's robbery
"Courtney and yons Getty pictures" Scott is still madly jealous of yons, "a source told e!"
"He just can't accept the fact that Courtney and others have found true happiness."
"Scott never thought that being with yones would last so long, or become so serious."
"No one really does that." Scott and Sophia Getty recalled that the source added that he "couldn't cope with other people having Courtney."
"He couldn't control his emotions and let it all out."
"It must be serious," a source told people earlier



Number  366
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s a time for mourning, really.””
““All the women who have been hurt deserve dignity and respect, so I want to give it the time it deserves.”
“...of Art fully supported Johansson s decision...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I totally agree with that,” Wintour said during a visit to The Late Show with Stephen Colbert.”
““Georgina is a brilliant designer and I don’t think she should be blamed for her husband’s behavior.”
““I think it was a great gesture of support on Scarlett’s part to wear a dress like that, a beautiful dress like that, on such a public occasion,” she added.”
“Looking for more style content?”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more.”
“Johansson was the first star to give Marchesa a high-profile red carpet moment in months since Weinstein was accused of sexual harassment and assault by dozens of women last fall.”


"It's a time of mourning, really."
"All women who have been hurt deserve dignity and respect, so I want to give them the time they deserve."
“…… The art world fully supports Johnson's decision... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I totally agree with that," Wintour said while watching the evening show with Stephen Colbert
"Georgina is a great designer and I don't think she should be blamed for her husband's behavior."
"It's a good gesture of support for Scarlett to wear such a dress, such a beautiful dress on such a public occasion," she added
"Looking for more style content?"
"Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle newsletters for amazing discounts, beauty products and more."
"Since Weinstein was accused of sexual harassment and assault by dozens of women last fall, Johnson is the first star in months to put marqueisa on the red carpet."



Number  367
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED: The Best Places to Buy Comfy Bras Online That Actually Fit...”
“With this guide, managing irregular bra cup sizes (yes, even for sports bras) should be a breeze, and sore, achy breasts from ill-fitting bras will be a thing of the past.”
“Bra size shouldn’t be a guessing game.”
“Best of all, knowing how to measure your bust will make adjusting to changes in your breasts (from losing or gaining weight, hormone fluctuations, aging, pregnancy, and more) so much less stressful.”
“All you need is a tape measure and a little free time, and you’ll have saved yourself a lot of bra-shopping misery.”
“Equipment is minimal.”
“...much easier especially for online shoppers...”
“Learning how to measure bra size can feel uncomfortable but knowing your measurements and keeping them written in a note on your phone or somewhere else that s accessible when the bra shopping mood strikes will make bra shopping so...”
“The best option is to know your bra size by taking bust measurements using these simple measuring instructions, which will ensure a perfect fit in band and in cup—and can even help you find the right amount of support.”
“...day or between washings...”


"Related: the best place to buy a really comfortable bra online..."
"With this guide, it should be easy to manage irregular bra cup sizes (yes, even sports bras), and breast soreness caused by unsuitable bras will be a thing of the past."
"Bra size should not be a guessing game."
"Most importantly, knowing how to measure your chest circumference will greatly reduce the stress of adapting to changes in your breasts (from weight loss or gain, hormonal fluctuations, aging, pregnancy, etc.)
"All you need is a tape measure and a little free time, so you don't have to buy a lot of bras."
"There are very few devices."
“… Especially for online shoppers... "
"It's uncomfortable to learn how to measure the size of a bra, but knowing your size and writing it on your mobile phone or other place where you can use it when your bra shopping mood hits will make your bra shopping so..."
"The best choice is to use these simple measurement instructions to measure your bra size, which will ensure that the bra fits perfectly with the cup and even help you find the right amount of support."
“… During the day or between washing and gargling... "



Number  368
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It makes me dizzy now to think about it,” he said.”
“It's easy to start playing that game.”
“He was in the throes of what appeared to be a dangerous eating disorder.”
“His coach had been urging him for years to lose weight, Rippon said, and the skater thought that if he was just a little thinner, just a little leaner, he would please the judges and land more quadruple jumps.”
“"It makes me dizzy now to think of it," Rippon said of his severe diet in 2016.”
“Getty ImagesRippon, 28, opened up about this difficult time in his life in a recent, candid interview with the New York Times.”
“The skater, who just won a bronze medal in Pyeongchang as part of the figure skating team event, said he used to feel constant pressure to look like his thin, teenage rivals.”
““I looked around and saw my competitors, they’re all doing these quads," he told the Times, referring to skating jumps with four revolutions.”
“"And at the same time they’re a head shorter than me, they’re 10 years younger than me and they’re the size of one of my legs."”
“We often hear female athletes talking about body confidence, but it’s less common to hear a male athlete speak so openly about eating disorders and body image issues.”


"I feel dizzy when I think about it now," he said
"It's easy to start playing this game."
"He is suffering from a seemingly dangerous eating disorder."
"His coach has been urging him to lose weight for many years, and the skater thinks that if he is thinner and thinner, he can satisfy the referee and jump four more levels," Rippon said
"I feel dizzy at the thought of this," Rippon said of the strict diet in 2016
"Getty Images Rippon, 28, spoke frankly about this difficult time in his life in a recent candid interview with the New York Times."
The figure skater, who has just won a bronze medal in the Pingchang figure skating team competition, said he used to feel constant pressure to look like his skinny young opponent
"I look around and see my competitors, they're all doing these quadrilateral moves," he told the times
"At the same time, they are a head shorter than me, 10 years younger than me and about the size of one of my legs."
"We often hear female athletes talk about body confidence, but rarely do we hear male athletes talk so openly about eating disorders and body image."



Number  369
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Nikki Bella and Brie Bella also serve as Executive Producers.”
“Total Bellas is produced by WWE and Bunim/Murray Productions with Gil Goldschein, Russell Jay and Farnaz Farjam Chazan serving as Executive Producers for Bunim/Murray Productions and Kevin Dunn serving as Executive Producer for WWE.”
“...has given a fourth season greenlight to its hit series Total Bellas.”
“The renewal comes as the series, which follows the lives of WWE superstars Nikki Bella and Brie Bella, finished its third season with its best numbers to date.”
“Season 3 was its highest-rated season ever among all key demos, drawing nearly 1 million total viewers per episode, up 22% from the previous season among the core P18-49 demographic, according to the network and Nielsen.”
“Sunday night premieres of Total Bellas ranked among the Top 10 programs in primetime across ad-supported cable with W18-34 and W18-49.”
“Season three also averaged more than 4MM social engagements a week, +123% higher average weekly engagements vs.”
“Season 2 (1.8MM).”
“Total Bellas currently has 1.1MM social followers, gaining +16% new followers during season three.”
“Season three of Total Bellas saw Nikki deciding to call off her high-profile wedding, Brie balancing being a new mom and a successful business woman with her sister, and Daniel Bryan’s sensational return to the WWE ring.”


"Nicky Bella and bribella are also executive producers."
"Total Bellas is produced by WWE and bunim / Murray productions, with Gil goldschein, Russell Jay and farnaz farjam Chazan as executive producer of bunim / Murray productions and Kevin Dunn as executive producer of WWE."
“… It's a green light for the fourth season of its hit series total Bellas. "
"The renewal comes as the series, which is the best number since World War superstars Niki Bella and bribella's life, ended their third season so far."
According to the network and Nielsen, the third season has the highest ratings ever, with nearly 1 million viewers per episode, up 22% from the previous season
"The premiere of total Bellas on Sunday night featured w18-34 and w18-49 ads in support of the cable prime time top 10."
"The average number of social activities in the third quarter exceeded 4 million per week, an increase of 123% compared with that in the third quarter."
"Second season (1.8 mm)."
"Total Bellas currently has 1.1 million social fans, with 16% of new fans in the third quarter."
"In the third season of total Bellas, Nikki decided to cancel her high-profile wedding, Brie and her sister became a new mother and a successful business woman, and Daniel Bryan made a sensational return to WWE."



Number  370
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Everyone is over the moon for them both.””
““This is such a wonderful moment for her: not only is she going to be a mother, she is going to be raising a child with a man she truly loves.”
““This is something Khloé has wanted for years and years and yet it’s more than that: She didn’t want it unless she was in the right relationship for it,” the source added.”
““Yes, Khloé and Tristan are expecting and they are absolutely thrilled,” one source told PEOPLE of the couple.”
“Image zoom Credit: Khloe Kardasian/InstagramLast month, multiple sources confirmed to PEOPLE that Kardashian is expecting her first child, a baby boy, with Thompson.”
“Kardashian posed strategically in each of the photos she shared (especially the few which could potentially reveal her bump), by placing belts and a fur shawl over her stomach.”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more.”
“Looking for more style content?”
“...media...”
“Image zoom Credit Khloe Kardasian Instagram In a photo the star shared of the couple kissing in their costumes Kardashian called her boyfriend of over a year the moon of my life after she captioned a shirtless photo of the NBA star with That s daddy Monday night on social...”


"For both of them, everyone is happy."
"It's such a wonderful moment for her: not only to be a mother, but to raise a child with a man she really loves."
"It's something khlo é has wanted for years, but it's more than that: she doesn't want it unless she has the right relationship," the source added
"Yes, Heroe and Tristan are looking forward to it and they are very excited," a source told the couple
"Credit for image zooming: Khloe kardasian / instagram last month, several sources confirmed that Kardashian is pregnant with her first child, a baby boy, and Thompson."
"Kardashian poses strategically in every picture she shares (especially in the few that may expose her lumps), putting a belt and a fur shawl around her stomach."
"Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle newsletters for amazing discounts, beauty products and more."
"Looking for more style content?"
“… Media... "
"Photo zooming credit card Khloe kardasian instagram in a photo shared by the stars, the couple are dressed up and kissing. Kardashian said her boyfriend who has been dating for more than a year is the moon of my life because she subtitled the shirtless photo of the NBA star and his father on the social networking site on Monday night..."



Number  371
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“According to the Kensington Palace Twitter account, Ptak "focuses on using seasonal and organic ingredients in her cakes."”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“A few days ago, Ptak posted a photo of lemon crates on her Instagram along with the caption "And so it begins "This content is imported from Instagram.”
“This isn't the first royal wedding cake preview fans have received so far.”
“...pic.twitter.com/OTdcF9hc0a — The Royal Family (@RoyalFamily) May 18, 2018This content is imported from Instagram.”
“ Watch as baker Claire Ptak begins work on the #RoyalWedding Cake!”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
According to Kensington Palace's account, ptak "focuses on using seasonal and organic ingredients in cakes."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"A few days ago, ptak posted a picture of a lemon box on her instagram with the title" so it started, "which was imported from instagram
"This is not the first royal wedding cake notice fans have received so far."
“... pic.twitter.com/OTdcF9hc0a -Royal (@ royalty) 18 may 2018 this content was imported from instagram. "
"Watch Beck Claire putak start making the royal wedding cake!"



Number  372
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s time to go see her, Tess,” Randall says.”
“That’s my brother.”Tess hasn’t seen “her” in awhileBack on the Season 2 finale, we got our first glimpse of an older Randall and an older Tess.”
“Sterling K. Brown: We’ve all [in the cast] known that it’s Rebecca, though the audience didn’t know, and we know why it’s Rebecca and you guys will find out at the end of the season what it is.”
“How soon are we going to find out why everyone is gathering to see her?”
“TheWrap: How did you feel about the reveal Rebecca is the mysterious future “her” we’ve all been wondering about?”
“So since we didn’t get anymore new hints on screen, TheWrap was able to gather a few clues for you while speaking with Brown about Randall winning the Philadelphia City Council race and how those election results might impact the Pearsons in the present and the future.”
“Also Read: 'This Is Us' Season 3: 'ER' Alum Goran Visnjic Cast as Beth's Teacher on Backstory Episode“This Is Us” returned from hiatus tonight with an episode that jumped between the past and present — but didn’t head into the future again.”
“Does that mean they separate or even divorce?”
“That spat led to Randall sleeping on the couch, and a not so happy vibe between the happy couple in the present, with some hints in the future indicating the two are only communicating between Adult Tess.”
“The episode also ended with a fight between our Present Day Beth and Randall, because Randall refused to drop out of the city council race, when the polls show he won’t win and his wife asks him to give up and come back to helping his family.”


"It's time to see her, Tess," Randall said
"That's my brother." Tess didn't see "she" in the last episode of season 2 for a long time. We saw old Randall and old Tess for the first time
"Stirling K. Brown: we all know it's Rebecca, although the audience doesn't know, we know why it's Rebecca, and you'll know what it is at the end of the season."
"How long will it take us to figure out why everyone got together to see her?"
"The wrap": how do you feel about the revelation of "Rebecca" in "Rebecca is the mysterious future we've always wanted to know"
"So, since we don't get any new cues on the screen anymore, the wrap gathered some clues for you when talking with brown about Randall's winning the city council election in Philadelphia and the impact of these election results on the present and future of the Pearsons."
"Also read: 'this is our' third season: 'er' Alan Golan Visnjic plays Beth's teacher backstage episode 'this is our' return to rest tonight and jump between the past and the present with an episode - but not towards the future."
"Does that mean they are separated or even divorced?"
"The quarrel caused Randall to sleep on the sofa. The atmosphere between the happy couple is not very pleasant now. Some hints in the future indicate that they are only communicating with adult Tess."
"This episode also ended with the fight between Beth and Randall today, because Randall refused to withdraw from the city council election. At that time, the polls showed that he would not win, and his wife asked him to give up and come back to help his family."



Number  373
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Are you surprised that Beyonce doesn't have more exes?”
“Now you do, though she is also rumored to have linked up with another famous rapper.”
“Did you know that Beyonce only dated one guy before Jay-Z?”
“Beyonce's past relationships have not been covered much in the media.”
“If you're wondering about Beyonce's exes, find out here!”
“Queen Bey fans also need to check out these lesser known Beyonce stories, photos of Beyonce without makeup, and even this list of celebrities who don't like Beyonce!”
“The loves, exes and relationships of Beyonce Knowles, listed by most recent.”
“Who Beyonce Knowles dated; list of Beyonce Knowles loves, ex boyfriends; breakup rumors.”
“Who is Beyonce Knowles dating?”


"Are you surprised Beyonce doesn't have more ex girlfriends?"
"Now you know, even though she's rumored to be associated with another famous rapper."
"Did you know that Beyonce only dated one man before jay?"
"There is not much media coverage of Beyonce's past relationship."
"If you want to know Beyonce's ex girlfriend, find it here!"
"Fans of Queen Beyonce also need to see these little-known stories of Beyonce, photos of Beyonce without makeup, and even this list of celebrities who don't like Beyonce!"
"Beyonce Knowles' love, ex boyfriend and romance are listed in a recent survey."
"The date of Beyonce Knowles; the list of ex boyfriends Beyonce Knowles loves; the rumor of breaking up."
"Who is Beyonce Knowles dating?"



Number  374
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I will never regard him as a father.””
“Ng previously told the Express that the actor has “never existed in my life.”
“The actor has not spoken publicly about his daughter but has acknowledged he had an affair.”
“.”Ng is Jackie’s daughter with former beauty queen Elaine Ng, with whom the actor had a relationship with while married to his current wife Joan Lin.”
““I love you .”
““We are living in such an international city and yet so many people have their minds closed off.”“But, none of it matters when I know every morning your going to be next to me,” she added.”
““She has given me a chance to fully express the running thoughts in my head.”“We’ve been pushed down again and again but its worth it knowing we will get through it together, side by side,” Autumn continued.”
““I’ve never met anyone like @stolenmilktea,” she wrote in the caption.”
““I’ve grown up in a world of negativity and close mindedness but I am at that point where I realise that I can use my experience to tell my truths and help others just like me.”Autumn shared with fans just what her girlfriend means to her.”
““I am speechless at how followers went to my Girlfriend @andiautumn and my account to show us both so much positivity.”Image zoom“People all over the world have been rooting us on as Hong Kong media continues to mock,” she continued.”


"I'll never think of him as a father."
Wu told the express earlier that the actor "never existed in my life."
"The actor didn't talk about his daughter in public, but admitted that he had an affair."
Wu zhuoxi, the daughter of Jackie Chan and former beauty queen Wu Qili, had a relationship with her when she married her current wife Lin Qiong
"I love you."
"We live in such an international city, but so many people's minds are closed." "But it doesn't matter when I know every morning that you'll be by my side," she added
"She gave me a chance to fully express what was in my head." "We've been pushed over and over again, but it's worth knowing we're going to get through this together," Qiu continued
"I've never met anyone like @ stolenmiktea," she wrote in the title
"I grew up in a negative and closed world, but I realized that I could use my experience to tell me the truth and help people like me." Qiu shared with her fans what her girlfriend meant to her
"I don't have a say in my girlfriend 'andiqiu' or my account, which shows us so much enthusiasm." As the Hong Kong media continues to ridicule, "image zoom" people all over the world are supporting us.



Number  375
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Designer Jeremy Scott looked incredibly tacky in the metallic Moschino outfitAwful: Teen Mom star Amber Portwood joined her co-star Farrah on the worst dressed list in her over-the-top dress, while rapper Conceited looked disastrous in his distressed denim lookNot lovin' it!”
“...the red carpet Excited YouTube star Bretman Rock opted to go without a shirt and instead wore a tasseled jacket and a statement choker Golden...”
“Kesha arrived in a ruffled gown to the star-studded eventWrong season!”
“...lacy corset Tulle me about it...”
“Baring it all Love and Hip Hip star Hazel E flashed a little too much flesh in her sheer lacy number that looked like it had been borrowed out of Morticia Addams closet Grrrrrr oss Actress Arielle Vandenberg was a sight for sore eyes in her leopard print suit and...”
“She also roped her young daughter Sophia into dressing up as what appeared to be an alien, with the eight-year-old wearing a bizarre silver trouser and shirt combo, along with a spaceship-esque skirt around the waistband of her pants.”
“Meanwhile, MTV star Farrah Abraham arrived on the red carpet in a too-tight pair of white pants which she had paired with an over-the-top pair of metallic gold boots that looked more like a tacky candy wrapper than a designer must-have.”
“Perhaps eager to distract from the awkward camel toe, Nicki paired her in-your-face crop top-and-trouser combo with some sky-high pink, orange, and white heels, and some glittering jewels around her neck and wrists.”
“'Nicki Minaj's camel toe must be her plus one for the VMAs,' one person tweeted, while another added: 'Nicki Minaj's latex camel toe cannot be sanitary.'”
“...highlight...”


Designer Jeremy Scott looks tacky in a metallic MOSCHINO: Teenage mom star amber Portwood Portwood, wearing a super dress, made the worst dress list with her partner Farrah, while concept, a rapper, looks terrible in distressing Jeans - don't like it! "
“…… The excited YouTube star on the red carpet, bretman Locke, chose not to wear a shirt, but a tassel jacket and a gold necklace... "
"Kaisha came to the star gathering in her ruffled dress. It's a wrong season!"
“… Lace corset, put Tulle on me... "
"Naked love and hip hop star hazel e flashed a little too much meat in her pure lace number, looking like borrowing the Morticia Adams closet grrrr OSS actress Ariel Vandenberg is a sight of eye pain in her leopard print suit and..."
"She also used ropes to dress up her young daughter Sophia to look like an alien. The 8-year-old Sophia was wearing a strange combination of silver trousers and shirt, and a spaceship style skirt around her belt."
"At the same time, MTV star Farrah Abraham came to the red carpet in a pair of tight white pants that, paired with a pair of super high metal gold boots, looked more like a tacky candy package than a designer must-have."
"Maybe to distract her from her clumsy hump toe, Nikki paired her with a jacket and pants on your face, some expensive pink, orange and white high heels, and some glittering jewelry on her neck and wrist."
"Nicky minaji's camel toes have to be on her VMA," one tweeted, adding: "Nicky minaji's latex camel toes are not hygienic."
“… Highlight



Number  376
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The bot in question, from Starship Technologies, can hold up to five medium pizzas and navigates at four miles per hour using cameras and short-range ultrasonic sensors, according to Wired.”
“Yes, that memory collecting device is crazy, but Domino’s Pizza has already tried out robot pizza delivery in Germany.”
“One thing we love about “Black Mirror” is all of the creative, futuristic technology.”
“Some of it is seriously freaky like those killer dog bots in Metal Head but some of it is truly dreamy like the consciousness cloud from the Emmy winning San Junipero Take a look at how close we are to some of the tech in Season 4 which dropped on...”
“Netflix on December 29”
“Also Read Black Mirror Season 4 Review Making a Strong Case for Death Arkangel mommy cam To actually track the location of a human you d need a lot more power than would be available in the teeny tiny microchip inserted into Sarah s head in Arkangel But microchipping in...”
“...humans does actually already exist the chips are used for things like swiping into a building using a printer or buying food...”
“In the future, “smart dust” is more likely to be the direction things go–sensors so small that they could be injected undetected.”
“The downside to microchipping yourself or you offspring?”
“You could be vulnerable to getting hacked.”


According to wired, the Starship technology robot can hold up to five medium-sized pizzas and uses cameras and short-range ultrasonic sensors to navigate at 4 miles per hour
"Yes, this kind of memory collection device is crazy, but domino pizza has tried robotic pizza delivery in Germany."
"What we like about black mirror is all the creativity and future technology."
"Some of them are very weird, like those killer dog robots on metal heads, but some of them are really dreamy, like the cloud of consciousness of Emmy winner St. Junipero. Look how close we are to the fourth quarter, and some of our technology has dropped..."
"December 29 Netflix"
"Also read the comment on the fourth season of black mirror, which strongly proves that the death of arkanger's mother's camera can really track a person's position, you need more powerful energy than the microchip implanted in arkanger's head, but in the future
“…… We do have chips that are used to do things like swipe cards into buildings or buy food with printers. "
"In the future," smart dust "is more likely to be the direction of things - sensors so small that they can be injected undetected."
"What are the disadvantages of microchips for yourself or your offspring?"
"You can be vulnerable to hackers."



Number  377
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Stay 360 studio (simply make sure you use the hashtag #EREDCARPET).”
“Information app (right here: iOS App Retailer or right here: Google Play Retailer), and never solely will you get unique entry, you will additionally have the ability to see your tweets probably featured onscreen in our E!”
“Obtain the E!”
“Stay 360 protection final go-spherical, do not make the identical mistake twice.”
“Should you missed our E!”
“Reside 360 expertise, introduced by AT&T, eventually yr’s present, you already know the sorts of tweet-worthy purple carpet moments we’re speaking about.”
“In the event you tuned into the E!”
“One of the best half about being reside on the Grammys pink carpet is that you simply by no means actually know what you are in for.”


"Stay 360 studio (just make sure you use the label" eredcarpet ")
"Information app (here: IOS app retailer or here: Google game retailer), you'll never get the only entry, you'll have the ability to see your twitter may be displayed on the screen in our e!"
"Get e!"
"Keep 360 degree protection and go to the ball at last. Don't make the same mistake twice."
"You should have missed our e!"
"From at & T's 360 expertise to now, you know what we call the purple carpet moments that deserve Twitter's attention."
"In case you switch to e!"
"The best thing about being on the Grammy pink carpet is that you don't know what you're doing."



Number  378
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Camila has finished that together with her broad, turtleneck-like chokers.”
“Nevertheless, now, we have been ready for somebody to offer new power to development.”
“As a flattering, sultry addition to any outfit, it shortly gained momentum.”
“We first noticed the influence of chokers again in 2015, when celebs like Kim Kardashian and Rihanna introduced again the ’90s fashion.”
“Her general look is daring, however it was her choker that grabbed our consideration.”
“The sheer layer featured a excessive neckline that would both be hooked up or an added extensive, black and white choker.”
“On the iHeartRadio Music Awards 2018, the “Havana” singer appeared on the purple carpet sporting a graphic pencil skirt, bodysuit with a plunging neckline and a black sheer prime.”


"Camilla did it with her big, turtleneck collar."
"Nevertheless, we are now ready for new impetus for development."
"As a delightful, sultry addition to any costume, it quickly gained momentum."
"We first noticed the impact of chokes in 2015, when celebrities like Kim Kardashian and Rihanna reintroduced the fashion of the 1990s."
"She was bold on the whole, but her neck caught our attention."
The transparent layer is characterized by too large neckline, which can be hung up or added with a wide black and white necklace
"At the 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards, the" Havana "singer appeared on the purple carpet with a pencil skirt, a jumpsuit with a drooping neckline and a black solid dress."



Number  379
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"They put you on so many drugs, you're like high out of your mind," he said.”
“Will &Grace Cast: Then &NowAfter the laparoscopic procedure, Hayes says was heavily medicated.”
“"They went in there and they clipped off the bad part and put it back together with like a chip clip, you know?"”
“Of course, Hayes made light of the scary situation.”
“Turns out Hayes' small intestine had burst open and was "poisoning" his body.”
“...and thank God I did."”
“"I went to the E.R.”
“"I went to bed at night and all the sudden I felt this excruciating pain in my stomach," Hayes described.”
“During an appearance on Ellen DeGeneres's couch Wednesday, 'Will & Grace" star Sean Hayes revealed he was actually supposed to sit down for an interview weeks ago, but had to reschedule because of a health emergency.”


"They made you take so much medicine, you're crazy," he said
Will and Grace: after laparoscopic surgery, Hayes said he took a lot of drugs then and now
"When they go in, they cut off the broken parts and reassemble them like chip clips, you know?"
"Of course, Hayes downplayed this terrible situation."
"It turns out that Hayes' small intestine has split and is poisoning his body."
"Thank God I did it."
"I went to the emergency room."
"I went to bed at night and suddenly I had a sharp pain in my stomach," Hayes said
Sean Hayes, who starred in "will and grace," revealed in an appearance on Ellen DeGeneres' sofa on Wednesday that he should have sat down for an interview a few weeks ago, but had to reschedule because of a health emergency



Number  380
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Kevin and Jane each received ownership of of one of their three homes, and will share ownership of a third home they own in Malibu.”
“Once his kids turn 18, Kevin will stop paying child support, but will pay Jane an additional $12,147 a month in spousal support for four years.”
“He will additionally be paying Jane $65,096 a month for spousal support and 20% of any income he receives over $3 million a year.”
“Kevin has been ordered to pay his ex $22,440 in monthly child support along with paying for their private school and summer camp.”
“Kevin and Jane share two children – Joseph, 17, and Iona, 15 – and will continue to share joint legal custody of them.”
“The 44-year-old Grey’s Anatomy star and his ex wife Jane have finally finalized their divorce on Friday (December 22) after initially separating back in October 2015 after almost 17 years of marriage.”
“Kevin McKidd is officially a single man.”


"Kevin and Jane each own one of the three homes and will share ownership of their third home in Malibu."
"Once his child turns 18, Kevin will stop paying child support, but will pay Jane an extra $12147 a month in spouse support for four years."
"He will also pay Jane $65096 a month in spousal support and 20% of his annual income of more than $3 million."
"Kevin was asked to pay $22440 a month in alimony, as well as the cost of their private school and summer camp."
"Kevin and Jane have two children - Joseph, 17, and Iona, 15 - and they will continue to share legal custody."
"The 44 year old anatomy of gray star and his ex-wife Jane separated in early October 2015 after nearly 17 years of marriage and finally got divorced on Friday (December 22)," he said
"Kevin mckead is officially single."



Number  381
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Plus, Kirra loves the beach, so we’ve already been a few times.””
““Whenever I go surfing at the beach or I go to the river and you’re in and out of the water all day, you don’t have to reapply makeup or sunblock — it literally just stays on,” she said.”
“May of that same year...”
“Now, they’re back together — and Patridge can’t help but gush about rekindling her romance with the musician.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I mean, I’m the happiest I’ve ever been right now,” she told PEOPLE on Sunday at Shiseido’s summer kick-off event in Malibu.”
““You know, things are going really good.”Image zoom Credit: Jennifer JohnsonAudrina Patridge kicked off summer with the new Shiseido Sun products at the Shiseido Sun Beach House in Malibu on June 2.”
““We’re just having fun.”
“Nothing is forced,” she continued.”
““You know, great things happen when it’s not forced, and things are naturally just happening.”


"Besides, Kira loves the beach, so we've been there a few times."
"Every time I go surfing on the beach or by the river and you go in and out of the water all day, you don't have to put on makeup or sunscreen - it just stays the same," she said
"May of the same year..."
"Now they're together again - partridge can't help talking about rekindling her relationship with the musician."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I mean, I'm the happiest time I've ever had," she told people at the Shiseido summer launch in Malibu on Sunday
"It's going well, you know." Photo zooming credit: on June 2, Jennifer Johnson Audrina Patridge opened the summer with new Shiseido sun beach house in Malibu
"We're just playing."
"Nothing is forced," she continued
"You know, great things happen when they're not forced, and they happen naturally."



**Something goes wrong**
“I’m not dismissing that and I don’t want to take light of your situation but this is a business and we’re here to find someone to elevate, to make an Idol.””
“I just wanted to tell stories and sing and connect with people.”Her comment about her personal life comes days after she and ex Orlando Bloom fueled reconciliation rumors after they were snapped by fans enjoying a meal together in the Maldives.”
“I love traveling.”
““I love movies.”
“They are not officially back together.”Image zoom Credit: Dave M. Benett/VF17/WireImageWhile Perry admitted that she does not abstain from social media, it’s not her main priority.”
““They have fun and love seeing each other, but it’s nothing serious.”
““Orlando and Katy were traveling separately over the holidays and met up in the Maldives after,” the source said.”
“Image zoom Credit: Frederick M. Brown/GettyHowever, the pair is not officially back together and are very much still friends, a source close to Bloom, 40, told PEOPLE recently.”
“Listen, all the fame stuff is just a bi-product of what I do, it’s not what I sought out to do.”
“I love modern art museums.”


"I don't deny that, and I don't want to belittle your situation, but it's a business, and we're here to find someone to promote and be an idol."
"I just want to tell stories, sing songs, communicate with people." A few days ago, she and former Orlando Bloom were photographed eating together in Maldives by fans, which triggered rumors of reconciliation. A few days ago, her comments on her private life were in full swing
"I love traveling."
"I love movies."
"They haven't officially reunited yet." Credit for image scaling: Dave M. Benett / vf17 / wireimageperry admits that she hasn't given up social media, but it's not her top priority
"They're happy and they love to meet, but it's no big deal."
"Orlando and Katie traveled separately during the holidays and then met in Maldives," the source said
A source close to 40 years old bloom recently told people magazine: "the credit for image zooming: Frederick M. Brown / Getty Hoover, the two have not officially reunited and are still friends."
"Listen, all the things that make me famous are the product of what I do, not what I want to do."
"I love the Museum of modern art."



Number  383
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Taylor Swift Can't Stop Wearing Boots and It's Making Us Excited for Fall -- Shop Her Style for Under $100!”
“Buy From the Nordstrom Anniversary Sale According to Your Celebrity Style Muse Kendall Jenner Wears 2 Super Cool Matching Sets in Paris Shop Her Exact Pieces...”
“ASOS New Look Snakeskin Effect Double Buckle Western Belt 13 Banana Republic Banana Republic Snake Effect Leather Trouser Belt 48 Macy s MICHAEL Michael Kors Python Embossed Leather Waist Belt 68 Yoox Cantarelli Regular Belt 89 Streets Ahead Streets Ahead Classic Snakeskin 129 RELATED CONTENT Here s What You Should...”
“Copy the blonde's getup by throwing on a snakeskin belt with your go-to black pieces from our selects ahead.”
“The one-step trick is the easiest way to keep an all-black outfit from being boring and wear the eye-catching trend without letting it wear you.”
“James Devaney/GC ImagesThe wildlife-inspired accessory breaks up the one-shade outfit and lends a chic rock 'n' roll edge to the look.”
“Dressed in head-to-toe black, Hadid added a pop of interest to the sleek monochrome ensemble of bodysuit, ripped RtA denim, intentionally half-worn topper, Tommy Hilfiger leather boots, Gigi Hadid for Vogue Eyewear cat-eye sunnies and Versace mini bag with a snakeskin-printed belt by Streets Ahead.”
“Over the weekend, the model demonstrated the trend as unexpectedly wearable (especially if you're a beginner with such statement pieces).”
“It's poised to run the gamut come fall, as exotic patterns from leopard to snakeskin rendered in clothes and accessories were spotted on numerous fall 2018 shows.”
“Case in point: animal print.”


"Taylor Swift keeps wearing boots, which makes us excited about autumn - buy her style for less than $100!"
"According to your celebrity style, buy Muse Kendall Jenner from Nordstrom's anniversary sale, wear 2 super cool matching suits in Paris, buy her authentic products..."
"ASOs new snake skin effect double button western belt 13 Banana Republic Banana Republic snake skin effect pants belt 48 Macy s Michael Coles Python embossed leather belt 68 Yoox cantarelli regular belt 89 street front street front classic snake skin 129 related content here is what you should do..."
"Dress like a blonde and match it with a snake belt and the black dress we chose in front of us."
"The one-step trick is the simplest way to make a black suit not boring, and to wear eye-catching fashion without making it uncomfortable."
"James Devaney / GC images, a wildlife inspired accessory, breaks the single tone of clothing and adds a chic rock element to the look."
"Hardid is black from head to toe, adding a popular flavor to the fashionable monochrome jumpsuit, torn RTA jeans, a deliberate half length top, Tommy Hilfiger leather boots, Gigi Hardid for vogue eye cat's-eye sun shoes and Versace mini bag, which has a Snake Print belt on the street in front of it."
"Last weekend, the model showed an unexpected wearable trend (especially if you're a beginner in this kind of personalised piece),"
"As exotic patterns from leopard to snake skin are used in clothing and accessories, they will shine in the autumn of 2018 when they are found on numerous shows."
"For example: Animal seals."



**Something goes wrong**
“Follow @htshowbiz for more...”
“Depp claims it isn’t because he doesn’t want to memorise a script.”
““I was as low as I believe I could have gotten.”
“The next step was, ‘You’re going to arrive somewhere with your eyes open and you are going to leave with your eyes closed’.”
“I couldn’t take the pain every day,” Depp told rollingstone.com, recalling his emotional state in the midst of his failed marriage and his simultaneously collapsing financial situation.”
“Depp had a highly publicised divorce from actress Amber Heard, which was finalised in August 2016, following a legal battle.”
“After Heard’s allegations of spousal abuse, which Depp has vehemently denied -- his legal troubles continued to spiral.”
“In January 2017, Depp sued his former business managers, Joel and Robert Mandel of The Management Group (TMG), claiming they mishandled his money and cost him millions.”
“The pair subsequently countersued and claimed Depp was the one who spent all his own money on extravagances.”
“In their countersuit, TMG claimed that Depp spent $30,000 a month on just wine, and even had a sound engineer on his payroll to feed him lines while shooting his films, so he wouldn’t have to learn them.”


"Follow @ htshowbiz to learn more..."
"Depp claims it's not because he doesn't want to remember the script."
"I did what I could."
"The next step is," you're going to go somewhere with your eyes open, you're going to leave with your eyes closed. "
"I can't stand the pain every day," Depp said rollingstone.com The website recalls his emotional state during the failure of his marriage and his financial collapse at the same time
"Depp and actress amber head had a big fight, and after a lawsuit, they decided to divorce in August 2016."
"After Hurd's allegations of spouse abuse were firmly denied by Depp, his legal problems continued to worsen."
"In January 2017, Depp sued his former business manager, Joel and Robert Mandel of management group (TMG), claiming that they had mishandled his money and cost him millions of dollars."
"The two later counterclaim, claiming that Depp spent all his money on luxury."
"In their counterclaim, TMG claimed that Depp only spent $30000 a month on wine, and even had a sound engineer on his payroll who fed him lines when he was making movies, so he didn't have to learn lines."



Number  385
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Royal Wedding Is Almost HereThe First Photo of Prince Louis on Instagram Is Downright RegalThe Royal Baby Name Is Full of Meaning as the World Welcomes Prince Louis...”
“—Shahrzad WarkentinFeatured Photo: Kensington Royal via InstagramRELATED STORIES:Does Meghan Markle Want Kids with Prince Harry?”
“...can t wait until Prince George Princess Charlotte and Prince Louis have a new cousin to play with...”
“Adam Stewart told the Prince that she and her redheaded husband have five kids and asked When are you and Meghan going to get going Recalling the moment to PEOPLE Adam Stewart said He laughed and said five children too many Five might be out of the question but we...”
“During the couple’s recent visit to Dublin, Prince Harry was greeting fans when one mom, Elaine Adam-Stewart, pressed him on their future plans.”
“It might be, but there’s a definitely a limit as one fan learned.”
“With big brother Prince William having recently welcomed his third child, is a big family on the horizon for Prince William as well?”
“During their first interview with the BBC after getting engaged, they were questioned about having kids and Prince Harry responded,”I think one step at a time and hopefully we’ll start a family in the near future.”The question is, exactly how many kids?”
“Prince Harry and Meghan Markle have already been forthcoming about wanting to have a family.”
“When pressed by fans, the Prince has made it clear exactly how many kids is too many, but that doesn’t mean babies won’t be part of the couple’s future.”


"The royal wedding is coming. The first picture of Prince Louis on instagram is just the name of the Royal baby. Prince Louis is welcomed all over the world..."
"- shahrzad wargent unsaturated photo: Kensington Royal via instagram relatedstory: Megan mark wants to have a baby with Prince Harry?"
“… I can't wait for Prince George, Princess Charlotte and Prince Louis to have a new cousin to play with... "
"Adam Stewart told the prince that she and her red haired husband had five children, and asked when you and Megan began to recall that moment. Adam Stewart said that he laughed and said that five children were too many, and five may not be possible, but we..."
"During the couple's recent visit to Dublin, Prince Harry was greeting fans when a mother named Elaine Adam Stewart emphasized their plans for the future."
"It may be, but as one fan knows, there must be a limit."
"With the eldest brother Prince William's recent arrival of his third child, is Prince William's extended family coming soon?"
"In their first interview with the BBC after their engagement, when they were asked about having children, Prince Harry replied," I want to do it step by step and hope we can get married in the near future. "The question is, how many children are there?"
"Prince Harry and Megan markel have publicly said they want a family."
"When asked by fans, the prince has made it clear how many children there are, but that doesn't mean the baby won't be a part of the couple's future."



Number  386
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A three-time New York Times bestselling author, Harper regularly practices transcendental meditation (TM), which involves silently repeating a mantra in order to place your body in a state of profound rest and allow your mind to achieve a sense of peace, as defined by the Mayo Clinic.”
“But now it’s a little more relaxed.”He takes time each day to focus on inner calmness.”
“But now I realized that what my diet was lacking—maybe I don’t want to say lacking, but how it was different—was that it didn’t have balance,” he explains.”
““I was healthy, I was fit, I was strong, I watched what I ate.”
“Harper, who is currently a health contributor on TODAY and a frequent co-host of the Racheal Ray Show, was consuming a high-protein, high-fat diet prior to his heart attack.”
“He is embracing carbs.”
“Here, the author and television personality shares the five ways he has transformed his health—and his life—from the inside out.”
“It was not smart on my part.”But what a difference a year makes.”
“So I did something that’s so dumb—I learned how to adjust.”
““I’m a workout nut, so I’m used to being uncomfortable, I’m used to being in pain.”


Harper, a three time New York Times bestseller, often practices transcendental meditation (TM), which involves silently repeating a mantra in order to put your body in a state of deep rest and bring your mind to the peace defined by Mayo Clinic
"But it's a little relaxed now." He takes time every day to focus on inner peace
"But now I realize that my diet may be lacking, and I don't want to say lacking, but the difference is that it's not balanced," he explained
"I'm healthy, I'm healthy, I'm strong, I look at what I eat."
"Harper is currently a health writer for today and a regular co host of trachea ray. He had been eating high protein, high fat food before his heart attack."
"He likes carbohydrates."
"Here, the author shares with TV celebrities five ways he can change his health and life from the inside out."
"It's not wise for me." But what a year's change
"So I did a stupid thing - I learned how to adjust."
"I'm a sportsman, so I'm used to discomfort, to pain."



Number  387
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He also had relationships with actresses Pam Grier and Margot Kidder.”
“They were together until Pryor’s death in 2005.”
“...relationship with Richard Pryor...”
“Brando’s son, Miko, told TMZ that his family is “disappointed” after Quincy Jones alleged that Pryor once slept with the Oscar-winning actor.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““The Marlon Brando family has heard the recent comments by Quincy Jones and we are disappointed that anyone would make such a wrongful comment about either Marlon Brando or Richard Pryor,” said Miko, Brando’s oldest living son.”
“Last week, Pryor’s widow Jennifer confirmed the rumor, telling TMZ that her late husband was always open about his bisexuality with friends and would not be ashamed that the relationship was revealed publicly.”
“She also said the comedy icon wrote about sleeping with men extensively in diaries, which she says she plans to release later this year.”
“Image zoom Credit: Getty; Bettmann/Getty“It was the ’70s!”
“Drugs were still good, especially Quaaludes,” Jennifer said.”


"He also has relationships with actresses PAM Greer and Margot Kidd."
"They were together until Pryor died in 2005."
“… And Richard Pryor... "
Brando's son Miko told TMZ that Quincy Jones claimed that Pryor had slept with the Oscar winning actor, and his family was "disappointed."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The Marlon Brando family has recently heard Quincy Jones' comments, and we are disappointed that someone would make such a wrong comment on Marlon Brando or Richard Pryor," said Miko, Brando's eldest son
"Last week, Pryor's widow, Jennifer, confirmed the rumor, telling TMZ that her late husband's bisexuality with her friends is always public and will not be ashamed of the public disclosure of the relationship."
She also said the comedy icon wrote a lot about sleeping with men in her diary, which she said was planned to be released later this year
"Image zooming credit: Getty; Bateman / Getty" it was the 1970s! "
"Drugs are still good, especially quierdes," said Jennifer



Number  388
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She also shares son Bingham, 6, with her ex-fiancé Matthew Bellamy.”
“And as a kiss on this bridge would have been nice, the kiss a year later was so much sweeter.”The Pretty Happy author shares Ryder, 14, with ex-husband Chris Robinson, whom she was married to from 2000 to 2007.”
“The 38-year-old actress announced on Friday, April 6, that she is expecting a baby girl with her boyfriend, Danny Fujikawa.”
““SURPRISE!!!”
“ If you’ve wondered why I’ve been so absent on my social channels it’s because I have never been more sick!”
“It’s was the most sick first trimester of all my children,” the Almost Famous star captioned a video of her gender reveal on Instagram.”
““Boomerangs have made me nauseous, Superzoom is an easy way to have my head in the toilet, food instagrams make me queezy and thinking too much about insta stories made me even more exhausted than I already had been.”
“If you’ve seen me out and about smiling and pretending like everything is amazing…I was lying!”“BUT!”
“I have broken through on the other end of that and rediscovering the joys of insta/snap.”
“We have been trying to keep this pregnancy under the radar for as long as possible but I’m a poppin now!” she continued.”


"She also shared her six-year-old son Bingham with her ex fiance Matthew Bellamy."
"It will be nice to kiss one on this bridge, and it will be sweeter in a year." The rather happy writer shared with her ex husband, Chris Robinson, Ryder, 14, who married between 2000 and 2007
The 38 year old actress announced on Friday, April 6 that she would have a baby girl with her boyfriend, Danny Fujikawa
"Surprise
"If you want to know why I'm so absent from social channels, it's because I've never been so sick!"
"This is the first three months of the most serious illness of all my children," the almost famous star wrote in a gender exposed video on instagram
"Flyback sticks make me sick. Superzoom is a simple way to put my head in the toilet. Food instagrams make me crazy. Too many stories about insta make me more tired than before."
"If you see me outside, smile and pretend that everything is great I'm lying! "But
"I've broken through that and rediscovered the fun of insta / snap."
"We've been on the alert for this pregnancy as long as possible, but I'm a popcorn now! "She continued



Number  389
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“While promoting the movie, they spoke to Entertainment Weekly about the importance of keeping their relationship private.”
“The high-profile pair has kept their three-year relationship largely under wraps, which began in late 2014 after they met and fell in love while filming The Light Between Oceans.”
“Vikander and Fassbender made their public debut as a couple at the 2016 Golden Globe Awards.”
“Ahead of the wedding ceremony, the couple was spotted soaking up the sun together on the Spanish island.”
“PEOPLE confirmed last week that Vikander and Fassbender tied the knot at the luxurious La Granja farmstead resort surrounded by friends and family.”
“The couple was also spotted touring Verona and Florence, where they stopped to take a few photos with fans.”
“A second photo showed the 40-year-old actor posing with the restaurant staff.”
“In the photo, taken by Fassbender, the group smiles for the camera as Vikander, 29, shows off her wedding band.”
“The newlyweds were spotted at Osteria del Cappello restaurant in Bologna on Sunday as seen in a fan’s selfie that was shared on Twitter.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"While promoting the film, they told entertainment weekly about the importance of maintaining the privacy of relationships."
"The high-profile three-year relationship between the two has been basically kept secret since the end of 2014, when they met and fell in love with each other during the filming of light between the oceans."
"Wickander and Fassbender made their public debut as a couple at the 2016 Golden Globe Awards."
"Before the wedding, someone found the couple basking in the sun together on the Spanish island."
"It was confirmed last week that vicander and faspin were married at the luxury La granja farmstead resort, surrounded by family and friends."
"The couple were also found touring Verona and Florence, where they stopped to take a few pictures with their fans."
"The second photo shows the 40 year old actor with the restaurant staff."
"In this picture taken by Fassbender, vikander, 29, smiles at the camera as she shows her wedding ring."
"The newlyweds were found at Osteria del Cappello restaurant in Bologna on Sunday, which can be seen in a self portrait shared by a fan on twitter."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  390
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She really has created a unique brand for herself and the network.”“The Chew” has been nominated for seven Emmy awards and has won two awards for outstanding informative talk show and outstanding informative talk show host for the group, including Oz, whose departure was first reported by TV Line.”
“She is now a mother, broadcaster, writer and inspiration to millions of viewers whom she has shown how to create healthier eating options for themselves and their families.”
“Her chemistry, honesty and intelligence are her trademarks, and they will stand with her wherever she goes.”Rebecca Campbell, president, ABC-owned stations and daytime, added, “When Daphne started with us, she had recently graduated college, was a new bride and ready to take on the world.”
“The moment she sat at the table with Mario, Clinton, Michael and Carla, I knew we had a great television show.”
“Aside from “The Chew,” she is also known for her regular appearances on various shows, including Food Network’s “Cooks vs. Cons.”“The Chew” creator and executive producer Gordon Elliott said, “She is one of the greatest natural broadcasters I have ever worked with.”
“...was a college student...”
“...and am lucky to have had The Chew as a bright beginning to my career Oz the daughter of TV personality Dr Oz is a nutritional author who first broke out on the scene with her best selling book The Dorm Room Diet which she wrote in 2006 when she...”
““I have had the great privilege of growing up at our family table, and have shared some huge milestones along the way — including the birth of my first two children, and recent announcement of a third on the way!”
““It has been so much fun having lunch with you on TV’s most delicious daytime show for the past six seasons, and I am immensely grateful to have found dear friends in my co-hosts and our team,” Oz said in a statement.”
“Oz will not be replaced for the seventh season, which kicks off on Sept. 5.”


"She really created a unique brand for herself and the Internet." "The chew" won seven Emmy nominations, two excellent information talk shows and the group's excellent information talk show host awards. Oz's departure was first reported by the TV station. "
"Now a mother, broadcaster, writer, she shows millions of viewers how to create healthier eating choices for herself and her family."
"Her chemical reaction, honesty and wisdom are her trademarks, and they will accompany her wherever she goes." Rebecca Campbell, President of ABC's stations and day, added, "when Daphne started a business with us, she just graduated from college and was a new bride, ready to meet the world."
"The moment she sat with Mario, Clinton, Michael and Carla, I knew our TV program was great."
"In addition to chew, she is also known for her frequent appearances on various shows, including the food network's chef vs. prisoner. "She's one of the greatest nature broadcasters I've ever worked with," says Gordon Elliott, creator and executive producer of chew
“… It's a college student... "
“… I'm very lucky to have chewed as a bright start to my career. Ozzie's daughter, TV celebrity Dr. Ozzie, is a nutrition writer. She first appeared on the scene with her best seller dormitory diet, and she wrote in 2006 when she... "
"I was fortunate enough to grow up at our family table and share some important milestones in the process - including the birth of my first two children and the recent announcement that my third child will be born!"
"It's been a lot of fun to have lunch with you on the most delicious day show on TV over the past six seasons, and I really appreciate finding dear friends in my co hosts and our team," oz said in a statement
"Ozzie will not be replaced in the seventh season, which starts on September 5



Number  391
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(TXF: "Per Manum", "Requiem")"Trust No 1" raises a possibility of Scully and Mulder had slept together at least once after Scully invited Mulder to her bed as she was lonely one night.”
“It was not until shortly after Mulder's abduction in 2000 that Scully discovered she was indeed pregnant.”
“He claims that during this time he impregnated her using alien DNA in order to create the first superhuman child, who was William (TXF: "My Struggle III").”
“In 2000, the Cigarette Smoking Man took Scully on a road trip (TXF: "En Ami").”
“(TXF: "Nothing Important Happened Today II", "Trust No 1", "William", "The Truth").”
“The experiments with William were more related to super-soldiers (USS Valor Victory), an attempt for the aliens to turn William into one of their own.”
“(TXF: "The Sixth Extinction II: Amor Fati”).”
“...he tried to transfer Mulder s immunity on himself...”
“In the context of the whole series it seems more realistic that the Cigarette Smoking Man s experiments on William before his birth might have been derived from whatever he did with Jeffrey Spender and maybe what he learned when...”
“While this seems definitive, all the characters are given is the Cigarette Smoking Man's word, and due to the convoluted nature of the mythology arc, there is as much evidence that negates this supposed truth as supports it.”


(TXF: "per Manum", "Requiem") "trust no 1" raises the possibility that one night, because Mulder was very lonely, Scully invited her to bed, and Scully and Mulder slept at least once. "
"It wasn't until shortly after Mulder was kidnapped in 2000 that Scully found out she was pregnant."
"He claimed that during this period, he used alien DNA to make her pregnant, so as to create the first Superman child. He was William (TXF:" my struggle III ")
In 2000, the smoker took Scully on a trip
"(TXF:" nothing important happened today, "" trust one, "" William, "" the truth ")
"The experiment with William is more about the super soldier, which is an alien attempt to turn William into one of his own."
"(TXF:" the sixth extinction II: amofati ")
“… He tried to transfer Mulder's immunity to himself... "
"In the context of the whole series, it seems more realistic that this smoker's experiment with William before he was born may come from what he did with Jeffrey spender, or from what he did in What I learned when I was young. "
"Although this seems to be certain, all the characters are the words of smokers, and due to the complex nature of mythological arc, there is a lot of evidence to deny the truth of this hypothesis, and there is also a lot of evidence to support it."



Number  392
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more co-star fun, watch the video below!”
“Watch the clip to see what happens!”
“Noting that the keg was the first from his family’s new craft brewery in Austin, Texas, Ackles then lifted his co-star up for the keg stand.”
“WATCH: 'Supernatural' Star Jared Padalecki and Wife Genevieve Cortese Welcome a Baby Girl -- See the Sweet First Photo!”
“Ackles then urged Padalecki to do a keg stand saying, “Only if you’re in a fraternity is it ok to do, or if you’re on the Conan O’Brien show.”
““When we were done filming!” Padalecki insisted.”
““When the show first started, we used to sneak kegs into each other’s trailers,” Ackles explained.”
“MORE: Jared Padalecki Pens Heartwarming Letter to His Children: 'You've Turned My World Upside Down'Ackles brought out a birthday surprise for the Gilmore Girls alum, wheeling a keg onto the stage.”
“Supernatural star Jared Padalecki celebrated his 35th birthday on Wednesday’s Comic-Con-themed episode of Conan, alongside his co-star Jensen Ackles.”
“Sam Winchester’s getting wild!”


"To have more fun with CO stars, watch the video below!"
"Look at the clip and see what happens!"
Akers noticed that the cask was the first made by his new craft winery in Austin, Texas, so he raised his partner and stood on the cask rack
"Look: 'supernatural' star Jared padaleki and his wife Genevieve Curtis welcome a baby girl - look at the sweet first picture!"
Akers then urged padaleki to make a bucket stand, saying, "only if you're in a fraternity can you do that, or if you're on Conan O'Brien."
"We're done! "Padaleki insisted."
"At the beginning of the show, we used to sneak barrels into each other's trailers," Akers explained
"More: Jared padaleki wrote a touching letter to his children:" you turned my world upside down. "Akers pushed a bucket of wine onto the stage, bringing a birthday surprise to Gilmore Girls' alumni
"Supernatural star Jared padaleki celebrated his 35th birthday on Wednesday with Jason Akers in the Conan comics theme set."
"Sam Winchester is crazy!"



Number  393
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If I had a bigger army we could really make a dent.”
“Crisis and relief is all about communication and dropping zero balls.”
“What struck me was people politely waiting in line patiently.”
““We pulled onto a street with a truck of basic necessities, and you would have thought I was giving out diamonds.”
“Image zoom Credit: Courtesy Bethenny Frankel“We arrived in the first town before their own mayor,” she says.”
“Endorsed by FEMA and the State Department in Puerto Rico, Frankel stopped in towns surrounding San Juan, visiting homes, a children’s hospital and more.”
“The Global Empowerment Mission also helped with this cause, and Frankel is on track to raise more than a $1 million in donations and supplies for Puerto Rico alone.”
“Upon arrival, the planes were used to transport dozens of sick and wounded women and children, and cancer victims, from local hospitals to the United States for treatment.”
“In addition to donating $10,000 to her nonprofit and pitching in $20,000 for Frankel’s four private planes, Duran pledged $100,000 to Feeding America to help with disaster relief.”
“WATCH: Bethenny Frankel Talks Puerto Rico Relief & Her #BStrong InitiativeBesides her own money, Frankel paid for this out of thousands of dollars in donations from Andy Cohen, Donny Deutsch, Elvis Duran and others to her B Strong charity, in partnership with Delivering Good.”


"If I have a stronger army, we can really make progress."
"Crisis and relief are all about communication and missing goals."
"What struck me was that people were waiting in line politely and patiently."
"We're driving a cart of necessities down the street, and you think I'm handing out diamonds."
Image zooming credit: Bethany Frankel "we got to the first town before their own mayor," she said
With the support of FEMA and the State Department of Puerto Rico, Frankel stopped in a town near San Juan and visited families, a children's Hospital, etc
"The global empowerment mission has also helped this cause, and Frankel is raising more than a million Australian dollars in donations and materials for Puerto Rico."
Upon arrival, the planes were used to transport dozens of women, children and cancer patients from local hospitals to the United States for treatment
"In addition to donating $10000 to her non-profit organization and investing $20000 in Frankel's four private planes, Duran also promised $100000 to fund the United States and help with disaster relief."
"Observation: Bethany Frankel talks about Puerto Rican relief and her strong initiative. In addition to her own money, Frankel also paid thousands of dollars from Andy Cohen, Donnie Dietrich, Elvis Duran and others to give her a powerful charity to work with."



Number  394
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He’s awesome, but we’re not dating!”Thank God, because I don’t know if Taylor Swift could handle another friend breakup right now.”
““Jack and I are not dating … I love him.”
““Guys, no!” Lorde responded to a fan who asked about the rumors.”
“Back in January, Antonoff claimed that rumors he left Dunham for Lorde were “dumb heteronormative gossip,” and today Lorde was similarly emphatic on an Instagram live chat.”
“Still, the two collaborators insist that there’s nothing to see here.”
“There have been rumors about the pair floating around for the past couple of months, and earlier this week, the Daily Mail added fuel to the fire by publishing a series of photos of them hugging on the streets of Auckland.”
“Photo: Taylor Hill/Getty Images for Governors BallLately we’ve been wondering: what exactly is the deal between Lorde and Lena Dunham’s ex Jack Antonoff?”
“Jack Antonoff and Lorde.”


"He's great, but we're not dating! "Thank God, because I don't know if Taylor Swift can handle another friend's breakup right now."
"I don't have a date with Jack I love him
"No, guys! "Lord responded to a fan's inquiry about the rumor."
"As early as January, Antonov claimed that the rumor that he left Dunham for Lord was" stupid gossip ", and Lord also stressed this point in today's instagram live chat
"However, the two collaborators insist that nothing can be seen here."
"There have been rumors of the couple wandering around for the past few months, adding fuel to the flames earlier this week when the daily mail published a series of photos of them hugging on the streets of Auckland."
"Recently, we've been thinking: what kind of deal did Lord have with Lena Dunham's former Jack Antonov?"
"Jack Antonov and Lord."



Number  395
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Life’s about to get a whole lot wilder, and I can’t bloody wait!””
“...currently focusing on fashion photography...”
“Image zoom Credit Lucas Rossi Photography Image zoom Credit Lucas Rossi Photography To say that I am over the moon that we are going to be having a little baby Beech is a huge understatement says Beech 31 who still plans to release music with the Jaguar Bones but is...”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
““She is such an incredible mama to me and I’m so excited to share everything she’s instilled in me and taught me with our baby girl!”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“...has always been says Grimes Beech who s currently on hiatus from her new TV crime drama The Detail...”
“Image zoom Credit Lucas Rossi Photography Image zoom Credit Lucas Rossi Photography I feel like being a father was something Josh was put on this planet to do and I m thrilled that we re welcoming a daughter because I know how special the bond between my mum and I”
“The couple wed five years ago (Grimes-Beech wore an unconventional black wedding gown for their big day), and the star says she’s always known her husband would one day make an amazing dad.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I can’t believe our world is about to get a whole lot bigger and brighter, and can’t wait to embark on this wild ride with my partner in crime,” the actress, 28, tells PEOPLE exclusively.”


"Life is about to get Wilder. I can't wait!"
“… Currently focusing on fashion photography... "
"Image zooming credit Lucas Rossi photography image zooming credit Lucas Rossi photography said, I am on the moon, we will have a beech is a huge understatement, beech 31 who still plans to release music with Jaguar bones, but..."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"She's an incredible mother to me. I'm very happy to share with you all the things she taught me and taught me with our baby girl!"! "Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
“…… It's always been said by Graeme beech, who is currently pulling out of the new crime TV series details
"Image zooming credit Lucas Rossi photography image zooming credit Lucas Rossi photography I think being a father is something Josh is assigned to do on this planet, and I'm very happy that we can have a daughter, because I know how special the bond between my mother and me is."
"The couple got married five years ago (Grimes beech wore an unconventional black wedding dress on their big day), and the star said she always knew her husband would be a great father one day."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I can't believe our world is going to be bigger and brighter, and I can't wait to embark on this crazy journey with my criminal partners," the 28 year old actress told people exclusive



Number  396
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Brie added, 'And he is so obsessed with Birdie.'”
“'Soon to be [married],' she posted as the caption using a diamond ring emoji.”
“But there might already be trouble in paradise for wrestlers John Cena and Nikki Bella.”
“A teaser for the series Total Bellas, returning this spring, has just released and it seems like the couple might be ready to take a break from their engagement.”
“Scroll down for videoTrouble?”
“Nikki Bella cries while asking fiance John Cena if they should call things off in a teaser for the season 3 premiere of Total BellasThe E!”
“...network series follows the lives of the Bella Twins, including their relationships with fellow wrestlers John Cena and Daniel Bryan and their ventures together including their new wine line Belle Radici and their clothing line Birdie Bee.”
“While Brie is happily married to the now retired Bryan, she is helping her sister cope with the ups and downs of her relationship with Cena.”
“Nikki is also there to help her sister cope with being a first time mom to daughter Birdie.”
“'Isn't marriage all about sacrifice,' Nikki asks Brie.”


"Bree added," he's so obsessed with birds. "
"About to get married," she posted with a diamond ring emoticon as the title
"But for wrestlers John senna and Nicky Bella, there may be trouble in heaven already."
"A trailer for the return of total Bellas this spring has just been released. It seems that the couple may be ready to take a break from their engagement."
"Scroll down for trouble?"
"Nicky Bella cried and asked fiance John Senna if they should cancel the joke at the premiere of season 3 general Bellas!"
“…… The online series focuses on the lives of the Bella twins, including their relationships with wrestlers John senna and Daniel Blaine, as well as their common undertakings, including their new wine line, bell ladic, and clothing line, birdie bee. "
"Although Bree and now retired Bryan are happily married, she is helping her sister cope with the ups and downs of her relationship with Seine."
"Nicky is also there to help her sister cope with the first mother to daughter bird."
"Isn't marriage all about sacrifice?" Nicky asked Bree



Number  397
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...threaten her her family and the daylight world humans inhabit Sabrina we get it high school is hard for everyone...”
“The show which was originally created for the the CW and then moved to Netflix has been described as tonally in the vein of Rosemary s Baby and The Exorcist It finds Sabrina wrestling to reconcile her dual nature half witch half mortal while standing against the evil forces that...”
“There are candles, spooky trees, a big moon, and of course a pair of cat eyes (Salem lives!).”
“Roberto Aguirre-Sacasa, who created Chilling Adventures as well as Riverdale, also shared a brief teaser for the series on Twitter.”
“Wearing the headband that appears in the show’s poster art but otherwise dressed in civvies, Shipka introduces everyone to the show’s coven, including Miranda Otto and Lucy Davis as Aunts Zelda and Hilda.”
“Photo: Jean-Baptiste Lacroix/AFP/Getty ImagesToday being Friday the 13th, Kiernan Shipka has chosen an appropriately spooky time to share a first glimpse at Chilling Adventures of Sabrina, Netflix’s dark, broody, and otherwise Riverdale-esque take on Sabrina the Teenage Witch.”
“Kiernan Shipka.”


“… Threatening her family and human beings living in Sabrina's sunlit world, we know high school is hard for everyone... "
"This play was originally produced for CW, and later it was moved to Netflix. It was described as the keynote of Rosemary's children and Exorcist. It found that Sabrina tried to reconcile her dual character, half Witch and half mortal, while fighting against evil forces."
"There are candles, ghostly trees, a big moon and, of course, a pair of cat's eyes (Salem is still alive!)"
Along with Riverdale, Roberto Aguirre sacasa created a gruesome adventure story and shared a short joke in the series on twitter
"Shipka, wearing the headband from the poster, but wearing casual clothes, introduced everyone to the witches in the play, including aunt Selda and aunt Hilda played by Miranda Otto and Lucy Davis."
"Photo: Jean Baptiste Lacroix / AFP / Getty Images today is Friday the 13th. Kiernan shipka chose a suitable gloomy time to share with you the first time of witnessing Sabrina's creepy adventure, Netflix's darkness and gloom, and other Riverdale style photos of Sabrina."
"Kirnan shipka."



Number  398
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was so fun and not fancy, which is what she’s like.””
“BECAUSE—@inagarten invited #PretendCookingShow to be part of her Thanksgiving special!”
“Jennifer Garner Will Guest Star on an Upcoming Episode of Ina Garten's Barefoot ContessaThe next episode of Jennifer Garner‘s Pretend Cooking Show will be an extra special one.”
“The actress, who first started sharing cooking videos from her home kitchen last year, announced on Monday she will be starring on Ina Garten‘s upcoming Thanksgiving special.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“To share the good news, Garner, 46, posted a video on Instagram where she is seen making a colorful paper turkey.”
““Why, is that the #BarefootContessa music playing somewhere?”
“YES.”
“Yes, it is.”
“!” she captioned the clip.”


"It's fun. It's not fancy. That's what she is."
"Because -@inagarten Invited # to pretend how cooking became part of her Thanksgiving special
"Jennifer Garner will guest star in ina Garten's upcoming episode of barefoot Contessa, and her next episode of pretend cooking will be a special show."
The actress, who started sharing cooking videos in her kitchen for the first time last year, announced on Monday that she would star in ina Garten's upcoming Thanksgiving special
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
To share the good news, Ghana, 46, posted a video on instagram in which she was making a colorful paper Turkey
"Why, is someone playing the music of the barefoot Countess?"
"Yes."
"Yes, yes."
"!" she captioned the clip. "



Number  399
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The new season filmed throughout this past summer, and is set to premiere sometime in 2019.”
“The cast includes Reese Witherspoon, Nicole Kidman, Laura Dern, Shailene Woodley, and Zoë Kravitz, among others, and Season 2 will see none other than Meryl Streep joining the series as well.”
“After all, the debut season was marketed as a one-off miniseries, and it had adapted the entirety of the Liane Moriarty novel on which is was based.”
“But months later, HBO surprised us all by revealing the show would get a second season.”
“While we are still waiting for this new season to premiere, now fans are left with another pressing question: how much longer will the show go on?”
“Will Big Little Lies Season 3 happen or is Season 2 where we will have to say goodbye to Monterey?”
“Nicole Kidman talked about the future of the series in a recent interview, and it does not sound like fans should hold out much hope for more new seasons.”
“The biggest hurdle to keeping Big Little Lies going after its upcoming second season, it sounds like, is the hectic schedules of the cast.”
“The ensemble drama boasts one of the most star-studded casts on television, and all of its stars are still putting out multiple blockbuster or critically acclaimed movies each year alongside their new TV jobs.”
“With all of those huge names, it is not easy to block out time for production on Big Little Lies, and unfortunately, that might make Season 2 the last season of the show.”


"The new season was filmed last summer and is scheduled to premiere sometime in 2019."
"The crew includes Reese Witherspoon, Nicole Kidman, Laura Dean, Shawn Woodley and Zoe Kravitz, and no one else will join the series except Meryl Streep in the second season."
"After all, the first season was promoted as a one-off miniseries, which adapted the entire contents of Lian Moriarty's novels."
"But a few months later, HBO announced that the show will have a second season, which surprised us all."
"Although we are still waiting for the premiere of the new season, fans still have an urgent question: how long will the show last?"
"Will season three of the big lies happen? Or are we going to say goodbye to Monterey in season two? "
"Nicole Kidman talked about the future of the series in a recent interview, and it sounds like fans shouldn't have too much hope for more new seasons."
"After the coming season 2, the biggest obstacle to keep those little lies going seems to be the busy schedule of the actors."
"This series is known as one of the most star studded series on TV. Every year, all the stars will launch a number of blockbusters or popular movies in their new TV jobs."
"With so many big names, it's not easy to squeeze in time to make little lies. Unfortunately, it may make Season 2 the last season of the show."



Number  400
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Margot, I love you, but I need to start drinking now," he added after he returned back “overheated.””
““I have no champagne," he said.”
“He then realized he had run out of champagne by the time Allison Janney was accepting her award for Best Supporting actress for I, Tonya, and made a run to the store.”
“Margot walked the red carpet with their mother, Sarie Kessler, and that put Cameron into "#excitementoverload” as he began documenting Hollywood’s biggest night.”
“The adorable Australian hilariously documented his Oscars viewing party and multiple champagne runs before trolling his older sister on Instagram after she lost Best Actress to Frances McDormand.”
“But it’s her brother, Cameron Robbie, who is making headlines Monday morning.”
“...bit...”
“Margot Robbie was up for her first ever Oscar at the 90th annual Academy Awards on Sunday March 5 and while she didn t take home the award for Best Actress she stole the show in her custom couture Chanel gown and by participating in Jimmy Kimmel s movie theater...”


"Margo, I love you, but I have to start drinking now," he added when he came back, "too much."
"I don't have champagne," he said
"When Alison Jennie won the best supporting actress award for" I, Tonia, "he realized he had run out of champagne and ran to the store
"Margot and their mother, Sally Kessler, walked onto the red carpet, which made Cameron feel" over excited "when he started recording Hollywood's biggest night
"This lovely Australian made a funny record of his Oscar Viewing Party and many bottles of champagne, and then showed off his sister on instagram after her sister lost to Frances McDormand."
"But it was her brother Cameron Robbie who made the headlines on Monday morning."
“… "I don't know..."
"On Sunday, March 5, Margot Robbie won the Best Actress Oscar for the first time at the 90th Academy Awards ceremony. Although she didn't get the best actress award, she still wore a customized Chanel dress and went to the cinema of Jimi Kimmel, taking away the show...."



Number  401
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But what about those who would rather look the other way?””
“I mean, he was a predator and a predator is a predator.”
“...alleged attack took place in 1996”
“A lawyer for Breest did not immediately reply to Rolling Stone s request for comment but told The AP that Haggis countersuit was a preposterous and transparent PR stunt that will not succeed and a further act of aggression One of the new accusers said she was 28 when the...”
“Two said that Haggis allegedly became more antagonistic when they resisted him.”
“...to kiss them...”
“The women who all chose to remain anonymous out of fear of retribution claimed to have stories similar to Breest s they were all in their 20s or early 30s and they all said Haggis allegedly attempted to set up private meetings with them to discuss business but subsequently tried...”
“...not Ms Breest The new accusers said they felt empowered to come forward after learning of Breest s story and seeing women report stories of powerful men engaging in sexual misconduct as part of the MeToo movement...”
“He views the fact that these reports appear to be spearheaded from the law firm representing Ms Breest as a further tactic to try to harm him and continue their effort to obtain money We reiterate our claim against Ms Breest and note again that we initiated the legal proceedings...”
““Notably, no one has reached out to anyone on Mr. Haggis’ team other than the press to report this.”


"But what about those who would rather see things from another angle?"
"I mean, he's a predator, and a predator is a predator."
“…… The attack is said to have occurred in 1996
"A lawyer for Bridget didn't immediately respond to rolling stone's request for comment, but he told the associated press that haggis's counterclaim was an absurd and transparent public relations stunt, won't succeed, and it was a further violation. One of the new plaintiffs said that when she was 28 years old..."
"The two said haggis was said to have become more hostile when he resisted him."
“… Kiss them... "
"These women, who chose anonymity for fear of revenge, claimed that they all had stories similar to those of Brest. They were all in their 20s or early 30s. They all said that haggis was said to have tried to meet with them in private to discuss business, but later tried..."
“…… It's not Ms. Brest. The new plaintiffs say that after learning Brest's story and seeing that women report stories about powerful men's involvement in sexual misconduct, as part of the metoo movement, they feel entitled to stand up... "
"In his view, these reports seem to have been initiated by the law firm representing Ms. Brest, which is a further strategy to try to hurt him and continue to strive for money. We reiterate our claim against Ms. Brest and point out once again that we have initiated legal proceedings... "
"It's worth noting that, apart from the media, no one has contacted anyone in haggis's team to report this."



Number  402
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In response to the April criminal complaint, Kelly's representative said the musician "categorically denies all claims and allegations."”
“In the past, Kelly has routinely denied allegations of sexual abuse.”
“CBS News reported that Rodgers previously filed a criminal complaint with the Dallas Police Department in April.”
“...is seeking unspecified damages alleging sexual battery false imprisonment and failure to disclose a sexually transmitted disease...”
“Rodgers said in the suit that she was in a relationship with Kelly for a year in which he routinely engaged in intimidation mental verbal and sexual abuse during and after sexual contact The suit alleges Kelly s actions were designed to humiliate embarrass intimate and shame her The suit...”
““I told him and he’s like, ‘You know, if you’re really, you know, 16, that you can tell daddy, right?’ And he was like, ‘You know, you just look about 14, 15 or 16,’” she said.”
“Rodgers said after the incident, Kelly asked how old she was.”
“She claimed Kelly recorded the act on his iPad without her consent.”
“Rodgers said she ultimately submitted and had sex with Kelly even though she didn’t want to.”


In response to the criminal charges in April, Kelly's representative said the musician "categorically denies all charges and charges."
"In the past, Kelly has often denied allegations of sexual abuse."
"CBS News reported that Rogers had previously filed a criminal complaint with the Dallas police department in April."
“…… Seeking unspecified damages for alleged sexual violence, illegal imprisonment and undisclosed sexually transmitted diseases... "
"Rogers said in the lawsuit that she had been with Kelly for a year and that Kelly regularly threatened, mentally verbally and sexually abused her during and after sexual contact. The lawsuit alleges that Kelly's behavior is to humiliate, humiliate and humiliate the intimate Kelly.... "
"I told him, and he said," you know, if you're really, you know, 16, you can tell Dad, right? "He said, 'you know, you look like you're only about 14, 15 or 16 years old,'" she said
"Rogers said that after the incident, Kelly asked her how old she was."
"She claimed that Kelly recorded the action on his iPad without her consent."
"Rogers said she finally gave in and had sex with Kelly, even though she didn't want to."



Number  403
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch a brand new episode of Total Divas Wednesday at 9 p m only on E”
“For me to change my mind and put that house on the market I really need to have a freakin problem with it Maryse said with tears in her eyes Watch the intense moment go down in the clip above...”
“"I thought I was gonna have kids at that house.”
“"You do understand that this is the house that we built together," The Miz probed.Though the home holds a special place in Maryse's heart as well, it seems like she's at the end of her rope.”
“Maryse argued.But The Miz wasn't ready to give up.”
“What do you want me to do, hire a bodyguard that's gonna live there seven days a week, 24/7?"”
“"I don't feel safe in my own house.”
“...safety...”
“The thing I didn t know is that the press would pick it up in less than 24 hours Maryse admitted While The Miz wished his wife would ve just told him Maryse insisted that it was a matter of...”
“"I put the house on sale, I didn't tell him.”


"Only watch a new episode of total divas on e at 9pm on Wednesday"
"To make me change my mind and put that house on the market, I really need a strange question," said Maris with tears, watching the tense moments disappear in the clip above... "
"I thought I would have a baby in that house."
"You know, this is the house we built together," Miz said. But yes, this family has a special place in Maris' heart. She seems to be at a dead end. "
"Maris argued. But Miz is not ready to give up
"What do you want me to do, hire a bodyguard, live there seven days a week, all day?" "
"I don't feel safe in my own home."
“… Security... "
"What I don't know is that the media will get the news in less than 24 hours, Maris admits, and Miz hopes his wife will tell him that Maris insists that this is a problem..."
"I sold the house without telling him."



Number  404
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Markle, 36, asked Prince Charles to walk her down the aisle because her father, Thomas Markle Sr., who lives in Mexico, did not attend the wedding due to health concerns.”
“Markle handed off her bouquet to a young bridesmaid before the ceremony began, during which the prince and his bride held hands.”
“Prince Harry, who stood at the altar with his best man and older brother Prince William, spoke with his new bride as she arrived, telling her, "You look amazing."”
“Markle's mother, Doria Ragland, had escorted the bride to the church before Markle walked the first half of the aisle on her own.”
“As Prince Charles walked his new daughter-in-law Meghan Markle down the second half of the aisle at St. George's Chapel, the beaming bride was walking calmly and confidently on the arm of the next King of England.”
“Prince Harry stood at the front with his best man, older brother Prince William.”


"Marcel, 36, asked Prince Charles to accompany her to the wedding aisle because her father, Thomas Markle Sr., lived in Mexico and did not attend the wedding for health reasons."
Before the wedding, markel gave her bouquet to a young bridesmaid, the prince and his bride holding hands
"Prince Harry stood on the altar with his best man and brother Prince William. When the bride arrived, he spoke to her and said to her," you look great. "
"Marcel's mother, Doria Raglan, escorted the bride to church before markel walked alone through the first half of the aisle."
"As Prince Charles and his new daughter-in-law Megan mackle walk in the second half of the aisle of St. George's church, the jubilant bride walks calmly and confidently on the arm of the next king of England."
Prince Harry and his best man, brother Prince William, were at the front



Number  405
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“When you get older, lines get blurred.””
“Perry addressed her relationship with Bloom on SiriusXM’s Morning Mash Up that same month, saying, “It’s nice to keep people you love around you.”
“They left the show together on Bloom’s motorcycle.”
“There was also the Ed Sheeran concert last August, where fans caught the pair once again.”
“Bloom and Perry quietly met in the Maldives after Perry had wrapped her performance in Dubai, where fans photographed the couple attempting to lay low, Leonardo DiCaprio-style, in baseball caps.”
“The trip is actually their second together this year.”
“And for those wondering, it’s too cold in Prague for any paddle boarding.”
“They’ve been photographed walking Bloom’s dog, Mighty, as well as touring the city’s castle.”
“The couple, who broke up last February after dating for a year, are currently on vacation in Prague, where Bloom is shooting the Amazon series Carnival Row.”
“Unfortunately for Katy Perry and Orlando Bloom, they are very famous, which is why the whole world has been keeping up with their Czech reunion in real time.”


"As you get older, the lines blur."
The same month, Perry talked about her relationship with bloom on Sirius XM's morning Mashup, saying, "it's nice to have someone you love around you."
"They left the show together on Bloom's motorcycle."
"There was an ED Sheeran concert last August, and the fans got hold of them again."
"Bloom and Perry met quietly in Maldives, Perry finished his performance in Dubai, and fans took pictures of the couple trying to lie down in a baseball cap, which is the style of Leonardo DiCaprio."
"This trip is actually their second time together this year."
"For those who want to know, Prague is too cold for any paddle boarding."
"They were photographed walking Bloom's dog, being powerful, and touring the city's castles."
"The couple broke up in February last year after dating for a year and are currently on holiday in Prague, where bloom is filming the Amazon Carnival series."
"Unfortunately, Katie Perry and Orlando Bloom are very famous, which is why the world is watching their reunion in Czech in real time."



Number  406
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo Credit: Shutterstock...”
“Kenya’s hostility with RHOA’s producers began after she secretly eloped and married her husband Marc Daly without informing Bravo.”
“Page Six is the latest and perhaps most notable media outlet to now confirm Kenya s departure from RHOA as their report confirms earlier reports from other media outlets that Bravo fired her from her full time role but gave her the opportunity to return to the show for its...”
“...upcoming season in a part time role...”
““[Producers] offered her [a] part-time [role] and she didn’t want the reduction in pay.”
“So she’s out,” an insider told Page Six on July 11.”
“Blogger Tamara Tattles is also confirming the same thing, stating Kenya was unwilling to sign a contract for a part-time role and that Bravo refused to budge.”
“Due to this, the July 9 deadline that Bravo gave Kenya to sign her contract for a smaller role on the show came and went, and it is now a done deal that Kenya will not appear on RHOA’s upcoming season in any capacity.”
“Since then, Kenya’s husband has been hesitant to film for the show, only appearing in one scene last season, which led to producers being frustrated.”
“Then, at the end of season 10 earlier this year, Kenya confirmed she and Marc were expecting their first child together.”


"Image source: shutterstock..."
"Kenya's hostility to the RhoA producer began when she eloped secretly without informing Bravo and married her husband, mark DALY."
"The sixth page is the latest and perhaps the most famous media that confirmed Kenya's departure from RhoA, because their reports confirmed earlier reports by other media that Bravo fired her full-time role, but gave her the opportunity to return to the show and participate in its..."
“… The coming part-time role season... "
"(producer) offered her a part-time job and she didn't want to cut her salary."
On July 11, a person familiar with the matter told page 6: "so she's out."
"Blogger Tamara tattles also confirmed this, saying that Kenya is not willing to sign part-time contracts, Bravo refused to give in."
"Because of this, Bravo's deadline for Kenya on July 9 has come and gone for her to sign a small role in the play. Now it has been agreed that Kenya will not appear in the upcoming season of RhoA in any capacity."
"Since then, Kenyan husbands have been hesitant to shoot for the show, and last season there was only one scene, which frustrated the producers."
"Then, at the end of season 10 earlier this year, Kenya confirmed that she and mark were pregnant with their first child."



Number  407
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We salute you, style queen...”
“Whether she's rocking a ballgown or low-key look, in our humble opinion, Blake never has a down day so do yourself A Simple Favour (sorry) and take some time out to admire Blake’s greatest garment hits below.”
“The fact that Blake continuously smashes fashion hits out of the park is made even more impressive by the knowledge that she styles herself from head to toe.”
“What.”
“A.”
“Woman.”
“We also love that she keeps it real.”
“Whilst she serves up sartorial hits on the red carpet, she's never afraid to show us the reality behind the glam.”
“Case in point?”
“This snap she just uploaded from isolation.”


"We salute you, Queen of fashion..."
"Whether she's a swing dancer or a low-key model, black has never been unhappy in our opinion, so please do yourself a simple favor (I'm sorry) and take some time to enjoy the best costume works of black."
"In fact, Blake's constantly breaking fashion out of the park is more impressive knowledge of her style from head to toe."
"What."
“A.”
"Women."
"We like her to be real, too."
"Although she provided fashion on the red carpet, she was never afraid to show us the reality behind the dazzle."
"For example?"
"This picture was just uploaded from quarantine."



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Talk show host Ellen DeGeneres paid a visit to Jennifer Lopez at her All I Have residency show at Planet Hollywood in Las Vegas, Nevada, on Monday's episode of The Ellen DeGeneres Show.”
“EXCLUSIVE Alex Rodriguez Says His Daughters Want to Do Everything That Jennifer Lopez Does But hanging with Lopez backstage at the AXIS Theater and scoring prime VIP table seats for the glitzy concert wasn t enough for the 59 year old comedian she also insisted on becoming Lopez s understudy...”
“...stealing her furniture and getting a personal shout out from the singer on stage...”
“DeGeneres walked into the J.”
“Lo's dressing room wearing her own version of the plunging emerald Versace gown that Lopez wore to the 2000 GRAMMYs, declaring that she was there to act as an understudy.”
““There are no understudies in these type of shows,” Lopez, 48, attempted to explain.”
“It s called Jennifer Lopez All I Have so it s hard for it to be like Jennifer Lopez But It s Not Jennifer Lopez It s Ellen Michael Rozman Warner Bros DeGeneres didn t buy it continuing to make herself at home and marking up furniture she wanted removed...”
“...once the dressing room became hers...”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Talk show host Ellen DeGeneres visited Jennifer Lopez on Monday on" all I have residence "on Planet Hollywood in Las Vegas, Nevada
"Exclusive Alex Rodriguez said that his daughters want to do everything that Jennifer Lopez does, but it's not enough for the 59 year old comedian to be with Lopez backstage at the axis theater and win VIP seats for the magnificent concert. She also insists on being a substitute for Lopez..."
“… She stole her furniture and heard the singer's private voice on the stage
"DeGeneres enters J."
"Lopez's dressing room is wearing the emerald Versace dress that Lopez wore at the 2000 Grammy Awards, claiming that she's coming as a substitute."
Lopez, 48, tried to explain: "there is no substitute in this kind of show."
"All my names are Jennifer Lopez, so it's hard for it to be like that, but it's not Jennifer Lopez. It's not bought by denilles of Allen Michael Rothman Warner Brothers. She continues to make her own clothes at home and mark the furniture she wants to move..."
“… Once the changing room becomes hers... "



Number  409
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And for even more on how she’s spending Christmas with her family, pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on stands now!”
““I love to mix holiday tableware with pieces I can use year-round.”Watch the video above to hear more of Decker’s holiday tips!”
“...with Joss Main plates...”
“At the same time she likes to keep her house festive but practical the mom of Vivianne 4 Eric II 3 and Forrest 8 months with husband Eric Decker notes adding she does the same for her Christmas dinner table...”
““I wanted to make sure it screamed ‘Merry Christmas, y’all!’” the singer and cookbook author, 30, exclusively says in the new issue of Us Weekly.”
“This season, Jessie James Decker is bringing wintry Christmas vibes to sunny Nashville!”


"For more information on how she spent Christmas with her family, let's take a look at the new issue of American weekly!"
"I like to mix holiday cutlery with cutlery that I can use all year round." Watch the video above to hear more holiday tips about dyke
“… With joss motherboard... "
"At the same time, she likes to keep her house festive, but the actual mother Vivian 4 Eric II 3 and Forrest 8 months notes with her husband Eric Decker added that she also makes the same Christmas table..."
"I want to make sure it screams' Merry Christmas, everyone! The 30-year-old singer and cookbook writer said exclusively in the new issue of American weekly
"This season, Jesse James Decker brings a Winter Christmas atmosphere to the sunny Nashville!"



Number  410
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Rich Fury/Invision/AP Images]”
“In fact, Abby Lee Miller’s presence is still very much felt on social media despite being in jail for four months now.”
“Former Dance Moms mentor Abby Lee Miller, who is currently serving her yearlong sentence at FCI Victorville, is reportedly celebrating this year’s holiday in a totally different way.”
“In an exclusive report by Radar Online, it has been alleged that the 51-year-old choreographer will not participate in the traditional Thanksgiving meal organized for the inmates.”
“According to the webloid, Abby Lee Miller is going to skip the holiday dinner because of a special visitor that will drop by to discuss something important to her.”
“Apparently, the inmates will gather for the Thanksgiving dinner around 11:00 — the same time when the former Dance Moms star will be in visitation.”
“An insider revealed to the outlet that their Thanksgiving meal will consist of dried up turkey canned cranberry juice canned corn green beans mashed potatoes one roll with a small pad of butter one slice of pumpkin pie and one slice of pecan pie Despite missing out on the meal...”
“Abby Lee Miller will still be allowed to get her share of food once her visitor leaves it has been claimed...”
““Unfortunately, by the time Abby gets her meal, it will be cold,” a source told the gossip site.”
“Previously, it has been reported that the controversial choreographer has not received any visits at the FCI Victorville in California.”


"[rich fury / invasion / AP images selected pictures]"
"In fact, even though Abby Lee Miller has been in prison for four months, his presence can still be felt on social media."
"Abby Lee Miller, a former dance mom mentor, is currently serving a year in FCI Victorville and is reported to be celebrating this year's festival in a completely different way."
"In the exclusive report of radar online, it is said that the 51 year old choreographer will not attend the traditional Thanksgiving dinner for prisoners."
"According to webweek, Abby Lee Miller will not attend the Festival dinner because a special guest will come to discuss some important things with her."
"It's clear that the prisoners will get together for Thanksgiving dinner around 11 o'clock, and the former dancer star will visit him at the same time."
"A person familiar with the situation told the store that their Thanksgiving dinner will include dry Turkey, canned cranberry juice, canned corn and green beans, mashed potatoes, a roll with a small piece of butter, a piece of pumpkin pie and a piece of hickory pie, even though they missed the meal..."
"Abby Lee Miller can still get the food she deserves after the guests leave..."
"Unfortunately, when Abby gets to dinner, it'll be cold," a source told gossip.com
"It has been reported that the controversial choreographer did not receive any interviews in FCI Victorville, California."



Number  411
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...became her humorous foil in the film...”
“Janney began her acceptance speech with a joke I did it all by myself It got a significant laugh but she quickly added Nothing further from the truth She thanked her castmates and even the squawking ear biting bird who...”
“She beat out others in the category, including Lesley Manville in Phantom Thread, Laurie Metcalf in Lady Bird, Octavia Spencer in The Shape of Water, and Mary J. Blige in Mudbound.”
“Janney’s dry, snappy performance was heavily praised by critics.”
“Janney played Tonya Harding’s abusive mother LaVona, who bullies her relentlessly throughout the film, while still providing comedic relief.”
“Allison Janney took home an Oscar for Best Supporting Actress in I, Tonya.”


“…… To be the foil of her humor in the film.... "
"Jennie's acceptance speech started with a joke. I did it by myself, which caused a meaningful laugh. But she quickly added that she was grateful to her friends and even the biting bird..."
"She beat others in this category, including Lesley Manville in phantom thread, Laurie Metcalf in Lady Bird, Octavia Spencer in the shape of water and Mary blich
"Jennie's skilful and agile performance was highly praised by critics."
Jennie plays Lavina, Tonia Harding's abusive mother, who bullies her mercilessly throughout the film while providing comic comfort
Alison Jennie won an Oscar for Best Supporting Actress in I, Tongya



Number  412
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“CNN’s Judith Vonberg contributed to this report.”
“This story has been updated to correct the Duchess of Cornwall’s title.”
“Archbishop of Canterbury Justin Welby administered the holy sacrament in a 45-minute service on Tuesday evening at the palace’s Chapel Royal with her fiance, Prince Harry, by her side, UK media outlets reported, quoting the Daily Mail.”
“Kensington Palace has not made a public statement but Prince Charles and his wife, the Duchess of Cornwall, were also said to have been among the handful of guests in attendance.”
“Welby was reportedly asked to lead the service by Markle, 36, with whom he has developed a close bond after providing guidance on the rites and sacraments of the Church in recent weeks.”
“As part of the ceremony, holy water from the River Jordan was poured on Markle’s head, the Mail reported.”
“It was not necessary for Markle – who attended a Roman Catholic high school but was brought up Protestant – to convert in order to marry Prince Harry, but she announced at the time of her engagement that she would do so anyway before their wedding in mid-May.”
“Lambeth Palace, the official London residence of the Archbishop of Canterbury, declined to comment Thursday when asked about the service.”
“Markle’s formal acceptance into the Anglican Church is the latest arrangement by the royal couple ahead of their wedding in St George’s Chapel at Windsor Castle.”
“The move appears to be a mark of respect to Queen Elizabeth II, who is head of the Church of England.”


"Judith von Berg of CNN contributed to this report."
"The story has been updated to correct the title of Duchess of Cornwall."
Justin Welby, the Archbishop of Canterbury, presided over a 45 minute sacrament at the Royal Chapel of the palace on Tuesday night, with her fiance Prince Harry at her side, the daily mail of London reported
"Kensington Palace did not make a public statement, but Prince Charles and his wife, the Duchess of Cornwall, are said to be among the few guests present."
According to reports, markel, 36, invited Welby to lead the ceremony, and he established close ties with markel after providing guidance for church rituals and sacraments in recent weeks
As part of the ceremony, holy water from the Jordan River was poured on markel's head, the Daily Mail reported
"Mark didn't have to convert to Religion in order to marry Prince Harry, because she studied in a Roman Catholic high school, but she was a Protestant since childhood, but when she was engaged, she announced that in any case, she would convert before their wedding in mid May."
Lambeth Palace, the Archbishop of Canterbury's official residence in London, declined to comment on Thursday when asked about the service
"Marcel's official accession to Anglican Church is the latest arrangement for the royal couple before their wedding at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle."
"It seems to be a tribute to Queen Elizabeth II, the leader of the Church of England."



Number  413
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Unless I can find a very upscale Ouija board, I have to accept there’ll be no answers.”“But in the end it found its own version of closure in peace,” he added.”
“Reynolds previously opened up to PEOPLE about the pair’s complicated relationship and how their “relationship never really mirrored the father-son dynamic I envied watching ’80s sitcoms.”“My dad left a lot of unanswered questions,” he remarked.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“At the end of the day, it’s easier to focus on the good stuff than the bad.”Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“For better or worse, all roads lead to here.”
““It felt right,” Reynolds said, adding that even though his dad passed away shortly after his daughter was born, “he got to see her, which makes me happy.”Continuing, he said, “All family relationships come with some complications.”
“...after his father...”
“Image zoom Credit Michael Loccisano Getty Images Blake Lively and Ryan Reynolds Although Reynolds didn t go into detail about how the father and son repaired their relationship a symbol of their reconciliation lives on in the actor s 3 year old daughter James who the couple decided to name...”
““She has a gift for foresight,” Reynolds added.”
“But despite their complicated relationship, Reynolds, 41, says he has Lively to thank for helping him reconcile with his father, who died following a long term battle with Parkinson’s disease.”


"Unless I can find a very high-end board, I have to accept the fact that there are no answers." "But in the end it found its own version of peaceful closure," he added
Reynolds had previously revealed to people their complex relationship, and that their "relationship never really reflected the father son relationship that I admired when I watched the sitcoms of the 1980s." "My father left a lot of unanswered questions," he said
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"At the end of the day, it's easier to focus on the good than the bad." Want to keep up with the latest news from people? "
"For better or for worse, all roads lead here."
"It feels good," Reynolds said, adding that although his father died shortly after his daughter was born, "he met her, which made me happy." "All family relationships have some complexities," he added
“… After his father... "
"Thanks to the zooming and zooming, Michael losisano Getty took pictures of Blake Lively and Ryan Reynolds, although Reynolds did not elaborate on how the father and son repaired their relationship, which was a symbol of their reconciliation. In the actor's three-year-old daughter James, the couple decided to name her..."
"She has the gift of foresight," Reynolds added
Reynolds, 41, said that despite the complexity of their relationship, he would like to thank Reynolds for helping him reconcile with his father, who died after a long struggle with Parkinson's disease



Number  414
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“As the senior Bellas leave Barden, they give Emily a belated proper initiation with Fat Amy showing her how to do the last tradition: christening the house by sliding down the staircase.”
“The Bellas win the championship and repair their damaged legacy.”
“Benjamin "Benji" Applebaum, Jesse's best friend, overhears Emily, leading him to develop a crush on her.”
“At orientation, she watches an Acappella performance by the Treblemakers, now led by Beca's boyfriend Jesse Swanson.”
“Freshman Emily Junk begins her college career, hoping to follow in the footsteps of her mother, Katherine, by being a Bella.”
“Beca makes a deal to allow the Bellas to be reinstated, should they win the World Championship of Acappella.”
“This incident leads to the Bellas' suspension from the ICCAs.”
“...underwear...”
“However the group gets involved in a national scandal dubbed Muffgate when Patricia Fat Amy Hobart accidentally rips her pants in front of U S President Barack Obama during a performance on his birthday at the Kennedy Center showing her genitalia to the public as she did not wear her...”
“The Bellas have become ICCA champions each of these three years.”


"When old Bella leaves Baden, they give Emily a late formal initiation ceremony, and fat Amy shows her how to do the last tradition: slide down the stairs for baptism."
"The Bellas won the championship and restored their damaged legacy."
"Benjamin" Benji "Applebaum, Jesse's best friend, overhears Emily, which leads to his infatuation with her
At the orientation ceremony, she watched the "acapela" performance of the "tree man" band led by Becca's boyfriend Jesse Swanson
"Freshman Emily garbage started her college career, hoping to follow her mother Catherine's footsteps and become a Bella."
"Becca and Bella have reached an agreement that they can come back if they win the world championships in acapela
"This incident led to the suspension of the Bellas family by ICCAS."
“… Underwear... "
"However, the group is involved in a national scandal known as" mofgate, "in which Patricia fat Amy Hobart was at Kennedy Center on the birthday of US President Barack Obama She tore her pants in front of him and showed her genitalia to the public because she didn't wear it... "
"The Bellas have been the ICCA champions every year for three years."



Number  415
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I married my best friend, and we do everything we can to spend as much time together as possible.””
“You’re the most thoughtful, loving, caring, and strong woman I’ve ever met!”
“Supermodel and Justin Verlander Are Expecting Their First Child TogetherKate Upton is modeling something new these days: a baby bump!”
“The 26-year-old supermodel is expecting her first child with husband Justin Verlander, who she married in an ultra-posh wedding in Italy on Nov. 4 — just days after the baseball pitcher helped the Houston Astros score their first-ever World Series victory.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Upton announced her pregnancy on Saturday, in the hashtag of an Instagram post.”
“Her photo — snapped as she posted in a red suit and white top on a balcony in Miami — showed the slightest peek of a baby bump.”
““#PregnantinMiami.” she wrote, tagging Verlander and adding a sunburst and heart emoji.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”


"I'm married to my best friend and we're together as much as we can."
"You are the most considerate, loving, considerate and strong woman I have ever seen
"Supermodel and Justin veland are looking forward to their first child together. Kate Upton is working on a new model recently: a small lump
"The 26 year old supermodel is looking forward to her first child with her husband Justin Verlander, who held a super luxurious wedding in Italy on November 4, just a few days after the baseball pitcher helped the Houston Astros win their first World Series in history."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Upton announced pregnancy on a label on instagram on Saturday
"Her picture - taken when she was wearing a red suit and a white jacket posted on a balcony in Miami - shows the slightest glimpse of a baby lump."
"Pregnant in Miami." She wrote, tagging frand and adding an emoticon of sunshine and heart
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."



Number  416
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here, a deep dive into the history of this supposed feud, which rages on in 2021.”
“Nixon and Charlotte Kristin Davis...”
“Even since the early days of SATC there have been rumors of infighting between the pair and speculation has only strengthened with Cattrall s absence from And Just Like That an HBO Max limited series revival about Carrie Miranda Cynthia...”
“But even more controversial than some of the episodes is the enduring offscreen drama between stars Sarah Jessica Parker (who played Carrie Bradshaw) and Kim Cattrall (who played Samantha Jones).”
“The very first episode of Sex and the City premiered over 20 years ago, and the series is remembered for its larger-than-life fashion and flings.”


"Here, we will explore in depth the history of this so-called feud that rages in 2021."
"Nixon and Charlotte Christine Davis..."
"Even in the early days of SATC, there were rumors of infighting between the two. With Katla's absence, speculation became more and more intense, just like a sequel of HBO Max limited about Carrie Miranda Cynthia..."
"But what's more controversial than some shows is the long-lasting off screen drama between stars Sarah Jessica Parker (as Kelly Bradshaw) and Kim katlar (as Samantha Jones)
The first episode of "sex and the city" premiered more than 20 years ago. The series is famous for its extraordinary fashion and passion



Number  417
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'””
“She called me — I was at work — and she said, ‘Hey, this is a hell of a product.”
“At the end of a stressful day, you want to kick back and relax a bit.”— On his wife’s opinion of the product: “Well, that’s who I heard about it from.”
“Which is really the goal.”
“It’s versatile and very user-friendly.”— On how using the product makes Damon feel: “Relaxed.”
“That’s what’s great about it.”
“Some people use it more than once a day; some people use it once a week.”
“AdvertisementAmong the highlights:— On how to use the product: “It depends.”
“DeGeneres asked Damon a series of leading questions about the product, and the Cambridge native’s answers left the audience in hysterics.”
“An underwear-clad blow-up doll with Kimmel’s face.”


“'””
"She called me - I was at work - and she said," Hey, this is a great product. "
"At the end of a stressful day, you want to relax." ——His wife's view of the product was, "well, that's what I heard from him."
"That's the real goal."
"It's versatile and very user-friendly." - how to use the product to make Damon feel "relaxed"
"That's the strength of it."
"Some people use it more than once a day; some people use it once a week."
Highlights in Advertising: - about how to use the product: "it depends."
"DeGeneres asked Damon a series of key questions about the product, and the Cambridge native made the audience hysterical."
"An inflatable doll in underwear with a Kimmel face."



Number  418
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More From Nicholas Raymondadvertising...”
“He can be reached by email at cnrmail@bellsouth.net and on Twitter at @cnraymond91.”
“The series is a spinoff of the 2010 animated film, Tangled, starring Levi and Mandy Moore.”
“Action comedy series Chuck aired on NBC from 2007 to 2012.”
“The series starred Levi as Chuck Bartowski, a nerd who has all of the government's secrets downloaded into his brain.”
“Assigned to protect Chuck is the beautiful but deadly CIA agent Sarah Walker (Strahovksi).”
“Chuck and Sarah have to work together to foil terrorist plots, defeat enemy spies, and diffuse bombs.”
“Though the two adopt a fake relationship as part of their cover, the pair eventually become a couple in season 3 and marry in the season 4 finale.”
“Due to low ratings, the show faced threats of cancellation with each season, but with the help of a devoted fan base, the series was able to last for five seasons.”
“...advertisingAs reported by E!”


"More from Nicholas Raymond Davidson..."
"We can contact him by email: cnrmail@bellsouth.net On twitter @ cnraymond91. "
"This series is a spin off of the 2010 cartoon tangle, starring Livy and Mandy Moore."
"The action comedy series chuck was broadcast on NBC from 2007 to 2012."
"In this series, levy plays chuck bartowski, a nerd who downloads all the secrets of the government into his head."
"It's Sarah walker, the beautiful but deadly CIA agent who is responsible for protecting chuck."
Chuck and Sarah must work together to thwart terrorist plots, defeat enemy spies, and spread bombs
"Although the two adopted a fake relationship on the cover, they eventually married in the third quarter and got married in the fourth quarter finale."
"Due to the low ratings, the play faces the threat of cancellation every season, but with the help of loyal fans, the play can last for five seasons."
“… The advertisement of e report



Number  419
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maryse appears to back off when she buys Miz a burger, but it turns out to be a tofu-vegetable type of burger that Miz agrees tastes just as good as the real deal.”
“Thinking there’s no way she’ll follow through on the terms, Miz orders her the juiciest steak he can find and is left speechless when she eats a bite of it, condemning him to seven days of meatless-ness.”
“This is not a huge problem, though it does lead to some entertaining spats between the two and a bet wherein Miz agrees to go vegetarian for one week if Maryse has only one bite of meat.”
“Maryse is a strict vegetarian, and The Miz is not.”
“The Miz is left speechless after losing a bet to vegetarian wife Maryse.”


"Maryse seems to give in when buying Miz a hamburger, but it turns out that it's a tofu vegetable hamburger, and Miz agrees that it tastes as good as the real one."
"Miz thought it was impossible for him to act according to the terms, so he ordered her the most juicy steak he could find. After a bite, Miz was speechless and accused him of not eating meat for seven days."
"It's not a big problem, though it did lead to some interesting quarrels between the two and bet that if marise had only one bite of meat, Miz would agree to be a vegetarian for a week."
"Mary is a strict vegetarian, Miz is not."
"After losing to Maris, a vegetarian wife, Miz couldn't speak."



Number  420
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It became too much for me.”Image zoom Credit: Paul Hebert/ABC via GettyThough the relationship was real both on and off camera, Stanton said that after the show, “all he wanted to do is party and not call me.””
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The situation began on Thursday morning after Hayes reportedly responded to a since-deleted tweet from Stanton, 27, about how one of her exes, whom she chose not to name, had emailed her about a payment issue with her Disneyland Annual Pass, according to E!”
“News.”
“I got a new debit card last month and got an email from an ex this morning forwarding me an email that his Disneyland Annual Pass payment was declined to update my card info I sure know how to pick em she wrote in the since deleted message according to...”
“...the outlet...”
“Claiming he wanted to clarify the situation, Hayes replied with screenshots of their private e-mail correspondence.”
““Lol is this how it happened or was I was trying to help you poor thing?”
“Let’s evaluate below everyone  (Read the whole thing),” he wrote alongside images of their exchange.”


"It's too much for me." Photo zooming credit: the Paul Herbert / ABC via Getty though relationship is real inside and outside the camera, and Stanton said after the show, "what he wants to do is have a party, not call me."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
According to e! "
"News."
"I bought a new debit card last month. This morning, I received an email from my ex girlfriend. He forwarded an email to me, saying that his annual ticket payment for Disneyland was refused and updating my card information. I certainly know how to select them. She wrote in the deleted email, according to..."
“… Exit... "
Hayes claimed he wanted to clarify the situation and replied to a screenshot of their private email correspondence
"Ha ha, how did this happen, or do I want to help you, poor guy?"
"Let's evaluate it under everyone," he wrote next to the pictures they exchanged



Number  421
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“People around him didn’t think he was going to finish it and knew from the start this was very ambitious for him.””
“He just didn’t want to do it anymore.”
“Justin Bieber made his first public appearance since canceling the remaining 14 shows of his Purpose world tour in July.”
“The “Sorry” singer, 23, enjoyed a night out on Thursday, August 3, at the launch party for celebrity stylist Karla Welch’s Bieber-inspired collection with Hanes.”
“The Grammy winner, who sported clear glasses and a small black backpack, was all smiles as he posed for photos with fans outside the event, held at Maxfield in West Hollywood.”
“Bieber socialized with his manager Scooter Braun and Braun’s wife, Yael Cohen, throughout the evening, and also took a moment to admire a large photo of himself on the wall.”
“As previously reported, the “What Do You Mean” crooner canceled the remainder of his tour, citing “unforeseen circumstances.” Bieber took to Instagram on Wednesday, August 2, to address the news and apologize to his fanbase.”
““I’m so grateful for this journey with all of you.. I’m grateful for the tours but most of all I am grateful to get to go through this life with you.”
“Learning and growing hasn’t always been easy but knowing I’m not alone has kept me going.”
“I have let my insecurities get the best of me at times, I let my broken relationships dictate the way I acted toward people and the way I treated them!”


"People around him thought that he would not finish, and knew from the beginning that it was very ambitious for him."
"He just doesn't want to do it anymore."
"Justin Bieber made his first public appearance in July after cancelling his remaining 14 performances on the world tour."
The 23-year-old "sorry" singer spent the night at the launch of the Bieber inspiration series for famous stylist Kara Welch and Hanes on Thursday, August 3
Wearing a pair of transparent glasses and a small black backpack, the Grammy winner smiles and takes a picture with his fans at the awards ceremony in Maxfield, West Hollywood
"All night long, Bieber went out with his manager, Scott Braun, and Braun's wife, Al Cohen, and spent some time admiring a big picture of himself on the wall."
As mentioned earlier, the "what do you mean" singer cancelled the rest of the tour for "unexpected circumstances.". Bieber visited instagram on August 2 (Wednesday) to post news and apologize to his fans
"I'm very grateful for this journey with all of you.. I appreciate this trip, but most of all, I appreciate spending my life with you. "
"It's not always easy to learn and grow, but knowing that I'm not alone keeps me going."
"I let my insecurity take up most of my time, and the relationship I let me break determines the way I treat others and the way I treat them!"



Number  422
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...didn’t miss a step.”
“The Bachelorette was on, my roommates were sipping Sauvignon Blanc on the couch, and I was stuck in my 7 by 5 foot closet-of-a-bedroom making sure I (God forbid!)”
“Below, the comprehensive list:THE LINEUPGrand Total: $3,050.98The Verdict: To be honest, I went into this experiment not expecting to see much of a difference in the way my skin and makeup looked.”
“...her product rundown would cost me if brands didn’t help with this We Tried It pursuit by generously sending over the products.”
“And that’s not even counting the financial burden (over $3,000!!!)”
“I thought I was high-maintenance to begin with, but after three days of Kim’s routine, I felt completely exhausted.”
“Level Of Difficulty: Basically, a 10/10.”
“I felt queasy looking at the price tags on some of the products — you’ll understand when you see for yourself — but hoped it would all be worth it.”
“Image zoomSo I started digging, made a long list of every product Kim has said she loves and swears by and then replaced everything in my arsenal with her approved picks.”
“And I wondered, would her go-to products work the same magic on me?”


“… I didn't miss a step. "
"Everlasting longing for each other, my roommates sipped the face on the sofa while I was trapped in a 7 - 5 foot bedroom closet, to ensure that I was (God)!"
Conclusion: to be honest, I participated in this experiment, and I didn't expect how different my skin and makeup would be
“…… If the brand can't help, her products will cost me money, and we will send them generously. "
"It's not a financial burden (over $3000)!"
"At first I thought I was well maintained, but after three days of routine, I felt exhausted."
"Difficulty level: basically 10 / 10."
"I feel uncomfortable looking at the price tags on some products - you'll see it with your own eyes - but I hope it's worth it."
"I started mining images, listing a long list of every product Kim said she liked and swore to, and then replaced all of my products with choices she recognized."
"I wonder if she has the same magic power for me?"



Number  423
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We had the camera breathe more.”
“I just wanted it to breathe more, and I think we did that.”
“The visual language — that maybe I brought to it, especially in the second season — helped to define what that was.”
“I think that these point of views became stronger.”
“You immediately, as an audience, get sucked in.”
““Who’s point of view is this?” They started doing point of view stories, which they discovered were very successful — which it always is because it’s from your character’s point of view.”
“You write a story and then your story starts to speak to you, and I believe that they had some growing pains in the beginning.”
“My perspective is that Damon and Tom Perrotta were really discovering what the show was about.”
“There’s been a lot of talk about what changed and what didn’t change between Season 1 and Season 2.”
“There were some growing pains in the beginnings of “The Leftovers.” That’s no secret.”


"We let the camera breathe more."
"I just wanted it to breathe more, and I think we did it."
"Visual language - maybe I brought it, especially in the second season - helped define what that was."
"I think these views have become stronger."
"As an audience, you're immediately attracted."
"Whose view is that? "They started doing perspective stories, and they found it very successful - it's always because it's from your character's point of view."
"You write a story, and then your story begins to talk to you. I believe they have some growing pains at the beginning."
"My point is that Damon and Tom Perrotta really discovered the content of the show."
"Between season one and season two, there's a lot of talk about what's changed and what hasn't changed."
"At the beginning of leftover women, there were some growing pains. It's not a secret. "



Number  424
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If the desire (for another child) comes around, it will happen, that’s the way I look at it."”
“We’ve always had the same values.”
“The "World of Dance" host graces the March cover of Health magazine and inside, she opens up about her marriage to hubby Channing Tatum, revealing— surprise!”
“— it takes work.”
“"When people say you guys have such a perfect life, I want to scream and tell them no one’s perfect," said 37-year-old Dewan Tatum.”
“The actress and dancer said she and her husband, who tied the knot in 2009, are lucky because they "fit" well together.”
“"I think there are such things as great fits.”
“It is a great fit as long as you are growing together, and I think up until this point we’ve really grown together.”
“Even if one starts to grow, the other catches up and vice versa," she explained.”
“But, she said, a healthy marriage takes constant fine-tuning.”


"If there is a desire (for another child), it will happen, and that's what I see."
"Our values have always been the same."
The host of dance world appeared on the March cover of health magazine, in which she disclosed her marriage to her husband Channing Tatum, revealing a surprise
"It takes work."
"When people say your life is so perfect, I want to scream and tell them that no one is perfect," said Dewan Tatum, 37
The actress and dancer said she and her husband, who married in 2009, were lucky because they "got along well."
"I think some things fit well."
"As long as you grow up together, it's a good fit, and I think we've really grown up together so far."
"Even if one starts to grow, the other will catch up, and vice versa," she explains
"But, she said, a healthy marriage needs constant fine-tuning."



Number  425
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Caleb McLaughlin, who won the award for best youth performance, got massive applause for his spins and splits.”
“The kids of Blackish, This Is Us and Stranger Things kicked things off on the dance floor, forming a circle and showing off their best moves.”
“Ava DuVernay, Anthony Anderson, Tracee Ellis Ross, Daniel Kaluuya and Omari Hardwick won big at the NAACP Image Awards, applauding the creative accomplishments of people of color.”
“But there were a few memorable moments that didn't make TV One's live telecast from the Pasadena Civic Auditorium.”
“The Hollywood Reporter shares the things the live broadcast missed:1.”
“Before host Anderson kicked off his opening monologue with talk of Oprah Winfrey's potential presidential run (“Why would she move to a smaller house?”), attendees turned to THR to brainstorm who her running mate could be.”
“Lil Rel Howery suggested Gayle King, Loretta Devine mentioned Tyler Perry and Yvonne Orji hoped for Michelle Obama.”
“Storm Reid, who is 14 years old and won’t be eligible to vote in 2020, said of her Wrinkle in Time co-star, “I’d vote for her if I could — it’s way better than what we have right now!”2.”
“Anticipation was high for the upcoming Marvel movie Black Panther, as its stars Chadwick Boseman, Michael B. Jordan, Danai Gurira, Sterling K. Brown and Kaluuya were in attendance.”
“"It's gonna change the world — I genuinely felt that on set," Kaluuya told THR.”


"Caleb McLaughlin won the best youth performance award, and his rotation and split leg won warm applause."
"Black children, this is us kicking things with strangers on the dance floor, forming a circle, showing their best action."
"EVA duvinai, Anthony Anderson, Tracy Ellis Ross, Daniel Karua and Omari hadvik won the NAACP Image Award, applauding the creative achievements of people of color."
"But there were some memorable moments that were not televised live in the Pasadena Civic Hall."
"Hollywood journalists share the content of the live broadcast: 1."
Before Anderson began his opening remarks, he talked about Oprah Winfrey's presidential potential ("why did she move to a small house?" The participants turned to thr and brainstormed about who her running mate might be
"Lille Rael howry suggests Gael king, Loretta Devin mentions Tyler Perry, Yvonne olkie wants Michelle Obama."
Storm reed, 14, will not be eligible to vote in 2020. "If I can, I'll vote for her - it's much better than what we have now," she said of time's co stars 2.”
"People have high hopes for the upcoming Marvel comic film Panther because its stars, Chadwick Bosman, Michael B. Jordan, Danai gurilla, Stirling K. brown and karuya, are all present."
"It's going to change the world - I really feel it on set," karuya told the times



Number  426
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“Sign up to receive the top stories you need to know right now.”
“The couple made the announcement on Instagram and on Joanna Gaines’ blog.”
“On the HGTV show, the couple would renovate homes in Waco, Texas, where they’re from.”
““While we are confident that this is the right choice for us, it has for sure not been an easy one to come to terms with.”
“Our family has grown up alongside yours, and we have felt you rooting us on from the other side of the screen.”
“How bittersweet to say goodbye to the very thing that introduced us all in the first place,” the blog post read.”
“The couple added their marriage and family are doing well and the decision to end the show has nothing to do with a fraudulent skincare line or anything else you ll inevitably read Joanna Gaines previously shot down rumors that she would be leaving the show to launch a skincare...”
“...line...”
“However, if you were hoping one day the Gaines family would come and fix up your home, there’s still hope.”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
"Sign up now to receive the top stories you need to know."
"The couple announced it on instagram and Joanna Gaines' blogs."
"On HGTV, the couple will renovate their home in Waco, Texas."
"Although we believe that this is our right choice, it is definitely not an easy choice to accept."
"Our family grew up with your family, and we feel like you're supporting us on the other side of the screen."
"It's bittersweet to say goodbye to what was first introduced to all of us," the Post wrote
"The couple added that their marriage and family are doing well, and the decision to end the show has nothing to do with the fraudulent skincare line or anything else, and you will inevitably read that Joanna Gaines refuted the rumors that she was leaving the show to launch skincare products before..."
“… Ok... "
"However, if you hope that one day the Gaines will come to repair your house, there is hope."



Number  427
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“PA Media...”
“And the newlyweds also had the congregation sing, Guide Me, O Thou Great Redeemer, which was sung at Princess Diana’s funeral in 1997.”
“The emerald-cut aquamarine ring worn by Meghan once belonged to Harry’s mother and Diana’s sister, Lady Jane Fellowes, delivered a reading.”
“I can’t stop thinking of how happy Princess Diana is upstairs x.”The memory of Diana influenced aspects of the service at Windsor Castle, with several tributes to the late princess included in the ceremony.”
“You’re the most beautiful bride.”
“She said: “Congratulations Meghan and Harry.”
“And she posted a touching message on Instagram to Harry and “beautiful” Meghan, including a reference to the late Princess of Wales.”
“Despite not being invited to the Windsor Castle wedding of Harry and Meghan, the Hello singer donned a fascinator and veil for the big occasion and toasted the happy couple from her home with a glass of champagne.”
“Adele sent the new Duke and Duchess of Sussex a touching message on their wedding day (Yui Mok/PA)Adele remembered Diana, Princess of Wales in a poignant message to the new Duke and Duchess of Sussex on their wedding day.”


"Pa media..."
"The newlyweds also asked the congregation to sing" guide me, the great Redeemer, "which was sung at Princess Diana's funeral in 1997
Megan's Emerald cut Aquamarine Ring belonged to Harry's mother and Diana's sister, Mrs. Jane fallows, who read a letter
"I can't help thinking about how happy princess Diana is upstairs." The memory of Princess Diana influenced all aspects of the Windsor Castle ceremony, which included several mourning for the late princess
"You are the most beautiful bride."
"Congratulations to Megan and Harry," she said
She sent a touching message to Harry and "beautiful" Megan on instagram, referring to the late Princess of Wales
Although not invited to Harry and Megan's wedding at Windsor Castle, the "hello" singer put on a camouflage dress and veil for the grand wedding and toasted the happy couple with a glass of champagne at home
"Adele sent a touching letter (YUI Mok / PA) to the new Duke and Duchess of Sussex on the wedding day. Adele remembered Diana, Princess of Wales, in a touching letter to the new Duke and Duchess of Sussex on the wedding day



Number  428
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'””
“I hope that clears it up.”Image zoom Credit: Eliza Morse/NetflixShe then refers to an article in Teen Vogue about the show.”
“The series follows former Disney darling Debby Ryan as a high school student named Patty who was bullied relentlessly about her weight.”
“After an incident leads to her jaw being wired shut over the summer, Patty shows up for the first day of her senior year looking rather different — and thirsty for revenge against anyone who was mean to her.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“After the new trailer was released on Thursday the show faced significant backlash with critics accusing the show of fat shaming and calling it disgusting lazy and toxic Milano who plays the wife of Patty s lawyer tweeted that the show hopes to confront the issue of bullying not create...”
“...more of it...”
““We are not shaming Patty,” she writes.”
““We are addressing (through comedy) the damage that occurs from fat shaming.”
“Ryan hasn’t addressed the backlash directly, but she too pointed her Twitter followers to the Teen Vogue article and posted a screenshot of a highlighted section that reads: “When she returns to school, everyone’s stunned by her physical change.”


“'””
"I hope that clarifies that." Credit for image zooming: Eliza Morse / Netflix she went on to mention an article in teen fashion magazine about the show
"This series tells the story of Debby Ryan, Disney's former favorite, a high school student named patty, who is mercilessly bullied because of her weight."
"After one thing caused Patty to strangle her chin all summer, she appeared on her first day of senior year and looked totally different - eager to revenge anyone who was mean to her."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"After the release of the new trailer on Thursday, the show faces a huge backlash, with critics accusing it of being fat and humiliating and calling it disgusting, lazy and poisonous Mirano. Mirano, who plays Patty's lawyer's wife, tweeted that the show wants to face bullying rather than create... "
“… More... "
"We are not insulting patty," she wrote
"We're dealing with the harm of obesity [through comedy]."
"Ryan didn't solve the problem directly, but she also led her twitter followers to Teen Vogue's article and posted a highlighted screenshot that said," when she got back to school, everyone was stunned by her physical changes. "



Number  429
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The picture is of another Selena character — but you’ll have to watch to find out which one.”
“When she’s alone again, she takes a Polaroid out, caressing it lovingly.”
“Then Mom Gomez knocks on the door, and Daughter Gomez pretends to be asleep on the bed.”
“Toward the end, the teenage wallflower finally lets loose in her room, dancing around and singing as the song crescendos.”
“In the super-’70s video for the slow-building song, Gomez portrays a shy high schooler, a gym coach with a Farrah Fawcett-inspired coif, a bespectacled male teacher, and a mom, all of whom are interconnected in unexpected ways.”
“Selena Gomez takes on a new role in the “Bad Liar” music video — or, to be more specific, multiple new roles.”


"This picture belongs to another Selena character - but you have to see which one."
"When she was alone again, she took out a polaroid and caressed it."
"Then mom Gomez knocks on the door and daughter Gomez pretends to sleep in bed."
"Towards the end, the teenage wallflower finally relaxed in her room. As her singing became stronger, she danced and sang everywhere."
"In the video of super slow architecture songs of the 1970s, Gomez depicts a shy high school student, a sports coach in a Farah Fossett headscarf, a male teacher with glasses, and a mother, all of whom are connected in unexpected ways."
Selena Gomez has played a new role - or more specifically, a number of new roles - in the "bad liar" music video



Number  430
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Thankfully, we do have something wonderful to hold us over until this very special episode airs…Creator Roberto Aguirre-Sacasa and cast members alike posted an *amazing* announcement — in the form of a heavily-edited cast list.”
“We still haven’t even watched the Archie-Mr. Lodge fight scene yet, and a *lot* can happen between now and April.”
“It’s set to air on Wednesday, April 18th at 8:00 p.m., and who knows what drama Archie and the gang will get up to by then?”
“All 11 songs featured in the episode will be performed by Riverdale cast members and are originals from the Carrie musical, which was first staged in 1988.”
“Of course, there will also be a behind-the-scenes documentary on the student musical, and that will be filmed by none other than Jughead Jones.”
“The majority of the main cast will be in supporting roles — Archie as Tommy Ross, Betty as Sue Snell, and Veronica as Chris Hargensen, for starters — and Kevin Keller will direct.”
“Per Entertainment Weekly, Riverdale High will stage a musical adaptation of Carrie that stars the incendiary Cheryl Blossom in the title role.”
“The Riverdale musical episode will air this season and feature 11 songs sung by the cast.”
“Yes, *that* Carrie, Stephen King’s high school horror classic.”
“Like many teen dramas before it, Riverdale is planning a musical episode based on the musical adaptation of Carrie.”


"Thank God, before this very special show was broadcast, we did have something wonderful to support us Creator Roberto Aguirre sacasa and the cast have both made a 'stunning' announcement - in the form of a heavily edited cast
"We haven't even seen Mr. Archie Lodge fight yet. There are a lot of things that could happen between now and April."
"It's scheduled to air at 8 p.m. on Wednesday, April 18. Who knows what will happen to Archie and the gang then?"
"All the 11 songs in this episode will be sung by the actors in Riverdale. They are all original songs from the first carri musical in 1988."
"Of course, there will be a behind the scenes documentary about student musicals, which will be shot by judead Jones."
"Most of the main actors will be supporting actors - Archie as Tommy Ross, Betty as Sue Snell, Veronica as Chris hagenson, and first - Kevin Keller will direct."
According to entertainment weekly, a musical adaptation of Carrie will be staged at Riverdale high school, starring sensational Cheryl bruson
"The Riverdale collection will be broadcast this season, with 11 songs sung by actors."
"Yes, * that * Carrie, Stephen King's high school horror classic."
"Like many previous teen dramas, Riverdale is planning a musical episode based on the musical adaptation of Carrie."



Number  431
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple have been married since September 2013.”
“Menstruating, childbirth and sex are natural, too, but that doesn’t mean I want to see pics of it and/or celebrities like @chrissyteigen taking a bath or nursing.”
“The 32-year old hit back once again against social media haters who bashed her for sharing a photo of her breastfeeding.”
“'I think it’s perfectly find for women who breast feed in public.”
“They are doing it because they need to.”
“When you post on social media that you are doing it, it comes across as narcissistic though,' wrote the critic who has since deleted the tweet.”
“Breastfeeding controversy: Chrissy Teigen was breastfeeding baby Miles on Saturday when daughter Luna asked her to feed her doll as wellBreastfeeding backlash: A handful of people on social medium seemed to have a problem with her breastfeeding pictureChrissy wasted no time responding as she tweeted back: 'Nah.”
“Just chillin.”
“Posting daily life like I do with anything else.”
“Cooking, playing with dogs, etc.”


"The couple have been married since September 2013."
"Menstruation, childbirth and sex are also natural, but that doesn't mean I want to see pictures of it and / or celebrities like @ christeiteigen bathing or nursing."
"At 32, she hit back at people who hated social media for criticizing her for sharing a picture of breastfeeding."
"I think it's the perfect choice for women who breast feed in public."
"They do it because they need to."
"When you post what you're doing on social media, it's narcissistic," the critic, who later deleted the tweet, wrote
"Breastfeeding controversy: when Chris Teigen was breastfeeding Myers on Saturday, her daughter Luna asked her to feed her baby, which is a strong objection to breastfeeding: some people on social media seem to have problems with her breastfeeding picture. She tweeted back: "no, it's a waste of time."
"Calm down."
"Connect everyday life with everything else."
Cooking, playing with dogs, etc



**Something goes wrong**
“Alexis prefers Junior.”
“She is the analog to her husband-to-be’s digital.”
“Alexis Olympia Ohanian, Jr. was born on September 1, 2017.”
““We’re not spending a day apart until she’s 18,” Williams says, only half-joking.”
“Williams wears a Valentino dress and Irene Neuwirth bracelet.”
“Fashion Editor: Tonne Goodman.”
“On a moist South Florida morning at the end of a relentless hurricane season, their wedding only a week away, Serena Williams and Alexis Ohanian are seated side by side at their long kitchen table discussing the Marshmallow Test.”
“Some 50 years ago, in a famous experiment, the Stanford University psychologist Walter Mischel invited children to choose between a small immediate reward, such as a marshmallow, or, if they could sit and wait for fifteen minutes, a larger prize.”
“The children who found ways to stave off temptation—by singing songs or pulling pigtails—went on to have higher SAT scores and lower body-mass indexes than their ravenous peers.”
““I would have eaten that marshmallow,” says Serena, who, in conspicuous contrast to that image, sips a radioactive-looking broth, which she nudged her chef to prepare after reading online that ginger and turmeric were supposed to aid in breast-milk production.”


"Alexis prefers young people."
"She's like her future husband's digital camera."
"Alexis Olympia Ohanian, Jr. was born on September 1, 2017."
"We won't be apart for a day until she's 18," Williams said half jokingly
"Williams is wearing a Valentino dress and Irene norworth's bracelet."
"Fashion editor: Tony Goodman."
On a wet morning in southern Florida, with the hurricane season coming to an end and their wedding only a week away, Serena Williams and Alexis Ohanian sat side by side at a long kitchen table discussing marshmallow tests
About 50 years ago, in a famous experiment, Stanford University psychologist Walter Mitchell invited children to choose between a small immediate reward (such as marshmallow) and a larger reward (if they could sit and wait for 15 minutes)
"Children who avoid temptation by singing or braiding have higher SAT scores and lower body mass index than their greedy peers."
"I would have eaten marshmallows," said Serena, who, in sharp contrast to this photo, sipped a broth that looked radioactive and pushed the chef to prepare it after she saw on the Internet that ginger and turmeric should help breast milk production



**Something goes wrong**
“Don’t miss Emma as she presents at the 2018 Golden Globe Awards this Sunday.”
“While Emma did get a pixie cut eight years ago, the new bangs are choppy and about halfway down her forehead – still quite a dramatic difference from the longer styles she’s had more recently.”
“#oursharedshelf,” she captioned it, referring to the book in her hand, her latest pick for her feminist book club, Our Shared Shelf.”
“PHOTOS: Check out the latest pics of Emma Watson“Have you had a chance to pick up a copy of @oursharedshelf Jan/Feb book choice, Why I’m No Longer Talking to White People About Race by @renieddolodge ?!”
“The 27-year-old The Circle actress debuted her new haircut on Instagram on Friday (January 5), featuring a bold set of bangs.”
“Emma Watson has a fresh new ‘do!”


"Don't miss Emma's 2018 Golden Globe Awards ceremony on Sunday."
"Although Emma did cut an elf eight years ago, the wavy shape of the new bangs and about half of her forehead are still very different from her latest long bangs."
"Our shared bookshelf," she wrote in the title, referring to the book in her hand, the latest work she picked for the feminist book club "our shared bookshelf."
"Photos: check out the latest photos of Emma Watson." do you have a chance to get a Book of @ oursharedself's January / February book "choice, why don't I talk about race with white people anymore" @ renieddoledge? "
"The 27 year old actress showed off her new hairstyle for the first time on instagram on Friday (January 5) with a bold bangs."
"Emma Watson has a new goal



**Something goes wrong**
“...make your own lemonade kit among other goodies...”
“Photographed by Sarah FalugoMore than 2,000 blooms were used to create the floral arrangements, all designed by Kristen Griffith-VanderYacht of Wild Bloom, including 100 flower boxes and at least 200 garden roses in the reception centerpieces.”
“...wedding...”
“Subscribe now for exclusive photos inside the gorgeous celebration — only in PEOPLE!”
“It was a night of “perfection” for Julianne Hough.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Dancing with the Stars judge married NHL star Brooks Laich on July 8 in a romantic, outdoor wedding on Lake Coeur d’Alene, Idaho, where Hough spent summer holidays growing up.”
““When I introduced Brooks to the lake, he fell in love with this special spot, and we knew this was where we wanted to raise our family and grow old together,” Hough, 28, tells PEOPLE in this week’s exclusive cover story.”
““It just felt right to be married here.”Designed by event planner Troy Williams of Simply Troy Lifestyle + Events, the wedding weekend was a celebration of love and nature — both of which were essential to the bride and groom.”
““It was really important to me that we had our ceremony outdoors,” says Laich, 34, who wore a Brooks Brothers tuxedo.”


“… Make your own lemonade and other goodies... "
"Photographed by Sarah falugomo, more than 2000 flowers were used to make flower arrangements, all designed by Kristen Griffith vanderyacht of wild bloom, including 100 flower boxes and at least 200 garden roses at the reception center."
“… Wedding... "
"Now subscribe to exclusive photos of gorgeous Celebrations - people only!"
"It was a perfect night for Julian Hoff."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Dancing with stars" judges and NHL star Brooks Leckie held a romantic outdoor wedding on July 8 in Lake Cowell Darren, Idaho, where Hoff spent his summer growing up
"When I introduced Brooks to the lake, he fell in love with this special place, and we knew it was a place where we wanted to support our family and grow old together," Hoff, 28, told people in his exclusive cover story this week
"It's nice to get married here." Designed by event planner Troy Williams, "simple Troy lifestyle + events," the wedding weekend is a celebration of love and nature - both essential for the bride and groom
"It's really important for me that we get married outdoors," said rich, 34, wearing the Brooks brothers' evening dress



Number  435
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“1 hit in the United States in 2016.”
““After hours of begging him for scraps of honesty, I chipped away just enough to confirm that this is not the first time he’s remorsely [sic] cheated on me,” she wrote in another post, listing some of the other women she had questioned him about.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Alex Pall of The Chainsmokers fame found himself in hot water on Tuesday when his girlfriend Tori Woodward shared photos she alleges are of him kissing another girl Alex Pall the Grammy winning deejay who is one half of the powerhouse EDM pop duo The Chainsmokers found himself in hot...”
“...water on Tuesday when his now ex girlfriend Tori Woodward shared photos she alleges are of him kissing another girl...”
“The pictures of Pall’s apparent indiscretion were captured at a residential location by CCTV and posted to Woodward’s Instagram Stories in a series of snaps — each with a series of savage messages thrown his way.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Alex is disgusting.”
“Men are trash.”
“Don’t ever forget it,” Woodward wrote on one of the surveillance shots, which Woodward later accused Pall of reporting to Instagram after it was deleted by the social network site.”


"There was one success in the United States in 2016."
"I've been begging him for hours to tell me the truth, but in the end I swore that it wasn't the first time he had been unfaithful to me," she wrote in another blog post
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"On Tuesday, Alex Parr of chain smokers found himself in trouble. His girlfriend Tori Woodward shared a picture of him kissing another girl. Alex pall is a Grammy winner deejay, and deejay is a member of chain smokers
“…… On Tuesday, his current ex girlfriend, Tori Woodward, shared what she claimed was a picture of him kissing another girl... "
"Bauer's apparently indecent photos were taken by CCTV in a residential area and published in the form of a series of snapshots in Woodward's instagram story - each with a series of savage messages
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Alex is disgusting."
"Men are rubbish."
"Don't forget that," Woodward wrote in one of the surveillance photos. Woodward later accused Parr of reporting to instagram after being deleted by social networking site instagram



Number  436
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Lovehappy" Produced by Dave Sitek of TV On The RadioMeanwhile, Beyoncé and Jay-Z continue their international On The Run II tour through the fall.”
“"Black Effect" Produced by Cool and Dre 9.”
“Just when it seemed June couldn't get any hotter for lovers of rap and R&B, the inevitable has finally happened: After a collaboration built on musical legacy and love for the past 15 years, Beyonce and Jay-Z have released a joint album as The Carters.”
“The surprise LP, Everything Is Love, premiered Saturday afternoon exclusively on Tidal, the digital streaming platform owned in part by Jay-Z, but appeared on Spotify on Monday morning.”
“The nine-song album, which features Bey and Jay on every track, comes in the middle of a month chock full of chart-topping releases from some of the biggest names in hip-hop and R&B.”
“Less than 24 hours earlier, Nas released his 11th solo album, Nasir, which was executive produced by longtime Jay-Z collaborator Kanye West.”
“And West, of course, is in the middle of a run of five releases which he's executive produced, including his own album, ye, Pusha T's Daytona, West and Kid Cudi's Kids See Ghosts and an album by Teyana Taylor that's due next Friday.”
“The credits to Everything Is Love appeared online soon after its Tidal premiere, and the producer list is (obviously) impressive.”
“Here's a rundown of the album's tracks with each song's producers and singers.”
“Everything Is Love 1.”


Meanwhile, Beyonce and jay z continue their international tour in the autumn
Cool and dre9's "black effect"
"Just in June, when rap and R & B fans no longer seem to be hot, the inevitable thing finally happened: Beyonce and Jay-Z released a joint album as Carter after a 15 year partnership based on musical heritage and love."
"Surprise LP" all is love "premiered exclusively on tidal, a digital streaming platform partly owned by Jay-Z, on Saturday afternoon, but appeared on spotify on Monday morning
"There are nine songs in this album, and each song has the figure of Bei and Jay Chou. In a month, this album is full of the top of some big names in hip hop and R & B circles."
Less than 24 hours ago, NAS released his 11th solo album Nasir, which was produced by kanyewest, a long-term partner of Jay-Z
"Of course, West is also on his five albums, including his own ye, pushat's Daytona, West and Kidd Cuddy's kid to hell, and Tyana Taylor's next Friday."
"It's all love" appeared online shortly after its tidal premiere, and the list of producers was (obviously) impressive
"The following is a summary of the album repertoire of the producers and singers of each song."
"All is love."



Number  437
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She assured that she is “committed to making this world a better place to live,” adding, “I will continue to learn from, and be open to, ALL people.””
“Signup for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“(Zolciak-Biermann had called castmate NeNe Leakes‘ home a “roach nest” — a term many of the women told her on Sunday they felt was racist for its cultural implications of impoverished black women living in the projects.)”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Speaking to Cohen, Zolciak-Biermann continued to deny claims that she is racist — and said racism is only something being magnified by social media.”
““This whole racism thing in this day in age is b—.”
“Everyone of those m—s on that couch owe this world a f— apology for this racism s—,” Zolciak-Biermann said.”
““They already tried to claim that s— long ago.”
“Nobody bought into it then because the social media wasn’t there and racism wasn’t f— all that real.”
“You know it.”In an Instagram post on Thursday, Zolciak-Biermann backtracked, writing, “During the last RHOA Reunion episode, I made a comment that confused and offended people.”


She pledged that she would "be committed to making the world a better place," adding, "I will continue to learn from everyone and open my heart to them."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"(zolciak Biermann once called castmate ne leakes' home a" cockroach nest "- on Sunday, many women told her that they thought the word was racist because of its cultural impact on poor black women living in these projects."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"While talking to Cohen, zorchak Bilman continued to deny that she was racist and said that racism was just something magnified by social media."
"In this day and age, racism is all about B -."
"Every M-S on the couch should apologize to the world for this racism," zolciak Biermann said
"They tried to claim it a long time ago."
"No one paid at the time because social media didn't exist and racism wasn't so real."
"You know that." On instagram on Thursday, zolciak Biermann backtracked, "I made a confusing and offensive comment in the last episode of the reunion of RhoA."



**Something goes wrong**
“The likeness of the two royals is physically manifested in the engagement ring Prince Harry gave Markle.”
“Their engagement rings coordinated.”
“Not everyone understood what she was doing and why, but in hindsight, it all makes complete sense.”
“...acknowledge the disease existed...”
“Her legacy is one of humanitarian work and beloved reverence now but during her time as a princess while she was still alive she was met with heated criticism for doing things like fighting the AIDS stigma in a time when even the U S president Ronald Reagan wouldn t...”
“Princess Diana was famously activism-focused.”
“This is probably the most striking comparison drawn between the two royals.”
“They are humanitarians.”
“Allow us to break it down.”
“Luckily we don't have to, since there's plenty of evidence to back it up, even without Harry's perspective in the mix.”


"The engagement ring that Prince Harry gave to Marcel shows the similarity between the two royal family members in appearance."
"Their engagement rings are in harmony."
"Not everyone understands what she's doing and why, but in hindsight, it all makes perfect sense."
“… Acknowledge the existence of disease... "
"Her legacy is humanitarian work and admirable now, but when she was a princess, she was still alive, and she met fierce criticism because of what she did, such as fighting the stigma of AIDS, at a time when even US President Ronald Reagan would not..."
"Princess Diana is known for her radicalism."
"This is probably the most striking comparison between the two royal family members."
"They are humanists."
"Let's break it down."
"Fortunately, we don't have to because there's enough evidence to support it, even without Harry's view."



Number  439
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Texas – Kirby LindleyMissouri – Sophia Dominguez-HeithoffMaryland – Taylor SpruillIowa – Carley ArnoldIndiana – Paige RobinsonNevada – Alexis SmithOregon – Vanessa MathesonOklahoma – Baylee OgleNew York – Isabella GriffithUtah – Rachel BellVermont – Kelsey GolonkaWyoming – Autumn SchiefersteinWest Virginia – Olivia HutchisonCalifornia – Jaanu PatelArizona – Karly Riggs...”
“Click inside to see who made the Top 15!”
“Be sure to watch the pageant on Facebook or on the Miss U App where you’ll see Kalani Hilliker and K. Lee Graham as judges and Jorge Blanco perform from The Venetian Las Vegas.”
“Out of 51 amazing girls, only 15 are moving on to the final competition where Karlie Hay, Miss Teen USA 2016, will crown at the end of the program TONIGHT.”
“The Top 15 at the 2016 Miss Teen USA Pageant have just been announced!”


"Texas - corbrindley, Missouri - Sophia Dominguez hatoff, Maryland - Thales pruliova - Carly anodine Dina - Peggy Robinson Nova - Alexis Smith, Oregon - Vanessa Massino, krahoma - Bailey ogren, New York - Isabella Griffith, TUTA - Rachel belfmont State of Kent - kelsigoron cayoming - Western Virginia, Qiushi Fairstein - Olivia, Hutchison Whampoa, California - Kanu patrizona - kalirigges
"Click inside to see who's in the top 15!"
"Be sure to watch beauty contests on Facebook or miss u app, where you'll see kalani Hilliker and K. Lee Graham as judges and Jorge Blanco performing in Venetian Las Vegas."
"Of the 51 amazing girls, only 15 have made it to the finals, and Carly hay, Miss American teen 2016, will be crowned at the end of tonight's show."
"The top 15 of the 2016 Miss America junior beauty contest have just been announced!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Gilles says Brown was nothing but supportive and helped arrange the abortion and care for her afterward.”
“As for Brown’s claims that Gilles was pregnant with Belafonte’s baby and subsequently had an abortion, Gilles does confirm she had an abortion, but says the pregnancy was the result of a one-night stand, something she confided to Brown about.”
“Mel B Brown s former nanny claims the Spice Girls star seduced her when she was just 18 years old and proceeded to carry on a seven year sexual relationship this according to a new lawsuit...”
“Lorraine Gilles is suing Brown for defamation, claiming the singer lied about her in her declaration as part of her efforts to get a permanent restraining order against her estranged husband, Stephen Belafonte.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Brown previously claimed in court documents that after Belafonte hired Gilles to be their nanny in 2010 the relationship became sexual and he began paying her inordinate amounts of money Image zoom Credit Courtesy Lorraine Gilles Over the course of some three years I recently learned that Belafonte paid Lorraine...”
“...the nanny in excess of 300 000 for alleged nanny services she claimed...”
“Then in the spring of 2014, Brown alleged that the nanny and Belafonte announced their pregnancy, and stated that they wanted “all three of us to live together.” Brown said that Belafonte later demanded that the nanny have an abortion, and used Brown’s money to pay for it.”
“Image zoom Credit: CRYSTAL/Pacific Coast NewsBrown’s lawyer did not respond to a request for comment from PEOPLE.”
“Gilles believes Brown painted her as “a homewrecker, prostitute, and extortionist” and in her lawsuit, Gilles paints a very different picture of her life with Brown and Belafonte.”


"Giller said Brown just supported her and helped arrange the abortion and take care of her later."
"As for Brown's claim that giller was pregnant with Belafonte's child and subsequently had an abortion, giller did confirm her abortion, but said that the pregnancy was the result of one night stand, which she revealed to brown."
"Mel Brown's former nanny claimed the spice star seduced her when she was only 18 years old and continued her sexual relationship for seven years, according to a new lawsuit..."
Lorraine Giles sued Brown for defamation, claiming that the singer lied about her identity in the statement as part of her efforts to issue a permanent restraining order against her separated husband, Stephen Belafonte
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Brown previously claimed in court documents that after bellafonte hired giller as their nanny in 2010, they had sexual relations, and he began to pay her too much money. This is a picture zooming credit card provided by Lorraine giller. In about three years, I recently learned that bellafonte paid Lorraine..."
“… Nannies claim to serve more than 300000 nannies.... "
"Then in the spring of 2014, brown claimed that nanny and Belafonte announced their pregnancy and expressed the hope that" the three of us live together. " "Belafonte later asked the nanny to have an abortion and paid for it with Brown's money," Brown said
"Image scaling credit: lawyers for crystal / Pacific Coast News Brown didn't respond to requests for comment."
Giller believed that brown described her as "a family wrecker, prostitute and blackmailer". In her lawsuit, giller described a life picture quite different from brown and Belafonte



Number  441
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Congratulations, Rachel and Jamie!”
“The reunion was back in '07.”
“We were explaining the shenanigans we got into.”
““[Costar Channing Tatum] didn't go to his reunion in Tampa.”
“"Scott and I had come back from our 10-year reunion," Linden told the Orlando Sentinelin 2012.”
“The movie, which tells the story of a 10-year high school reunion, was inspired by his own reunion, which he went to alongside his old classmate, actor Scott Porter, who also starred in Dear John.”
“10 Years, which he both wrote and directed, was set at his alma mater, Lake Howell High School in Florida, though it was not actually filmed there.”
“His directorial debut was based on his high school reunion.”
“He also worked on the screenplay for the upcoming sci-fi movie Chaos Walking, an adaptation of the young adult novel by Patrick Ness, according to The Hollywood Reporter.”


This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Congratulations, Rachel and Jamie!"
"The reunion was as early as 2007."
"We're explaining our prank."
"[partner Channing Tatum] didn't go to the party in Tampa."
"Scott and I are back from a 10-year reunion," Linden told the Orlando Sentinel in 2012
"The film tells the story of a 10-year high school reunion, inspired by his own reunion. He joined his old classmate and actor Scott Porter, who also starred in Dear John."
"For 10 years, what he wrote and directed was at his alma mater, Lake Howell high school in Florida, although it wasn't actually filmed there."
"His directorial debut is based on a high school reunion."
He also wrote for the upcoming science fiction film "walking in troubled times," which is adapted from Patrick ness's youth novel, according to the Hollywood Reporter



Number  442
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can test your saliva morning and night and see how well you’re doing.”
“Actually, WelleCo sells sticks that can test the pH of urine or saliva.”
““I realized, this isn’t a fixed state of being.”
“I felt more emotionally balanced.” The change was so dramatic, “it was like a light bulb went off,” she says.”
“My digestion improved.”
“I started to lose weight, probably because my sugar cravings had subsided.”
““What I’d always thought were sunspots—actually, they were sugar spots— started to clear, and my skin looked tighter, dewier and plumper.”
“Within two weeks, her skin changed.”
“She walked out with a suggestion to switch to a plant-based alkaline diet, and a jar of the doctor’s custom-mixed powdered greens supplement.”
“On the recommendation of a friend who had recently enlisted London uber-nutritionist Simone Laubscher to help her weather a course of chemotherapy, Macpherson headed to Laubscher’s clinic in London’s Harley Street.”


"You can test your saliva sooner or later to see how well you're doing."
"In fact, welleco sells sticks that can test the pH of urine or saliva."
"I realize that this is not a fixed state of being."
"I feel more balanced." "It's a dramatic change," she said, "like a light bulb goes out."
"My digestion has improved."
"I started to lose weight, probably because my craving for sugar has subsided."
"In fact, I always thought it was sunspots. They were sugar stains - they began to clear. My skin looked tighter, wetter and fuller."
"In less than two weeks, her skin changed."
"She suggested switching to a plant-based alkaline diet and bought a can of mixed green powder supplements customized by the doctor."
On the recommendation of a friend, Macpherson went to London's Harley Street labor clinic. This friend recently asked Simone laucher, a nutritionist at Uber London, to help her through a chemotherapy course



Number  443
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow Randee Dawn on Twitter.”
“Watch the entire episode here.”
“It would hurt our achy, breaky hearts!”
“We don't know what prompts that declaration, but we certainly hope that's not the case!”
“YouTube"Guys, I think we can officially say that the Cyrus family reunion is over," says Cyrus at the end of the clip as they drive through Los Angeles, passing a billboard of the gang.”
“Is this the image that ends the Cyrus clan reunion?”
“It's proved so popular, it now has a show of its own!”
“"Carpool Karaoke: The Series," as you may know, is a spinoff from "The Late Late Show," where host James Corden traditionally drives around a single singer, or a band while interviewing them and jamming to their hits.”
“In the teaser clip, we see Billy Ray, Tish, Brandi, Trace, Braison and Noah — oh, and of course Miley — get all dolled up in mullet wigs, bandanas and (in Miley's case) a mouth grill to groove along with daddy's biggest hit.”
“The new episode of "Carpool Karaoke: The Series" on iTunes goes all the way back to 1992, when Billy Ray Cyrus lit up the country and pop charts with his "Achy Breaky Heart," by piling his family into a minivan for a run at that extremely memorable tune.”


"Follow randee dawn on twitter."
"Watch the whole episode here."
"It's going to hurt our hearts!"
"We don't know what prompted this statement, but we certainly hope that's not the case!"
"YouTube" guys, I think we can officially say that the Cyrus family reunion is over, "Cyrus said at the end of the film that they drove through Los Angeles and passed a gang billboard."
"Is this the end of the Cyrus family reunion?"
"It turns out to be very popular, and now it has its own show!"
“Carpool  Karaoke:The Series ”As you know, it's a derivative of "the late show," where host James Corden traditionally drives around a singer or band, interviewing them and interfering with their hit songs
"In the trailer, we see Billy Ray, tish, brandy, tres, Bryson and Noah - Oh, and Miley, of course - all wearing a Mugil wig, a big handkerchief and (in Miley's case) a barbecue rack, shooting with dad's favorite."
"The new episode of" carpool karaoke: Series "on iTunes dates back to 1992, when Billy Ray Cyrus lit the country and pop charts with his" achy breaky heart "and packed his family into a pickup truck and ran around with that unforgettable song."



Number  444
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Share...”
“— Gabrielle Union (@itsgabrielleu) February 8, 2018Looks like Union just got another big item to add to her happy list.”
“(Getty)Gabrielle Union is on the March 2018 issue of Redbook magazine, and in the accompanying interview, she opened up about her struggle with self-worth.”
““I’ve struggled with feelings of worthlessness for a very long time, probably until about last year, even though I had a body of work and I’m pretty accomplished,” Union admitted to the mag.”
“Union also admitted that her decision to open up about her experience with sexual abuse had triggered her PTSD but she wanted to tell her story because she felt a responsibility to offer that sense of safety and support Though she has talked about her sexual abuse for years in...”
“...public Union s best selling memoir We re Going to Need More Wine and the rise of the MeToo movement brought her story and the stories of so many others to the forefront...”
“Looking forward with positivityHer own safety net, she said, included her therapist and life coach, who had helped her to look forward and to look at the positive things in life.”
“To that end, Union has a “happy list” of the good things she has in her world as well as a vision board of the things she’d like to accomplish.”
““I’ve been able to look at my boards and say, ‘Damn, I put in a lot of work and deserve it.’ That’s helped me to stop feeling suspicious of joy.”
“To not sabotage something before I’ve had a chance to do it because I assume I’ll be rejected,” she said.”


"Share..."
"On February 8, 2018, isgabriel Leu looks like the League just got another big project added to her happiness list."
"In an interview with the Gabriel alliance published in the red book magazine in March 2018, she made public her struggle with self-worth."
"For a long time, I've been fighting against the sense of worthlessness, probably until last year, even though I had a lot of work and I was very successful," the union admitted in the magazine
"The Union also admitted that her decision to disclose her experience of sexual abuse triggered her PTSD, but she wanted to tell her story because she felt obliged to provide such security and support, even though she had been talking about her sexual abuse for many years..."
“…… "We're going to need more wine," the best-selling memoir of the public League, and the rise of the meto movement have pushed her story and many others to the forefront of the world... "
"Actively look forward to her own safety net, she said, including her therapist and life coach, who help her look forward and see the positive things in her life."
"To this end, the Union has a 'happy list' of the good things she has in her own world and a vision board for what she wants to accomplish."
"I was able to look at my board and say, 'damn it, I put in a lot of work and I deserve it.' It helped me to stop doubting happiness. "
"Don't destroy something until I have a chance to do it, because I think I'll be rejected," she said



Number  445
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo Credit: Bravo TV”
“TELL US – SHOULD EDDIE FORGIVE VICKI FOR THE GAY RUMORS?”
“Join us in the comments below for all of the snarking fun at 9/8 CST!”
“Shannon Beador heads to Mexico with her daughters for their first solo vacation since her divorce from David.”
“On tonight’s episode we’ll also see newbie Emily Simpson and her husband Shane celebrating their ninth wedding anniversary.”
“She introduces us and the other cast members to her new friend Gina Kirschenheiter, who recently moved to the OC from Long Island.”
““Kelly is stunned to learn that Vicki and Steve set up her ex-husband Michael and confronts Vicki over the betrayal.”Since Eddie isn’t allowed to do any heavy workouts due to his heart issues, Tamra takes over his fitness class.”
“While Vicki attempts to mend her relationship with Eddie and Tamra, she lands on Kelly Dodd‘s bad side.”
“This ought to be good.”
“Vicki attempts this latest round of “I’m sorry” by referencing Bible verses that relate to their situation.”


"Photo source: Bravo TV"
"Tell us - should Eddie forgive Wiki's rumors about homosexuality?"
"Join our comments at 9 / 8 CST!"
"Shannon BIDO is taking her daughters to Mexico for a holiday. It's her first solo holiday since her divorce from David."
"On tonight's show, we're going to see Emily Simpson and her husband Shane celebrate their ninth wedding anniversary."
"She introduced us and the other actors to her new friend Gina kirshhatt, who recently moved from long island to OC."
"Kelly was surprised to learn that Wiki and Steve framed Michael, their ex husband, and confronted wiki on the matter." Because of Eddie's heart problem, he was not allowed to do any heavy exercise, and Tamra took over his fitness class
"When wiki tries to repair her relationship with Eddie and Tamra, she's on the bad side of Kelly Dodd."
"It should be a good thing."
Wiki tries to express the latest round of "sorry" by quoting scriptures related to their situation in the Bible



Number  446
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Today, my rebirth begins."”
“"I did everything I could.”
“Isaac Brekken/Getty ImagesFor years, Kendra Wilkinson and Hank Baskett spoke openly about their marital problems, and their relationship seemed to take a toll when news spread in 2014 of Baskett's reported cheating while Wilkinson was pregnant with their second child.”
“"I messed up," Baskett told People during an interview.”
“"I put myself in a bad situation.”
“And everything through me brought pain upon this family."”
“Prior to their split, there were reports stating that the couple was planning on separating after being married since 2009.”
“Wilkinson seemingly confirmed it on Instagram on Monday, April 2.”
“Taking to her Instagram story, Wilkinson shared several photos and emotional videos addressing her relationship with Baskett.”
“"Ten years," she said.”


"Today, my rebirth begins."
"I've tried my best."
"For many years, Kendra Wilkinson and Hank Baskett have talked openly about their marriage. In 2014, Baskett was reported cheating when Wilkinson was pregnant with a second child, and their relationship seemed to be affected."
"I messed up," Bassett told people in an interview
"I put myself in a bad position."
"Everything about me has brought pain to the family."
"Before they broke up, there were reports that the couple had planned to live apart since they got married in 2009."
"Wilkinson seems to confirm that on instagram on Monday, April 2."
Wilkinson shared several photos and emotional videos on instagram about her relationship with basketball
"Ten years," she said



Number  447
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Lady Gaga Shares Photo of Herself in Boyfriend Christian Carino’s Arms While Wearing Pink Frilly BikiniLady Gaga Rocks a Skirt and Heels While Hiking With Boyfriend Christian Carino This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“RELATED CONTENT:Lady Gaga Shares Rare Photo With Boyfriend Christian Carino As She Pays Tribute to Late FriendLady Gaga Meets Up With Boyfriend Christian Carino After GRAMMYs -- See the Pics!”
“"I ask that of many people in my life, and my family, all the time."”
“"It's not just about it being my boyfriend," she said of moments when she runs off stage to ask Carino how she did during a performance.”
“"Simply fearless.”ET confirmed in February that Gaga was dating Carino, her talent agent, and last September, the 31-year-old singer talked with us about getting her boyfriend's input when it comes to her career.”
“"The Super Bowl jump was only a warm up," Carino captioned the clip on Instagram.”
“The brake scared the s**t out of me!” Gaga exclaims in the video.”
“"Oh, God!”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Lady Gaga shared with her boyfriend Christian Carino a picture of herself wearing a pink frilly bikini and hugging her boyfriend Christian Carino. Lady Gaga was wearing a skirt and high heels while hiking with her boyfriend Christian Carino. This video is not available because we can't load sponsor information. "
"Related content: Lady Gaga shares a rare photo with her boyfriend Christian carrino, paying tribute to her late friend. Lady Gaga meets her boyfriend Christian carrino after the Grammy Awards ceremony - look at the pictures
"In my life, I often ask my family that."
"It's not just about being my boyfriend," she said of running off the stage to ask carrino about his performance in the show
In February, et confirmed that Gaga was dating her agent Carino, and last September, the 31 year old singer talked to us about getting her boyfriend's support in her career
Carrino added a title to the video on instagram: "the Super Bowl jumper is just a warm-up."
"The brakes scared me! "Gaga exclaimed in the video."
"Oh, my God!"



Number  448
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The pair later documented their journey trying to overcome their issues on Kendra on Top and Marriage Boot Camp: Reality Stars.”
“In 2014, Baskett became embroiled in a sex scandal following news he allegedly had an affair with a transgender model while his wife was eight months pregnant with their daughter.”
“Kendra Wilkinson indulged in some liquid therapy following news she had filed for a divorce from husband Hank Baskett after almost nine years of marriage.”
“The former Girls Next Door star, 32, shared a photo of herself on her Instagram story on Friday, April 6, and captioned it, “Lol drunk bunny gamer” with crying-laughing emoji faces.”
“In the photo, she takes a sip from a frosted shot glass while wearing gamer headphones with a video game controller on her chest.”
“According to her Instagram story, earlier in the day, she kept busy by golfing with Jon Lovitz and did a puzzle wth her daughter Alijah, 3.”
“(Wilkinson and Baskett, 35, also share an 8-year-old son, Hank IV.)”
“As previously reported, the Kendra on Top star announced the end of her relationship with the retired football star in an emotional Instagram post on Friday morning.”
““Today is the last day of my marriage to this beautiful man.”
“I will forever love Hank and be open but for now we have chosen to go our own ways,” she wrote alongside a photo of the former couple.”


"The two later recorded how they overcame their problems in Kendra on top and marriage camp: Reality TV stars."
"In 2014, Basquet was involved in a sex scandal after news that he had an affair with a transgender model and that his wife was eight months pregnant with her daughter."
"Kendra Wilkinson is addicted to some fluid therapy after she has filed the news of divorce from her husband Hank Basquet in nearly nine years of marriage."
The 32 year old former next door star shared a picture of herself on instagram on Friday, April 6, with the caption "drunk rabbit gamer" on her face
"In the picture, she's wearing headphones and a video game controller on her chest, sipping from frosted glass."
"Earlier in the day, she was busy playing golf with Jon Lovitz and playing a jigsaw puzzle with her three-year-old daughter, aria, according to her instagram report
(Wilkinson and Basquet, 35, and an eight year old son, Hank IV.)
"As previously reported, the top star Kendra posted a touching post on instagram on Friday morning announcing the end of her relationship with the retired football star
"Today is my last day to marry this beautiful man."
"I will always love Hank and remain open, but now we choose to go our own way," she wrote next to a picture of the first two



Number  449
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Regardless of what happens under the leadership of this new White House, be comforted to know that Harvard will now be home to not one but two more Michelle Obamas in the making.”
“Yes, this is the same program that the Trump administration is reportedly planning to cut, although the White House denied this is the case in early May.”
“In truth, some of her hard work has been on the First Lady’s education initiative, Let Girls Learn, which is how she got to know Obama.”
“...calculus teacher at the Dwight School in New York City.”
““Um, hard work,” Shahidi, said, simply, before adding that she was also especially flattered to receive a recommendation from her A.P.”
“How did you get that?” Kimmel asked the actress, who said she would graduate from high school this year.”
“.”
““I heard you got a recommendation letter from the First Lady, from Michelle Obama .”
“During a March interview with Jimmy Kimmel, Shahidi told the late-night host a little more about her special recommendation letter.”


"No matter what happens under the leadership of the new White House, we should be glad to know that Harvard is no longer the home of one, but the home of two Michelle Obama."
"Yes, it's reported that it's the same plan that the trump administration plans to cut, but the White House denied that in early May."
"In fact, some of her hard work has been on the first lady's educational initiative to get girls to learn, and that's how she got to know Obama."
“… Calculus teacher at Dwight school in New York
"Well, work hard," shahidi said, quite simply, and then added that she was also particularly flattered to receive her A.P. recommendation
"How do you know? Kimmel asked the actress, who said she was graduating from high school this year
“.”
"I hear you've received a letter of recommendation from first lady Michelle Obama."
"In an interview with Jimmy Kimmel in March, shahidi detailed her special recommendation to the late night hosts."



Number  450
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A rep for Locklear didn’t immediately respond to ABC News’ request from comment.”
“Alcohol and drugs were not believed to have been factors in the crash, the department said.”
“Locklear, 55, who was driving alone in a Porsche, was taken to a hospital to be treated for non-life-threatening injuries, according to the Ventura County Sheriff's department, which is investigating the accident.”
“The "Melrose Place" actress was involved in a single-vehicle crash in Thousand Oaks, California, the Ventura County Sheriff’s Department confirmed to ABC News, in which she suffered minor injuries.”
“ -- Heather Locklear is recovering from a car accident Thursday evening, officials say.”


"A representative of Locklear did not immediately respond to ABC News's request for comment."
"Alcohol and drugs are not believed to be the cause of the crash," the Ministry said
"According to the County Security Department of Ventura, which is investigating the accident, the 55 year old, who was driving a Porsche alone, was taken to the hospital for treatment and his life was not in danger," he said
Ventura County police confirmed to ABC news that the "Melrose square" actress suffered minor injuries in a car accident in Thousand Oaks, California
Officials say Heather Locklear recovered from a car accident Thursday night



**Something goes wrong**
“Series six saw a contestant seemingly masturbate using a wine bottle.”
“During series five, a violent argument broke out, and police were called.”
“In the weeks running up to his death Russell spoke of his time on the show It just takes the pressure to a whole new level we were pushed to extremes In the UK we heard over the weekend that 26 year old Mike Thalassitis a contestant on the 2016”
“This all played out on, and off, television.”
“His marriage had broken down, and he was about to face a $1.5 million lawsuit.”
“Three years before, he’d appeared on Kitchen Nightmares, when Gordon Ramsay had yelled at him, “Your business is about to f*cking swim down the Hudson.” Then in 2011, Russell Armstrong, husband of Real Housewives Of Beverly Hills star Taylor Armstrong, committed suicide.”
“They include Joseph Cerniglia, a 39-year-old chef who took his own life in 2010.”
“In the past decade, 21 US reality TV stars have committed suicide.”
“These aren’t isolated incidents.”
“She was 31 years old.”


"In the sixth episode, I see a player masturbating with a wine bottle."
"In the fifth film, there's a big fight and a call to the police."
"In the weeks before his death, Russell talked about his time on the show, which just brought the pressure to a whole new level. We were pushed to the extreme in the UK. We heard last weekend that 26 year old Mike salaxitis was a contestant in the 2016 Olympic Games."
"It's all on TV and on TV."
"His marriage is broken and he's about to face a $1.5 million lawsuit."
"Three years ago, he was in a kitchen nightmare when Gordon Ramsey yelled at him," your business is rolling down the Hudson River. " Then in 2011, Russell Armstrong, husband of Beverly Hills star Taylor Armstrong's real housewife, committed suicide. "
"This includes Joseph cerniglia, a 39 year old chef who committed suicide in 2010."
"In the past decade, 21 American reality TV stars have committed suicide."
"These are not isolated events."
"She was 31."



Number  452
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“11.”
“She won 17 years ago for MTV Unplugged.”
“He also swept all four rap awards two years ago.”
“Kendrick Lamar Sweeps The Rap Categories (Again)Kendrick Lamar swept all four awards in the Rap Field.”
“Watch: Alessia Cara Wins Best New Artist5.”
“She's the first artist who was born in Canada to win in this category.”
“Alessia Cara: Canada's Best New ArtistBrampton, Ontario, native Alessia Cara won Best New Artist.”
“4.”
“The old record, shared by seven songs, was four co-writers.”
“"That's What I Like": 8 Songwriters Recognized"That's What I Like," with eight credited songwriters, set a new record as the Song Of The Year winner with the most co-writers.”


“11.”
"She won the championship 17 years ago for MTV Unplugged."
"Two years ago, he swept all four rap awards."
"Kendrick Lamar swept the rap category (again) Kendrick Lamar swept all four rap awards."
"Watch: Alicia Carla wins Best Newcomer Award 5."
"She is the first Canadian born artist to win this award."
"Alicia Kara: best new artist in Canada, Brampton, Ontario, native Alicia Kara wins best new artist."
“4.”
"There are seven songs on this old record. They are four co authors."
"This is what I like": eight songwriters recognized "this is what I like", and eight award-winning songwriters set a new record for the best song of the year, winning awards together with the most co authors



Number  453
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“When E!”
“News asked Gosling whether he had asked Ford about starring in the fifth Indiana Jones film he said: "I'm working on it man… easy."”
“He then jokingly added: "You just blew it for me."”
“It looks as though Gosling, who has just starred alongside Ford in Blade Runner 2049, isn't quite done working with his childhood hero - even if he did manage to "walk into" Harrison's fist on set.”
“But what did Ford have to say about the potential casting?”
“"I'm trying to wrap my head around that.”
“Too soon."”
“We'll be honest, it's not the most positive reaction we've ever heard, but then again it is Harrison Ford.”


nan


Empty follow up sentence
“Though the surgery went well, she battled a pulmonary embolism for six days that led to multiple surgeries and a handful of additional medical troubles.”
“...lungs...”
“WATCH Serena Williams Withdraws from Australian Open I m Not Where I Want to Be After Baby s Birth In the cover story of Vogue s February issue Williams revealed that she had a medical scare following the birth of her baby girl developing several small blood clots in her...”
““My coach and team always said ‘Only go to tournaments when you are prepared to go all the way.’ With that being said I am disappointed to say I’ve decided not to compete in The Australian Open this year,” she said.”
““After performing in my first match after giving birth I realized that although I am super close I’m not where I personally want to be,” Williams announced on Jan. 4.”
“30.)”
“(She lost an exhibition match against French Open champion Jelena Ostapenko on Dec.”
“Image zoom Serena Williams competing in the US Open in September 2016 | Credit: Jean Catuffe/GettyThe mother of one was previously scheduled to compete in the Australian Open to defend her title this month but withdrew just 12 days before the start of the tournament.”
“It will be the first time in two years that either Williams sister has been on the team.”
“Helping her defend the country’s Fed Cup championship is her sister Venus Williams.”


"Although the operation went well, she struggled with pulmonary embolism for six days, resulting in multiple operations and some additional medical problems."
“… Lung... "
"Watching Serena Williams quit the Australian Open" I'm not where I want to go "in the February cover story of vogue, Williams revealed that after her baby girl was born, her body appeared several small blood clots, which made her have medical fear..."
"My coach and the team always say, 'play only when you're ready to go all the way,' she said Having said that, I am disappointed to say that I have decided not to participate in the Australian Open this year
Williams announced on January 4: "after playing well in my first game after childbirth, I realized that although I was very close, I didn't reach the level I personally wanted."
“30.)”
"She lost to French Open champion jelina Ostapenko in a performance match on the 12th
"Serena Williams took part in the US Open in September 2016 | photo source: the mother of one of Jean catuffe / gettyhe's children originally planned to defend her title in the Australian Open this month, but dropped out 12 days before the start of the game."
"It's going to be the Williams sisters' first time in two years."
"It was her sister Venus Williams who helped her defend her Federal Reserve Cup title."



Number  455
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Bonanza $19.90”
““I got to go to her house.”
“How could she not, considering her name is an homage to the late Tejano singer.”
“So, while it’s no surprise that we see Selena love coming from the young singer, it was such a cute thrill to see her sporting a vintage Selena t-shirt.”
“Celebrities love to wear Selena Quintanilla tees!”
“We’ve seen Drake and Kylie Jenner pay tribute to the singer via fashion, so it’s very cool to see Selena Gomez share the love as well.”
“In 2016, Selena Gomez talked about how much her parents loved Selena Quintanilla, and what it was like to meet her family.”
““My dad and mom were huge fans.”
“My name was going to be Priscilla, but my cousin actually took the name when she was born six months before me.”
“They actually loved [Selena’s] music, so they just named me after her,” Selena Gomez said on a radio interview with Sacramento’s NOW 100.5.”


"Bonanza $19.90"
"I have to go to her house."
"Given that her name is a tribute to the late Triano singer, how could she not?"
"So it's no surprise when we see that the young singer's love comes from Serena, but it's lovely to see her wearing an old-fashioned Serena T-shirt."
"Celebrities like to wear Serena quintana T-shirts!"
"We've seen Drake and Kelly Jenner pay homage to the singer through fashion, so it's cool to see Selena Gomez share that love as well."
"In 2016, Selena Gomez talked about how much her parents loved Selena Quintanilla and how it felt to meet her family."
"My parents are super fans."
"My name was Priscilla, but my cousin took it when she was born six months before me."
"They really like [Serena's] music, so they just named me after her," Serena Gomez told Sacramento radio now 100.5



Number  456
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He was 59.”
“Mark was found dead April 30 at his home in Gloucestershire, England, according to The Daily Mail.”
“File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoMay 16 (UPI) -- Lisa Vanderpump is paying tribute to her late brother after a "devastating" couple of weeks.”
“The 57-year-old television personality dedicated a post Tuesday on Instagram to her brother, Mark Vanderpump, following his death in April.”
“AdvertisementVanderpump shared a throwback photo of herself with Mark at dinner.”
“She added a broken heart emoji in the caption.”
“"Rest In Peace big brother," the star wrote.”
“Rest In Peace big brother  A post shared by Lisa Vanderpump (@lisavanderpump) on May 15, 2018 at 4:45pm PDTThe Real Housewives of Beverly Hills star thanked fans for their support in a subsequent post.”
“"It's been a devastating couple of weeks... one day at a time..." she captioned a photo of herself riding her horse.”
“"I thank you all from the bottom of my heart for all your love and support.”


"He was 59."
Mark was found dead at his home in Gloucestershire on April 30, the Daily Mail reported
On the 16th, Lisa vanderpump paid tribute to her late brother after two weeks of "devastating" life
The 57 year old TV celebrity posted a blog post on instagram on Tuesday in memory of her brother Mark vanderpump, who died in April
"At the dinner party, advertiser van der Pol shared with mark a retrospective photo of herself."
"She added a heartbreak to the title."
"Rest in peace, big brother," the star wrote
"Rest in peace, big brother" Lisa vanderpump (@ lisavanderpump) shared a post at 4:45 p.m. on May 15, 2018. The star of "the real housewife of Beverly Hills" expressed her thanks to her fans for their support in the following post
"It's been a devastating week... Day by day... " She put a title on a picture of herself riding a horse
"I thank you from the bottom of my heart for your love and support."



Number  457
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was cool to just have that little moment away.”Us Weekly was first to report the news.”
““The whole family was up there.”
““I went on an air balloon trip with about 15 people … both my boys were up there with me, my wife was up there with me,” he recalled about a recent trip to Italy.”
“Two years ago, he opened up to PEOPLE about spending quality time with his family.”
“The star has two sons, Naviyd Ely Raymond, 9, and Usher Raymond V, 10, with Foster.”
“She has helped me through some of the hardest times in my life and my career,” he previously said about her.”
“Image zoom Credit: Bertrand Rindoff Petroff/GettyGrace Miguel and Usher“I have an incredible partner and manager.”
“Multiple sources confirmed in January of the same year that the star, who was previously married to Tameka Foster for two years, had proposed to Miguel, 48.”
“Though the singer, 39, and Miguel — who is also Usher’s manager — have kept their relationship largely out of the spotlight, buzz they had secretly wed spread in late 2015 when he was spotted wearing a gold band on his wedding finger while out and about in L.A.”
““The enormous amount of love and respect that we have for each other will only increase as we move forward.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


American weekly was the first to report the news
"The whole family is up there."
Recalling a recent trip to Italy, he said: "I went on a balloon trip with about 15 people My two sons are with me, and my wife is with me. "
"Two years ago, he opened up to people to have a good time with his family."
"The star has two sons, 9-year-old navid Erie Raymond and 10-year-old Arthur Raymond V and foster."
"She helped me through the most difficult times of my life and career," he said of her earlier
Image scaling credit: Bertrand rindoff Petroff / gettygrace Miguel and usher "I have an incredible partner and manager."
"In January of the same year, a number of sources confirmed that the star, who had been married to tameka foster for two years, proposed to Miguel, 48."
"Although the 39 year old singer and Miguel (who is also usher's agent) have been keeping their relationship out of the spotlight, rumors of their secret marriage spread in late 2015 when he was found out in Los Angeles wearing a gold ring on his wedding finger."
"Our love and respect for each other will only increase as we move forward." Get push notification of news, functions, etc



Number  458
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Related: Ariana Grande Wants People to Call the Las Vegas Shooting "Terrorism"”
“"Calling it off and going home was not an option.”
“While the attack may have prevented other musicians from performing live for a good amount of time and understandably so Ariana came back as resilient as ever ultimately headlining a benefit concert for those affected by the attack and continuing...”
“...the entirety of her tour with limited interruption...”
“And she did it with continuing grace, no less.”
“While Ari has spoken sparingly about her Manchester experience in the past mostly at that aforementioned benefit concert she opened up in a new interview with Coveteur on how abandoning her Dangerous Woman tour was never ever an option in...”
“...the midst of everything going on...”
““I don’t think I’ve been through anything as traumatic as [what] we’ve been through.”
“So .”
“.”


Related report: Ariana Grande wants people to call the Las Vegas shooting "terrorism"
"Cancel, go home is not an option."
"Although the attack may prevent other musicians from performing live for quite a long time, it is understandable that Ariana regained her flexibility and eventually hosted a charity concert for those affected by the attack and continued to..."
“… There was a break in her whole journey... "
"She continued to do it gracefully, not bad at all."
"Although Ali has rarely talked about her experience in Manchester in the past, mainly at the charity concert mentioned above, she revealed in a new interview with Kauft (Coveur) that giving up her dangerous women's tour has never been an option..."
“… Everything is going on... "
"I don't think I've experienced anything as painful as we have."
"So."
“.”



Number  459
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image zoomAlthough Hadid has not confirmed whether or not she runs Rebekka’s Instagram account, based off of the shots, we can presume Hadid is behind it.”
“Rebekka’s account has only been live for a few days, but she’s already racked up more than 15,000 followers, although she only follows five people including herself and best friend Fanny Bourdette-Donon, who is the International PR Director for Dior.”
“It appears the model has taken things so far, she even made her Rebekka an Instagram account too.”
“But Hadid didn’t just share photos of Rebekka’s excursions in Tokyo on her own Instagram.”
“,” Hadid captioned a photo of her alter ego.”
“Exclusive s–t.”
““Rebekka getting ready with Raffael.”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more.”
“Looking for more style content?”
“As the weekend progressed, Hadid continued to post photos posing as her blonde doppleganger, whether Rebekka was dancing at a club in a black beret or checking herself out in a mirror before a night on the town in Tokyo.”


"Although Hadid has not confirmed whether she runs Rebecca's instagram account, we can speculate that Hadid is behind the scenes from the photos."
"Rebekka's account has only been live for a few days, but she has attracted more than 15000 fans, but she only focuses on five people, including herself and her good friend Fanny bourdette donon, Dior's director of international public relations."
"It seems that the model has done a good job. She even turned her rebekka into an instagram account."
"But Hadid didn't just share photos of Rebecca's trip to Tokyo on his instagram."
"Hadid added a title to a picture of her other self."
"Exclusive s – T"
"Rebecca and Raphael are ready."
"Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle newsletters for amazing discounts, beauty products and more."
"Looking for more style content?"
"As the weekend goes on, Hadid continues to post photos of her as a blonde, whether Rebecca is dancing in a club in a black beret or looking in the mirror one night in Tokyo city."



**Something goes wrong**
“This content is imported from YouTube.”
“‘I tried to do the movie without nudity but realised it just wouldn’t be right to put the character through something that I, myself, am not willing to go through,’ Lawrence told Vanity Fair.”
“The Oscar winner is believed to have since married art gallery director Cooke Maroney, on October 19, 2019, at a Rhode Island venue.”
“'None of that was going to bring me peace and none of that was going to bring my nude body back to me and Nick [Holt], the person they were intended for,' she explained.”
“I think that I am still actually processingDespite the leak, the star decided not to sue the tech giant.”
“The Hunger Games star revealed that several women had contacted her about bringing a lawsuit against technology company Apple which later revealed hackers hadn't penetrated its systems, as was widely believed, rather targeted 'names, passwords and security questions'.”
“'You could just be at a barbecue and someone could just pull it up on their phone.'”
“There was not one person in the world that is not capable of seeing these intimate photos of me.'”
“Stephane Cardinale - Corbis Getty Images'I feel like I got gangbanged by the f*cking planet.”
“I think that I am still actually processing,' she explained.”


"This content was imported from YouTube."
"I tried not to make the film naked, but realized that it was wrong for the character to experience something I didn't want to experience myself," Lawrence told Vanity Fair
"The Oscar winner is believed to have married art curator cook Maroni at a location in Rhode Island on October 19, 2019."
"None of this will bring peace to me, nor will it bring my nudity back to me and Nick (Holt), their goals," she explained
"I think I'm actually still dealing with it. Despite the leak, the star decided not to sue the technology giant."
The hunger game star revealed that several women had contacted her and filed a lawsuit against the technology company Apple. Later, it was found that the hackers did not intrude into the company's system as commonly believed, but aimed at "name, password and security issues."
"You can go to a barbecue and someone can pull it out with a cell phone."
"No one in the world can't see these intimate pictures of me."
"I feel like I've been hit by this damn planet."
"I think I'm actually dealing with it," she explained



Number  461
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That lawsuit never reached to the courts but got settled with a settlement by 2012.”
“In the year 2011, she launched her third fragrance ‘Gold’ and she also had filed a lawsuit against the Old Navy and Gap Inc. she said that Old Navy was imitating her looks on their model to promote their brand.”
“Later the settlement was made as she settled herself and took the case back for $5 million.”
“As she got to know about this tape being leaked out she filed a lawsuit against the Vivid Entertainment who were the distributors of this tape naming it Kim K Superstar.”
“Academy Controversies | Acting Career | First Movies | Ex-Boyfriend | TV Reality Show | Dancing Show | Highest Earing Reality StarsKim Kardashian i n 2007 there was news of a sex tape being leaked and it was Kim’s and her ex-boyfriend Ray-J’s tape which they had made in 2003.”
“She gained her first media recognition when she was in her early 20s by being friends with a well-known socialite Paris Hilton and she was friends with her as well.”
“Her father died in 2003 suffering from cancer.”
“When she was in her teen she had attended an all girl’s school in Los Angeles name Marymount High School.”
“Later Bruce and Kris gave birth to another two divas of the era Kendall and Kylie Jenner who were half-sisters to the Kardashian kids.”
“It was his second marriage too so now the Kardashian kids have 3 stepbrothers namely Burton, Broody and Brandon, and a step-sister Casey.”


"The lawsuit never went to court, but it ended with a settlement agreement before 2012."
"In 2011, she launched her third perfume" Gold ", and she filed a lawsuit against Old Navy and Gap Inc.. She said Old Navy imitated her on their models to promote their brand
"Later, she settled the settlement herself and took back the case at the price of 5 million yuan."
"When she learned that the tape had been leaked, she filed a lawsuit against vid entertainment, the publisher of the tape and named it Kim K superstar."
"Academic controversy | acting career | the first film | ex boyfriend | reality TV show | dance show | the most popular reality TV star scrim Kardashian had a sex video leaked in 2007, which was made by Kim and her ex boyfriend ray-j in 2003."
"She won media recognition for the first time, but in her early 20s, she was friends with a well-known socialite, Paris Hilton, and she was friends."
"Her father died of cancer in 2003."
"When she was a teenager, she went to a girls' school in Los Angeles called marimont high school."
"Then Bruce and Chris gave birth to Kendall and Kelly Jenner, the heroines of the two eras, who were half sisters of the Kardashian children."
"It was also his second marriage, so now the kardashians have three stepbrothers, Burton, foster and Brandon, and a stepsister, Kathy."



**Something goes wrong**
“It’s hard to pick favorites, but here are some of the looks that caught our attention and stuck with us until today!”
“Today, we’re walking back through some of Gigi’s best runway styles from over the past few years.”
“She’s designed her own collections with Tommy Hilfiger and Vogue Eyewear, starred in numerous ad campaigns, and even gave models some professional insight on her mother Yolanda’s reality show.”
“It’s no surprise that the model’s face has graced nearly forty Vogue covers — a number second to only Lauren Hutton — but her work extends far beyond the pages of glossies.”
“Along with her sister Bella and a crew that counts the likes of Kendall Jenner in its ranks, Gigi has become a modern-day fashion icon, slaying looks both on and off the runway while serving as a bellwether for the fashion trends of tomorrow.”
“It would be difficult to talk about the 2020 fashion landscape without mentioning Gigi Hadid.”


"It's hard to pick a favorite, but here are some of the styles that have caught our attention and stuck to today!"
"Today, we're going to review Gigi's best runway style in a few years."
"Together with Tommy Hilfiger and vogue eyewear, she designed her own series, starred in numerous advertising campaigns, and even gave models some professional insight into her mother's Yolanda reality show."
"There's no doubt that this model's face has brightened the cover of nearly 40 vogue magazines - second only to Lauren Hutton, but her work goes far beyond the cover."
"Together with her sister Bella and a crew that can be regarded as Kendall Jenner, Gigi has become a modern fashion icon, murderous on and off the runway, and the leader of the future fashion trend."
"It's hard not to mention Gigi Hadid when talking about the fashion pattern in 2020."



Number  463
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She teamed it with chunky silver heels and went jewellery-free as she let the intricate dress design and bold makeup speak for itself.”
“...silver detail which she appeared to go underwear free in...”
“MOST READ IN TV SHOWBIZ Exclusive he was so brave Katie Price s joy as her son Harvey gets the Covid vaccine early heartbroken Engelbert Humperdinck s wife Patricia is dead after contracting Covid FEARS FOR PADDY Paddy Doherty rushed back to hospital and put on oxygen after Covid battle...”
“The singer wore her hair in a wavy half up ‘do and kept her makeup minimal and natural.”
“The floor-length lilac Monique Lhuillier dress had a strapless bodice and feather skirt which she teamed with simple black heels.”
“Zealander Lorde shunned her usual gothic look and instead opted for a ball gown fit for a princess...”
“40 As Mel Bs divorce to Stephan Belafonte intensifies she wore a dress with a clear message to him Credit Getty Contributor 40 The Spice Girls dress read YOU WILL NEVER OWN ME Credit AP Associated Press 40 The back had a quirky eye design Credit Getty Contributor Quirky New...”
“Large letters said: “YOU WILL NEVER OWN ME”, while the back of it had an eye across her derriere.”
“Mel B let her dress do the talking quite literally, and appeared to send out a message to estranged husband Stephan Belafonte in a bright sequin dress.”
“...the sexy number Credit Getty Images Getty 40 The model arrived with Mel B Credit AP Associated Press She wore her blonde hair in a centre parting and kept it simple and straight while she went for her usual smoky eye makeup...”


"She paired it with heavy silver heels to make complicated fashion design and bold make-up her spokesperson, and gave away jewelry for free."
“… Silver details, she seems to be free... "
"Most people in the exclusive news of TV show business saw that he was so brave. Katie Price was very happy that her son Harvey got the coved vaccine. Her heart was broken in the early stage. Engelbert hampdink's wife Patricia was infected after her death. Coved was afraid that paddy Doherty rushed back to the hospital and took oxygen after the coved battle."
"The singer combs her hair into a wavy half cocked head and keeps her make-up simple and natural."
"This floor length lilac Monique lhuillier dress comes with a Strapless Corset and a feather skirt, paired with simple black heels."
"New Zealander Lord avoided her usual Gothic style and chose the ball dress suitable for the princess..."
"40 when the divorce between Mel BS and Stephan Belafonte intensified, she wore a skirt with a clear message for him. Read you will never own me credit AP Associated Press 40 has a strange eye on the back, and designed a strange new..."
"You'll never have me" was written in large letters, while an eye flashed across her chest on the back of the letter
"Mel B makes a real conversation out of his clothes and seems to be sending a message to a distant husband, Stephen bellafonte, in a sequined skirt."
“… The sexy digital credit Getty picture Getty 40 model arrives with Mel B credit AP. She wears her blonde hair in a center apart and keeps it simple and straight while she goes with her usual smoky eye makeup... "



**Something goes wrong**
“♥️,” her co-star wrote.”
“If I didn’t have them, I’d probably go crazy,” she said.”
“According to a source close to the reality star, “Teresa had a small private family party last night at her house.”
“It was very low-key.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“On Thursday, she shared a post to Instagram with her four look-alike-daughters — Gia, Gabriella, Milania and Audriana — and cake!”
““Celebrating my Birthday  with my girls ❤️,” the Real Housewives of New Jersey star captioned her beaming photo.”
“Giudice’s husband Joe Giudice — whose own 45th birthday falls on Monday — was absent.”
“He is currently serving out a 41-month prison sentence for bankruptcy fraud at the Federal Correctional Institution in Fort Dix, New Jersey.”
“In January 2015, the Bravolebrity began her own 15-month sentence for fraud.”
“Giudice told PEOPLE in September that, thanks to her girls, she’s able to face each and every day without as much loneliness.”


“ ♥️ "Her partner wrote
"If I didn't have them, I might go crazy," she said
According to a source close to the reality TV star, "Theresa had a small private family party at home last night."
"Very low profile." Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"On Thursday, she shared a post on instagram with her four daughters, GIA, Gabriella, milania and audiana, as well as cake, who look like each other!"
"Celebrate your birthday with your daughters ❤️ "The real housewife of New Jersey" star added the title to her jubilant photo
"Judith's husband, Joe Judith, is absent. His 45th Birthday is on Monday."
"He is currently serving 41 months at the Federal Correctional Institution in dixburg, New Jersey, for bankruptcy fraud."
"In January 2015, bravolebrity began a 15 month sentence for fraud."
"In September, Judith told people that thanks to her daughters, she was able to face every day without so much loneliness."



Number  465
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We want to thank her for her undeniable passion and dedication to Suits, and we wish her the very best.”The seventh season of Suits will resume in 2018.”
“Meghan has been a member of our family for seven years and it has been a joy to work with her.”
“USA Network and Universal Cable Productions released the following statement: “From all of us at USA Network and Universal Cable Productions, we want to send our most heartfelt congratulations to Meghan Markle and Prince Harry on their engagement.”
“Along the way, Rachel began dating and eventually got engaged to the firm’s wonder-boy, Mike Ross (Adams).”
“For the past seven seasons, Markle played the tenacious Rachel Zane, an ambitious paralegal who eventually became a full fledged lawyer at the show’s central law firm.”
“There is no word yet if Adams will remain past season 7.”
“Two weeks ago, it was reported that she and fellow original cast member Patrick J. Adams would depart once their contracts were up at the end of the upcoming season, and Markle noted in her joint interview with Prince Harry that she was leaving acting behind.”
“This certainly doesn’t come as a surprise.”
“The word arrives a day after news broke of her engagement to Prince Harry of Wales.”
“On Tuesday, USA Network officially announced that original Suits cast member Meghan Markle is leaving the legal drama at the end of season 7.”


"We want to thank her for her undeniable enthusiasm and dedication to the suit and wish her all the best." The seventh season suits will resume in 2018
"Megan has been a member of our family for seven years and it's great to work with her."
"The following statement was issued by ATV and universal cable production:" we, the staff of ATV and universal cable production, extend our heartfelt congratulations to Megan Marcel and Prince Harry on their engagement. "
Along the way, Rachel starts dating and eventually gets engaged to the company's wizard Mike Ross (Adams)
"Over the past seven seasons, markel has played the tough Rachel Zane, an ambitious assistant lawyer who eventually became a full-time lawyer at the show's central law firm."
"There's no word yet on whether Adams will stay at the end of the seventh season."
"Two weeks ago, it was reported that she and former actress Patrick J. Adams would leave at the end of the coming season once their contract expired, while mark pointed out in a joint interview with Prince Harry that she would leave the show business."
"It's no surprise, of course."
"The news came the day after the news that she was engaged to Prince Harry of Wales came out."
"On Tuesday, American television network officially announced that the original suit actor Megan markel will leave the legal drama at the end of the seventh season."



Number  466
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Playing on set in sparkling Gucci, Gerber found the humor in that infamous crystal-covered bodysuit, and posing in a downtown alleyway, she even pulled onlookers into the shoot.”
“Chilling in a suite at the Plaza with fellow teen stars Cara Taylor and Faretta, she turned room service into a mini editorial; later dancing in Times Square, she gave tourists an eyeful of the latest runway looks.”
“As seen behind the scenes of her big week, Gerber didn’t just conquer the runways, she took all of New York by storm, and everywhere she went, she brought a little fashion magic with her.”
“Not bad for a newbie, though Gerber isn’t your ordinary rising star.”
“Instantly becoming the model of the moment, Gerber spent her very first New York Fashion Week walking for Alexander Wang, Marc Jacobs, and even Rihanna.”
“At just 16, the daughter of supermodel Cindy Crawford went from taking her driver’s test to making her runway debut at Calvin Klein a few days later—and that was just the beginning of her adventure.”
“Admit it: Kaia Gerber makes this whole modeling thing look easy.”


On the set of glittering Gucci, Gerber discovered the sense of humor of the infamous crystal tights. She posed in the downtown alleys and even pulled onlookers into the camera
"In a suite in the Plaza, she was with other teen stars Cara Taylor and faretta, turning room service into a mini editorial; later dancing in Times Square, she showed visitors the latest runway look."
"From what she saw behind the scenes during her show week, Gerber not only conquered the runway, but also swept the whole of New York. Everywhere she went, she brought a little bit of fashion magic."
"It's good for a rookie, even though Gerber isn't your average new star."
"Immediately becoming a model of the time, Gerber spent her first New York Fashion week walking Alexander Wang, mark Jacobs, and even Rihanna."
"At the age of 16, supermodel Cindy Crawford's daughter made her debut on Calvin Klein's runway a few days after taking a driving test. It was just the beginning of her adventure."
"Admit it: Kaia Gerber makes the whole look simple."



Number  467
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Gilmour first met with Elizabeth in 2009 and they married in 2012.”
“Furthermore, Matthew Gilmour has three sisters and a brother.”
“...resist developing their deep friendship romance into a wedding ceremony within three years...”
“Matthew Gilmour recalls his first meet with Elizabeth Smart I got to know her as she truly is The thing that attracted me the most to her at the beginning and now is how confident she is especially considering everything she has been through The two exciting partners could not...”
“First, they started their relationship with friends and then gradually evolved their dating into a romantic relationship.”
“Recommended: Abby Martin Very Close To Ringing Wedding BellsMatthew Gilmour works for the missionary, is from Scotland, and was in Paris for his mission job.”
“In fact, they happened to cross their paths when they were in the Mormon mission trip there.”
“Matthew Gilmour first met Elizabeth Smart in Paris in 2009.”
“On the course of her travels, Elizabeth Smart met Matthew Gilmour.”
“Elizabeth Smart traveled worldwide giving inspirational lectures and motivational speeches after she survived rape.”


"Gilmore first met Elizabeth in 2009 and they got married in 2012."
In addition, Matthew Gilmore has three sisters and a brother
“… Boycott to develop their deep friendship and romance into a wedding in three years
"When Matthew Gilmour recalled his first meeting with Elizabeth Smart, I got to know her, because she was really the most attractive person at the beginning, and now how confident she is, especially considering what she's been through, these two exciting partners can't be..."
"First of all, they start to associate with friends, and then gradually develop into a romantic relationship."
Highlight: Abby Martin is close to the wedding bell. Gilmore worked as a missionary from Scotland. He was a missionary in Paris
"In fact, they happened to have problems on their Mormon missionary trip there."
"Matthew Gilmore met Elizabeth Smart for the first time in Paris in 2009."
"On the journey, Elizabeth Smart met Matthew Gilmore."
"Elizabeth Smart, who survived the rape case, traveled around the world giving inspiring and inspirational speeches."



Number  468
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'I get that you are religiously convicted but at the same time you hurt me in a really big way and this was our opportunity to make amends for that and it wasn't taken so it is hard to tell where we go from here,' she said.”
“Reveal party: Shayla rocked a green gown for her reveal party'That hurts,' said Shayla as her brother said she was advised by elders at her church not to go as her daughter was living as a sinner.”
“'After my parents came clean to me I started to beast eat to feel better, but gaining all this weight has made me feel worse.”
“Getting emotional: Khloe listened as Shayla told about being lied to about her biological fatherShayla told the cameras that her mother felt she was living in sin with boyfriend Toby despite her own actions.”
“My parents are very religious and I grew up a Jehovah's Witness.'”
“We don't speak.”
“The relationship with my mom is damaged big time.”
“'I am pissed off at my parents.”
“'I researched him online and found his obituary online, he played in the NFL and died at 61 and has four other children out there somewhere.”
“I did not really have a reaction it was jarring and very devastating.”


"I know you've been convicted in religion, but at the same time, you've hurt me to a great extent, and this is our chance to make up for it. We didn't take action, so it's hard to judge where we are going in the future," she said
"Secret party: Sheila shakes a green robe for her secret party, which is very hurtful," said Sheila, whose brother said church elders advised her not to go because her daughter lives a sinful life
"After my parents confessed to me, I started eating to make myself feel better, but weight gain made me feel worse."
"Emotional: Khloe listens to Shayla saying that her biological father has been cheated, and hayla tells the camera that despite her own behavior, her mother feels that she and her boyfriend Toby are living in sin."
"My parents are very devout. I have been a witness of the Lord since I was a child."
"We don't talk."
"My relationship with my mother has been seriously damaged."
"I'm angry with my parents."
"I investigated him online and found his obituary on the Internet. He played football in NFL, died at the age of 61, and had four children somewhere."
"I didn't really respond. It was disharmonious and very destructive."



Number  469
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Alyssa Bailey News and Strategy Editor Alyssa Bailey is the news and strategy editor at ELLE.com, where she oversees coverage of celebrities and royals (particularly Meghan Markle and Kate Middleton).”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“It went so viral, it became a Twitter moment—and a future great story for the kid and his or her parents to tell all their friends.”
“...pic.twitter.com/fWcBBefLDX — James Longman (@JamesAALongman) April 23, 2018They were greeted by the press too, and Twitter had a field day reacting to the photos shared of the surprise encounter.”
“Unsuspecting couple have new baby - and find the world’s press waiting outside.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Alyssa Bailey, news and strategy editor ELLE.com She oversees coverage of celebrities and royalty, especially Megan markel and Kate Middleton
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from twitter."
"It spread so fast that it became a twitter moment and a good story for the child and his or her parents to tell all their friends about the future."
“... pic.twitter.com/fwcbefldx -James aalongman (@ James aalongman) on April 23, 2018, they were also welcomed by the media, and twitter responded enthusiastically to the photos of the accident they shared
"An unprepared couple has a new child - finds the world's media waiting outside."



Number  470
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“So it wasn’t Disney,” Thorne fired back, adding in another tweet, “The world can be a sick place sometimes :/.””
“I think she was molested?”“Yeah I was.”
“The Disney alum revealed on Sunday, January 7, that she was sexually abused as a child.”
““I was sexually abused and physically growing up from the day I can remember till I was 14..when I finally had the courage to lock my door at night and sit by it.”
“All damn night.”
“Waiting for someone to take advantage of my life again.”
“Over and over I waited for it to stop and finally it did.”
“But some of us aren’t as lucky to get out alive.”
“Please today stand up for every soul Mistreated.”
“#timesup,” Thorne wrote on Sunday via Instagram, referencing to the Time’s Up movement, which was created by women in Hollywood to fund legal aid for victims of sexual harassment.”


"So it's not Disney," Thorne retorted, adding on another tweet, "the world sometimes becomes a sick place: /."
"I think she was molested? "Yes, I am."
"Disney alumni revealed on Sunday, January 7 that she had been sexually abused as a child."
"From the day I remember to the age of 14, I was sexually abused and growing up At that time, I finally had the courage to lock the door at night and sit by it
"The whole damn night."
"Waiting for someone to use my life again."
"I waited for it to stop over and over again, and finally it did."
"But some of us are not so lucky to get out alive."
"Today, please stand up for every abused soul."
"Timesup," Thorne wrote on instagram Sunday, referring to the "times up" campaign launched by Hollywood women to provide legal aid to victims of sexual harassment



Number  471
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I just leave all that to karma and justice and what will be.””
““I don’t need to say, ‘I told you so’,” she said regarding Cosby.”
“Despite that, Bonet is not vindictive.”
“Cosby also opposed her role in the film Angel Heart, in which she had a nude scene with Mickey Rourke, and allegedly opposed her marriage at age 20 to rocker Lenny Kravitz.”
“She was frequently late on the set and posed topless for Interview magazine, a step away from the wholesome family image that the TV shows tried to cultivate.”
“Bonet had a somewhat rocky relationship with Cosby.”
“His first trial on those charges ended in a hung jury, and the retrial is expected to start in April.”
“The 80-year-old comedian has been accused by multiple women of sexually assaulting them after drugging them.”
“The truth will set you free.”Cosby is in pre-trial hearings in Pennsylvania for his sexual assault retrial.”
“That’s my nature.”


"I just leave it to karma and justice, and what will happen in the future."
"I don't need to say, 'I told you so,'" she said of Cosby
"Nevertheless, Bonet is not vindictive."
"Cosby is also opposed to her role in the movie heart of the angels, where she had a nude scene with Mickey Locke and is said to be opposed to her marriage to rock singer Lenny Kravitz at the age of 20."
"She is often late for the set and takes pictures for Interview magazine naked, which is far from the healthy family image that TV programs try to create."
"The relationship between Burnett and Cosby is a bit shaky."
"His first trial of these charges ended with a jury pending and a retrial is expected to begin in April."
"The 80 year old comedian was accused by a number of women of sexually assaulting them after they were drugged."
"The truth will set you free." Cosby is at a pre-trial hearing in Pennsylvania to review his sexual assault case
"It's my nature."



Number  472
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch Felman’s interview on “Today” below.”
“And nobody is going to stop me this time as long as people support this,” he said.”
“It’s serous stuff and I vow I will release every single name that I have any knowledge of, period.”
““I’m not playing around.”
“He said that a "statute of limitations" in California has prevented him from going to the police again, which is why he wants to make this film.”
“Feldman also claimed that he has received death threats from those who are trying to keep him from releasing any information.”
“Michael was innocent … I told them, ‘He was not that guy,’” Feldman said, adding that he gave them all of the names of people he alleged had molested him.”
“All they cared about was trying to find something on Michael Jackson.”
“But they were scanning Michael Jackson.”
“They have all of this information.”


Look at Fairman's "today" interview
"As long as people support me, no one will stop me this time," he said
"It's a serious thing, and I swear I'll announce every name I know, period."
"I'm not playing."
He said California's "statute of limitations" prevented him from calling the police again, which is why he wanted to make the film
"Feldman also claimed that he received death threats from people who tried to stop him from releasing any information."
"Michael is innocent I told them, "he's not that guy," Feldman said, adding that he gave the names of all of them, claiming that someone had molested him
"All they care about is what they want from Michael Jackson."
"But they're scanning Michael Jackson."
"They have all this information."



Number  473
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He has three daughters — Emma, Lily and Ruth — from his previous marriage.”
“I support her decision, I am in counseling and perhaps, when I am better, we can rebuild.”After the New York Times uncovered allegations that Weinstein paid off sexual harassment accusers for decades, the movie mogul gave an interview with the New York Post saying that Chapman was supporting him.”
“As allegations of sexual misconduct continue to mount, the disgraced film producer’s wife, Georgina Chapman, announced on Tuesday, October 10, that she is leaving him after 10 years of marriage.”
“Now, the 61-year-old is opening up about the “pain” he caused the British fashion designer, 41, and their two children India, 7, and Dashiell, 4.”
““I sat down with my wife Georgina, who I love more than anything, and we discussed what was best for our family,” he told Us Weekly in a statement on Wednesday.”
““We discussed the possibility of a separation and I encouraged her to do what was in her heart.”
“In the end, she made the decision to separate.”
“I understand, I love her and I love our children and hopefully, when I am better, I will be in their lives again.”
““She stands 100 percent behind me,” he told the paper on October 5.”
“Weinstein is now seeking treatment for sex addiction.”


He has three daughters, Emma, Lily and Ruth. This is his ex-wife's daughter
"I support her decision. I'm in counseling. Maybe when I get better, we can rebuild." After the New York Times exposed Weinstein's decades old charges of paying for sexual harassment accusers, the film mogul told the New York Post that Chapman was supporting him
"With increasing accusations of sexual misconduct, Georgina Chapman, the wife of the discredited filmmaker, announced on Tuesday October 10 that she would leave him after 10 years of marriage."
"Now, the 61 year old British fashion designer and their two children, India, 7, and dashir, 4, have made public the 'pain' he has brought to the British fashion designer."
"My wife Georgina and I sat down, I love her more than anything, and we discussed what's best for our family," he told us in a statement on Wednesday
"We discussed the possibility of separation and I encouraged her to do what she wanted to do."
"In the end, she decided to live apart."
"I understand that I love her and our children, and hope that when I get better, I can enter their lives again."
"She's 100 percent for me," he told the newspaper on October 5
"Weinstein is now looking for treatment for sexual addiction."



Number  474
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Where To Stay: Villa Lario Resort Mandello5 bedrooms, 7 bathrooms, sleeps 11.”
“George Clooney and Donatella Versace own homes in the area, and Chrissy Teigen recently shared that this is her favorite vacation spot, no surprise given she and John Legend were married here in 2013.”
“Relax by your private pool before preparing a meal in your gourmet kitchen.”
“The luxe four-bedroom home offers plenty for space for up to 8 guests, and was recently redecorated with hardwood floors and a rustic-chic off-white look.”
“From $1,857/nightThis elegant villa overlooks Petit Cul de Sac, one of the calmest (and most beautiful) beaches on the island.”
“Where To Stay: La Papaye4 Bedrooms, 4 Bathrooms, Sleeps 8.”
“Known for its yacht-filled harbor, pristine beaches and picturesque blue waters, St. Bart’s is a great place for a beach escape—just ask Beyoncé, Ellen DeGeneres, Gwen Stefani, or the Kardashians, who’ve all vacationed here.”
“This Caribbean island is a magnet for A-listers.”
“Check out Water’s Edge Villa on TripAdvisor!”
“With world-class restaurants, casual poolside dining options, full-service spa, concierge services, and a kid’s club and nature center, this resort offers a number of first-class amenities.”


Accommodation: mandelo villa Lario resort, 5 bedrooms, 7 bathrooms, 11 bedrooms
"George Clooney and Donatella Versace own their own houses in the area, and Chris tegan recently said that this is her favorite resort, which is not surprising considering that she and John Legend married here in 2013."
"Before you prepare a meal in your gourmet kitchen, relax by your private pool."
"This luxurious four bedroom home provides enough space for up to eight guests, and has recently been redecorated with hardwood floors and a rustic off white look."
"Starting at $1857 per night, this elegant villa overlooks the small end of one of the quietest (most beautiful) beaches on the island."
Where to live: lapapier 4 bedrooms, 4 bathrooms, 8 bedrooms
"St. Bart is famous for its yacht harbor, pristine beaches and picturesque blue waters. It's a great beach resort. Ask Beyonce, Ellen DeGeneres, Gwen Stephanie or the Kardashian family, all of whom have spent their holidays here."
"This Caribbean island is a magnet for stars in the first place."
"Look at the waterfront villa on TripAdvisor!"
"The resort has world-class restaurants, leisure pool dining options, full-service spa, concierge service, children's club and Nature Center, providing many first-class amenities."



Number  475
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow NBCBLK on Facebook, Twitter and Instagram...”
“Could we bring in culture, bring in history in their costumes?”
“With a young black girl as the lead, Storm Reid, epitomizes #blackgirlmagic, in her role as Meg Murry from Madeleine L’Engle’s 1963 award winning children’s book, “A Wrinkle In Time.”Disney gave fans a glimpse of the first official trailer this weekend.”
“"Your father has accomplished something extraordinary, but also dangerous," Winfrey's character says in the trailer.”
“"He's trapped by a darkness that's actively spreading throughout the universe, and the only one who can stop it is you."”
“Meg, a young girl (played by Reid, who made her film debut in the Oscar-winning “Twelve Years A Slave,”) embarks on an interplanetary journey with her classmate and little brother to find her scientist father (Chris Pine).”
“Meg is accompanied by the three female guides, Mrs. Whatsit (Reese Witherspoon), Mrs. Who (Mindy Kaling) and Mrs.”
“Which (Oprah Winfrey).”
“Viewers get a glimpse of the extraordinary costumes and visual effects that make this film so magical.”
“The enchanted story that travels from planet to planet is strung together by the chilling cover of the ’80s band Eurythmics' "Sweet Dreams" in the 1:49 minute trailer.”


"Follow nbcblk on Facebook, twitter and instagram..."
"Can we use their clothes to introduce culture and history?"
"Starring a young black girl, storm reed is the epitome of blackgill's film. She plays MEG Murray in Madeleine Ringer's 1963 award-winning children's book wrinkles in years. Disney let fans see the first official trailer of the weekend
"Your father did something extraordinary but dangerous," Winfrey's character says in the trailer
"He's trapped in a kind of darkness that's active in the universe, and the only thing that can stop it is you."
"MEG, a young girl (played by reed, who made her debut in the Oscar winning film twelve years of slavery), is on a star trek with her classmates and younger brother in search of her father (Chris pine), a scientist."
MEG is accompanied by three female guides: Mrs Whatsit (Reese Witherspoon), Mrs who (Mindy Carlin) and Mrs
"Which one."
"The audience can see the extraordinary costumes and visual effects of the film, making it so amazing."
"In the 1:49 minute trailer, the cover of" sweet dream "by the art troupe of the 1980s is creepy, a fascinating story from one planet to another."



Number  476
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When he was questioned about whether he was banned from the show, he said, ‘Not that I’m aware of.’”
“AdvertisementAccording to Inside Edition, the comedian ‘didn’t recall the Wendy show from so many years ago’ when the outlet spoke to him.”
“During Monday’s show, Wendy Williams was just discussing the recent sexual harassment allegations against the former CBS This Morning co-host Charlie Rose.”
“That was the moment when she remembered her own experience with an unnamed guest.”
“I'm excited to see my friends @Mariobatali, @carlaphall, @clintonkellyoh, @chefsymon on @abcthechew today! Tune-in!”
“A post shared by Wendy Williams (@wendyshow) on Nov 20, 2017 at 9:50am PST‘My worst guest?”
“I’m not going to name, but I can tell you this—it had to do with some groping.”
“You all saw it, but didn’t say a word, and I felt it, and I didn’t say a word,’ Wendy recalled.”
“‘My staff saw it, and that guest will never be here anymore.”
“He’s not relevant anyway.’Wendy confessed that the guest was a little comedian who appeared on the program in either her second or third season.”


"When asked if he was banned from performing, he said," as far as I know, that's not the case. "
According to inside, the comedian "doesn't remember the Wendy show so many years ago," the media told him at the time
"On Monday's show, Wendy Williams is discussing recent sexual harassment charges against former CBS co host Charlie Rose."
"At that moment, she remembered her experience with an unknown guest."
"I'm very happy to meet my friends @ mariobatali, @ carlaphall, @ clintonkellyoh, @ chefsymon!" on abcthechew today! Listen in
"Wendy Williams (@ wendyshow) shared a post on November 20, 2017 at 9:50 a.m." my worst guest? "
"I don't want to call the roll, but I can tell you it has to do with some groping."
"You all saw it, but didn't say a word, I felt it, didn't say a word," Wendy recalled
"My staff saw it, and the guest will never come again."
Wendy admitted that the guest was a little comedian and had appeared in her second or third season shows



Number  477
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"We have a lot of songs but in those times we just tried to get them to the outside world, and we didn't have enough money to do it weself," he explained to Reshma B.”
“Even a legend like Scratch has suffered from bad business deals.”
“Scratch, who will turn 85 next month, describes reggae music as "a spiritual organization that I put together," which isn't much of an exaggeration.”
“But for people like Scratch and Reshma B—whom VIBE readers know as the Boomshots correspondent who does IG Live interviews with all the top dancehall stars—every month of the year is reggae month.”
“Brown s birthday and runs through Bob Marley s birthday on February 6 all the way until the end of the month...”
“Plans to hit the film festival circuit in 2020 were put on pause by the pandemic but the film is finally streaming worldwide just in time for Reggae Month the international celebration of Jamaican music that kicks off today Dennis...”
“...where it was viewed by over 1 million people...”
“Hailed as one of the finest reggae documentaries ever made by acclaimed author John Masouri and a magical piece of work by veteran UK reggae radio DJ David Rodigan the Studio 17 doc premiered in late 2019 on BBC television...”
“Moments like these make the Studio 17 film a rare treat for music lovers seeking to understand the creative alchemy that makes reggae the most mystical and misunderstood music in the world.”
“"But Randy's wasn't humming or Randy's wasn't [shhhh-ing]."”


"We had a lot of songs, but at those times we just tried to get them out into the world and we didn't have enough money to be ourselves," he explained, reshma B
"Even legends like scock have had bad business deals."
Scotch, who turns 85 next month, is not exaggerating to describe reggae music as "a spiritual organization I organized."
"But for people like scratch and reshma, it's Reggae month that Ig interviews all the top ballroom stars every month of the year."
"Brown's birthday lasts until February 6, Bob Marley's birthday, until the end of the month..."
"The 2020 Film Festival plan has been suspended due to the influenza pandemic, but the film has finally been released around the world, just in time for the opening of the Reggae crescent Mecca music international celebration Dennis...."
“… There are more than one million people watching... "
"Known as one of the best Reggae documentaries in history, it was produced by the famous writer John masouri, and is also a magical work of David rodigan, a senior DJ of British Reggae radio station. Studio 17 premiered on BBC TV at the end of 2019..."
"Moments like this make studio 17's movies a rare enjoyment for music lovers, who want to know that reggae music is the most mysterious and misunderstood creative alchemy of music in the world."
"But Randy didn't hum or Randy didn't (Shhh)



Number  478
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I didn’t have anywhere to go.”He’s now a hometown hero giving the world a piece of Houston through his music.”
““I canceled work.”
“HOUSTON — It was a huge weekend for Missouri City native and superstar Travis Scott.”
“His inaugural Astroworld Festival was a complete success.”
“His other half, reality star Kylie Jenner, cashed in on her boyfriend’s visit to H-town by surprising some of her fans at a local beauty shop.”
“Hundreds of fans greeted Jenner as she arrived at the Ulta Beauty store near the Galleria to promote her make-up line.”
“Karla Martinez, a die-hard fan said, “I have her notifications on Kylie Comestics.”
“I saw they were coming to houston and we live all the way in Rosenberg so we made a drive.”Hundreds of @KylieJenner fans gathered at @ultabeauty.”
“Here she is taking a video after visiting the store.”
“Her makeup, @kyliecosmetics, her the store today.”


"I have no place to go." He is now a hero in his hometown, bringing a part of Houston to the world through his music
"I canceled my job."
"Houston - it's a huge weekend for Missouri City native and superstar Travis Scott."
"His first celestial world festival was a complete success."
"His other half, reality TV star Kelly Jenner, took advantage of her boyfriend's visit to H city to surprise some of her fans at a local beauty shop."
"When Jenna came to the ulta beauty shop near Kaidan square to promote her cosmetics line, hundreds of fans saluted her."
"Carla Martinez, a big fan, said," I got her notice about Kelly comistes. "
"I saw they were coming to Houston and we lived in Rosenberg, so we drove there." Hundreds of fans of @ Kylie Jenner gathered at @ ultabeauty. "
"This is the video she took after the shopping."
"Her makeup, her makeup artist, she's in the store today."



Number  479
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This post has been updated.”
“Does this mean love is dead?”
“Britney Spears and Justin Timberlake (2001 American Music Awards era) requires entirely too much denim.”
“You need to have some pretty amazing suits on hand to pull off Mick and Bianca Jagger.”
“And without the perfect matching blonde pixies, nineties-era Gwyneth and Brad really just means wearing jeans and leather jackets, which will surely get you the dreaded "Who are you guys supposed to be?!"”
“Luckily 2018 bestowed upon us a couple so instantly recognizable without the hassle of shopping for a million outdated pieces to get the costume right.”
“If you've got a long ponytail, some sweats, a couple of lollipops, and a willingness to engage in over the top displays of public affection, voilà: You're Ariana Grande and Pete Davidson, Halloween heroes.”
“But like almost all of the iconic couples who have inspired couples costumes, Ariana and Pete have also broken up.”
“We aren't sure.”
“Bless these two crazy kids, they’ve given us a lot to work with.”


"This post has been updated."
"Does that mean love is dead?"
"Britney Spears and Justin Timberlake [in the age of the American Music Awards 2001] are too demanding of cowboys."
"You need to have some pretty amazing suits in hand to pull down Mick and Bianca Jagger."
Without the perfect pair of blonde elves, Gwyneth and Brad in the '90s were really just wearing jeans and leather jackets, which would make you afraid of "who should you be?"
"Fortunately, 2018 has given us a couple so recognizable that we don't have to worry about buying millions of outdated clothes."
"If you have a long ponytail, some sweat, a pair of lollipops, and are willing to participate in an open relationship, look: you are Arianna grand and Pete Davidson, a Halloween hero."
"But like almost every iconic couple who inspired a couple's clothing, Ariana and Pete broke up."
"We're not sure."
"God bless these two crazy kids, they give us a lot of opportunities to cooperate."



Number  480
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to TIME, her sponsored Instagram posts are “worth the equivalent of $1 million (about a fifth the cost of a Super Bowl commercial).””
“The 20-year-old makeup mogul can thank fans’ fervor over the arrival of her daughter, Stormi, and her booming Kylie Cosmetics business.”
““But despite calls for West to be “canceled,” his recently released album, Ye, debuted atop the Billboard 200.”As for Jenner?”
“...of not caring about black people call President Trump his brother post an image of a Make America Great Again Hat and defend his comments about slavery being a choice according to TIME”
“Image zoom Kanye West and Kylie Jenner Credit Billy Farrell BFA REX Shutterstock Since returning to the platform in April after a nearly year long hiatus many fans have been alternately baffled angry and saddened to see the same artist who in the aftermath of Hurricane Katrina accused President Bush...”
“The 41-year-old rapper’s controversial Twitter spree helped seal his spot on the list.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“KarJenner family member online...”
“Other celebrities on the list include Rihanna President Donald Trump Korean boy band BTS and fit mommy influencer Sia Cooper Kylie Jenner and Kanye West Named to TIME s 25 Most Influential People on the Internet Kim Kardashian may have broken the Internet but she s not the most influential...”


According to time magazine, the instagram post she sponsored "is worth about $1 million (about a fifth of the cost of Super Bowl advertising)"
"The 20-year-old makeup tycoon can thank fans for their enthusiasm for the arrival of her daughter, Tommy, and her booming Kelly cosmetics business."
Despite calls to "Cancel" West, his recently released album leaves topped the top 200 list for the first time
“…… He did not care about the black people, called President trump his brother, put on a hat of "making America great again", and defended his speech that slavery is the choice of the times
"Image zooming Kanye West and Kylie Jenner praised Billy Farrell BFA Rex shutterstock. Since returning to the stage in April, after nearly a year's rest, many fans have been confused, angry and sad to see the artist who accused President Bush after Hurricane Katrina..."
"The 41 year old rapper's controversial craziness on twitter helped him get a place on the list."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Karjenner family members online..."
"Other celebrities on the list include President Rihanna, Donald Trump, South Korean boys band BTS, and" for mommy "influencer SIA Cooper Kelly Jenner, and Time magazine's 25 most influential people on the Internet Kanye westkin Kardashian. She may have broken the Internet, but she is not the most influential..."



Number  481
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Yikes.”
“Anne HathawayIn 2004, Anne Hathaway thought that her low-slung denim jeans and midriff-bearing tee combo was a worthy red-carpet ensemble.”
“1.”
“Here’s our countdown of 11 must-see celebrity style transformations to give you a giggle this Monday.”
“Thankfully for us mere-mortals, there’s still photographic evidence of our favourite style-stars before they had their personal stylists on the payroll!”
“In a world where everyone who’s anyone has their stylist on speed-dial, gone are the days when celebrities would hit the red carpet in tragically bad fashion.”
“There’s no denying the world loves a good style transformation – whether it’s our favourite on-screen makeover or a real life red carpet revamp.”
“Or in Pretty Woman where Julia Roberts morphs from a sloppy street worker to the picture-perfect Polo queen?”
“BY: LAUREN POLLARDRemember the scene from Clueless where Cher gives Tai the ultimate makeover?”


"Oh, dear."
"Anne Hathaway in 2004, Anne Hathaway thought her low rise denim jeans and medium sleeve T-shirt combination was a worthy red carpet ensemble."
“1.”
"This is the countdown to the 11 celebrity style changes we have to see, making you giggle on Monday."
"Thank goodness, for us mortals, before the Personal stylists of our favorite fashion stars appear on their payrolls, they still have photo evidence!"
"In a speed dial world where everyone has their own stylist, gone are the days when celebrities get on the red carpet with pathetic bad fashion."
"There's no denying that the world loves good style change - whether it's our favorite screen change or the red carpet change in real life."
"Or is Julia Roberts transformed from a slovenly Street worker to the perfect Polo queen in beautiful woman?"
Author: Lauren Pollard, do you remember the scene of Cher's ultimate transformation of Taj in "at a loss"



**Something goes wrong**
““It’s hard to talk about because so many people have suffered such severe, tremendous loss,” she told Vogue U.K. for their July issue.”
“Davidson has also said he struggles with anxiety and Crohn’s disease.”
“With a little Disney magic.”
“After news dropped that Ariana Grande and Pete Davidson are set to marry after just several weeks of dating, the happy couple celebrated with a trip to Disneyland on Monday.”
“The 24-year-old singer, who was also accompanied by brother Frankie Grande, documented their adventure on her Instagram story, sharing videos of her fiancé, also 24, making silly remarks mid-ride as she giggled.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“She captioned one video, “Full mood,” while another was labeled, “Another take.”
“I really like this one.”Image zoom Pete Davidson and Ariana Grande | Credit: MEGAGrande got a little naughty in another post, which featured Davidson yelling with the caption, “When I got on top.” She later deleted the joke, but the clip was captured and shared to Twitter by fans.”
“The Disneyland Celebrities Instagram page also obtained a video captured by a fan of the duo getting off of a rollercoaster, with Davidson thoughtfully offering his hand to help the pop star out.”
“Grande rocked mouse ears for the outing and briefly waved after a fan called out her name.”


"It's hard to say because so many people have suffered so much," she told Britain in the July issue of fashion magazine.
"Davidson also said he was fighting anxiety and Crohn's disease."
"A little bit of Disney magic."
"The happy couple went to Disneyland on Monday to celebrate after the news that Ariana Grande and Peter Davidson were going to get married just a few weeks after their date."
"Accompanied by her brother, Frankie grand, the 24-year-old singer recorded their adventures on instagram and shared a video of her 24-year-old fiance. She giggled and said silly things on the way."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
One of her videos was titled "in a good mood," while the other was titled "shooting again."
"I really like this one." Photo zooming Peter Davidson and Ariana Grande | photo source: megagrande is a bit mischievous in another post where Davidson yells "when I get to the top." She later deleted the joke, but the video was captured by fans and shared on twitter
"Disneyland celebrity instagram website also got a video shot by two fans who got off the roller coaster. Davidson thoughtfully extended his hand to help the pop star get away."
"Grande shook a mouse's ear on an outing and waved briefly after a fan called her name."



Number  483
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There, they met up with Orlando Bloom and a group of friends including tech mogul Jim Clark’s model wife, Kristy Hinze-Clark.”
“They also visited the Montauk Point Lighthouse, according to Page Six.”
“Luckily, the Hamptons crash was minor, and a source quickly confirmed that both were “doing great” following the fender-bender.”
“August 2016DiCaprio and Agdal were involved in a car accident in late August.”
“They also took a kayak out in the ocean.”Near the end of July, the duo were spotted partying in Ibiza, Spain, with DiCaprio’s longtime pal Tobey Maguire and a yacht full of their closest friends.”
““They enjoyed the beach and had fun swimming.”
“Image zoom Credit: AKM-GSI“It was just the two of them at the beach,” a source told PEOPLE at the time.”
“Later that month, DiCaprio was photographed locking lips with Agdal as they lounged in the sand during a romantic beach day in Malibu, California.”
“July 2016The Revenant star and the supermodel were merely a “fast fling” as of July, a source told PEOPLE after the duo vacationed together with friends on the private Bahamian island Over Yonder Cay.”
“During the trip, DiCaprio and Agdal were seen enjoying a few local hot spots together, including picking up breakfast at Goldberg’s Famous Bagels.”


"There, they met Orlando Bloom and a group of friends, including Christie cinz Clark, the model wife of technology tycoon Jim Clark."
According to page 6, they also visited the Cape montoc lighthouse
Fortunately, the Hampton crash was very small, and a source quickly confirmed that both of them performed well after the crash
"In August 2016, DiCaprio and Agdal were involved in a car accident in late August."
At the end of July, they held a party in Ibiza, Spain. DiCaprio's old friend Toby Maguire and their closest friend sat on the yacht
"They like the beach and they have fun swimming."
"Image zooming credit: akm-gsi," a source told people at the time: "only the two of them were on the beach."
"Later that month, DiCaprio was photographed on a romantic beach day in Malibu, California, where they were hanging out with their lips locked against Agdal."
A source told people that in July 2016, the "revenge star" and the supermodel were just a "fast indulgence" in July. They were on holiday on a private island in the Bahamas
During the trip, DiCaprio and Agdal played together in some local hot spots, including breakfast at the famous bagel shop in Goldberg



Number  484
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Emma Watson Beams During 'Harry Potter' Reunion With Tom Felton and Matthew LewisRelated Gallery...”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:'Harry Potter' Star Tom Felton Is Almost Unrecognizable in TV AppearanceDaniel Radcliffe and Tom Felton Have a Magical Harry Potter Reunion: See Harry and Draco Today!”
“Emma Watson and Tom Felton -- who played Hermione Granger and Draco Malfoy, respectively, in the beloved franchise -- just hung out at the beach together.”
“On Thursday, 28-year-old Watson took to Instagram to share an adorable pic and a hilarious video from the duo's get together.”
“In the selfie, Watson and Felton, 31, are cuddled up with giant smiles on their faces.”
“Both of the actors are sporting white T-shirts and silver necklaces in the pic, while Watson added a backwards baseball cap and dark pants to her look.”
“The sepia-toned video of the duo skateboarding together is as cute as you'd imagine.”
“"Easy with the wobbling!”
“Keep your feet still," Felton jokingly chastises his former co-star.”
“"They are!"”


"Emma Watson shines in the reunion of Harry Potter with Tom Felton and Matthew Lewis related galleries..."
"Embedded code restart" related content: "Harry Potter star Tom Felton is almost beyond recognition in the TV program. Daniel Radcliffe and Tom Felton have a magical reunion of Harry Potter: watch Harry and Draco today!"
"Emma Watson and Tom Felton - playing Hermione Granger and Draco Malfoy in the beloved series - have just been hanging out on the beach together."
"On Thursday, Watson, 28, shared a lovely picture and a funny video of their party on instagram."
"In the selfie, Watson, 31, and Felton embrace each other with a smile on their face."
"In the photo, both actors are wearing white T-shirts and silver necklaces, while Watson adds a baseball cap with a back and dark trousers."
"The dark black video of skateboarding together is as cute as you think."
"Stop shaking!"
"Don't move," Felton jokingly scolded his former partner
"They are!"



Number  485
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the end, it will always be okay."”
“"It's obviously easy to get insecure and feel bad about yourself," he said.”
“The couple got engaged after a whirlwind courtship during Viall's turn as the titular "Bachelor" and now days after the announcement was made, he is speaking out about how he's been coping with the breakup.”
“"I still love her very much.”
“I'm not afraid to say that," the reality star told Us Weekly.”
“The couple stepped out at the MTV Movie and TV Awards during happier times in their relationship.”
“David Crotty / Patrick McMullan/Getty Image"My friends, my family and Vanessa and I are still very much each other's support system," Viall continued.”
“"We're trying to do that and it's a challenge at times, but we still realize that we're there for each other."”
“He also mentioned the mental toll the split has taken.”
“"You get in your head about things when things aren't working out for you."”


"In the end, everything will be fine."
"Obviously, it's easy for you to lose your sense of security and feel bad about yourself," he said
The couple got engaged after a whirlwind courtship in the name of Villar as a "Bachelor", and now, a few days after the announcement, Villar talked publicly about how he dealt with the breakup
"I still love her."
"I'm not afraid to say that," the reality star told us
"The couple attended the MTV film and Television Awards ceremony at the happiest time of their relationship."
"David Crotty / Patrick McMullen / Getty pictures" my friends, family and Vanessa and I are still supporting each other, "vial continued
"We're trying to do that, and sometimes it's a challenge, but we still realize that we exist for each other."
"He also mentioned the mental loss caused by the breakup."
"When things don't work for you, you think about them in your head."



Number  486
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“With a personal combined value of more than $6.7 billion, Kerr and Spiegel met in 2014 at a New York dinner party and started dating a year later.”
“TMZ recorded footage while outside their home, which has audio of Kerr singing You’re Still The One, a hit recorded by Shania Twain.”
“It was an intimate twilight affair, and featured no other bridal party except Kerr’s son, six-year-old son Flynn (who’s dad is Orlando Bloom), who was a ring-bearer.”
“A post shared by Vogue (@voguemagazine) on Jul 16, 2017 at 1:51pm PDTKerr, 34, and Spiegel, 26, became engaged last July and tied the knot in late May in a warm, family-centred ceremony in the garden of their $16 million Brentwood mansion.”
“Photographed by @patrickdemarchelier.”
“Take an exclusive inside look at the making of her dream dress in the link in our bio.”
“It’s important to look good.’ I was like, ‘OK, Nan.’”For @mirandakerr, it took two fittings and a team of couturiers at @dior to create her fairy-tale wedding dress.”
““When I was young, my grandmother told me, ‘Miranda, men are very visual.”
““Honestly, I couldn’t have imagined a more beautiful wedding dress,” Kerr told Vogue.”
“According to the magazine, her mother and grandmother wept when they first saw her dress.”


"With a total personal value of more than $6.7 billion, Kerr and Spiegel met at a dinner party in New York in 2014 and began dating a year later."
"TMZ recorded a video in front of their house with Kerr singing" you're still that man ", a popular song recorded by Shania Twain
"It's a close Twilight relationship, and there's no wedding except Kerr's son, six-year-old son Flynn, whose father is Orlando Bloom, who is a ring holder."
"Vogue (@ voguemagazine) posted a post at 1:51 p.m. on July 16, 2017, in which 34 year old tker and 26 year old Spiegel got engaged in July last year and held a warm, family centered wedding in late may at the $16 million Brentwood Mansion Garden."
"Shot by @ Patrick Demarchelier."
"In our resume link, let's have an exclusive look at the production of her dream skirt."
"It's important to look good. I said, "OK, Nan." For @ mirandakerr, @ Dior needs two sets of clothes and a group of fashion designers to make her fairy tale wedding dress
"When I was young, my grandmother told me," Miranda, men are very visual. "
"To be honest, I can't imagine a more beautiful wedding dress," cole told vogue
According to the magazine, her mother and grandmother cried the first time they saw her clothes



Number  487
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Weinstein Miramax Class Action by gmaddaus on Scribd...”
“Dulany earlier told a version of her encounter in a first-person account for the Wrap, though she did not mention the alleged assault.”
“The woman, Melissa Thompson, accuses Weinstein of luring her to his hotel room for a meeting in 2011 and then forcibly raping her.”
““Thompson was fighting back, but could not out-muscle him,” the lawsuit states.”
““Thompson closed her eyes, traumatized, praying for the assault to end.”Earlier that day, Thompson said that she went to Weinstein’s Tribeca office to pitch him on a marketing startup called Intercast Networks.”
“According to the suit, she made a video recording of the encounter on her laptop.”
“As she explained the company’s services, she alleges that Weinstein began to caress her legs.”
“He promised to make a deal that afternoon if she would meet him for a drink at the Tribeca Grand Hotel, the suit alleges.”
“Once there, he brought her to his hotel room, where the alleged rape occurred.”
“The complaint also alleges that Thompson sought help from the law firm of Benjamin Brafman last fall, and turned over her video evidence to the firm not realizing that Brafman was representing Weinstein.”


"Gmaddaus's Weinstein Miramax class action on Scribd..."
"Dulani earlier told her story in the first person, but she didn't mention the attack."
"The woman, Melissa Thompson, accused Weinstein of luring her to a hotel room for a meeting in 2011 and then forcibly raping her."
"Thompson was fighting back, but failed to convince him," the lawsuit said
"Thompson closed his eyes, was traumatized and prayed for the end of the attack." Earlier that day, Thompson said she went to Weinstein's Tribeca office to sell him a marketing startup called intercast networks
"According to the prosecution, she recorded the encounter on her laptop."
"When she explained the company's service, she claimed that Weinstein began to stroke her leg."
"He promised that if she had a drink with him at Tribeca that afternoon, he would come to an agreement with her."
"As soon as he got there, he took her to the hotel room where there was the so-called rape."
The complaint also alleges that Thompson sought help from Benjamin braffman last fall and handed her video evidence to the law firm, which did not realize that braffman was Weinstein's agent



Number  488
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...she truly loves her husband.”Although they faced plenty of backlash for the incident, the source added that the 747, which Travel & Leisure noted could hold up to 660 passengers and is the same model of plane as Air Force One, doesn’t actually belong to West.”
“I’ve never been on one before.”
“Kim Kardashian knows the private 747 plane she and husband Kanye West took to Tokyo was “unnecessary,” a source tells PEOPLE, but she isn’t apologizing for the extravagance.”
“The couple faced backlash on social media after Kardashian showed off the massive—and nearly empty—interior of the commercial-size airliner on her Instagram stories.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““No big deal, just taking a private 747,” Kardashian said in the series of videos, in which she filmed West, 41, walking up to the “double decker” plane.”
““This is how he does it now.”
“Only 747s, private.”
“I’ve never even heard of this, but whatever.”The insider says Kardashian-West accompanied West to Japan for an “artistic trip.”“He feels very inspired and creative at the moment, so she wants to be supportive,” the source says.”
““She is aware of the 747 backlash—it wasn’t her idea.”


“…… She really loves her husband Although they met with strong opposition in this incident, the source added that the 747 plane does not actually belong to the West. The travel and leisure company pointed out that the 747 plane can accommodate 660 passengers, which is the same model as air force one
"I've never used it."
"Kim Kardashian knows that her 747 private plane to Tokyo with her husband Kanye West is" unnecessary, "a source told people, but she did not apologize for the extravagance
"The couple met with strong opposition on social media after Kardashian showed off the huge and almost empty internal structure of the commercial airliner on instagram."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's no big deal. It's just a private 747," Kardashian said in the video series, taking pictures of 41 year old West walking toward a "double deck" plane
"That's what he's doing now."
"Only 747, private."
"I've never heard of this, but anyway." Kardashian West accompanied West on an "Art Tour" to Japan, the person familiar with the matter said. "He feels inspired and creative now, so she wants to support him," the source said
"She knew the 747 backlash, it wasn't her idea."



Number  489
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After all, this will give you another excuse to watch the show again (not that you really need one).”
“Don't feel bad if you didn't catch all of these well-concealed details.”
“It's so easy to be distracted by all the shenanigans that Rachel, Ross, Joey, Monica, Chandler, and Phoebe get up to that die-hard fans can still miss some of these Easter eggs, even after repeated viewings.”
“...show...”
“It s one of those feel good shows that demands to be watched over and over again but even those who have watched the series repeatedly over the decades might not have spotted all of the hidden details in the...”
“The sitcom was must watch viewing during its original run from 1994 to 2004, and reached even more fans after the entire series began streaming on Netflix.”
“Hidden Friends Details Almost No One NoticesLet's be honest, you've probably watched the iconic television show Friends more times than you can count, right?”


"After all, it'll give you another excuse to watch the show again (not to say you really need one)."
"Don't feel bad if you don't grasp all these well hidden details."
"It's easy for people to be distracted by these pranks, so that Rachel, Ross, Joey, Monica, Chandler and Phoebe get up and even after watching them over and over again, die hard fans will still miss some Easter eggs."
“… Show
"It's a program that makes people feel good and requires people to watch it over and over again, but even those who have watched it over and over for decades may not find all the details hidden in it..."
"This sitcom had to be watched during its premiere from 1994 to 2004, and after the whole series started playing on Netflix, it had even more fans."
"The hidden details of friends are barely noticed. Let's be honest, you may have watched the iconic TV show more than you can count, right?"



Number  490
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think it was love at first sight, we connected on a level that I've never connected with anybody before, he was just my rock, my everything.'”
“He was pictured grabbing dinner with friends in West Hollywood Monday night, just hours before his the grim news broke.”
“So sad: Wilmer, 38, is reportedly 'completely devastated' over her overdose on Tuesday.”
“...that had these repercussions...”
“The insider continued She s been honest with him about her relapse as she has with her family friends fans and the entire public especially with her new song but he didn t think it was this severe and that she would be struggling so much and have a situation...”
“'He was not aware that her issues were this severe and intense at this time.'”
“...make a romantic relationship work a source told Us Weekly...”
“Ex The 38 year old who dated the singer for six years was spotted entering Cedars Sinai Medical Center in Los Angeles on Wednesday pictured February 2016 Wilmer is completely devastated and he still loves Demi and it was just a matter of scheduling and time that they needed to...”
“Sources close to the That 70s Show star, who was Demi's significant other between 2010 and 2016, revealed he was was 'completely devastated' after hearing about her heroin overdose.”
“I thought 'I have to have him,' but I was only 17 and he was like, 'Get away from me...When I turned 18 we started dating.”


"I think it's love at first sight, our relationship has reached a level I've never contacted with anyone, he's just my rock, everything to me."
"On Monday night, he was photographed having dinner with friends in West Hollywood, just hours before the bad news came out."
"It's sad: Wilmer, 38, was reported to have" completely collapsed "on Tuesday after taking an overdose
“… It has these effects... "
"The insider continued that she was as candid about his relapse as she was to her family, friends, fans and the public, especially her new song, but he didn't think it was so serious, she would struggle so much, such a situation appeared..."
"He didn't realize that her problem was so serious and intense at this time."
“… Let a romantic relationship work. A source tells us that
"The 38 year old former singer dated Demi for six years and was found to have entered the cedars Sinai Medical Center in Los Angeles. The photo was taken in February 2016. Wilmer collapsed completely. He still loves Demi. All they need is time and timing..."
"The 70's star was Demi's other half from 2010 to 2016. People familiar with the matter said that after hearing that Demi had overdosed heroin, Demi felt" completely collapsed. "
"I thought, 'I have to have him,' but I'm only 17 years old and he said, 'stay away from me When I was 18, we started dating. "



Number  491
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This also marks Bey's first performance since the 2017 Grammy Awards and her first concert set since late 2016.”
“Minutes before hitting the stage, the superstar singer hit up her Instagram to post pictures of her on stage in her elaborate costumes.”
“After rocking her Egyptian-inspired ensemble, the mother of three quickly changed into a yellow sweatshirt, jean shorts and glittering boots, which was also custom-made by Rousting, and broke into "Formation."”
“...and then broke into her hit "Crazy in Love."”
“She opened the set by asking the excited crowd, "Y'all ready Coachella?"”
“The chart-topping singer first appeared onstage with a slew of backup dancers and an elaborate leotard, cape and headdress created by Olivier Rousteing of Balmain.”
“Beyoncé has become the first black woman to headline the music festival.”
“But that's not all, it's been confirmed that Bey will be joined fellow stars and for a throwback moment.”
“...took the stage on Saturday for her long-anticipated performance at Coachella 2018, following her cancellation of her headlining set at the annual music festival last year due to her pregnancy with her twins.”
“She's back!”


"It also marks Bei's first performance since the 2017 Grammy Awards and her first concert since the end of 2016."
"A few minutes before she came on stage, the superstar singer posted photos of her on instagram dressed in exquisite clothes."
"After shaking the Egyptian ensemble, the mother of three quickly changed into a yellow sweatshirt, denim shorts and sparkling boots, which were also customized by routing and broke into the formation."
“… Then she broke into her hit show crazy love. "
She began by asking the excited audience, "are you ready, cochella?"
"When the number one singer first appeared on stage, there was a group of dancers, as well as an elaborate corset, Cape and headdress, all created by Olivier rousteing of balman."
"Beyonce has become the first black woman to make the headlines of a music festival."
"But that's not all. It has been confirmed that Beck will join other stars and have a moment to go back."
“…… She appeared on the stage of her long-awaited 2018 cochella concert on Saturday, and last year she canceled the headlines at the annual music festival because she was pregnant with twins. "
"She's back!"



Number  492
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I think it’s better to respectfully step away from the discussion.””
“I’d rather respectfully not enter it today.”In 2014, Dylan Farrow – who is one of the star’s three children with ex Mia Farrow – publicly claimed that Allen molested her as a child.”
“(Photo by Rich Fury/Getty Images)Woody Allen is the one topic Kate Winslet won’t speak out on.”
“The Oscar winner, 42, graces the cover of a recent Variety issue where she stays away from the controversy that follows the director following molestation accusations.”
“Winslet is starring in Allen’s latest film Wonder Wheel opposite Justin Timberlake.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Asked whether the allegations against Allen played “a factor in your decision to star in his new film,” Winslet said, “Um.”
“It’s just a difficult discussion.”
“Allen adamantly denied Dylan’s claims at the time.”
“We’re always as actors going to say the wrong thing.”


"I think it's better to respectfully stay away from the discussion."
"I'd rather not be here today." In 2014, Dylan Farrow publicly claimed that Allen had sexually harassed her as a child. Dylan is one of the three children of the star and former Mia Farrow
(Photo by rich fury / Getty Images) Woody Allen is one of the topics Kate Winslet doesn't want to talk about publicly. "
The 42 year old Oscar winner appeared on the cover of the latest variety show, avoiding the controversy over the director's alleged indecency
Winslet is playing opposite Justin Timberlake in Allen's latest movie, magic wheel
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Asked whether the charges against Allen "were a factor in your decision to play in his new film," Winslet said, "well."
"It's just a difficult discussion."
"Allen strongly denied Dylan's claim at that time."
"As actors, we always say the wrong thing."



Number  493
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here...”
“The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week...”
“It's supposed to give an inside look at how people may or may not be lured into these types of groups (i.e.”
“Of course, The Institute of The Higher Mind is not Scientology - it's formatted as a place where people are looking to improve their lives, not as a religion.”
“But then they’ll watch and realise it’s not," Abrahams added.”
“"I’m happy for people to think, 'Oh, this must be the Tom and Katie story.'”
“While Holmes and Cruise's marriage may not be the only inspiration for The Arrangement, it's hard to believe it didn't cross any of the team's minds.”
“And, by the way, that goes back to the golden age of Hollywood."”
“He said, "If you and I took a minute, we could probably come up with 10 couples that we’ve heard might be not real or might have been arranged.”
“Creator Jonathan Abrahams told THR that the team was "inspired by rumours we have all heard."”


"The independent would like to inform you of the offer and updates by email. Please check the box. If you would like to contact, please read our complete mailing list and agree to the terms..."
"The independent would like to inform you of the offer and updates by email. Please check the box. If you would like to contact, please read our complete mailing list. Agree terms here independent culture newsletters best movie music TV broadcast will be sent directly to your in box every week..."
"It should give people an inner perspective on how people are lured into these types of groups (i.e
"Of course, the Higher Institute of the mind is not Scientology - it takes the form of a place where people want to improve their lives, not religion."
"But they'll see it and realize it's not," Abraham added
"I'm glad people think, 'Oh, this must be the story of Tom and Katie.'"
"Although the marriage of Holmes and cruise may not be the only inspiration for this arrangement, it's hard to believe that no one on the team thought of it."
"It goes back to Hollywood's golden age, by the way."
"He said," if you and I spend some time, we might come up with 10 couples, and we've heard that they may not be real, or they may be arranged. "
Creator Jonathan Abrahams told the times that the team was "inspired by rumors we've all heard."



Number  494
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“WWE News And Rumors[display-posts tag=”WWE” wrapper=”ul” posts_per_page=”4″]”
“Follow him and 106.7 The Fan on Twitter.”
“(CBSDC) — When WWE Superstar Jimmy Uso got caught having marital relations with his wife Trinity, who also happens to be a pro wrestler, on the reality show Total Divas, it was, well… real.”
“In one of the most memorable moments of the second season of the hit show on E!, Uso and his WWE Diva bride, known on-camera as Naomi, were sharing a luxury bus with a number of other talents, including the recently wed Daniel Bryan and Brie Bella.”
“Because of the close quarters, there was a strict policy against heightened levels of intimacy.”
“But, as has been proven time and again in pro wrestling, rules are made to be broken.”
““I honestly, I couldn’t hold out any longer,” Uso said.”
““They caught us flat out.”Uso, one half of the WWE tag team champions with his twin brother Jey, said you could tell he wasn’t acting just by the expression on his face.”
““Somebody sent me a picture of the way I was looking, it was hilarious,” he said.”
““Ya know, I’m on the road 24-7, so I can’t even see my wife half the time so I had to go there… I told my mom not to watch!”Filming for the third season of Total Divas began two weeks ago, according to Uso.”


"WWE news and rumors
"Follow him and 106.7 fans on twitter."
(cbsdc) - when WWE superstar Jimmy USO was found to be married to his wife Trinity on the reality show total divas, who happens to be a professional wrestler, it was, um actual
"One of the most unforgettable moments of the second season of e-show! Yosso and his WWE queen bride, known in the camera as Naomi, share a luxury bus with other geniuses, including recently married Daniel Bryan and bribella
"Because of the close relationship, there is a strict policy against increasing intimacy."
"But in professional wrestling, it has been proved time and again that the rules are to be broken."
"To be honest, I can't hold on any longer," Urso said
"They got us." Yosso and his twin brother Jay, who are half champions of WWE tag, said you can see from the expression on his face that he's not acting
"Someone sent me a picture of what I looked like at that time, which was funny," he said
"You know, I'm on the road 24-7 hours, so half the time I don't see my wife, so I have to go there I told my mother not to look! According to USO, filming for the third season of total queen began two weeks ago



Number  495
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sharing a photo of one of her gifts, Kardashian West gushed, “Look at this Wang bag that North got.”Image zoom Credit: Kim Kardashian/Instagram...”
“In one video, the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star also confirmed North’s father Kanye West was in town from Wyoming to celebrate the happy occasion.”
“Although North West won’t officially turn 5 until June 15 and Penelope Disick has to wait until July 8 to turn 6, the pair teamed up for a joint unicorn-themed birthday bash on Sunday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““North and P!”
“Twin girls, turn around!” Kim Kardashian West called out to the cute cousins in a video showing off the pair’s identical rainbow robes and matching bathing suits.”
““Happy birthday ladies,” the proud mama continued.”
“Image zoom Credit Kim Kardashian Instagram North West and Penelope Disick While documenting what she described as North and Penelope s unicorn birthday party the KKW Beauty mogul made sure to highlight all of party s sweet treats which included doughnuts matching unicorn cakes and rice crispy pops with little...”
“...unicorn horns and ears...”
““Here, come with daddy,” she can be heard saying to her almost 5 year old.”


"Look at this ace bag that North got," Kardashian West gushed as she shared a picture of a gift
"In a video," follow Kardashian "also confirmed that North's father Kanye West came from Wyoming to celebrate this happy moment
"Although the northwest won't officially turn five until June 15, and Penelope Disick won't turn six until July 8, they held a joint birthday party with Unicorn theme on Sunday."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"North and P!"
"Twin girls, turn around! "As like as two peas in the same breath, Kim Kardashian West (Kim Kardashian West) shouted to her lovely cousins in a video showing two people's identical rainbow robes and matching swimsuits.
"Happy birthday, ladies," the proud mother continued
"When Kim Kardashian instagram North West and Penelope disc recorded the unicorn birthday parties she described in North and Penelope, kkw beauty tycoon made sure to highlight all the party desserts, including donuts matched with Unicorn cake and cookies
“… Unicorn's horns and ears... "
"Come on, come with Dad," she said to the nearly five-year-old



Number  496
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Oh, the irony!””
“But I guess it’s time for me to become an actual real housewife of sorts.”
“The Real Housewives of Orange County alum, who is expecting twin boys with her husband Jim Edmonds in July, celebrated the boys’ impending arrival with friends and family over the weekend.”
“(A “sprinkle” is a lighter baby shower designed to celebrate the upcoming birth of a second, third or fourth child.”
“Presents are not the point, as Mama already has the necessities!)”
“Edmonds, 33, shared a series of photos from the party on Instagram.”
“She captioned the Saturday, March 31, post: “An unforgettable day!”Guests nibbled on blue macaroons and vanilla cupcakes and toasted the Bravo personality with non-alcoholic Ready to Pop bubbly.”
“And all revelers went home knowing a little bit more about multiples!”
“The dessert table featured a laminated sheet called Twinsies Trivia.”
“Fun Fact: 22 percent of twins are left-handed!”


"Oh, how ironic!"
"But I think it's time to be a real housewife."
"The Real Housewives of the Orange County Alumni Association, who were pregnant with twin boys in July with their husband Jim Edmonds, celebrate the coming of the boys with their relatives and friends at the weekend."
"(the sprinkler" is a lighter baby shower designed to celebrate the birth of a second, third or fourth child. "
"Gifts are not the point, because mom already has necessities!"
"Edmonds, 33, shared a series of party photos on instagram."
In her post on Saturday, March 31, she wrote: "unforgettable day! "Guests nibble on blue almond cakes and vanilla cupcakes and toast with non-alcoholic improvised sparkling wine."
"All the revelers have gone home and learned more about multiples!"
"There's a piece of laminated paper called twinsies trivia on the dessert table."
Interesting fact: 22% of twins are left-handed



Number  497
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Deadpool 2 is set to hit U.S. theaters May 18.”
“You can check out the photos from the Make-A-Wish visit below.”
“Internet troll: 0.”
“Image via InstagramDeadpool: 1.”
“That’s just my .02 cents,” he responded.”
“Deadpool is Rated R. If my kid went through a fraction of the shit these kids deal with daily, I think they can watch whatever they like.”
““Yup.”
“The commenter wrote: “Guys [D]eadpool is [an] R rated movie and those kids are watching it…I think something is wrong here [angry face emoji].”Reynolds hit back.”
“CloseOne apparently soulless Instagram user criticized the actor for allowing young children to visit the set of Deadpool, which centers on an anti-superhero who has a habit of dropping f-bombs.”
“It was a heart-warming moment that Reynolds later shared on Instagram; however, not everyone was pleased with what they saw.”


"Death pool 2 will be released in the United States on May 18."
"You can see the photos below."
Internet Troll: 0
"Images obtained through instagram Deadpool: 1."
"That's just my 0.02 cent," he replied
"Deadpool's rating is r. If my kids go through a small amount of shit that these kids deal with every day, I think they can see anything they like. "
"Yes."
"Guys, eadpool is an R-rated movie, and the kids are watching I think something's wrong here (angry expression). " Reynolds hit back
"An apparently soulless instagram user criticized the actor for allowing children to visit the dead pool crew, which features an anti superhero with the habit of throwing F-bombs."
"Reynolds later shared this exciting moment on instagram; however, not everyone was satisfied with what they saw."



**Something goes wrong**
“RELATED VIDEO: Dancing Under the Stars: Julianne Hough’s Perfect Wedding to Brooks Laich: ‘We Never Stopped Looking at Each Other’To celebrate the big day, Earles had the support of multiple of his Dadnapped castmates, including Emily Osment, Moises Arias, George Newbern and Phillip David Lewis.”
““I only came for the cake ” she captioned a kissing photo of the couple cutting their multi-tiered white cake.”
“Drysen also took to social media to share an image from the reception.”
““I love how every day you open my eyes to beauty and unexpected joys that exist all around us.”“You are my other half and no one will fit me as perfectly as you do,” Drysen, who donned a white, strapless wedding gown, told Earles during the ceremony.”
““I am madly in love with you,” he told his bride in his vows during the ceremony.”
“Beyond blown away,” Earles, 40, captioned a snapshot video of their big day.”
“#happilyeverearles2017 @andhervisuals captured the day beautifully.”
“She’s perfect.”
““Here’s a glimpse at the the most magical day of my life.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Related video:" dancing under the stars: the perfect wedding of Julian Hoff and Brooks rich ":" we never stop looking at each other. "To celebrate this important day, earls has the support of many of his fathers, including Emily Osment, Moys arias, George newborn and Philip David Lewis."
"I'm just here to buy a cake," she wrote in a photo of the couple kissing as they cut a multi-layer white cake
"Dreisen also shared a picture of the reception through social media."
"I love that you let me see the beauty and unexpected happiness around us every day." "You're the other half of me, and no one will fit me as perfectly as you do," dreisen, dressed in a white strapless wedding dress, told earls at the wedding
"I love you madly," he told the bride at the wedding
"After being blown away by the wind," earls, 40, wrote in a snapshot video of their big day
"# happy early 2017 @ her video captures the day perfectly."
"She's perfect."
"This is the most amazing day of my life."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



**Something goes wrong**
“Meanwhile, Vito previously dated supermodel Heidi Klum, 45, on and off from 2014 until 2017 with the two even attending Wimbledon 2016.”
“The actress was previously married to Johnny Depp from 2015 until 2016, with their high-profile divorce finalized in 2017.”
“Amber most recently dated American businessman Elon Musk, but they parted ways after a year, and he has since moved on with musician Grimes.”
“Stylish: Vito too dressed up for the match in a blue button-up shirt and navy trousersBlossoming relationship: The pair were also spotted walking into the stands holding hands earlier in the dayThe pair were also spotted walking into the stands holding hands earlier in the day.”
“With the help of some product, his brunette locks were slicked back.”
“Vito too dressed up for the match in a blue button-up shirt and navy trousers.”
“...pair were extremely comfortable with each other and between their kisses were seen taking selfies and had their arms around each other...”
“Sports fan Amber stunned in a green jumpsuit with a modest v neck cut for the tennis match Loved up According to onlookers the pair were extremely comfortable with each other and between their kisses were seen taking selfies and had their arms around each other According to onlookers the...”
“The actress sported a radiant complexion complete with well-defined and bronzed cheekbones.”
“She had her blonde locks pinned back with a few front tresses left out to frame her face.”


"At the same time, Vito had been dating 45 year old supermodel Heidi Cramer intermittently from 2014 to 2017, and they even participated in Wimbledon in 2016."
"The actress's previous marriage to Johnny Depp lasted from 2015 to 2016, and their high-profile divorce was finalized in 2017."
"Amber recently dated Elon Musk, an American businessman, but they broke up a year later, and then he continued to date Grimes, a musician."
"Fashion: Vito entered the competition in a blue button shirt and a pair of Navy Pants, an intimate relationship: earlier in the day, the two were also found walking into the stands hand in hand. Earlier in the day, they were also found walking into the stands hand in hand
"With the help of some product, his dark hair was combed back."
"Vito is dressed up in a blue button shirt and Navy trousers
“…… They get along very well. Between the kisses, some people see them taking self portraits and holding each other.... "
"Amber, a sports fan, is wearing a green one-piece suit with a V-neck cut. It's a favorite tennis match for the audience. They get along very well. You can see a selfie between the two kissing, and they hug each other.... "
"The actress is radiant, with well-defined cheekbones and bronze."
"She pinned her golden hair to the back and left a few in front to decorate her face."



Number  500
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.2692307692307692
Correct number is  126
Total number is  468
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
